***
A new guy in town walks into a bar and notices a large jar filled to the brim with $10 bills
A new guy in town walks into a bar and notices a large jar filled to the brim with $10 bills. The man approaches the bartender and asks, "What's up with the jar?"

"Well, you pay $10, and if you pass three tests, then you get all the money."

"What are the three tests?" asks the man

"Gotta pay first."

So the guy gives him the $10, and the bartender adds it to the jar.

"OK, here's what you have to do. First, you have to drink that whole bottle of pepper tequila -- the WHOLE thing at once -- and you can't make a face while doing it. Second, there's a pit bull chained up out back with a sore tooth. You have to remove the tooth with your bare hands. Third, there is a 90-year-old woman upstairs who's never had an orgasm in her life. You gotta make things right for her."

"Well, I know I've paid my $10," says the man, "but I'm not an idiot. No wonder you've collected so much money -- that's impossible!"

The new guy proceeds to drink several whiskeys, and eventually, he gets up his nerve.

"Wherez zat teeqeelah?" he slurs.

He grabs the bottle of pepper tequila with both hands and downs it, gulp by gulp. Tears are streaming down his cheeks, but he doesn't make a face. Next, he staggers out back. Everyone in the bar hears a huge scuffle outside -- barking, yelping and growling, then silence.

Just when they think the man must be dead, he staggers back into the bar with his shirt ripped and gashes across his body.

"NOW," he says, "wherez at ol' lady with the sore tooth?"
***
A guy walks into a bar in West Virginia and orders a white wine.

All the hillbillies sitting around the bar look up from their beer and whiskey,expecting to see some pitiful Yankee from the north. 
The bartender says, "You ain't from around here, are ya?" 
The guy says, "No, I'm from Canada." 
" Canada " The bartender says, "What do you do in Canada?" 
The guy says, "I'm a taxidermist." 
The bartender says, "A taxidermist? What in the hell is a taxidermist? Do you drive a taxi?" 
"No," says the Canadian "I don't drive a taxi, I mount animals." 
The bartender grins and hollers, 
"It's okay boys. He's one of us."
***
An Irishman walks into a bar and orders three shots...
Seamus walks into a bar and asks the bartender for three shots of Bushmills and three pints of Guinness. 

"Rough day, friend?" the bartender asks as he pours the drinks.

"Nah - it's for me brothers. The three of us used to drink together back home in Dublin when we were younger. Now Mick's in London, Paddy's in Australia, and I'm here in New York. We hardly ever see each other these days, but when we left home, we swore we'd drink like this in honor of the times we was together."

Seamus returns every Friday night, always ordering the same thing. The lone Irishman with three shots and three pints becomes a familiar sight to the other patrons.

Then, one Friday night, Seamus comes in looking downcast. He walks up to the bartender and orders two shots and two pints. A stunned silence falls over the regular patrons. 

"Oh, Seamus. I'm so sorry for your loss," says the bartender. "Which brother did you lose? Mick or Paddy?"

"Oh, no! Me brothers are fine!" says Seamus. "It's just that me wife's made me quit drinking!"
***
Grandpa was summoned for an audit.
The IRS decides to audit Grandpa, and summons him to the IRS office. The IRS auditor was not surprised when Grandpa showed up with his attorney. 

The auditor said, ‘Well, sir, you have an extravagant lifestyle and no full-time employment, which you explain by saying that you win money gambling. I’m not sure the IRS finds that believable.’

‘I’m a great gambler, and I can prove it,’ says Grandpa. ‘How about a demonstration?’

The auditor thinks for a moment and says, ‘Okay. Go ahead. ‘

Grandpa says, ‘I’ll bet you a thousand dollars that I can bite my own eye.’

The auditor thinks a moment and says, ‘It’s a bet.’

Grandpa removes his glass eye and bites it. The auditor’s jaw drops.

Grandpa says, ‘Now, I’ll bet you two thousand dollars that I can bite my other eye.’

The auditor can tell Grandpa isn’t blind, so he takes the bet.

Grandpa removes his dentures and bites his good eye. The stunned auditor now realizes he has wagered and lost three grand, with Grandpa’s attorney as a witness. He starts to get nervous.

‘Want to go double or nothing?’ Grandpa asks ‘I’ll bet you six thousand dollars that I can stand on one side of your desk, and pee into that wastebasket on the other side, and never get a drop anywhere in between.’

The auditor, twice burned, is cautious now, but he looks carefully and decides there’s no way this old guy could possibly manage that stunt, so he agrees again.

Grandpa stands beside the desk and unzips his pants, but although he strains mightily, he can’t make the stream reach the wastebasket on the other side, so he pretty much urinates all over the auditor’s desk.

The auditor leaps with joy, realizing that he has just turned a major loss into a huge win. 

But Grandpa’s own attorney moans and puts his head in his hands.

‘Are you okay?’ the auditor asks. 

‘Not really,’ says the attorney. ‘This morning, when Grandpa told me he’d been summoned for an audit, he bet me twenty-five thousand dollars that he could come in here and pee all over your desk and that you’d be happy about it.’
***
On his Birthday, Peter was really upset...
On his Birthday, Peter was really upset because none of his family members or near and dear ones wished him. As he walked into his office, his secretary Anna said, "Good Morning Boss, and by the way Happy Birthday!" He felt a bit better knowing that at least someone remembered. In the lunch time Anna knocked on his door and said, "You know, it's such a beautiful day outside, and it's your Birthday, why don't we go out for lunch, just you and me." Peter happily agreed They had their lunch but on the way back to the office, Anna said, "You know, it's such a beautiful day... We don't have to go right back to the office, do we?" Peter replied "I suppose not. What do you have in mind?" She said, "Let's go to my apartment, it's just around the corner." After arriving at her apartment, Anna said, "Boss if you don't mind, I'm going to step into the bedroom for just a moment. I'll be right back." "Ok." He nervously replied. She went into the bedroom and, after a couple of minutes; she came out carrying a huge birthday cake... Followed by his wife, his kids, and dozens of his friends, and co-workers, all singing "Happy Birthday". And Peter just sat there... On the couch... Naked...
***
Old joke is old but still great
Sherlock Holmes and Dr Watson were going camping. They pitched their tent under the stars and went to sleep. Sometime in the middle of the night Holmes woke Watson up and said: "Watson, look up at the sky, and tell me what you see."
Watson replied: "I see millions and millions of stars."
Holmes said: "And what do you deduce from that?"
Watson replied: "Well, if there are millions of stars, and if even a few of those have planets, it’s quite likely there are some planets like Earth out there. And if there are a few planets like Earth out there, there might also be life."
And Holmes said: "Watson, you idiot, it means that somebody stole our tent."
***
A nun in a pub
A nun, really needing to go to the bathroom, walked into a neighborhood pub. The place was hopping with music and dancing but every once in a while the lights would turn off. Each time after the lights would go out the place would erupt into cheers. However, when the revelers saw the nun, the room went dead silent. She walked up to the bartender, and asked," May I please use the restroom?"

The bartender replied, "I really don't think you should."

"Why not? " the nun asked.

"Well, there is a statue of a naked man in there, and his most private part is covered only by a fig leaf. "

"Nonsense," said the nun, "I'll just look the other way."

So the bartender showed the nun the door at the top of the stairs, and she proceeded to the restroom. After a few minutes, she came back out, and the whole place was hopping with music and dancing again. However, they did stop just long enough to give the nun a loud round of applause.

She went to the bartender and said, "Sir, I don't understand. Why did they applaud for me just because I went to the restroom?"

"Well, now they know you're one of us," said the bartender. "Would you like a drink?"

"But, I still don't understand," said the puzzled nun.

"You see," laughed the bartender, "every time the fig leaf is lifted on the statue, the lights go out in the whole place. Now, how about that drink, Sister ??"
***
The wise old Jewish man
A CNN journalist heard about a very old Jewish man who had been going to the Western Wall to pray, twice a day, every day, for a long, long time. 

So she went to check it out. She went to the Western Wall and there he was, walking slowly up to the holy site. 

She watched him pray and after about 45 minutes, when he turned to leave, using a cane and moving very slowly, she approached him for an interview. 

"Pardon me, sir, I'm Rebecca Smith from CNN. What's your name? 

"Morris Feinberg," he replied. 

"Sir, how long have you been coming to the Western Wall and praying?" 

"For about 60 years." 

"60 years! That's amazing! What do you pray for?" 

"I pray for peace between the Christians, Jews and the Muslims." 

"I pray for all the wars and all the hatred to stop." 

"I pray for all our children to grow up safely as responsible adults and to love their fellow man." 

"I pray that politicians tell us the truth and put the interests of the people ahead of their own interests."

"How do you feel after doing this for 60 years?" 

"Like I'm talking to a fucking wall."
 
***
A frog walks into a bank
A frog walks into a bank, and approaches the teller. He sees the tellers name tag read Paddy Black and says

"I'd like to take out a loan, Mrs. Black" 

"Certainly," says the teller, "how much would that be for?"

"One million dollars." replies the frog. "Don't worry, it's ok, I know the manager."

The teller is understandably taken aback by this, and asks if the frog has any collateral to cover this.

"As a matter of fact, I do!" says the frog, and he reaches into his pocket and hands over a tiny ceramic elephant.

"What?!" says the teller, "This is garbage! I can't take this!"

"Well, take it up with my father then!" The frog retorts.

"Oh yeah, and who might that be?" The teller is quickly getting more and more annoyed at the frog.

"Why, it's Keith Richards!" The frog is waiting impatiently, tapping his toe on the ground. "Now, can I have that loan or not?"

"Wait right here" the teller says, as she storms into the back room, looking for her manager. 

"There's a frog out there who claims to know you, and wants a million dollar loan. He claims his father his Keith Richards! He even gave me this as collateral," she says, holding up the elephant. "I mean, what even is this?"

The manager takes a look at the elephant and replies "It's a knick knack, Paddy Black, give the frog a loan. His old man's a rolling stone!"
***
A little girl goes to a pet shop and asks "Excuthe me do you have any widdle wabbits?"
The shop keepers heart melts. 

He gets down on his knees so that he is on her level and says, "Do you want a widdle white wabbit or a thoft, fuffy, bwack wabbit, or one like that widdle bwown one over there..?" 

The little girl blushes, rocks on her heels, puts her hands on her knees, leans forward and whispers . . . "I don't wealy fink my pyfon gives a phuc..
***
A bloke bumped in to me on the tube the other day and said, "Remember Leonardo Di Caprio."
Then the same fella followed me home from the pub and said, "Remember Leonardo Di Caprio."

Things then got out of hand when he tapped on my window at 11.30 that night and said, "Remember Leonardo Di Caprio."

I thought, "That's it, I'm going to the Police."

I told the officer I was being stalked and he asked if I could tell him anything about the man.

I said, "Yes, he reminds me of Leonardo Di Caprio."

***
Roger, 85, married Jenny, a lovely 25 year old
Since her new husband is so old, Jenny decides that after their wedding
she and Roger should have separate bedrooms, because she is concerned
that her new but aged husband may over-exert himself if they spend the
entire night together.

After the wedding festivities Jenny prepares herself for bed and the
expected knock on the door.

Sure enough the knock comes, the door opens and there is Roger, her 85
year old groom, ready for action. They unite as one.

All goes well, Roger takes leave of his bride, and she prepares to go to
sleep.

After a few minutes, Jenny hears another knock on her bedroom door, and
it's Roger,

Again he is ready for more 'action'. Somewhat surprised, Jenny consents
for more coupling.

When the newlyweds are done, Roger kisses his bride, bids her a fond
good night and leaves.

She is set to go to sleep again, but, aha, you guessed it - Roger is
back again, rapping on the door and is as fresh as a 25-year-old, ready
for more 'action'.

And, once more they enjoy each other.

But as Roger gets set to leave again, his young bride says to him, 'I am
thoroughly impressed that at your age you can perform so well and so
often. I have been with guys less than a third of your age who were only
good once. You are truly a great lover, Roger.'

Roger, somewhat embarrassed, turns to Jenny and says: 'You mean I was
here already?'
***
Go tell Meyer's wife . . .
Six retired Jewish Floridian fellows were playing poker in the condo clubhouse when Meyer loses $500 on a single hand, clutches his chest, and drops dead at the table.   Showing respect for their fallen comrade, the other five continue playing, but standing up.  
 
At the end of the game, Finkelstein looks around and asks, "So, who's gonna tell his wife?"
  
They cut the cards. Goldberg picks the low card and has to carry the news.  They tell him to be discreet, be gentle, don't make a bad situation any worse.  

"Discreet? I'm the most discreet person you'll ever meet. 
Discretion is my middle name. Leave it to me."  
 
Goldberg goes over to the Meyer's condo and knocks on the door. 
The wife answers through the door and asks what he wants? 

Goldberg declares, "Your husband just lost $500 in a poker game and is afraid to come home."  
 
"Tell him to drop dead!" yells the wife.
 
"I'll go tell him." says Goldberg.
***
An altar boy enters the box to confess...
'Bless me Father, for I have sinned. I have been with a loose girl.' The priest asks, 'Is that you, little Joey Pagano?' 'Yes, Father, it is.' 'And who was the girl you were with?' 'I can't tell you, Father, I don't want to ruin her reputation.' "Well, Joey, I'm sure to find out her name sooner or later so you may as well tell me now. Was it Tina Minetti?" 'I cannot say.' 'Was it Teresa Mazzarelli?' 'I'll never tell.' 'Was it Nina Capelli?' 'I'm sorry, but I cannot name her.' 'Was it Cathy Piriano?' 'My lips are sealed Father.' 'Well then, was it Rosa DiAngelo?' 'Please, Father, I cannot tell you.'

The priest sighs in frustration. 'You're very tight lipped, and I admire that. But you've sinned and have to atone. You cannot be an altar boy now for 4 months. Now you go and behave yourself.' Joey walks back to his pew, and his friend Franco slides over and whispers, 'What'd you get?' 'Four month's holiday and five excellent Leads.'
***
A zookeeper notices his prize gorilla was getting aggressive..
She wouldn't eat. She wouldn't sleep. And she constantly kept trying to attack the zookeeper. So, he did some research and found out female gorillas can become depressed and aggressive when deprived from sex. 

The zookeeper then looked around for another male gorilla for her to engage in intercourse, but unfortunately the zoo couldn't afford to import a male gorilla just for her to have sex. 

Giving his funding situation, he goes up to the janitor and asks him "Hey, for $500, would you have sex with this gorilla?"

The janitor thought about it for a minute, and then replied "Sure, on three conditions. First condition, I don't want to kiss her."

"Okay sure! I wouldn't expect you to!" 

The janitor then stated "Second condition. I don't want anyone knowing about this ordeal."

"Sure, fine! Not a problem! What's your third condition?"

Janitor said "Give me at least 2 weeks to come up with the $500"

Edit: a word
***
One last blow job
Some soldiers are deep in enemy lines and life's luck looks like it's about to run out. "Hey fellas before I die, I want one last blow job. Will one of you guys help me out?" The other soldiers are stunned. "No!" "Absolutely not!" "Go jack off or do what ever but we don't want any part of it!!" "Fine, I'll find some one who will." He climbs out of the trench, bullets raining past him as he runs forward into a another trench. Time passes and the soldiers think for sure he must have got hit and was dead, but just then, they see him stick his head out of the trench smoking a cigarette. He jumps out and casually strolls back to them. Once again bullets flying by. He jumps back down in the hole with the soldiers. "What the hell happened to you!?" The soldiers ask. "Fellas you wouldn't believe it. There was a nurse up there in that trench! We had sex in every position you can think of! It was glorious!!" One of the soldiers asks, "Well did you get your blow job then?" "No, I couldn't find her head!"
***
The wire brush
One of the few genuinely funny jokes I know that I originally learned in English:

During World War I, a British general is visiting an Army hospital.  He shakes the hand of one soldier, who is lying in bed.

"What's wrong with you, son?"

"Gonorrhea, Sir!"

"What is the treatment for gonorrhea in the British Army?"

"The wire brush, Sir!"

"What is your fondest desire?"

"To recover and to serve the King and the country, Sir!"

The general then turns to another soldier.

"What's wrong with you, son?"

"Hemorrhoids, Sir!"

"What is the treatment for hemorrhoids in the British Army?"

"The wire brush, Sir!"

"What is your fondest desire?"

"To recover and to serve the King and the country, Sir!"

The general then turns to a third soldier.

"What's wrong with you, son?"

(softly) "Laryngitis, Sir!"

"What is the treatment for laryngitis in the British Army?"

(softly) "The wire brush, Sir!"

"I see that you have difficulty speaking.  Is it true that your fondest desire is to recover and to serve the King and the country?"

(softly) "Nay, Sir.  It is to grab the wire brush before the others, Sir."
***
Two guys from Michigan die and wake up in hell.
Two guys from Michigan die and wake up in hell. The next day, the devil stops to check on them and sees them dressed in parkas, mittens and bomber hats, warming themselves around the fire.
The devil asks them, "What are you doing? Isn't it hot enough for you?"

The two guys reply, "Well, you know, we're from Michigan, the land of ice and snow and cold. We're just happy for a chance to warm up a bit, you know."

The devil decides that these two aren't miserable enough and turns up the heat. The next morning, he stops by again and there they are, still dressed in their parkas, mittens and hats.
The devil asks them again, "It's awfully hot down here, can't you guys feel that?"

Again, the guys reply, "Well, like we told you yesterday, we're from Michigan, the land of ice and snow and cold. We're just happy to warm up a little bit, you know."

The devil gets a little steamed up and he decides to fix the two guys. He cranks the heat up as high as it will go. The people are wailing and screaming everywhere. He stops by the room with the two guys from Michigan and finds them in light jackets and hats, grilling sausage and drinking beer. The devil is astonished. "Everyone down here is in abject misery, and you seem to be enjoying yourselves."

The two Michiganders reply, "Well, ya know, we don't get too much warm weather up there in Michigan, we've just got to have a cookout when the weather is this nice."

The devil is absolutely furious, he can hardly see straight. Finally, he comes up with an answer. These two love the heat because they have been cold all their lives. He decides to turn all the heat in hell off.

The next morning, the temperature is below zero, icicles are hanging everywhere, the people are shivering so bad, they are unable to wail, moan or gnash their teeth.
The devil smiles and heads for the room with the 2 Michiganders. He finds them back in their parkas, mittens and hats. They are jumping up and down and cheering.
The devil was dumbfounded. "I don't understand. When I turn the heat up, you're happy. Now it's freezing cold, and you're happy. What is wrong with you two?"

The Michiganders look at the devil in surprise. "Well, don't ya know - if hell froze over, that must mean. The Lions won the Super Bowl!"

***
A man, an ostrich, and a cat.
A man walks into a bar with an ostrich and a cat and sits at the bar. The bartender walks over to them and says, "What can I get for you?"
The man says "I'll have a beer", the ostrich says, "I'll have a beer", and the cat says, "I'll have half a beer and I'm not buying." So the bartender says, "OK, that will be $3.87."
The man reaches into his pocket and brings out the exact change and pays him. About an hour later the bartender goes back over to them and says, "What'll you guys have?"
The man says, "I'll have a beer", the ostrich says, "I'll have a beer", and the cat says "I'll have half a beer and I'm not buying." The bartender gets them their beer and says "That'll be $3.87."
The man reaches into his pocket and brings out the exact change and pays him. A couple of days later they come back into the bar and the bartender walks over and asks "What do you guys want today?"
The man says, "I'll have a scotch", the ostrich says, "I'll have a bourbon", and the cat says, "I'll have half a beer and I'm not buying." So the bartender says "OK, that will be $7.53." The man reaches into his pocket and brings out the exact change and pays him.
The bartender's curiosity got the best of him and he asks, "Why is it that every time I tell you the amount you owe you always have the exact change in you pocket?"
The man said, "I found a bottle with a genie in it and she granted me 3 wishes. My first wish was that I always have the exact change in my pocket for anything I buy."
The bartender says, "That's a great wish...better than asking for a million dollars. A million dollars will run out but that never will. What were your other 2 wishes?"
The man says, "That's where I screwed up. I asked for a chick with long legs and a tight pussy." 
***
Two guys go moose hunting.....
A bush-pilot drops Bob and Ted, two moose hunters, at a remote lake in Northern Ontario.  He tells them that he’ll be back in a week, and warns them that his plane won’t be able to take off with more than one moose.

The next week he returns, and sure enough the hunters have bagged two moose.  The pilot tells them there’s no way they can take off with the two moose.

Ted says, “I don’t know, the pilot last year took off with two moose.”

To which Bob adds, “Yeah, but maybe he wasn’t a total pussy!”

Not wanting to be outdone, the pilot loads up everything and they start to move down the lake.  

The plane is gathering speed, but the pines on the shore are rapidly approaching.  Finally the plane gets airborne, but one wing clips the top of a tree.  The plane spins, crashes into the trees, and breaks apart.

Sometime later Ted regains consciousness and begins searching for his buddy.  He finds him, and when he wakes him up Bob asks, “Do you have any idea where we are?”

Ted replies, “I think about 200 yards further than last year.”

***
A toothpaste factory had a problem.
 They sometimes shipped empty boxes
without the tube inside. This challenged their perceived quality with the
buyers and distributors. Understanding how important the relationship with
them was, the CEO of the company assembled his top people. They decided to
hire an external engineering company to solve their empty boxes problem. The
project followed the usual process: budget and project sponsor allocated,
RFP, and third-parties selected.  Six months (and $8 million) later they had
a fantastic solution - on time, on budget, and high quality. Everyone in
the project was pleased.

They solved the problem by using a high-tech precision scale that would
sound a bell and flash lights whenever a toothpaste box weighed less than it
should. The line would stop, someone would walk over, remove the defective
box, and then press another button to re-start the line. As a result of the
new package monitoring process, no empty boxes were being shipped out of the
factory.

With no more customer complaints, the CEO felt the $8 million was well
spent. He then reviewed the line statistics report and discovered the number
of empty boxes picked up by the scale in the first week was consistent with
projections, however, the next three weeks were zero! The estimated rate
should have been at least a dozen boxes a day. He had the engineers check
the equipment, they verified the report as accurate.

Puzzled, the CEO traveled down to the factory, viewed the part of the line
where the precision scale was installed, and observed just ahead of the new
$8 million dollar solution sat a $20 desk fan blowing the empty boxes off
the belt and into a bin. He asked the line supervisor what that was about.


"Oh, that," the supervisor replied, "Bert, the kid from maintenance, put it
there because he was tired of walking over, removing the box and re-starting
the line every time the bell rang."

***
A man wakes up in a dingy slum
with no memory of how he got there. He wanders around aimlessly before he finds even one person who will talk to him. Some ratty beggar on the street turns out to be nice enough to explain where he is.

"You're in the afterlife!" he tells the man, "But you must have been a real shithead when you were alive, because this is the fourth ring, and only the worst people come here."

All of a sudden, a siren goes off, one of those air-raid things. The man is terrified but the beggar gets up calmly and leads him to a big, dilapidated warehouse where thousands of other similarly unkempt souls are gathering. When the man asks why they're all here, the beggar points to a line of folding tables against the wall. Each table has some moldy bread, cups of dingy water, and some bowls of broth so thin they could have just run out of cups. Only then does the man realize how hungry he is. A guard in heavy body armor blows a whistle and all the people arrange themselves into three lines.

The beggar is helpful enough to explain them for the man. "That one's the bread line, that's the broth line, and that's the water line. All the food here is free, but if you want to get out of this maggot hole, you've got to work, because the gate guards into the third ring ask five hundred dollars to get through. I've heard the food is better there."

So the man gets his food. It's abominable, and right then and there, he vows to make five hundred dollars and get into the third ring. Unfortunately for him, very few people need work in the afterlife, especially when all of them are saving up to emigrate. Even still, after ten years of hard work, eating the moldy bread and indistinguishable soup and water, he finally saves up enough money. The guards let him through and he finds himself in the third ring. It's nothing too fancy, if anything, it's a bit below average for a real city, but to his eyes it is paradise. All the guards look much friendlier, and the houses and buildings, while not spacious or lavish, are at least up to code. And to his surprise, he runs right into a familiar former beggar as he crosses the street.

"What are the odds?" they both ask and they get to conversing. The beggar, it turns out, only managed to make it in himself a few months back. Their conversation is interrupted, however, by what sounds like a school bell. When the man seems confused, the beggar leads him to what looks like a giant gymnasium. Here, people are gathering once again, and the man begins to understand. On a line of folding tables against one wall are stacks of hot dogs, big bowls of salad, and solo cups full of fresh lemonade. A cop shouts for everyone's attention and directs them all to stand in three lines. The beggar smiles at the man's wonder and points to each line in turn. "That's the hot dog line, that's the salad line, and that's the lemonade line." The man gets in each line in turn and gets himself his lunch.

While he's eating, basking in joy at not being stuck with old bread and water, the beggar encourages him, "The best part is, halfway through the year, they switch from hot dogs, salad, and lemonade to chicken, chili, and hot chocolate. You can never get tired of it!"

Sadly, this proved not to be true. After only a few days, the man did again get tired of the same meal every day. But he knew firsthand that he could change his lot, so one day he went up to the wall of the second circle. This time the guards were asking for ten thousand dollars. Well, the man didn't like it, but he figured he had his whole afterlife ahead of him now that he was out of the fourth circle, and he could certainly take some time to save up. After ten years of hard work, it wasn't too difficult for him to keep up the work ethic, and only twenty years later, he went back to the guards of the second ring with the money in hand. He went through the gate and found himself in a glittering, clean city full of glass and steel.

And wouldn't you know it, but there, standing across the street was the same beggar, only now he was wearing a well-fitted suit. The man greeted the beggar as an old friend and they started talking again. Once again, their conversation was interrupted, only this time it was by beautiful church bells. "Come," the beggar told him, "I'll take you to the evening meal." So the man followed and they entered a glamorous ballroom filled with beautiful attendees. Even the cops here looked good, dressed in suits and sunglasses like bodyguards. And sure enough, piled onto platters on huge mahogany tables against the far wall were plates of steak, bowls of the most delicious seafood soups, and glasses of champagne. One of the bodyguards cleared his throat loudly and politely requested that the attendees line up. Three lines were formed and the beggar pointed each line out in turn. "That's the steak line, that's the soup line, and that's the champagne line," and then he added, "and apparently here, they change the meals FOUR times a year!"

The man rejoiced, ate, and was happy, and for once felt that nothing was lacking. Four changes a year was enough for him. But one day, out of curiosity, he went up to the bodyguards that guarded the gate into the first and final ring of the afterlife and found they were asking for a million dollars to pass. Well the man was a bit disturbed by this, after all, the second ring seemed perfect to him. "What is it," he thought, "that could possibly be more wonderful than what I have here?" That question haunted him for weeks until he came to a conclusion. He was used to working hard and he had all of eternity to save up, so he wanted, just once to see what he could possibly be missing in the first ring.

Fifty years later, he returned to the guards with a million dollars. When he stepped into the first ring he fell to his knees. The architecture was glorious and inhuman, and the bodyguard had turned into shining angels. To his surprise, someone helped him up off the street and when he looked, he realized he recognized who it was--it was the beggar he met in the fourth ring, adorned in a golden robe and glowing, and when he looked down at himself he realized he looked much the same.

The beggar laughed jovially. "I got here only three years ago myself, but somehow I knew you would be right here behind me. I've come back to this gate every day waiting for you to make it in!" Suddenly, the air was filled with the sound of angelic choirs and the beggar led the man off to a gigantic palace made of crystal and cloud. The room was filled with radiant citizens of the first circle and angels prepared everything. Sure enough, there was a line of massive altars against one wall, spilling over with glistening golden dragon meat, a pudding refined from clouds and dew and silk, and an ice cold tub of ambrosia and nectar ladled out individually into blindingly beautiful crystalline chalices. An angel fluttered from the ceiling and bowed silently to the assembled mass, who bowed respectfully back and then broke themselves into their lines on their own.

Smiling at the tradition, the beggar pointed to the first line. "That's the line for the dragon meat," he said before turning to the next line, "and that's the line for angeldust stew," then he paused, confused.

"What is it?" the man asked his old friend.

The beggar replied, "There appears to be no punchline."

EDIT: if you liked this joke, go to r/feghoot for more like this one!

EDIT 2: To people screaming repost, i gave credit to  u/insolent_swine in the comments. I just did it here, too.
***
Sherlock Holmes and Dr. Watson decide to go on a camping trip.
 After dinner and a bottle of wine, they lay down for the night, and go to sleep.

Some hours later, Watson awoke and nudged his faithful friend.

"Holmes, look up at the sky and tell me what you see."

Holmes replied, "I see millions of stars."

"What does that tell you?"

Sherlock says

"Astronomically, it tells me that there are millions of galaxies and potentially billions of planets."

"Astrologically, I observe that Saturn is in Leo."

"Horologically, I deduce that the time is approximately a quarter past three."

"Theologically, I can see that God is all powerful and that we are small and insignificant."

"Meteorologically, I suspect that we will have a beautiful day tomorrow."

"What does it tell you, Watson?"

Watson was silent for a minute, then spoke: "Holmes, you idiot. Someone has stolen our tent!
***
Little Johnny fell asleep in Sunday school...
The teacher asked, "Johnny, who is our Lord and savior?"
The boy behind him poked him in the back with a pin.
Johnny shot upright and shouted, "Jesus Christ!"
"Correct," said the teacher. 
Johnny then fell back asleep.
The teacher called on him again, "Johnny, who was Jesus's mother?"
Again, the boy behind Johnny poked him.
Johnny woke up again and exclaimed, "Mary mother of God!"
"Correct," said the teacher once more.
Johnny fell back asleep.
The teacher called on him one last time, "Johnny, can you tell me what Eve said to Adam after she gave birth to their 23rd child?"
The boy behind him poked him once more.
Johnny shot up and shouted, "YOU STICK THAT THING IN ME ONCE MORE AND I'LL SNAP IT IN HALF!"
***
An Englishman in France
This happened to an Englishman in France who was totally blasted. A French policeman stops his car and asks if he has been drinking. With great difficulty, the Englishman admits that he has been drinking all day, that his daughter got married that morning, and that he drank champagne and a few bottles of wine at the reception, and many single malts scotches thereafter.

Quite upset, the policeman proceeds to alcohol-test (breath test) the Englishman and - ping, pow, boom - verifies that he is indeed sloshed. He asks the Englishman if he knows why, under French Law, he is going to be arrested.  The Englishman answers with a bit of humor, "No sir, I do not! But while we're asking questions, do you realize that this is a British car and that my wife is the one driving . . . . . on the other side?" 
***
The Tramp's Holiday
There was this tramp. One cold winter's morning he was walking along a country road, when he heard a cry for help from a nearby lake.

Without a moment's hesitation he ran out onto the ice and slipped and slided over to a little girl. He managed to pull her out without breaking the ice further and carried her back to the road. He took off his coat and wrapped her in it then began looking for a car to flag down.

Coincidentally the father drives up. "How can I ever thank you sir?" he says after putting his daughter into the warmth of the limo. "Just name your price - I'm a wealthy man."

"Ah, well..." stammers the tramp, "... uh, I'm a little short of cash, perhaps you could help me out."

"Oh dear," says the father, "I don't carry much cash with me, I only have ten pounds - but come home with me and I'll get more from the safe."

"No! No!" says the tramp, "Why ten pounds is more money than I've seen in my whole life - that'll be plenty."

"Ten pounds," thinks the tramp, "I'm rich! I'm rich!" and off he goes to the town to buy himself a holiday.

He finds a travel agent, walks in - much to the disgust of the staff - and goes up to the desk. "I'll have one holiday please!"

"Ahem, which holiday would you like?" asked the girl at the desk, forcing a smile.

"Oh, any holiday I don't mind, anything up to ten pounds," replies the tramp.

"TEN POUNDS! You'll NEVER get a holiday for ten pounds," says the girl incredulously.

She goes into the back of the shop, and searches in the deepest, dustiest filing drawers she can find. There - to her amazement - she finds an old file.

"Well you'll never believe it," she says to the tramp, back in the shop. "I've got you a holiday - its a super-duper, ultra-hyper, mega-economy class round the world cruise - and it costs ten pounds."

"Yippee!" exclaims the tramp, "I'll take it!"

A few days later he arrives at the port, and there in the dock is the most beautiful, most elaborately decorated, most expensive looking ocean-going liner he has ever seen.

"Get off my ship ye dirty bum!" shouts a voice, and an irate captain storms down the gangplank and kicks the tramp down onto the dockside.

"But I've got my ticket!", responds the tramp, "super-duper, ultra-hyper, mega-economy class, and I want on!"

"Well okay," says the captain, "but you can't come on just now, I don't want my first-class passengers seeing you. Come back at midnight when it's dark and I'll let you on then."

So the tramp finds himself a quiet spot among some cargo cases on the dockside, and he falls asleep.

"Psst," says a voice, waking him with a start. It was the captain.

"Hurry up, it's midnight, let's get you to your cabin."

The tramp toddles after the captain, along the dockside, up the gangway, and onto the ship - and what a ship!

First they went down through the first class level: Oriental carpets - 6" pile. A genuine Rembrandt on every wall. Leave your shoes outside for cleaning, and the steward brings a new pair. 24 ct gold trim everywhere.

Then the second class: As above, but perhaps the carpets were only 3" deep, and so on...

3rd, 4th, 5th class, down past the casinos, and the ballrooms, down through the crew's quarters, down through the galleys, and the engine rooms, until finally, at the lowest point in the ship, against the very hull, the captain opens a watertight door into a tiny 7' x 4' cabin, with a hammock, a bedside table, and an alarm clock.

"Sheer luxury!" exclaimed the tramp, "A room of my very own."

"I'm glad you like it," replies the captain, "but there is one more thing... Your class of ticket only allows you to use the facilities of the ship, at night - when all the other passengers are asleep. So that's what the alarm clock is for. Enjoy your cruise."

Well the cruise began, and the tramp had a whale of a time. Sleeping by day, and up on deck at night - he loved it. One-man-tennis, clay pigeon shooting, more food than he'd ever seen...

Then one morning, a week or so into the cruise, the tramp decided he'd have a go on the diving board of the pool. He had just enough time for one dive before he had to go below.

He climbed up the ladder, stepped onto the board tip, bounced, and dived...

... and what a dive...!

Perfectly poised in the air, he hit the water without so much as a ripple.

Now unknown to him, the captain - who'd grown rather fond of the poor old tramp - was standing watching this.

"That was amazing!" exclaimed the captain, "Where did you learn to dive like that?"

"Um, well I've never actually dived before," replied the tramp.

"Well that's incredible!" says the captain, "I've never seen..." He broke off. "Hey, I've got an idea", he started again. "How would you like to train a bit, and we'll put on a show for the other passengers. I'll pay you, and you can then afford to go first class!"

"It's a deal!" says our man. For the next 3 weeks the tramp practices like he's never practiced before. Back-flips, front-flips, triple-back sideways axled dives, you name it he tried it.

Then one morning the captain comes to talk. "Okay, I'd like you to stay in your cabin for the next 2 days. We're going to erect a high diving board for you."

"Okay," agreed the tramp.

Two days passed, and the big day arrived. The ship was humming with excitement. Everyone wanted to see the mystery diver. The captain had provided the tramp with a new pair of swimming trunks and he wore these as he stepped out onto the sun-beaten deck. Gasps of astonishment from the crowd, and a hushed awe. Higher than the eye could see, towering up and up, rose a slender column of metal.

"Well, tramp," said the captain, shaking his hand, "Let's see what you can do." And with that the Captain handed him a walkie talkie. And the tramp began to climb...

up and up...

below him the ship grew smaller...

on and on...

past a solitary albatross...

and still higher...

till the ship was but a speck on the ocean below...

and on still further...

till the ocean grew dim...

and the earth itself...

began to shrink...

past our moon...

and on...

and Mars...

and on...

higher, and higher...

through the asteroid belt...

and on and on towards the diving board...

past the outer planets, until...

on the outermost reaches of the Solar System...

he reached the board.

He climbed on top and radioed the captain...

and then...

he jumped.

Slowly at first,

but speeding up,

faster, and faster,

speeding past Pluto,

and the other outer planets,

through the asteroid belt,

past Mars,

and the moon,

faster,

and faster,

faster - ever faster,

and by now the earth was growing large in the distance, the oceans and land masses grew clear,

faster, and faster,

past the albatross,

double-back somersault,

and he could see the ship, tiny in the distance,

hurtling down now, he posed, ready for the final 500 feet,

Down on the ship the crew strained their necks,

"I CAN SEE HIM!" yelled a passenger, "LOOK!!!"

The tramp streaked down towards the pool, did a last triple flip, and dove...

NOT A RIPPLE ON THE SURFACE!

DOWN THROUGH THE WATER!

SMASHED THROUGH THE POOL BOTTOM!

DOWN THROUGH THE FIRST DECK!

SMASHING THROUGH THE SECOND!

DOWN!

DOWN!

THROUGH THE CREW'S QUARTERS!

THROUGH THE ENGINE ROOMS!

SMASHING THROUGH HIS OWN LITTLE CABIN!

AND DOWN THROUGH THE DOUBLE-STRENGTH STEEL HULL OF THE SHIP!

STILL DOWN...!

DEEPER,

DEEPER INTO THE MURKY DEPTHS,

TILL.........

SMASH!

Into the sea bed, sinking a 37' shaft in the process.

Desperate for air he struggle out of the shaft, his lungs bursting he swam frantically for the surface.

Up and up, desperate, gasping...

Out of the water, up the ladder onto the deck of the ship, into a throng wild with acclaim.

"HERO!" "WONDERFUL!" "AMAZING!" "GOOD SHOW THAT!"

And handing him a heated towel the captain spoke, as a hush fell over the crowd.

"Well tramp, I have NEVER seen anything like that, EVER. That was the most *STUPENDOUS* piece of diving I have ever seen."

The tramp blushed.

The captain went on, "but tell me, most amazing of all is how you survived smashing through this boat after you dived - how did you do it."

And the tramp looked at the captain, and the crowd and replied modestly: "Well you see...

I'm a just poor tramp...

so you must understand...

I've been through many a hard ship in my life."

***
A Well-Argued Court Case
The beauty of a language and the art of constructing the words of the language significantly lead to their meaning. This is not a case of twisting, but of the refined manner of presentation by witty minds. A good case for reference.

One evening, after attending the theatre, two gentlemen were walking down the avenue when they observed a rather well dressed and attractive young lady walking ahead of them. One of them turned to the other and remarked, "I'd give $250 to spend the night with that woman."

Much to their surprise, the young lady overheard their remark, turned around, and replied, "I'll take you up on that offer."

She had a neat appearance and a pleasant voice, so after bidding his companion good night, the man accompanied the young lady to her apartment. The following morning, as he prepared to leave, the man gave her $125.

She demanded the rest of the money, stating, "If you don't give me the other $125 I'll sue you for it."

He laughed, saying "I'd like to see you get it on these grounds."

Within a few days, he was surprised when he received a summons ordering his presence in court as a defendant in a lawsuit. He hurried to his lawyer and explained the details of the case. His lawyer said, "She can't possibly get a judgment against you on such grounds, but it will be interesting to see how her case will be presented."

After the usual preliminaries, the lady's Lawyer addressed the court as follows:
"Your Honour, my client, this lady, is the owner of a piece of property, a garden spot, surrounded by a profuse growth of shrubbery, which property she agreed to rent to the defendant for a specified length of time for the sum of $250. The defendant took possession of the property, used it extensively for the purposes for which it was rented, but upon evacuating the premises, he paid only $125, one-half of the amount agreed upon. The rent was not excessive, since it is restricted property, and we ask judgment be granted against the defendant to assure payment of the balance."

The defendant's Lawyer was not only surprised but also impressed AND amused by the way his opponent had presented the case. Naturally, his defence was somewhat different from the way he had originally planned to present it. He rose to the occasion!

'Your Honour," he said, "my client agrees that the lady has a fine piece of property, that he did rent such property for a time, and a degree of pleasure was derived from the transaction. However, my client found a well on the property around which he placed his own stones, sunk a shaft, and erected a pump, all labor performed personally by him. We claim these improvements to the property were sufficient to offset the unpaid amount, and that the plaintiff was adequately compensated for the rental of said property. We, therefore, ask that judgment not be granted."

The young lady's lawyer answered, "Your Honour, my client agrees that the defendant did find a well on her property. However, had the defendant not known that the well existed, he would never have rented the property. Also, upon evacuating the premises, the defendant removed the stones, pulled out the shaft, and took the pump with him. In doing so, he not only dragged the equipment through the shrubbery, but left the hole much larger than it was prior to his occupancy, making the property much less desirable to others. We, therefore, ask that judgment be granted."

In the Judge's decision, he provided for two options, "Pay the balance $125 to the plaintiff, or have the equipment detached from its current location and provided to the plaintiff for damages."

The defendant wrote out a cheque immediately.
***
New sales job!
A young guy from North Dakota moves to Florida and goes to a big "everything
under one roof" department store looking for a job.

The Manager says, "Do you have any sales experience?"

The kid says "Yeah. I was a vacuum salesman back in North Dakota."

Well, the boss was unsure, but he liked the kid and figured he'd give him a
shot, so he gave him the job.

"You start tomorrow. I'll come down after we close and see how you did."

His first day on the job was rough, but he got through it. 

After the store was locked up, the boss came down to the sales floor. 

"How many customers bought something from you today?"

The kid frowns and looks at the floor and mutters, "One."

The boss says "Just one ?!!? Our sales people average sales to 20 to 30
customers a day. 

That will have to change, and soon, if you'd like to continue your
employment here. 

We have very strict standards for our sales force here in Florida. 

One sale a day might have been acceptable in North Dakota, but you're not on
the farm anymore, son."

The kid took his beating, but continued to look at his shoes, so the boss
felt kind of bad for chewing him out on his first day. 

He asked (semi-sarcastically), "So, how much was your one sale for?"

The kid looks up at his boss and says "$101,237.65."

The boss, astonished, says $101,237.65?!? What the heck did you sell?"

The kid says, "Well, first, I sold him some new fish hooks. Then I sold him
a new fishing rod to go with his new hooks. Then I asked him where he was
going fishing and he said down the coast, so I told him he was going to need
a boat, so we went down to the boat department and I sold him a twin engine
Chris Craft.

 Then he said he didn't think his Honda Civic would pull it, so I took him
down to the automotive department and sold him that 4x4 Expedition."

The boss said "A guy came in here to buy a fish hook and you sold him a boat
and a TRUCK!?"

The kid said "No, the guy came in here to buy tampons for his wife, and I
said, 'Dude, your weekend's shot, you should go fishing.'
***
Three friends die and go to heaven
(Change the names in this if you want to)

Three friends die and go to heaven. When they reach the Pearly Gates, St. Peter greets them, giving them the usual spiel that everyone gets when they're about to enter, and as they are walking in he says " By the way, I almost forgot the new rule. Whatever you do, don't step on a duck." The three friends think this is an odd rule, but they agree to it and step in. 

The second they enter they realize that the final rule might be harder to follow than they thought. Heaven is TEEMING with ducks! Try as they might, they quickly realize that avoiding the birds is going to be a difficult task. And then it happens, "QUACK!" Friends Two and Three look over in shock as Friend One steps on a duck. Quickly, an angel rushes over with one of the most unattractive people the three of them have ever seen. "Because you stepped on a duck, you are condemned to spend the rest of your time in the Kingdom shackled to this person. Have a good eternity." The angel shackles the two together and flies off. 

After seeing what happened to Friend One, the other two are more wary of the consequences and begin treading extremely lightly. The two of them make it another three days before, on the dawn of the fourth day, a loud "QUACK" is heard. Friend Two looks to Friend Three, wide-eyed, fearing the worst. The angel rushes over, ties Friend Two to a hideous being, and flies away. 

The third friend, now petrified that this will be his fate, becomes incredibly paranoid, barely walking anywhere. He lasts one week, two weeks, but on the beginning of the third week, an angel brings one of the most stunningly beautiful people the friend has ever seen, shackles the two of them together, and flies off. Bewildered and excited, Friend Three proclaims, "Wow! What did I do to deserve this?" And the person the friend is shackled to turns and replies "I don't know what you did, but I stepped on a duck!"

***
Ten dollars is ten dollars.
Stumpy and his wife Martha went to the state fair every year. Every year Stumpy would say, "Martha, I'd like to ride in that there airplane."
And every year Martha would say, "I know Stumpy, but that airplane ride costs ten dollars, and ten dollars is ten dollars."


One year Stumpy and Martha went to the fair and Stumpy said, "Martha, I'm 71 years old. If I don't ride that airplane this year I may never get another chance."
Martha replied, "Stumpy, that there airplane ride costs ten dollars, and ten dollars is ten dollars."
The pilot overheard them and said, "Folks, I'll make you a deal, I'll take you both up for a ride. If you can stay quiet for the entire ride and not say one word, I won't charge you, but if you say one word it's ten dollars."
Stumpy and Martha agreed and up they went.


The pilot did all kinds of twists and turns, rolls and dives, but not a word was heard.
He did all his tricks over again, but still not a word.
They landed and the pilot turned to Stumpy, "By golly, I did everything I could think of to get you to yell out, but you didn't." Stumpy replied, "Well, I was gonna say something when Martha fell out, but ten dollars is ten dollars." 

edit--format
***
"Santa Claus"
A girl is sitting at the edge of a tall building, contemplating suicide on Christmas day. Santa Claus sees the girl and sits down beside her.

"What's wrong my child?" asks the man.

"I have no job, no friends and no one who loves me and today i'm reminded of this even more.. there's no point." 

Santa Claus thinks for a moment and replies: "What if i were to grant you 3 wishes, would that change your mind?"

The girl's eyes light up and she asks for her first wish " I want a beautiful house, one which money can't buy". The old man pulls out a piece of paper with an address and tells the girl that her new home is waiting for her there.

"I want more money that i could ever spend so that i can enjoy my house and new life and never need to worry about a job ever again"

"Next time you check your bank account, it will be there. More than you could ever spend." replies Santa.

"And finally, i want the perfect husband to live my dream life with and never have to be alone ever again!"

"Done, he will be waiting for you at your new place"

The girl gets up and begins to walk away from the ledge, Santa claus looks at her and asks a final question. "You seem a lot happier now, how would you feel about returning the favor to and old lonely man?"

"Sure, anything!" replies the girl.

"How about a BJ?" he asks.

The girl keeps her promise and starts doing her thing.

Towards the end, the old man asks the girl -- "How old are you child?"

"24" she replies.

"And you still believe in Santa Claus?"
***
An American soldier
An American soldier, serving in World War II, had just returned from several weeks of intense action on the German front lines. He had finally been granted R&R and was on a train bound for London. The train was very crowded, so the soldier walked the length of the train, looking for an empty seat. The only unoccupied seat was directly adjacent to a well dressed middle aged lady and was being used by her little dog.

The war weary soldier asked, "Please, ma'am, may I sit in that seat?" The English woman looked down her nose at the soldier, sniffed and said, "You Americans. You are such a rude class of people. Can't you see my Little Fifi is using that seat?"

The soldier walked away, determined to find a place to rest, but after another" trip down to the end of the train, found himself again facing the woman with the dog. Again he asked, "Please, lady. May I sit there? I'm very tired."

The English woman wrinkled her nose and snorted, "You Americans! Not only are you rude, you are also arrogant. Imagine!"

The soldier didn't say anything else; he leaned over, picked up the little dog, tossed it out the window of the train and sat down in the empty seat. The woman shrieked and railed, and demanded that someone defend her and chastise the soldier.

An English gentleman sitting across the aisle spoke up, "You know, sir, you Americans do seem to have a penchant for doing the wrong thing. You eat holding the fork in the wrong hand. You drive your autos on the wrong side of the road. And now, sir, you've thrown the wrong bitch out the window."  - joke credit stumbleupon
***
3 guys die in a car crash and go to hell
they all appear at the gates of hell and are greeted by satan himself

satan says to the first man "whats your favorite thing in the world?"

the man says "i love getting drunk just shit faced all the time"

satan opens a door and inside is every alcoholic drink you can imagine

the man walks in drooling at what he sees 

satan says "see you in 1000 years" and locks the door behind him

satan says to the second man "whats your favorite thing in the world?"

the man says "i love getting pussy man i live to fuck dude"

satan opens a door and inside is the most beautiful women he could imagine"

he runs in full sprint and satan says "see ya in a 1000 years" and locks the door

satan walks up to the last man and says "how bout you?"

the man says "i love smoking weed man, i haven't been sober since i was 10"

satan opens a door and inside is every strain of cannabis in the world and a few strains specific to hell"

the man walks in slowly 

satan says you already know" and locks the door

1000 yars pass and satan checks up on the 3 guys

the first guy is laying in a puddle of his own puke with broken bottles everywhere

the second man runs out screaming "im gay im gay!"

the last man satan was shocked by

the 3rd man is laying in the fetal position silent

satan says "are you ok?"

and the man with a single tear in his eye looks up to satan and says "hey man... you got a light?"
***
Christmas Joke... Three men died....

Three men died on Christmas Eve and were met by Saint Peter at the pearly gates.
'In honor of this holy season' Saint Peter said, 'You must each possess something that symbolizes Christmas to get into heaven.'
The Englishman fumbled through his pockets and pulled out a lighter. He flicked it on. 'It's a candle', he said.
'You may pass through the pearly gates' Saint Peter said.
The Scotsman reached into his pocket and pulled out a set of keys. He shook them and said, 'They're bells.'
Saint Peter said 'You may pass through the pearly gates'.
The Irishman started searching desperately through his pockets and finally pulled out a pair of women's panties.
St. Peter looked at the man with a raised eyebrow and asked, 'And just what do those symbolize?'
The Irishman replied, 'These are Carol's'     

And So The Christmas Season begins......and I sure hope the jokes get better.       

Edit: Thank you for the gold..  One day I may do the analysis on how many commented on the joke, the superfluous use of nationalities, or scoring the joke with rice...  Gotta look that one up.
***
Boudreaux & Thibodeaux
One morning Thibodeaux was sitting on his dock enjoying the sunrise when Boudreaux pulls up in his boat filled with duct tape.  Thibodeaux looks at him, and asks "what you doing with a boat full of duct tape?" Boudreaux replies "I'm going duck hunting! You wanna come?" "You can't hunt ducks with duct tape, and no I ain't coming" replied Thibodeaux.  So Boudreaux leaves.  Later in the day Thibodeaux sees Boudreaux fly by in his boat, and low and behold its full of ducks. "Well i'll be damned!" says Thibodeaux.

The next morning as Thibodeaux is enjoying the sunrise, Boudreaux pulls up in his boat again, this time with a boat full of gatorade.  Sarcastically Thibodeaux says "Let me guess, you gonna catch gators with gatorade?" "Yep, you wanna come?" says Boudreaux. "You can't catch gators with gatorade...No I ain't coming!" So Boudreaux leaves. Later that day Thibodeaux sees Boudreaux fly by in his boat, and it was filled with gators. "Well i'll be damned!" says Thibodeaux.

The next morning as Thibodeaux is enjoying the sunrise, Boudreaux pulls up in his boat agian...this time with a boat full of pussy willows.  Thibodeaux thinks for a second and says..."Hold on let me get my hat"
***
Old guy bought a new car
A senior citizen drove his brand new Corvette convertible out of the dealership. Taking off down the road, he floored it to 80 mph, enjoying the wind blowing through what little gray hair he had left. "Amazing," he thought as he flew down I-94, pushing the pedal even more. Looking in his rear view mirror, he saw a state trooper behind him, lights flashing and siren blaring. He floored it to 100 mph, then 110, then 120. Suddenly he thought, "What am I doing? I'm too old for this," and pulled over to await the trooper's arrival. Pulling in behind him, the trooper walked up to the Corvette, looked at his watch, and said, "Sir, my shift ends in 30 minutes. Today is Friday. If you can give me a reason for speeding that I've never heard before, I'll let you go."
The old gentleman paused. Then he said, "Years ago, my wife
ran off with a State trooper. I thought you were bringing her back."

"Have a good day, sir," replied the trooper.
***
Random Drug search
A DEA Agent stopped at a ranch in Texas and talked to an old rancher. He told the rancher, "I need to inspect your ranch for illegally grown drugs." The rancher said, "okay, but don't go into that field over there...", as he pointed out the location. The DEA Agent verbally exploded and said, "look mister, I have the authority of the federal government with me!" Reaching into his rear back pocket, the arrogant officer removed his badge and proudly displayed it to the rancher. "See this badge?! This badge means I can go wherever I want... On any land! No questions asked, no answers given! Do you understand old man?!"The rancher kindly nodded, apologized, and went about his chores. Moments later the rancher heard loud screams, he looked up and saw the DEA agent running for his life, being chased by the ranchers big Santa Gertrudis Bull...... With every step the bull was gaining ground on the officer, and it was likely that he'd sure enough get gored before he reached safety. The officer was clearly terrified. The old rancher threw down his tools, ran as fast as he could to the fence, and yelled at the top of his lungs......"YOUR BADGE! SHOW HIM YOUR BADGE!"
***
Jim walks into a bar with his arm in a sling.
He sits next to his friend Bill and orders two shots of whiskey.

Bill asks him, "How'd you break your arm, Jim?"

Jim downs a shot of whiskey and says, "Well, you see, about two years ago--"

Bill interrupts him, "Woah woah, two YEARS! You didn't break your arm two YEARS ago!"

Jim scowls. "You gonna let me tell the story, or not? Anyway..."

"About two years ago, I was driving down Rural 80. It was almost sunset but I was hours away from the city. My car runs out of gas outside a farm out in the middle of the fields.

I go knock on the door of the farmhouse, hoping they'll let me use the phone. A complete knockout of a lady answers the door, sexiest thing you ever saw. Said their phone's out of service, but I'm welcome to use the guest bedroom overnight and walk for gas in the morning.

She lives alone, and offers to make us both dinner. We eat, we talk, it's real pleasant. After dinner she walks over to me, leans in close and asks,

"Is there... *anything else* I can do for you?"

Well, dinner was good, and the dessert topped it off real nice, so I patted my stomach and told her I was fine, but thanks all the same.

We retire to the living room, and she offers me the big soft recliner. Pours us some scotch, we drink and laugh. It starts getting late, she walks over to me, stands behind the chair and rubs my shoulders. She asks, 

"Is there... *anything else* I can do for you?"

Well the shoulder rub feels mighty nice, so I tell her I'm fine, but thanks all the same.

It's real late now and I gotta walk for gas in the morning. I retire to her guest room, settle in and get comfy. Right as I'm dozing off, the door creaks open. She's standing in the doorway wearing pajamas that're almost transparent. She flips her hair over her shoulder and asks, 

"Is there... *anything else* I can do for you?"

It'd been a long day, I'm tired, I yawn and tell her I'm fine, but thanks all the same. In the morning I go get gas and drive on to the city."

Jim sits in silence, his story done. Bill, frustrated, asks Jim, "What in the hell does that have to do with your broken ARM?!"

Jim downs his second shot of whiskey, turns to Bill, and says, "Yesterday I was cleaning my gutters out, when it finally hit me what that lady was getting at. Slapped my forehead so hard I fell off the ladder and broke my arm.
***
So a Japanese company and a North American company decided to have a canoe race...
So a Japanese company and a North American company decided to have a canoe race on the St. Lawrence River. Both teams practiced long and hard to reach their peak performance before the race. 

On the big day, the Japanese won by a mile. The North Americans, very discouraged and depressed, decided to investigate the reason for the crushing defeat. 

A management team made up of senior management was formed to investigate and recommend appropriate action. Their conclusion was the Japanese had 8 people rowing and 1 person steering, while the North American team had 8 people steering and 1 person rowing. So, North American management hired a consulting company and paid them a large amount of money for a second opinion. 

They advised that too many people were steering the boat, while not enough people were rowing. 

To prevent another loss to the Japanese, the rowing team’s management structure was totally reorganized to 4 steering supervisors, 3 area steering superintendents and 1 assistant superintendent steering manager. They also implemented a new performance system that would give the 1 person rowing the boat greater incentive to work harder. 

It was called the"Rowing Team Quality First Program“, with meetings, dinners and free pens for the rower. There was discussion of getting new paddles, canoes and other equipment, extra vacation days for practices, and bonuses. 

The next year the Japanese won by two miles. Humiliated, the North American management laid off the rower for poor performance, halted development of a new canoe, sold the paddles, and canceled all capital investments in new equipment. The money saved was distributed to the Senior Executives as bonuses and the next year’s racing team was outsourced to India.
***
"No Jews Allowed"
A US Navy cruiser anchored in Mississippi for a week's shore leave.

The first evening, the ship's Captain received the following note from the wife of a very wealthy and influential plantation owner:

'Dear Captain, Thursday will be my daughter's Debutante Ball. I would like you to send three well-mannered, handsome, unmarried officers in their formal dress uniforms to attend the dance. They should arrive promptly at 8:00 PM prepared for an evening of polite Southern conversation. They should be excellent dancers, as they will be the escorts of lovely refined young ladies. One last point: No Jews please.'

Sending a written message, the captain replied: 

'Madam, thank you for your invitation. In order to present the widest possible knowledge base for polite conversation, I am sending three of my best and most prized officers.

One is a lieutenant commander, and a graduate of Annapolis with an additional Masters degree from MIT in fluid technologies and ship design.

The second is a Lieutenant, one of our helicopter pilots, and a graduate of Northwestern university in Chicago, with a BS in Aeronautical Engineering. His Masters Degree and PhD. In Aeronautical and Mechanical Engineering are from Texas Tech University and he is also an astronaut candidate.

Finally, the third officer, also a lieutenant commander, is our ship's doctor, with an undergraduate degree from the University of Georgia and his medical degree is from the University of North Carolina . We are very proud of him, as he is also a senior fellow in Trauma Surgery at Bethesda .'

Upon receiving this letter, the mother was quite excited and looked forward to Thursday with pleasure. Her daughter would be escorted by three handsome naval officers (and the other women in her social circle would be insanely jealous).

At precisely 8:00 PM on Thursday, Melinda's mother heard a polite rap at the door which she opened to find, in full dress uniform, three very handsome, smiling black officers.

Her mouth fell open, but pulling herself together, she stammered, 'There must be some mistake.'

'No, Madam,' said the first officer, 'Captain Goldberg never makes mistakes.'
***
Jeff walks into a bar and sees his friend Paul slumped over the bar.
Jeff walks into a bar and sees his friend Paul slumped over the bar. He walks over and asks Paul what's wrong. 

"Well," replies Paul, "you know that beautiful girl at work that I wanted to ask out, but I got an erection every time I saw her?"

 "Yes," replies Jeff with a laugh. 

"Well," says Paul, straightening up, "I finally plucked up the courage to ask her out, and she agreed." 

"That's great!" says Jeff, "When are you going out?" 

"I went to meet her this evening," continues Paul, "but I was worried I'd get an erection again. So I got some duct tape and taped my penis to my leg, so if I did, it wouldn't show." 

"Sensible" says Jeff. 

"So I get to her door," says Paul, "and I rang her doorbell. She answered it in the sheerest, tiniest dress you ever saw." 

"And what happened then?" 

(Paul slumps back over the bar again.)

 "I kicked her in the face." 
***
The local synagogue is having their taxes audited...
The IRS agent goes through the audit normally, and finds nothing wrong with the synagogue's taxes.  Eager to find something amiss, he looks around and sees the candles burning.  "Rabbi Rabinowitz," he begins, "what do you do with the drippings from the candles you burn?"
  The Rabbi quickly replies, "Well, we gather them up and send them back to the candle makers, and once a year they send us a complete box of candles."
   Slightly annoyed at this answer, the tax man makes another attempt to catch the Rabbi on something. He asks, "What do you do with the crumbs and leftovers of the cracker things you eat?"  He is pleased with himself as the Rabbi takes a moment to think it over.  
   After a moment, the Rabbi replies, "Well, we gather them up, send them to the cracker company, and once a year they send us a complete box of crackers."
   At this point, the IRS agent is furious, and the Rabbi knows what's going on.  In a last ditch effort, the agent asks, "Okay, and what about the leftover foreskins from your circumcisions?  What do you do with those?"
   Without missing a beat, the Rabbi replies, "Well, we gather them up, and send them to the IRS.  Once a year, they send us a complete dick."
***
A blonde woman is in a plane bound for Toronto...
...when the pilot says over the speakers- *Ping*! "You are now free to move about the cabin." The blonde calmly gets up from her seat in second class, strolls over to an empty seat in first class, and promptly gets herself situated.

One of the newer flight attendants notices this, so, naturally, she heads over to the blonde and tells her: 
"Excuse me, Ma'am, did you happen to just come from second class and sit down here, in first class?"

"Yes, I did," the blonde remarks, "Is this a problem?"

"Well, yes, it is. I'm afraid you'll have to return to your seat in second class."

"Look, lady, I'm a blonde, I'm sitting in first class, and I'm heading for Toronto. *Period*."

The attendant is quite new at her job, so she heads to the cockpit of the plane to get help from the copilot.

The copilot returns and repeats the "you have to move back speech", but the blonde woman yet again returns with "Look; I'm a blonde, I'm sitting in first class, and I'm heading for Toronto. **Period**."

The copilot doesn't want any trouble, so he heads back to the cockpit and tells the pilot about the situation.

"You man the controls, rookie. My wife is a blonde- I can take care of this."

The pilot walks over to the blonde woman, whispers something into her hear, and she suddenly gets up and returns to her second class seat without hesitating.

"That was amazing!" the flight attendant told the pilot, "What did you say to her to make her move so eagerly?"

"I told her that first class doesn't go to Toronto." 
***
For my teacher who used to tell this one....
Two traveling salesmen were riding together across West Texas when their car began to sputter and cough. Soon, it died completely and they were stranded on the side of a state highway with little traffic.

Fortunately, a pick up truck pulled over to help. The driver was a comely middle aged woman in jeans and a work shirt. She told them the closest town with a mechanic was 60 miles away, and since it was past 5:00 pm they would be closed anyway until the next day.

In a gesture of Texas hospitality, she invited them to stay the night at her ranch which was nearby. Then they could call the garage in town to get their car fixed in the morning.

The two salesmen were very appreciative, and climbed into the pickup with her.

Soon they turned into a gate, and began driving through a lovely farm where cattle were grazing behind neatly built fences. As they drove she told them how she and her late husband had run this farm for years before he had died from a heart attack two years ago. Now it was just her running things, and it got lonely out here so she was glad for the chance to have guests.

Before long they pulled up to a very nice ranch house surrounded by a white fence and with a big barn nearby. 


Once inside, the widow rancher made them comfortable on the big front porch and brought them cold iced tea before proceeding inside to cook a delicious home cooked meal for them. After dinner they chatted in the living room for a few hours before she showed them to the guest bedroom where they found a comfortable bed with down pillows and a homemade quilt.

In the morning the widow made them an enormous breakfast while they waited for the tow truck to come collect their car. 


When the wrecker came, they bid the kind widow a fond farewell and she sent them on their way with a bag of cookies for later.

Soon their car was repaired and they were on their way again.

About nine months had passed when one of the salesman called the other.

"Bob, do you remember about nine months ago when our car broke down in West Texas?"

"Yes, Ted. I remember that."

"And Bob, do you remember that very kindly widow that took us in for the night?"

"Well of course I remember her Ted."

"Well Bob, I have to ask you something."

"Ok Ted."

"Bob, did you slip out of the guest room that night?"

Yes Ted, I did."

"And Bob, did you go to the widow's room that night?"

"I did Ted."

"Did you and the widow make love Bob?"

"Yes, we did Ted"

"Now Bob, this is very important. Did you by chance use MY name that night when you slept with her?"

"I did Ted. I'm ashamed of myself, but I did. I'm really, really sorry Ted...."

"Oh, that's ok Bob. I just wanted to call and let you know that she died and left me the ranch in her will."

That ones for you Coach!
***
A guy walks into a bar...
A guy walks into a bar, sits down and orders a beer. As he is sitting there he catches sight of the guy sitting next to him and notices the man looks exactly like Adolf Hitler. The man ignores this at first and quietly drinks his beer. 

After some time his curiosity gets the better of him, so he turns to the man and says, "Has anyone ever told you that you look just like Hitler?" 

To the guy's surprise, the man turns right to him and says in a thick German accent, "That is because I am Hitler." 

The guy just laughs this off and takes another drink, but the stranger keeps his serious expression and says, "It is true, I am Hitler. The allies thought I killed myself, but I escaped and moved here to lie low." 

The guy is understandably stunned, so putting his drink down he asks Hitler, "If it's true, and you're Hitler, then you're the most hated man alive--you killed six million Jews!"

"Well yes," says Hitler, "but nobody cares about the Jews anyway."

They argue for a while after that about whether anyone cares about the Jews, before Hitler finally says, "Tell you what. I'll prove to you right now that no one cares about the Jews. I will go around the world right now, round up six million more Jews, and kill every single one of them. Then I will find one clown, and I will kill him too."

Puzzled, the man asks, "Well what would you kill the clown for?"

Then Hitler points at him and says, "See? You didn't care about the Jews either!"
***
75 story hotel
Phil, Jim, and John were at a convention together sharing a large suite at the top of a 75 story hotel. After a long day of meetings, they were shocked to hear the elevators were broken, and they now had to climb 75 flights of stairs. 

Phil said to Jim and John,"let's break the monotony of this unpleasant task by concentrating on something more interesting. Hmm, I'll tell jokes the first 25 floors, Jim, you can sing songs the next 25 floors and John you can say your collection of sad stories."

The others agreed and they started the climb for their hotel room. At the 26th floor Phil stopped with his jokes and Jim started his songs. At the 51st floor songs stopped and John's sad stories started.

"I guess I'll begin with my saddest story first. I forgot the room key in the car."

(EDIT) FIXED THE GRAMMAR DAMMIT
***
A cowboy from Texas
A cowboy, who just moved to Wyoming from Texas, walks into a bar and orders three mugs of Bud.

He sits in the back of the room, drinking a sip out of each one in turn.

When he finishes them, he comes back to the bar and orders three more.

The bartender approaches and tells the cowboy, "You know, a mug goes flat after I draw it. It would taste better if you bought one at a time..."

The cowboy replies, "Well, you see, I have two brothers. One is an Airborne Ranger, the other is a Navy Seal, both serving overseas somewhere.

When we all left our home in Texas, we promised that we'd drink this way to remember the days when we drank together.

So I'm drinking one beer for each of my brothers and one for myself."

The bartender admits that this is a nice custom, and leaves it there.

The cowboy becomes a regular in the bar, and always drinks the same way.

He orders three mugs and drinks them in turn.

One day, he comes in and only orders two mugs.

All the regulars take notice and fall silent.

When he comes back to the bar for the second round, the bartender says, "I don't want to intrude on your grief, but I wanted to offer my condolences on your loss."

The cowboy looks quite puzzled for a moment, then a light dawns in his eyes and he laughs.

"Oh, no, everybody's just fine," he explains, "It's just that my wife and I joined the Baptist Church and I had to quit drinking."

"Hasn't affected my brothers though...."
***
A shipwreck, only Scarlett Johansson and some random dude survived on an deserted island...
They didnt know each other before the shipwreck, but he did know who she was...

At the beginning it was hard, but as time passed, this guy learnt how to provide food and shelter, he started taking care of her, and eventually she started caring about him... after all, there wasnt anybody else in the island...

He eventually built a cabin, had a functioning automatic potable water supply, and all sorts of little clever commodities, all done to make her life easier... it was the most effort any man had ever done for her, and all the hard work made him fit, she noticed this...

One night after some wildlife attacked and he defended her succesfully, getting a few cuts in the process, she threw herself at him and they made love, after that, they where for all intents and purposes a couple with an above regular sex life.

But for some reason he started drifting away, something was bothering him.
And she noticed... "Whats wrong?" Scarlett Johansson asked, "Nothing..." the guy would say...

She pestered him for a while eventually saying she would do ANYTHING he needed or wanted to make him feel good again, just because she really cared for him a lot, and even if he wasnt asking, she felt it was the least she owed it to him...


- "Really?, youll do anything id like?"

- "yes" she said "anything!"

- "ok, first i want you to take off you toga and get into this pair of work jeans that somehow washed on the shore"

- "ok..."

- "now put this shirt on please, but first, "tape" your boobs so they are flat"

- "wha... ok, id say id do anything" she said lovingly.

- "ok, now, take this hat and wear it, but tuck your hair under it"

she was kinda confused, but non the less, she wanted to make him happy, so she tuck her hair under the hat.

- "Now id like for you to grab this piece of soot and paint yourself a beard and a mustache"

- "ok... if this is what you want..." she muttered.

- "now, please, put on these sunglasses, and start walking down the beach ill catch up to you in a bit" he said a bit excited...

She started walking... wondering... doubting herself... just confused about what had just happened, maybe it wasnt her, maybe it was h... suddenly the guy grabs her by her shoulder turns her around and says: "DUDE!!! you wont believe who ive been fucking for the past 6 months!"
***
The Haircut


A man was getting a haircut prior to a trip to Rome. He mentioned the trip to the barber who responded, "Rome? Why would anyone want to go there? It's crowded and dirty. You're crazy to go to Rome. So, how are you getting there?"

"We're taking American Airlines," was the reply. "We got a great rate!"

"American Airlines?" exclaimed the barber. "That's a terrible airline. Their planes are old, their flight attendants are ugly, and they're always late. So, where are you staying in Rome?"

"We'll be at the downtown International Marriott."

"That dump! That's the worst hotel in the city. The rooms are small, the service is surly and they're overpriced. So, whatcha doing when you get there?"

"We're going to go to see the Vatican and we hope to see the Pope."

"That's rich," laughed the barber. "You and a million other people trying to see him. You'll be at the back of St Peter's Square and from that distance he'll look the size of an ant. Boy, good luck on this lousy trip of yours. You're going to need it."

A month later, the man again came in for his regular haircut. The barber asked him about his trip to Rome.

"It was wonderful," explained the man. "Not only were we on time in one of American Airlines's brand new planes, but it was overbooked and they bumped us up to first class. The food and wine were wonderful, and I had a beautiful 28 year old stewardess who waited on me hand and foot. And the hotel was great! They'd just finished a $25 million remodeling job and now it's the finest hotel in the city. They, too, were overbooked, so they apologized and gave us the presidential suite at no extra charge!"

"Well," muttered the barber, "I know you didn't get to see the Pope."

"Actually, we were quite lucky, for as we toured the Vatican, a Swiss Guard tapped me on the shoulder and explained that the pope likes to personally meet some of the visitors, and if I'd be so kind as to step into his private room and wait, the pope would personally greet me. Sure enough, five minutes later the pope walked through the door and shook my hand! I knelt down as he spoke a few words to me."

"Really?" asked the Barber. "What'd he say?"

He said, "Where'd you get the shitty haircut?"

courtesy of planet-38
***
The Psychiatrist & The Proctologist
Best friends graduated from medical school at the same time and decided that, in spite of two different specialties, they would open a practice together to share office space and personnel. Dr. Smith was the psychiatrist and Dr. Jones was the proctologist. They put up a sign reading: "Dr. Smith and Dr. Jones: Hysterias and Posteriors." 
 
The town council was livid and insisted they change it. So, the docs changed it to read: "Schizoids and Hemorrhoids."
 
This was also not acceptable, so they again changed the sign. "Catatonics and High Colonics" - No go. 

Next, they tried "Manic Depressives and Anal Retentives" - thumbs down again. 

Then came "Minds and Behinds" - still no good. 

Another attempt resulted in "Lost Souls and Butt Holes" - unacceptable again! 
 
So they tried "Analysis and Anal Cysts" - not a chance. 

"Nuts and Butts" - no way. 

"Freaks and Cheeks" - still no good. 

"Loons and Moons" - forget it. 

Almost at their wit's end, the docs finally came up with: "Dr. Smith and Dr. Jones - Specializing in Odds and Ends." 
 
Everyone loved it.
***
Found this in my timeline...
I was fed up with being burgled every other day in my neighbourhood. So, I tore out my alarm system & de-registered from our local Neighbourhood Watch.
I've planted a Pakistani flag in each corner of my front garden and a large Black Flag of ISIL in its centre.
Now,the Yorkshire police, the National Security Bureau, Scotland Yard, MI-5, MI-6, the CIA and every other intelligence service in Europe are all watching my house 24x7x365.
My children are followed to school every day and my wife when she goes shopping. I'm followed to and from work every day. So no one bothers me at all.
I've never felt safer.
***
A newly discovered chapter in the Book of Genesis has provided the answer
 to “Where do pets come from?” 

Adam and Eve said, “Lord, when we were in the garden, you walked with us 
 every day. 

 Now we do not see you any more. We are lonesome here, and it is difficult 
 for us to remember how much you love us.” 

And God said, I will create a companion for you that will be with you and 
 who will be a reflection of my love for you, so that you will love me even when 
 you cannot see me. Regardless of how selfish or childish or unlovable you may be, 
 this new companion will accept you as you are and will love you as I do, in spite of 
 yourselves.” 

And God created a new animal to be a companion for Adam and Eve. 

 And it was a good animal. 

 And God was pleased. 

 And the new animal was pleased to be with Adam and Eve, and he wagged his 
 tail. 

 And Adam said, “Lord, I have already named all the animals in the Kingdom, 
 and I cannot think of a name for this new animal.” 

And God said, ” I have created this new animal to be a reflection of my 
 love for you, his name will be a reflection of my own name, and you will call him 
 DOG.” 
And Dog lived with Adam and Eve and was a companion to them and loved them. 

 And they were comforted. 

 And God was pleased. 

 And Dog was content and wagged his tail. 

 After a while, it came to pass that an angel came to the Lord and said, 
“Lord, Adam and Eve have become filled with pride. They strut and preen like peacocks 
 and they believe they are worthy of adoration. Dog has indeed taught them that 
 they are loved, but perhaps too well.” 

And God said, “I will create for them a companion who will be with them 
 and who will see them as they are. The companion will remind them of their limitations, 
 so they will know that they are not always worthy of adoration.” 

And God created CAT to be a companion to Adam and Eve. And Cat would not 
 obey them. And when Adam and Eve gazed into Cat’s eyes, they were reminded that they 
 were not the supreme beings. 

 And Adam and Eve learned humility. 

 And they were greatly improved. 

 And God was pleased. 

 And Dog was happy. 

 And Cat didn’t give a shit one way or the other. 

***
Ten solders
Ten soldiers are camping in a forest, when two thieves try to steal from them and are caught. The soldiers tell them, "We have to kill you now but since we are in a good mood we'll let you go provided you can make us all laugh". The thieves agree and the first one begins telling a very funny story. Nine of the soldiers are laughing their butts off except for one of them, so they tell the thief, "Sorry, you were funny but not all of us laughed so we have to kill you", and they kill him. The second thief isn't as funny plus now he's nervous so he tells a very boring story. Now nine of the soldiers aren't laughing except for the one who didn't laugh before, so they kill the second thief as well. After killing him the soldiers ask their friend, "Why did you laugh when it was a boring story but not when it was actually funny?", "Oh," he said, "when the second guy was talking, I understood what the first guy said, and it was damn funny"   

^sorry ^for ^the ^bad ^english 

edit:  Changed solders to soldiers (thanks /u/Clutz)
***
A World Wide Survey....
A worldwide survey was conducted by the UN. The only question asked was: "Would you please give your honest opinion about solutions to the food shortage in the rest of the world?" The survey was a huge failure. In Africa they didn't know what "food" meant. In Eastern Europe they didn't know what "honest" meant. In Western Europe they didn't know what "shortage" meant. In China they didn't know what "opinion" meant. In the Middle East they didn't know what "solution" meant. In South America they didn't know what "please" meant. And in the USA they didn't know what "the rest of the world" meant.
***
Jewish Bra
A young Jewish man walks into the Lingerie Department of Macy's in New York. He tells the saleslady,
"I would like a Jewish bra for my wife size 34 B."

With a quizzical look the saleslady asked, "What kind of bra?"

He repeated, "A Jewish bra. She said to tell you that she wanted a Jewish bra, and that you would know what she wanted."

"Ah, now I remember," said the saleslady. "We don't get as many requests for them as we used to. Most of our customers lately want the Catholic bra, or the Salvation Army bra, or the Presbyterian bra."

Confused, and a little flustered, the man asked "So, what are the differences?"

The saleslady responded. "It is all really quite simple. The Catholic bra supports the masses, the Salvation Army lifts up the fallen, and the Presbyterian bra keeps them staunch and upright."

He mused on that information for a minute and said: "Hmm. I know I'll regret asking, but what does the Jewish bra do?"

"Ah, the Jewish bra," she replied "makes mountains out of molehills.
***
The Pope visits Texas
The Pope was state bound scheduled to give a speech in Dallas, TX. On their way to the venue the Pope rolls down the privacy glass in the limo and says to his chauffeur, "Hey, you know what? I've always rode in these things, but I've never driven one! Do you mind if we switch spots?" Being it was the Pope himself, the chauffeur felt he couldn't say no so he obliged and exchanged seats.
It had been years since the Pope had driven, and he was having the time of his life cruising down the interstate going over 100mph! Consequently he was clocked by a state trooper and pulled over. As the trooper approached the vehicle and got a glance at the driver he quickly turned around and returned to his squad car to call his supervisor. 

The trooper called in and told the sergeant, "Sergeant, I'm afraid I pulled over someone very very important."
In which he replied," Well, who is it, the governor?"
"No, no, much more important than that!"
"The President?!"
"I'm afraid even more important than that!"
"Well, who the hell is it then?!" 
"I don't know, but his chauffeur is the freakin' Pope!"
***
The Priest, The Minister and The Rabbi
A priest, a Pentecostal preacher and a Rabbi all served as chaplains to the students of a large, diverse University.
They would get together two or three times a week for coffee and to talk shop.


One day, someone made the comment that preaching to people isn't really all that hard. A real challenge would be to preach to a bear.
One thing led to another and they decided to do an experiment. They would all go out into the woods, find a bear, preach to it, and attempt to convert it.


Seven days later, they're all together to discuss the experience.
Father Flannery, who has his arm in a sling, is on crutches, and has various bandages, goes first. 

"Well," he says, "I went into the woods to find me a bear. And when I found him I began to read to him from the Catechism. Well, that bear wanted nothing to do with me and began to slap me around. So I quickly grabbed my holy water, sprinkled him and, Mary Mother of God, he became as gentle as a lamb. The bishop is coming out next week to give him first communion and confirmation."


Reverend Billy Bob spoke next. He was in a wheelchair, with an arm and both legs in casts, and an IV drip. In his best fire and brimstone oratory he claimed, 

"WELL brothers, you KNOW that we don't sprinkle! I went out and I FOUND me a bear. And then I began to read to my bear from God's HOLY WORD! But that bear wanted nothing to do with me. So I took HOLD of him and we began to wrestle. We wrestled down one hill, UP another and DOWN another until we came to a creek. So I quickly DUNKED him and BAPTIZED his hairy soul. And just like you said, he became as gentle as a lamb. We spent the rest of the day praising Jesus."


They both looked down at the rabbi, who was lying in a hospital bed. He was in a body cast and traction with IV's and monitors running in and out of him. All in all, he was in horrible shape. The rabbi looks up and says, "Looking back on it, circumcision may not have been the best way to start."
***
I am Pierre
Pierre, a brave French fighter pilot, takes his girlfriend, Marie, out for a  pleasant little picnic by the River Seine. It's a beautiful day and love is in the air.

Marie leans over to Pierre and says, "Pierre, kiss me!"

Pierre  grabs a bottle of Merlot and splashes it on Marie's lips.  "What are you doing, Pierre?" says the startled Marie.

"I am Pierre, the fighter pilot! When I have red meat, I have red wine!"

She smiles and they start kissing.  Things began to heat up a little and Marie says, "Pierre, kiss me lower."

Our hero tears her blouse open, grabs a bottle of Chardonnay and pours it on her breasts. "Pierre! What are you doing now?" asks the bewildered Marie.

"I am Pierre, the fighter pilot! When  I have white meat, I have white wine!"

She giggles and they resume their passionate interlude, and things really steam up. Marie leans close to his ear and whispers, "Pierre,  kiss me much lower!"

Pierre rips off her underwear, grabs a bottle of  Cognac and pours it in her lap. He then strikes a match and lights the cognac on fire. Marie shrieks and dives into the River Seine.

Standing waist deep, Marie throws her arms into the air and screams furiously, "PIERRE, WHAT IN THE F#@K DO YOU THINK YOU ARE DOING?"

Our hero stands and says defiantly, "I am Pierre, the fighter pilot! If I go down, I go down in  flames!"
***
A man with no arms is homeless and looking for a job.
He goes to the pastor in his local church one morning and says:
"Pastor, I am in desperate need of work. Is there any kind of job you can give me, despite my obvious disability?"
The pastor, with a cheeky grin, points to the churches bell tower and says:
"You see that bell up in the tower? If you can ring that for me every day precisely at noon, I will pay you $20 a day. Can you do that for me?"
The no armed man hesitates, but the offer of $20 a day sounds too promising, so he agrees. 

Later that day, he makes his way up to the bell tower but alas, cannot pull the rope for obvious reasons. However, he does not give up. Being a quick thinker, the man takes a stance in front of the bell, and begins repeatedly bashing his face into the bell. Success! the bell rings on the strike of noon, and a slightly dizzy no armed man returns downstairs, where a very confused pastor lives up to his promise and grants him $20.

This process continues for several weeks. Every day at noon, the man would head to the bell tower and bash his face into the solid metal for it to chime, and then the pastor would pay him. Over time, however, this method began damaging the mans head, both inside and out. Bruises were always constant, and the pastor began noticing the man would slur his speech, look deranged and have trouble walking in a straight line. But there were no complaints, and the man, though a bit slower by the day, was still getting paid happily, so it continued.

On one fateful day, however, the man once again staggers up the stairs to reach the bell tower as noon approached. He took his normal stance, ready to smash his head once again into the giant chiming machine. However, on this fateful day, he succumbs to the damage, and as he charges at the bell, he staggers so much that he completely misses the target. His momentum takes him right over the shallow wall of the tower and he plummets to the ground. He is killed instantly.
 
A crowd of people begin to gather around the no armed man's body, including a police officer. A woman looks at the body, horrified, and asks "Oh my god, does anybody know who this man is?" The police officer looks at the dead man and replies "I don't know him, but his face rings a bell."
***
Why is it so hard to have a guys night out
Why it is hard to have a guys night out when you are in a relationship.Last Friday night I was invited with the boys for some fun. “I told my wife I would be home by midnight,….I swear !!! Well the hours passed and the beers and shots went down to easily…around 2:30 am and a wee bit drunkin, I took a taxi home. 
just as I got in the door…the cuckoo clock in the hallway started up and cuckooed 3 times…Quickly, realising my wife would probably wake up , I cuckooed another 9 times. I was really proud of myself for coming up with such a quick-witted solution, in order to escape a possible conflict with her (even when totally hammered…3 cucckoos plus 9 = midnight !!!

Well the next morning my wife was in a good mood and she asked what time I got in….I said twelve Midnight….she didn’t seem mad at all ( I was thinking I got away with one)….

then she said we need a new cuckoo clock…I then asked her why…and she said….well, last night our cuckoo clock cuckooed 3 times, then said oh $hit….cuckooed 4 times, cleared it’s throat and cuckooed 3 more times…laughed and cuckooed twice more and the tripped over the coffee table and farted
***
..Trump said "Buy american, Hire american"
Standing on an Ikea podium from *Sweden*, behind bullet proof by Saint Gobain Glass from *France*, smiling at a 4K Sony *Japanese* Video camera, speaking into a Dolby Sennheiser *German* microphone, with vigorous hand gestures giving a glimpse of a Rolex under the cuff made in *Switzerland*  

he patriotically said ..*"Buy American, Hire American, Stop Immigrants".* while standing beside a *Slovenian wife*
***
George Bush is with the Queen of England.
George: "Your Majesty, any tips you can give me to stay in power, the way you have been for so long?"
"Well" said the Queen, "The most important thing is to surround yourself with intelligent people."
George frowned and then asked, "But how do I know the people around me are intelligent?"
The Queen: "Easy, you just ask them to answer an intelligent riddle."
The Queen pushed a button on her intercom. "David Cameron, would you come in here, please?"
David Cameron walked into the room and said, "Yes, ma'am?"
The Queen smiled and said, "Answer me this please, David. Your mother and father have a child. It's not your brother and it's not your sister. Who is it?"
Without pausing for a moment, David Cameron answered, "That would be me, ma'am."
"Very good! Thank you, David!" said the Queen.
Then she turned to George with a smile and said "See?"
Now its George's turn to apply the same logic...
George went back to the USA and asked Jeb.. "Jeb, answer this for me. Your mother and your father have a child. It's not your brother and it's not your sister. Who is it?"
"I'm not sure." said Jeb. "Let me get back to you on that one..."
Jeb went to his advisors and asked every one, but none could give him an answer...
Finally, he ran into Obama and asked, "Hey, can you answer this for me? Your mother and father have a child and it's not your brother or your sister. Who is it?"..
Obama answered, "That's easy, it's me!"
Jeb said, "Thanks!"
Then he went back to George. "I did some thinking and I have the answer to that riddle. It's Barack Obama."
George slapped him. and shouted.. "No! You dumb idiot! It's David Cameron."
***
A little girl walks into a pet shop and asks ...
'Excuthe me, do you have any widdle wabbits?'
The shopkeeper's heart melts, he gets down on his knees
so that he's on her level, and says, 'Do you want a widdle white wabbit or a thoft, fwuffy bwack wabbit, or one like that widdle bwown wabbit over there?'
The little girl blushes, rocks on her heels, puts her hands on her knees, leans forward and whispers ...
'I don't weally fink my pyfon gives a phuk!!..
***
A guy buys a vintage motorcycle he saw for sale in an ad in the paper...
When he goes to pick the bike up, the dude who sells him the bike says, "

"Now remember....that's all original leather. You can't let it get too wet. If it starts raining and you don't have anywhere to shelter it, make sure you keep a tub of vaseline with you. Rub it all over the seat so the water will just bead off."

The guy takes his new bike and goes to pick up his girlfriend. The girlfriend invites the guy over to her parents house for dinner. This will be the first time he's ever eaten with her family. 

"I should let you know the rule of the table" she said. "There is no talking allowed. The first person to talk at the table has to clean the dishes." 

The guy doesn't think this is that big of a deal until he arrives at the family's house and looks in the kitchen. There must be at least three months worth of dishes inside. They are stacked up to the ceiling, stinking and rotting of mold and old bits of food everywhere. The guy almost throws up at the smell and sight of such a disgusting state of affairs. 

Dinner begins, and no one is saying a word. The tension is starting to get to the boyfriend, so he concocts a plan to make someone else speak first. 

The guy drops his fork, goes over to his girlfriend at the table, throws her up on top and just starts fucking her in front of everyone. The father and mother are obviously mortified. But even with their jaws on the floor, no one says a word. 

The guy stops and thinks to himself "This is going to be harder than I thought...."  then he gets another idea.....

Without hesitation, he runs over to the *mother* throws her up on the table and fucks the shit out of her, right in front of the father. 

The dad is staring daggers through the boyfriend and turning bright red in anger. But still says nothing. The girlfriend is becoming teary eyed and covering her mouth with her hands, but doesn't make a peep. 

The boyfriend stops fucking the mother and sits back down at his seat, completely flustered. He takes a gander out the window, and notices a sudden heavy rain has settled in. He then realizes that his vintage motorbike is parked on the street, uncovered. 

The boyfriend pops out of his seat and grabs his tub of vaseline.

The dad jumps out of his chair and yells out, "ALRIGHT, I'LL DO THE GODDAMNED DISHES!"
***
Jimmy the Bum
I was hanging around the bars downtown when I ran into an old acquaintance, Tom. He asks, "You come down here often? I gotta show you this bum I met. He's gotta be the dumbest SOB I've ever met." We walk over to the corner where a man was standing with a cardboard sign. "Hey Jimmy," Tom greets the bum with a smile and holds up $5 and a $1 bill in each hand "which one ya want?". Jimmy instantly points to the $1 bill and Tom hands it over to him. Tom has his laugh and walk off, "I'll meet you inside buddy. You try it with him, Jimmy picks the smaller bill every time." I asked Jimmy, "You gotta know the $5 is worth more, but why did you take the $1?". Jimmy replies with a shrug, "If I take the $5, he would have stopped giving me money years ago".
***
My grandpa told me this one!
One day at kindergarten, the teacher says to the class of five-year-olds,  "I'll give $2 to the child who can tell me who the most famous man who ever lived was."

An Irish boy raised his hand and said, "Please, Miss, it was St. Patrick." The teacher said, "Sorry, Sean, that's not correct."

Then a Scottish boy put his hand up and said, "Please, Miss, it was St. Andrew." The teacher replied, "I'm sorry, Hamish, that's not right either."

Finally, a Jewish boy, Adam, raised his hand and said, "Please, Miss, it was Jesus Christ."

The teacher said, "That's absolutely right, Adam. Come up here, and I'll give you your $2."

As the teacher was giving Adam his money, she said, "You know, Adam, you being Jewish, I was very surprised you said Jesus Christ." "I know, Miss," Adam replied, "in my heart I knew it was Moses, but business is business.
***
So, Bob shot a duck and it fell into Tom's property...
...Bob quickly hopped over the fence and went into Tom's backyard to get his meal, but Tom walks outside and finds Bob trespassing.    

"Hey, Bob! That duck is in MY property, and it is MINE."    

"No way, Tom! I shot this duck fair and square. I shot it, so I eat it!"    

"How about this," said Tom. "We both kick each other in the balls, back and forth, back and forth, and the first person to fall on the floor, loses, and has to give up the duck".    

"That sounds reasonable. I have a high pain tolerance! Hit me with your best shot!" yelled Bob.    

**BOOM**, Tom kicks Bob as hard as he can in the balls. Bob yells in pain, but he is still standing.    

"Alright, so you kicked me in the balls, now it's my turn!" exclaimed Bob.    

"Nah, man, it's cool, you can keep the duck."
***
The Reverend John Flapps
The Reverend John Flapps was the pastor of a small town church
in Ireland . One day he was walking down the High Street and he
noticed a young lady of his congregation sitting in a pub
drinking beer.
The Reverend wasn't happy. He walked through the open
door of the pub and sat down next to the woman. 'Mrs
Fitzgerald,' he said sternly. 'This is no place for a member
of my congregation. Why don't you let me take you home?' 'Sure,'
she said with a slur, obviously very drunk.
When Mrs Fitzgerald stood up from the bar, she began to weave
back and forth.
The Reverend realized that she'd had far too much to drink and
grabbed her arms to steady her. When he did, they both lost
their Balance and tumbled to the floor.
After rolling around for a few moments, the Reverend wound up
on top of Mrs. Fitzgerald, her skirt hiked up to her waist.
The pub landlord looked over and said, 'Oi Mate, we won't have
any of that carrying on in this pub.'
The Reverend looked up at the landlord and said, 'But you
don't understand, I'm Pastor Flapps.' The landlord nodded and
said,
'Oh well, if you're that far in, you might as well finish.' 
***
This farmer has about 200 hens, but no rooster...
and he wants chicks. So, he goes down the road to the next farmer and asks if he has a rooster.  The other farmer says, "yeah, I've got this great rooster, named randy; he'll service every chicken you've got. No problem"

well, Randy the rooster is a lot of money, but the farmer decides he'd be worth it. so, he buys Randy. The farmer takes Randy home and sets him down in the barnyard, giving the rooster a pep talk, "Randy, I want you to pace yourself now. You've got a lot of chickens to service here and you cost me a lot of money, and I'll need you to do a good job. So, take your time and have some fun," the farmer said with a chuckle.

Randy seemed to understand, so the farmer points towards the hen house and Randy took off like a shot ~WHAM~ He nails every hen in there THREE or FOUR times and the farmer is just shocked. Randy runs out of the hen house and sees a flock of geese down by the lake ~WHAM~ he gets all the geese. Randy's up in the pigpen. He's in with the cows. Randy is jumping on every animal the farmer owns.

The farmer is distraught, worried that his expensive rooster won't even last the day. Sure enough, the farmer goes to bed and wakes up the next day to find Randy dead as a doorknob in the middle of the yard. Buzzards are circling overhead.

The farmer, saddened by the loss of such a colorful animal, shakes his head and says, "Oh, Randy, I told you to pace yourself. I tried to get you to slow down, now look what you've done to yourself."  Randy opens one eye, nods towards the sky and says, "Shhh. They're getting closer..."


**Well worth the read**

**EDIT**: Since this hit front page I must credit my friend. He text this to me while I was at work and I put it on here. I'm glad you all like it.
***
A mafioso finds out that his bookkeeper has screwed him for ten million dollars.
This bookkeeper is deaf, an occupational benefit since it was assumed that a deaf bookkeeper would not be able to hear anything he'd ever have to testify about in court.


When the mafioso confronts the bookkeeper about his missing money, he brings along his attorney, who knows sign language. The mafioso asks, "Where's the ten million bucks you embezzled from me?" The attorney, using sign language, asks the bookkeeper, and the bookkeeper signs back. The attorney tells the mafioso, "He says he doesn't know what you're talking about."



The mafioso pulls out a 9-mm pistol, puts it to the bookkeeper's temple, cocks it, and says, "Ask him again!"


The attorney signs, "Don Vito will kill you for sure if you don't tell him!"


The bookkeeper sighs and signs back, "Okay, you win. The money is in a brown briefcase buried behind the shed in my backyard on Staten Island."


The mafioso asks the attorney, " Well, what'd he say?"


The attorney shakes his head. "He says you don't have the guts to pull the trigger."
***
If World War One were a bar fight.
Germany, Austria and Italy are standing together in the middle of a pub when Serbia bumps into Austria and spills Austria's pint. Austria demands Serbia buy it a complete new suit because there are splashes on its trouser leg. Germany expresses its support for Austria's point of view. Britain recommends that everyone calm down a bit. Serbia points out that it can't afford a whole suit, but offers to pay for the cleaning of Austria's trousers. Russia and Serbia look at Austria. Austria asks Serbia who it's looking at. Russia suggests that Austria should leave its little brother alone. Austria inquires as to whose army will assist Russia in compelling it to do so. 

Germany appeals to Britain that France has been looking at it, and that this is sufficiently out of order that Britain should not intervene. Britain replies that France can look at who it wants to, that Britain is looking at Germany too, and what is Germany going to do about it? Germany tells Russia to stop looking at Austria, or Germany will render Russia incapable of such action. Britain and France ask Germany whether it's looking at Belgium. Turkey and Germany go off into a corner and whisper. When they come back, Turkey makes a show of not looking at anyone. 

Germany rolls up its sleeves, looks at France, and punches Belgium. France and Britain punch Germany. Austria punches Russia. Germany punches Britain and France with one hand and Russia with the other. Russia throws a punch at Germany, but misses and nearly falls over. Japan calls over from the other side of the room that it's on Britain's side, but stays there. Italy surprises everyone by punching Austria. Australia punches Turkey, and gets punched back. There are no hard feelings because Britain made Australia do it. France gets thrown through a plate glass window, but gets back up and carries on fighting. Russia gets thrown through another one, gets knocked out, suffers brain damage, and wakes up with a complete personality change. 

Italy throws a punch at Austria and misses, but Austria falls over anyway. Italy raises both fists in the air and runs round the room chanting. America waits till Germany is about to fall over from sustained punching from Britain and France, then walks over and smashes it with a bar stool, then pretends it won the fight all by itself. By now all the chairs are broken and the big mirror over the bar is shattered. Britain, France and America agree that Germany threw the first punch, so the whole thing is Germany's fault . While Germany is still unconscious, they go through its pockets, steal its wallet, and buy drinks for all their friends.
***
Luigi and his Armani Shoes
Luigi walks to work every day.  Each way he passes a shoe store.  Each time he can't help himself but to stop, look in the window and admire a particular pair of Armani shoes.
 
He wants those shoes so much...it's all he can think about.
 
After about 2 months he saves every last penny to get the $300 he needs to buy the shoes.
 
Every Friday night the Italian community holds a dance in the church basement.
 
Luigi seizes this opportunity to wear his new Armani leather shoes for the first time.
 
He asks Sophia to dance and as they dance he asks her, "Sophia, are you wearing red panties tonight?"
 
Startled, Sophia  replies, "Yes, Luigi , I am wearing red panties tonight, but how do you know?"
 
Luigi answers, "I see the reflection in my new $300 Armani leather shoes."  With a smile he moves on.

Next he asks Rosa to dance, and after a few minutes he asks, "Rosa , are you wearing white panties tonight?"
 
Rosa answers, "Yes, Luigi, I do, but how do you know that?"
 
He replies, "I see the reflection in my new $300 Armani  leather shoes."  With a coy laugh he moves on.

Now as the evening is almost over and the last song is being played Luigi asks Carmela to dance.
 
Midway through the dance his face turns red...
 
He states, 'Carmela, my sweetheart, Please, please tell me you are wearing no panties tonight. Please, please, tell me this true!"
 
Carmela smiles coyly and answers, "Yes Luigi , I am not wearing panties tonight..."
 
Luigi gasps, "Thank God ...I thought I had a CRACK in my $300 Armani leather shoes!"
***
How to sell toothbrushes
Monday at school, the teacher lined up all the students and had them present their weekend homework: their assignment was to sell something and give a presentation on effective salesmanship.

Sally was up first. "I sold Girl Scout cookies and I made $30. My sales approach was to appeal to people's sense of civic duty and I credit that for my success."

"Very good, Sally," said the teacher. "Next?"

Jenny went next. "I sold magazines and I made $45," she said. "My approach was to convince people that the magazines would keep them up to date on current events and trends."

"Very good, Jenny," the teacher said. Eventually it was Little Johnny's turn and as he walked up to the front carrying a large cardboard box, the teacher held her breath.

He dumped the box out onto the teacher's desk, covering it with cash. "I made $2,167," Little Johnny said.

"$2,167?!" the teacher exclaimed. "What in the world were you selling?"

"Toothbrushes," said Little Johnny.

"Toothbrushes?!" echoed the teacher. "How on earth did you sell enough toothbrushes to make that much money?"

"I found the busiest corner in town, and set up a chips & dip stand and gave everyone who came by a free sample. They all said the same thing: 'This tastes like dog crap!' 'It *is* dog crap,' I told them. 'Want to buy a toothbrush?'"

The teacher's jaw dropped.

"I used the government's approach of giving you something shitty for free, and then making you pay to get the bad taste out of your mouth."
***
Hillary Clinton was invited to address a major gathering of the American Indian Nation two weeks ago in upstate New York.
She spoke for almost an hour about her plans for increasing every Native American’s present standard of living. She referred to her time as a U.S. Senator and how she had voted for every Native American issue that came to the floor of the Senate.

&nbsp;

Although Hillary was vague about the details of her plans, she seemed most enthusiastic and spoke eloquently about her ideas for helping her “red sisters and brothers.”

&nbsp;

At the conclusion of her speech, the Tribes presented Hillary with a plaque inscribed with her new Indian name, “Walking Eagle.” The proud Hillary then departed in her motorcade to a fundraiser, waving to the crowds.

&nbsp;

A news reporter later asked the group of chiefs how they came to select the new name they had given to Hillary.

&nbsp;

They explained that “Walking Eagle” is the name given to a bird so full of shit it can no longer fly.
***
Buh, buh ,bible . . .
A man with a stutter answers an ad for "bible salesman wanted". He walks into the office and says " I wanna suh, suh, sell buh, buh, buh, bibles ! "

The office manager, holding back a laugh, replies "sure thing, just take this here box and go door-to-door until they are gone. Then come back for more."

The office manager is amazed when the man comes back the next day and says "I nuh, nuh, nuh, need muh, muh, more buh, buh, buh, buh, bibles ! "

The office manager is dumbstruck but agrees to give the man another box, with one condition. "You have to tell me how you did it. "He says.

"Well I just nah, nah, nock on the duh, duh, duh, door and say, I'm suh, suh, suh, selling buh, buh, buh, bibles. Wuh, wuh, wuh, would you like to buh, buh, buh, buy one or should I reh, reh, reh, READ IT TO YOU? "
***
A man walks into a bar (NSFW)
A man walks into a bar, and as men do at bars he orders a beer. And soon it turns into several beers. And as men do after several beers this man is gets rather drunk and needs to piss. So he walks into the bathroom and uses one of the urinals. He looks down to the urinal next to him and sees a short man in a green suit taking a piss. This little guy has the absolutely largest dick that the man has ever seen. The man is absolutely shocked.

In this man's drunken stupor he blurts out, "Oy, that is one fucking big cock ya got there!"

The little man in the green suit looks up and says, "Well of course I do, all leprechauns do!"

The man is even more shocked now, "Wait you're a fuckin' leprechaun?!"

Slowly the man tries to process this and suddenly grabs the leprechaun and says, "Well, now you need to give me your pot of gold!"

The little man looks up sadly and responds, "Well, you see, in this economy we leprechauns don't have pots of gold anymore. We decided it would be easier to grant a wish to the people who catch us, but there is a catch. If you want the wish you need to let me fuck you in the ass."

The man thinks for a second and agrees. The idea of getting anything he wants is just too tempting despite the massive size of the leprechaun's cock.

So they move to a stall, the little man jumps up on the toilet, and they start fucking. The little guy really starts giving it to him.

After about 15 minutes the man is really starting to regret his decision. Then the little man asks, "What's your name, friend?"

The man is barely able to talk while getting fucked in the ass like this, but he just manages to get out, "My name is Dave."

"Oh by the way, how old are ye, Dave?"

"35"

"Wow 35 years old and you still be believe in leprechauns!!!"
***
A worldwide survey was conducted by the UN. The only question asked was: "Would you please give your honest opinion about solutions to the food shortage in the rest of the world?"
The survey was a huge failure. In Africa they didn't know what "food" meant. In Eastern Europe they didn't know what "honest" meant. In Western Europe they didn't know what "shortage" meant. In China they didn't know what "opinion" meant. In the Middle East they didn't know what "solution" meant. In South America they didn't know what "please" meant. And in the USA they didn't know what "the rest of the world" meant.
***
A hurricane comes unexpectedly.
The ship goes down and is lost. A man finds himself swept up on the shore of an island with no other people, no supplies, nothing. Only bananas and coconuts. Used to five-star hotels, this guy has no idea what to do, so for the next four months he eats bananas, drinks coconut juice and longs for his old life. He fixes his gaze on the sea, hoping to spot a rescue ship.

One day, as he is lying on the beach, he spots a movement out of the corner of his eye. It's a rowboat, and in it is the most gorgeous woman he has ever seen. She rows up to him.

In disbelief, he asks her, 'Where did you come from? How did you get here?'

'I rowed from the other side of the island,' she says. 'I landed here when my cruise ship sank.'

'Amazing,' he says. 'I didn't know anyone else had survived. How many are there? You were lucky to have a rowboat wash up with you.'

'It's only me,' she says, 'and the rowboat didn't wash up; nothing did.'

He is confused. 'Then how did you get the rowboat?'

'Oh, simple,' replies the woman. 'I made the rowboat out of materials that I found on the island. I whittled the oars from the gumtree branches. I wove the bottom from palm branches and the sides and stern came from a coconut tree.'

'B-b-but that's impossible,' stutters the man. 'You had no tools or hardware. How did you manage?'

'Oh, that was no problem,' replies the woman. 'On the other side of the island there is a very unusual stratum of alluvial rock exposed. I found that if I fired it to a certain temperature in my kiln, it melted into the forgeable ductile iron. I used that for tools and used the tools to make the hardware. But enough of that,' she says. 'Where do you live?'

Sheepishly, he confesses that he has been sleeping on the beach the whole time. 

'Well, let's row over to my place then,' she says.

After a few minutes of rowing she docks the boat at a small wharf. As the man looks to the shore he nearly falls out of the boat. Before him is a stone walk leading to an exquisite bungalow painted in blue and white. While the woman ties up the rowboat with an expertly woven hemp rope, the man can only state ahead, dumbstruck. As they walk into the house, she says casually, 'It's not much, but I call it home. Sit down, please; would you like a drink?'

'No, no thank you,' he says, still dazed. 'I can't take any more coconut juice.'

'It's not coconut juice,' the woman replies. 'I have a still. How about a pina colada?'

Trying to hide his amazement, the man accepts, and they sit down on her couch to talk.

After they have exchanged their stories, the woman announces, 'I'm going to slip into something comfortable. Would you like to take a shower and shave?' There is a razor upstairs in the cabinet in the bathroom.'

No longer questioning anything, the man goes into the bathroom. There in the cabinet is a razor made from a bone handle. Two shells honed to a hollow ground edge are fastened onto its end inside a swivel mechanism.

'This woman is amazing,' he muses. 'What next?'

When he returns, she greets him wearing nothing but vines - strategically positioned - and smelling faintly of gardenias. She beckons him over to sit down next o her.

'Tell me,' she begins, suggestively, slithering closer to him, 'we have been out here for a very long time. You've been lonely. There's something I'm sure you really feel like doing right now, something you've been longing for all these months. You know...'

She stares into his eyes. He can't believe what he is hearing. 

'You mean?' he replies, '...I can check Reddit from here?'
***
Little April
was not the best student in Sunday school. 



Usually she slept through the class. 



One day the teacher called on her while she was napping, "Tell me, April, who created the universe?" 



When April didn't stir, little Johnny, a boy seated in the chair behind her, took a pin and jabbed her in the rear. "GOD ALMIGHTY!" shouted April and the teacher said, "Very good" and April fell back asleep. 



A while later the teacher asked April, "Who is our Lord and Saviour," But, April didn't even stir from her slumber. Once again, Johnny came to the rescue and stuck her again. 'JESUS CHRIST!" shouted April and the teacher said, "very good," and April fell back to sleep. 



Then the teacher asked April a third question. "What did Eve say to Adam after she had her twenty-third child?" And again, Johnny jabbed her with the pin. This time April jumped up and shouted, "IF YOU STICK THAT FUCKING THING IN ME ONE MORE TIME, I'LL BREAK IT IN HALF AND STICK IT UP YOUR ARSE!"
***
Hillary Clinton goes t o a gifted-student primary school in New York to talk about the world. After her talk she offers question time.
One little boy puts up his hand. Hillary asks him what his name is. "Kenneth," he says 
And what is your question, Kenneth?" she asks. 

I have three questions," he says. 

"1st -- whatever happened in Benghazi? 

2nd -- why would you run for president if you are not capable of handling two e-mail accounts? 

And, 3rd -- whatever happened to the missing six-billion-dollars while you were Secretary 
of State?" 

Just then the bell rings for recess. Hillary informs the kiddies that they will continue after recess. 
When they resume Hillary says, "Okay, where were we? Oh, that's right, question time. Who has a 
question?" 


A different boy -- little Johnny -- puts his hand up. 

Hillary points to him and asks him what his name is. "Johnny," he says. 

"And what is your question, Johnny?" she asks. 

"I have five questions," he says. 

"1st -- whatever happened in Benghazi? 

2nd -- why would you run for president if you are not capable of handling two e-mail accounts? 

3rd -- whatever happened to the missing six-billion dollars while you were Secretary of State? 

4th -- why did the recess bell go off 20 minutes early?" 

And 5th -- where's Kenneth?"
***
Airman Jones was assigned
to the induction center, where he advised new recruits about their government benefits, especially their GI insurance. It wasn't long before Captain Smith noticed that Airman Jones was having a staggeringly high success-rate, selling insurance to nearly 100% of the recruits he advised. Rather than ask about this, the Captain stood in the back of the room and listened to Jones' sales pitch. Jones explained the basics of the GI Insurance to the new recruits, and then said: "If you have GI Insurance and go into battle and are killed, the government has to pay $200,000 to your beneficiaries. If you don't have GI insurance, and you go into battle and get killed, the government only has to pay a maximum of $6000. Now," he concluded, "which group do you think they are going to send into battle first?"
***
So John can't take it anymore, so abandons society and makes to the hills.
He's happy as months go by. One day, a large, gruff looking Hill-Billy type man knocks on his door. "The name is Lars" he said. "I'm having a party tonight... wanna come?"

John: "well... I've been alone for months now, I like it but I do get lonely... Sure, I'll come"

Lars: nod. "Just to warn ya, these parties usually involve drinking"

John: "don't worry about me, I can hold my liquor"

Lars: "might be some drugs too"

John: "well I may not partake, but no judgement on anyone who does"

Lars: "usually a bit of fighting as well"

John: "I'm pretty easy going... and if I have to I can take care of myself"

Lars: "I've also seen some pretty nasty sex going on at these parties..."

John: "after several months, that actually sounds pretty awesome!"

Lars: nods turns to leave.

John: "hey, before you go, what should I wear? Casual? Semi-formal?"

Lars: "don't matter... just gonna be the two of us"
***
So there's a plane that's half criminals and half master tradesmen...
The plane is half full of criminals and half full of master craftsmen.

The pilot comes on over the PA and says "Ladies and Gentlemen, the plane is overloaded, we need to bump half of you to another flight."

After deliberating with the mechanics and copilot for a while, the pilot comes back of the intercom and says "We've decided to bump all the master craftsmen from this flight to the next, please grab your carry-ons and head back to the gate."

The pilot stands next to the door apologizing to the master craftsmen as they disembark. One craftsman says to the pilot "I have to ask, why did you decide to bump us? We didn't commit any crimes, they are the ones who should have to wait longer!"

The pilot looks at the craftsman and says "We talked it over and found that the Pros outweighed the Cons."
***
All the single ladles
Joe invited his mother over for dinner one night. During the course of said dinner his mother couldn't help but notice the staggering beauty of Joe's roommate. She had been long suspicious of a relationship between them, and her beauty combined with the banter she had seen them share only made her all the more curious. 

Joe noticed his mother's suspicion. "I know what you must be thinking, but I assure you that Julie and I are just roommates."

A week later, Julie came to Joe and said, "Ever since your mother came to dinner, I can't seem to find the gravy ladle. You don't suppose she took it on accident, do you?"

Joe agreed that it was a reasonable possibility, and wrote a letter to his mother inquiring about the ladle. It read, "I'm not saying you 'did' take the ladle, nor am I saying you 'did not' take the ladle,' but the fact is it's been missing since you came to dinner last week."

Several weeks later, a reply came.

"I'm not saying you 'do' sleep with Julie, nor am I saying you 'do not' sleep with Julie. The fact is if she was sleeping in her own bed, she would have found the ladle by now."
***
Hillary Clinton is elected president, . . .
and on the first night she spends in the White House, she is visited by the ghost of George Washington. She asks him, "George, what can I do to best serve the United States?"

The ghost of George Washington responds, "Never tell a lie."

She says, "Oh, I don't think I can do that."

The next night, she is visited by the ghost of Thomas Jefferson. She asks him, "Thomas, what can I do to best serve the United States?"

The ghost of Thomas Jefferson responds, "Listen to the people."

She says, "Oh, I don't think I can do that."

On the third night, she is visited by the ghost of Abraham Lincoln. She asks him, "Abraham, what can I do to best serve the United States?"

The ghost of Abraham Lincoln responds, "Go see a play."
***
Hillbilly Stripper
Cletus is passing by Billy Bob's hay barn one day when, through a gap in the door, he sees Billy Bob doing a slow and sensual striptease in front of an old John Deere tractor.

He performs a slow pirouette, and gently slides off first the right strap of his overalls, followed by the left. He then hunches his shoulders forward and in a classic striptease move, lets his overalls fall down to his hips, revealing a torn and frayed plaid shirt.

Then, grabbing both sides of his shirt, he rips it apart to reveal his stained T-shirt underneath. With a final flourish, he tears the T-shirt from his body, and hurls his baseball cap onto a pile of hay.
Having seen enough, Cletus rushes in and says, "What the world're ya doing, Billy Bob?"

"Good grief, Cletus, ya scared the bejeebers out of me," says an obviously embarrassed Billy Bob.
"But me 'n the wife been havin' trouble lately in the bedroom d'partment, and the therapist suggested I do something sexy to a tractor."
***
Patrick brings home his new fiancé to meet his parents.
Patrick brings home his new fiancé, Stacy, and introduces her to his parents, who are staunchly Irish Catholic and very old fashioned.

His parents and Stacy get along very well and they have a nice dinner together.  After dinner, they are in the living room exchanging stories, laughs, and beers.  Stacy excuses herself to use the bathroom.

"Patrick, she's wonderful!" his dad says.  

"Why haven't you brought her over here before?" asks his mom.

"Well, dad, mom…" the man trails off.  "It's just…  I'm a little embarrassed about something, but I have to tell you."  He takes a deep breath and blurts out "Stacy is a prostitute."

"Oh my Lord!" shrieks Patrick's mother.

His father clutches his chest and falls to the floor, unconscious.  Patrick and his mom gather around his father, and after a few moments he wakes up.  

"Son," he says.  "What did you just say about Stacy?"

"Dad, she's a prostitute."

"Oh thank Heaven!" his father says.  "I thought you said protestant!"
***
ISIS guy stopped the car of Christian couple.
ISIS guy stopped the car of Christian couple. 
ISIS guy: Are you moslem?  
Christian: Yes I am.  
ISIS guy: Recite a verse from Quran.   
Christian man recited a verse from Bible.  
ISIS guys: Yallah-ho-snackbar, you can go.  

Later Christian guy's wife: I can't believe you took that risk. If he knew you recited a verse from Bible he would have killed us.   
   
Christian guy: Don't worry, if he knew Quran he wouldn't be member of ISIS.  

   
    
_________________________ 
 
 
EDIT :  

**Dein Beitrag wurde vergoldet!**  
What does that mean? Oh! Thanks for the gold ( not sure if I should reveal the user name, I always see people write thanks for the gold stranger )

***
3 spies, a french one, a british one, and an italian one, are captured by al-qaeda...
the terrorists tie each of them up and put the brit and the italian in a locked room. they take the frenchman to a room for 6 hours, torturing information out of him. when they finish with him, they take the brit to the room, who lasts 12 hours. they finally take the italian into the room, but as much as they torture him, they cant get any information out of him.

the brit and the frenchman ask him how it goes and he says "i couldnt say anything." they ask him why and he says "my hands were tied!"
***
Osama Bin Laden sends George W. Bush a coded message
Osama Bin Laden sends George W. Bush a coded message to let him know he is still alive:-
"370H SSV 0773H." Bush is baffled. Condi Rice and her aides and even the FBI and CIA
can't decipher it. So they ask Britain's MI6 for help. Within a minute MI6 replies:-
"Er, tell the President he's holding the message upside down."
***
Superheroes' day off
So it's the superheroes holiday and Superman is looking for some friends to hang out with so he starts flying around and uses his x-ray vision to see what his friends are up to. 

He cruises by incredible hulk's place, uses his x-ray vision and sees hulk lifting weights. Superman thinks to himself, "I lift weights all the time, I don't want to do it on my day off." So he moves on.

Next he comes up to Batman and Robin's place. Uses his x-ray vision to see them doing spring cleaning and dusting. Superman thinks, "what a bunch of nerds. I'm not hanging with them while their doing their cleaning." 

Next he goes to Wonder Woman's house. He uses his vision and sees her totally naked lying on her back with her legs wide open. Superman gets a little excited and thinks to himself, "I'm gonna fly down there with my super speed and get a super quickie." 

So he uses his super speed to fly down and bam! bam! bam! Does his super speed super quickie and ejaculates and is out of there so fast wonder woman didn't even see. 

But Wonder Woman says, "Holy Shit, what the hell was that?" 

To which the Invisible Man replies, "I don't know but my asshole is killing me!"
***
An Englishman, a Frenchman, a Spaniard and a German... (x-post from /r/dadjokes)
An Englishman, a Frenchman, a Spaniard and a German are all standing watching an American street performer do some juggling. The juggler notices the four gentleman have a very poor view, so he stands up on a wooden crate and calls out, "Can you all see me now?"

"Yes"

"Oui"

"Sí"

"Ja"
***
Is This A Joke?
A horse walks into a bar. The bartender says, "why the long face?" The horse stands there, staring blankly at the bartender. Everyone starts to feel a little awkward. The horse's handler comes in and leads it out, but not before it's knocked over a couple of glasses and soiled itself. Needless to say, the bar is closed for the rest of the day. Jesus walks up to the bar, but it's closed for hygiene reasons and he goes next door to a hotel. He hands the receptionist a couple of nails and says "Can you put me up for the night?" The receptionist takes a moment to understand, not speaking Aramaic, but is able to explain in mime that nails are not legal tender. After Jesus leaves disgruntledly, a duck that has been kind of harrassing the receptionist for the last few days by asking for grapes waddles in. The duck asks if the receptionist has any nails, and the receptionist finally snaps. Deciding to walk out on the most ludicrous workday of his life, receptionist goes to the bar, and is infuriated to find it closed. He jimmies open a window, not caring who sees. But two old friends across the street, a priest and a rabbi, DO see. They decide they should do something to calm this agitated man down, and follow him into the bar. The bartender, having spent all day cleaning up after the horse, sees the receptionist, the priest and the rabbi come into the bar, and stops scrubbing shit long enough to ask "Is this some kind of a joke?"
***
An old lady walks into a bank with a big bag of money
One of the employees asks her what she wants. 

Old Lady: I'm here to open an account and I want to deposit all this money into the bank.

"Whoa, that's a whole lot of money", the employee said. "You'll have to talk to the manager."

The employee escorts her to the manager's office, tells the manager everything and leaves.

Manager: Well. We'll deposit your money. How much is it anyway?

Old Lady: A million dollars.

Manager: Whoa! But I don't understand one thing. How did an old lady like you manage to make so much?

Old Lady: I do betting on random things with people.

Manager: And you managed to make so much out of it. Would you care to play one bet with me as well?

Old Lady: Yes! Just seeing you I can bet $100,000 that your testicles are cubical.

Manager: What? That's insane. I know my testicles are round. Do you really want to place your money on such a stupid bet?

Old Lady: Do you want to play the bet or not?

Manager: Okay! You're on.

Old Lady: Okay! But to make sure that you don't cheat, I'll do this tomorrow morning in front of a witness.

Manager: Fine. No problem.

The next day, the lady comes with a man who's meant to be the witness.

Old Lady: Are you ready?

Manager: Yes, absolutely.

Manager takes down his pants and says, "See, it's all round. Nothing's cubical."

Old Lady: "It's not very clear from here. Can I touch and check. After all $100,000 is at stake.

Manager: Yeah, sure. Check all you want.

So the lady walks up to the manager and holds his testicles to check thoroughly.

Meanwhile the witness she brought starts banging his head to the wall.

Manager asks him, "What happened to you?"

Witness: This bitch made a bet with me for $500,000 yesterday that the bank manager's testicles will be in her hands this morning.
***
this prostitute gives the best handjobs in town... (NSFW)
and this guy hears about her and goes to her asking "so you really give the best hanjobs in town?" the girl goes "see that mcdonalds? i've used the money i got from giving handjobs to buy that mcdonalds" so the guy is convinced and asks for a handjob, gives her 50 bucks, and it's the best handjob he's ever gotten. 

he goes "wow that was amazing! do you give awesome blowjobs too?" she says "see that gas station? with the money I've made from giving blowjobs i bought that gas station". the guy is convinced again, gives her 100 bucks, and it's the best blowjob he's ever gotten. 

"wow, that was even more amazing! how good is your pussy?" the girl goes "see that casino? i'd buy that casino if i had a pussy"
***
An Irish daughter had not been home for over five years.
Upon her return, her father questioned her mercilessly. “Where have ye been all this time? Why didn’t you write to us, not even a line? Why didn’t ye call? Can ye not understand what ye put yer old ma through?”

The girl, crying, replied, “Daddy … I became a prostitute.”
“Ye what?! Out of here, ye shameless girl! Sinner! You’re a disgrace to this family.”

“OK, Daddy… as ye wish. I just came back to give Ma this luxurious fur coat, title deed to a ten bedroom mansion plus a savings certificate for $5 million. For my little brother, this gold Rolex and for ye Daddy, the sparkling new Mercedes limited edition convertible that’s parked outside, plus a membership to the country club and… an invitation for ye all to spend New Years Eve on board my new yacht on the Riviera.”

“Now what was it ye said ye had become?” asks Dad.
Girl, crying again, says….”A prostitute, Daddy.”

“Oh! Be the Hokey! Ye scared me half to death, girl! I thought ye said … a PROTESTANT! Now, come here and give yer old man a hug!”
***
So there are three couples.
Three couples—one elderly, one middle-aged, one young and newly wed—apply for membership in a church. The pastor informs them that the requirement for new parishioners is that they abstain from sex for two weeks. The couples agree and go their separate ways.

After two weeks, they return. The pastor asks the elderly pair if they were able to abstain for two weeks. "No problem at all, Pastor," replies the old man.

"Congratulations!" says the pastor. "Welcome to the church." He turns to the middle-aged couple and asks if they were able to abstain for two weeks. "It was difficult," replies the husband. "By the end of the second week, I had to sleep on the couch, but we did it."

"Congratulations on overcoming temptation," says the pastor. "Welcome to the church." He then turns to the newlyweds and asks if they were able to abstain for two weeks.

"At first it was no problem," says the husband. "But one day my wife was reaching for a can of corn on the top shelf, and she dropped it. When she bent over to pick it up, I was overcome with lust and took advantage of her right there."

"You understand, of course, that this means you will not be welcome in our church," says the pastor.

"We know," says the young man. "We’re not welcome at the supermarket anymore either."

***
A Christmas Joke
Three men died on Christmas Eve and were met by Saint Peter at the pearly gates. 'In honor of this holy season' Saint Peter said, 'You must each possess something that symbolizes Christmas to get into heaven.' The Englishman fumbled through his pockets and pulled out a lighter. He flicked it on. 'It's a candle', he said. 'You may pass through the pearly gates' Saint Peter said. The Scotsman reached into his pocket and pulled out a set of keys. He shook them and said, 'They're bells.' Saint Peter said 'You may pass through the pearly gates'. The Irishman started searching desperately through his pockets and finally pulled out a pair of women's panties. St. Peter looked at the man with a raised eyebrow and asked, 'And just what do those symbolize?' The Irishman replied, 'These are Carol's' 
***
A 15 year old boy comes home with a Porsche...
A fifteen-year-old came home with a Porsche and his parents began to yell and scream, "Where did you get that car?"

He calmly told them, "I bought it today."

"With what money!?" demanded his parents. "We know what a Porsche costs."

"Well," said the boy, "this one cost me fifteen dollars."

The parents began to yell even louder. "Who would sell a car like that for fifteen dollars!?" they asked.

"It was the lady up the street," said the boy. "Don't know her name -- they just moved in. She saw me ride past on my bike and asked me if I wanted to buy a Porsche for fifteen dollars."

"Oh my goodness!" moaned the mother, "she must be a child abuser. Who knows what she will do next? John, you go right up there and see what's going on."

So the boy's father walked up the street to the house where the lady lived and found her out in the yard calmly planting flowers. He introduced himself as the father of the boy to whom she has sold a Porsche for fifteen dollars and demanded to know why she did it.

"Well," she said, "this morning I got a phone call from my husband. I thought he was on a business trip, but I learned from a friend he has run off to Hawaii with his secretary and really doesn't intend to come back. He claimed he was stranded and asked me to sell his new Porsche and send him the money. So I did."

***
God Knows!!!
God said, "Adam, I want you to do something for Me."

Adam said, "Gladly, Lord, what do You want me to do?"

God said, "Go down into that valley."

Adam said, "What's a valley?"

God explained it to him. Then God said, "Cross the river."

Adam said, "What's a river?"

God explained that to him, and then said, "Go over to the hill....."

Adam said, "What is a hill?"

So, God explained to Adam what a hill was. He told Adam, "On the other side of the hill you will find a cave."

Adam said, "What's a cave?"

After God explained, He said, "In the cave you will find a woman."

Adam said, "What's a woman?'

So God explained that to him, too. Then, God said, "I want you to reproduce."

Adam said, "How do I do that?"

God first said (under His breath), "Geez....."

And then, just like everything else, God explained that to Adam, as well.

So, Adam goes down into the valley, across the river, and over the hill, into the cave, and finds the woman. Then, in about five minutes, he was back.

God, His patience wearing thin, said angrily, "What is it now?"

And Adam said, "What's a headache?"
***
Old Russian joke
A young guy is drafted into the army, he pleads to the Chief Enlistment Officer:

Conscript - I beg you, tell them I'm unfit for duty and I'l give you $1000!

Officer - You're not lying to me are you? Alright, meet me at the cemetery at 2AM with the money.

The conscript arrives the cemetery precisely at 2AM and sees the officer standing on one leg on top of a grave, the officer is naked, playing a guitar and singing songs. He sees the conscript, gets off the grave, takes his money and tells him: Tomorrow at 10 AM come to the draft committee and I will make sure you won't be drafted.

The following day the conscript stands in front the draft committee:

Officer - You're now enlisted in the navy for 2 years! The conscript almost has a heart attack.

Conscript - How could this be? Last night I met the chief enlistment officer and gave him $1000, you can't draft me!

Officer - This is slander! You didn't give me anything!

Conscript - I did! You were naked, standing on one leg on top of a grave in the cemetery, singing songs all night and playing the guitar!

Officer - Comrades and members of the committee, it's obvious this man is insane! We can't enlist him in the navy, he has to be forbidden to join the military!
***
The ambidextreous Golfer
A group of guys lived and died for their Saturday morning round of golf. One transferred to another city. It wasn't the same without him.
 
A new woman joined their Club. She overheard the guys talking about their golf round. She said, "You know, I used to play on my golf team in college and I was pretty good. Would you mind if I joined you next week?"
 
The three guys looked at each other. Not one of them wanted to say 'yes', but she had them on the spot. Finally, one man said it would be okay, but they would be starting early - at 6:30 a.m.
 

He figured the early tee-time would discourage her. The woman said this may be a problem, and asked if she could be up to 15 minutes late. They rolled their eyes, but said okay. She smiled and said, "Good, I'll be there at 6:30 or 6:45."
 

She showed up at 6:30 sharp, and beat all three of them with an eye-opening 2-under par round. She was fun and a pleasant person, and the guys were impressed. Back at the clubhouse, they congratulated her and invited her back the next week. She smiled, and said, "I'll be there at 6:30 or 6:45."
 
The next week she again showed up at 6:30 sharp. Only this time, she played left-handed. The three guys were incredulous as she still beat them with an even par round, despite playing with her off-hand. They were totally amazed.
 

They couldn't figure her out. She was again very pleasant and didn't seem to be purposely showing them up. They invited her back again, but each man harbored a burning desire to beat her.
 
The third week, the guys had their game faces on. But this time, she was 15 minutes late, which made the guys irritable. This week the lady played right-handed, and narrowly beat all three of them.
 

The men mused that her late arrival was due to petty gamesmanship on her part. However, she was so gracious and so complimentary of their strong play, they couldn't hold a grudge.
Back in the clubhouse, all three guys were shaking their heads. This woman was a riddle no one could figure out. They had a couple of beers, and finally, one of the men asked her point blank, "How do you decide if you're going to golf right-handed or left-handed?"
 

The lady blushed, and grinned. "That's easy," she said. "When my Dad taught me to play golf, I learned I was ambidextrous. I like to switch back and forth. When I got married after college, I discovered my husband always sleeps in the nude. From then on, I developed a silly habit. Before I left in the morning for golf practice, I would pull the covers off him. If his unit was pointing to the right, I played right-handed; if it was pointed to the left, I played left-handed."
 

The guys on the team thought this was hysterical. Astonished at this bizarre information, one of the guys shot back, "But what if it's pointing straight up?"
 
She said, "Then, I'm fifteen minutes late." 

***
A trucker and a blonde.
A trucker is driving down a busy highway when he is abruptly cut off by a blonde woman in her car. Tired and grumpy from driving all day, he quickly pulls along side of the woman's car and forces her to stop on the shoulder of the highway. The trucker and the woman get out of their vehicles. The trucker takes a rock and draws a circle around the blonde. 

"Don't you dare set foot outside this circle," the trucker orders. 

He walks over to the blondes car and keys the side of it. When he returns, the woman is standing in her circle giggling. This angers the trucker even more. He proceeds to grab a bat out of his semi and smash the mirrors off the woman's car. When the trucker returns to the woman, she is still standing in her circle laughing.  Enraged, the trucker takes a gas tank out of his semi, douses the woman's car in gas, and sets it on fire. The woman bursts into hysteria. 

"I just totaled your car!! What is so funny?!" The trucker shouts. 

The blonde replies, "When you weren't looking, I stepped out of the circle three times!"

***
A Jew and an Arab go into a bakery...


The Arab immediately steals three pastries and puts them in his pocket.

He says to the Jew, "See how good I am? The owner didn't see a thing." The Jew says to the Arab, "That's typical of you Arabs. I am going to show you an honest way to get the same result."

He goes to the owner of the bakery and says, "Give me a pastry and I will show you a magic trick."

Intrigued, the owner accepts and gives him a pastry. The Jew swallows it and asks for another one. The owner gives him another one. Then the Jew swallows that one and asks for a third pastry and eats that, too.

The owner is starting to wonder where the magic trick is and asks, "So what did you do with the pastries?"

The Jew replies, "Look in the Arab's pocket....."

***
Bob works hard
Bob works hard at the office but spends two nights each week bowling, 
and plays golf every Saturday. 
His wife thinks he's pushing himself too hard, so for his birthday she takes him to a local strip club. 
The doorman at the club greets them and says, 'Hey, Bob! How ya doin?' 
His wife is puzzled and asks if he's been to this club before. 
'Oh no,' says Bob. 'He's in my bowling league. 

When they are seated, a waitress asks Bob if he'd like his usual and brings over a Budweiser. 
His wife is becoming increasingly uncomfortable and says, 
'How did she know that you drink Budweiser?'
'I recognize her, she's the waitress from the golf club. 
I always have a Bud at the end of the 1st nine, honey.' 

A stripper then comes over to their table, throws her arms around Bob, starts to rub herself all over him and says, 'Hi Bobby. Want your usual table dance, big boy?' 

Bob's wife, now furious, grabs her purse and storms out of the club. 
Bob follows and spots her getting into a cab. 
Before she can slam the door, he jumps in beside her. 
Bob tries desperately to explain how the stripper must have mistaken him for someone else, 
but his wife is having none of it. 
She is screaming at him at the top of her lungs, calling him every 4 letter word in the book. 

The cabby turns around and says, 
'Geez Bob, you picked up a real bitch this time.' 

EDIT: By request

***
A rapist and con artist get caught by the sheriff in a small town.
The town doesn’t have much money to take care of prisoners so the sheriff gets an idea. He decides he’ll charge money to let the townspeople punish the crooks and use the money to keep them in jail for as long as he can. The sheriff figures even a short stay in jail will be plenty after a little “justice” from the townspeople.

The sheriff takes the criminals to the town square, handcuffs them posts and sets up shop. He tells the people that the punishment should fit the crime so anyone can pay $1 to kick the rapist in the groin. Since the con artist used his image to wrong his victims, anyone can pay $1 to hit him in the face.

After a while there are two long lines for the criminals. Some people paying $5, $10, even $15 to get their licks in. After a long while, a guy steps up for his turn and sees the con artist’s face is a bloody pulp and thinks “He’s so beat up at this point, he probably can’t even feel anything anymore. I’m not going to waste my money on that.” So the guy walks up and kicks the con artist squarely in the groin.

The sheriff sees this and hurries over and says, “Hey son, you can’t do that here.”

The man asks, “Why not?”

And the sheriff replies, “Because this is the punch line.”
***
State Trooper pulls a car over
A Texas State trooper pulled a car over on I-35 about 2 miles south of Waco Texas. When the trooper asked the driver why he was speeding, the driver said he was a magician and a juggler and was on his way to Austin to do a show for the Shrine Circus. He didn't want to be late.

 

The trooper told the driver he was fascinated by juggling and said that if the driver would do a little juggling for him, then he wouldn't give him a ticket. He told the trooper he had sent his equipment ahead and didn't have anything to juggle.

 

The trooper said he had some flares and asked if he could juggle them. The juggler said he could, so the trooper got 5 flares, lit them and handed them to the juggler.

 

While the man was juggling, a car pulled in behind the State Trooper's car. A drunken good old boy from central Texas got out, watched the performance, then went over to the trooper's car, opened the rear door and got in. The trooper observed him and went over to his car and opened the door asking the drunk what he thought he was doing.

 

The drunk replied, "You might as well take my ass to jail, cause there ain't no way I can pass that test."
***
Wartime meeting
At the height of WWII on the Eastern front, a high-level meeting takes place in the Kremlin between Stalin and the marshals on the situation on their respective fronts. When the meeting ends, Zhukov is the first one to step out. As he does so, he mutters under his breath "Fucking mustachioed piece of shit." It just so happens that Stalin's secretary, Poskrebyshev hears this. So being a good servant to the cause, he reports it to his boss. To which Stalin replies, "get him back here."

Two minutes later, Zhukov is back in the room facing Stalin. 

"Comrade Zhukov," begins Stalin, "would you please repeat what you said when you left the room?"

"I said 'fucking mustachioed piece of shit' Comrade Stalin."

"And who were you talking about?

"I was talking about Hitler, Comrade Stalin."

Stalin then turns to Poskrebyshev,

"And you, Comrade Poskrebyshev, who did *you* have in mind?
***
The Pope is walking through the streets of Vatican City...
... and he sees two beggars holding up cans for money. One of them is holding up a Christian cross, and the other a Star of David. The Pope sees that the one with the cross is, of course, getting much more money than the one with the Star of David, with some people only giving money to the Christian to spite the Jew. The Pope decides he has to intervene.

So he taps the Jew gently on the shoulder and says, "Excuse me. I noticed that you didn't have anything in your tin and I wanted to point out that in Vatican City, begging for money with a Star of David isn't a very good method of getting any, especially with a man with a cross next to you. Perhaps you should try a different city?"

The Jewish man laughs out loud, shocking the Pope. He turns to the Christian and exclaims, "Hey Abraham! Look who's trying to teach the Goldberg brothers marketing!"
***
Two couples are playing cards at the table, and someone accidentally knocks them to the floor..
Two couples are playing cards at the table, and someone accidentally knocks them to the floor.  One of the men goes under the table to pick up the cards, and as he looks up he can see up his friend's wife's dress and that she isn't wearing any underwear.

Blushing coming up from the table, he sets the cards down and they continue to play.  A little while later while going to get a drink from the fridge, the other wife approaches him and asks, "When you were looking for the cards, did you find anything to your liking?"

Awkwardly, he replies, "Actually yes, I did."

"If you'd like some more, show up tomorrow at 1 pm and bring 100$.  You can like it a little more then.", she whispers to him.

He kindly agrees and the next day he shows up at 1 pm with 100$.  He hands her the money and they proceed to have at each other, in every conceivable way, for several hours.  After the deed is done, he leaves the house.

Holding the money in her hand, the phone rings 10 minutes later.  It's her husband, "Hey, did Mike come by today at around 1 pm?"

Ashamed and a little frightened, she says, "Uh, yes he did."

"Did he happen to give you 100$?", he replies promptly.

Her heart sinks, "Y-y-yes, he did."

"Ah, ok.  Good.  He came by earlier and asked to borrow 100$.  He said he'd drop it off at the house today at 1 pm"
***
Turtle Picnic
Three turtles named Tom, Dick, and Harry are roommates. One day they decide to go for a picnic on Picnic Hill. So they pack up a picnic basket and set off. It takes them ten days to get there. 

As they're setting up the picnic, Tom pulls out a few bottles of beer and asks Dick "did you pack the bottle opener?"

"No," says Dick "I thought you packed it."

"Damn," says Tom. "Somebody needs to go get the bottle opener. Harry, go back to the house and get it."

"NO WAY," says Harry. "As soon as I leave, you guys are gonna eat all the sandwiches. I'm not going."

"Come on," says Tom, "We promise not to touch any of the picnic food until you get back. Right Dick?"

Dick promises too, so Harry sets off down the road. 

Ten days go by.

"Man," says Tom, "I'm hungry. Let's eat a sandwich."

"No way" says Dick. "We promised not to touch them, and he'll be back soon. Just wait."

Ten more days go by. Harry still hasn't returned.

"I'm SOOO hungry," says Tom. "Let's eat already."
"Not happening," says Dick. "We promised."

Ten more days go by. It's been thirty days and Harry is nowhere to be seen.

"I'm STARVING," says Tom. "Let's just open up ONE sandwich and split it, and then we'll save the rest for when Harry gets back."
"Well, okay," says Dick. "But just one sandwich, and we're not touching anything else." So they unwrap one sandwich and split it in half, and each turtle takes a bite. 

Just then Harry pops his head up from behind a rock five feet away. "MAN, I FUCKING KNEW IT!" he screams. "I'M NOT GOING!"

***
The Danceologist
A man was sitting at a bar in London, and ordered a drink.

"So, who are you?", asked the bartender.

"I'm a danceologist. I've studied every dance in the entirety of Oceania".

"Even the Wingo Wango?"

"Mhm", he replied.

"Even the Yapucha dance?", he asked.

"Wait, I've never heard of that one! Can you tell me about it?"

The bartender shook his head. "I can't, but my cousin lives in Darwin. Here's his address. The bartender handed him a business card. The danceologist thanked him, and booked a flight there. When he arrived at the airport, the cousin greeted the danceologist, and took him home.

"Every year on the 12^th of May they do the dance. You see that mountain up there? They live on top. They'll be doing it in 2 weeks.

The danceologist looked at the mountain in awe. Two weeks later, there was a heavy storm. There were collapsing, jagged rocks, and the icy winds battered him. He didn't bring any oxygen, and so he felt too out of breath, and took a rest. Later, he carried on for one last push, and reached the top, where he met the tribe.

"Aha! Is this where the Yapucha dance is?", exclaimed the danceologist.

"Sorry", said the chief. "You missed it by twelve minutes".

"WHAT?!", exclaimed the man. "Can you do it just for me?", he asked.

"Sorry again", said the chief. "It would upset the Gods. Come back next year at 12 o' clock"

Distraught, he went down the mountain. He flew back to London, and waited a full year, holding off any other projects so he could practise, even to the point where he spent less time with his family. When the time came, he flew back to Darwin, climbed out the mountain, combatted the chilly winds, fought off aggressive wildlife, only to get hit by a rock on the head. Despite this, he carried on, and reached the top.

"Am I in time?!", the danceologist panicked.

"Just in time!", laughed the chief. "Are we all ready?"

The other tribesmen got into a circle and nodded. The danceologist watched intently.

"Yapucha left foot in..."
***
An unemployed engineer opens a clinic..
An engineer who was unemployed for a long time decided to open a medical clinic. He puts a sign outside the clinic: 
"A cure for your ailment guaranteed at $500; we'll pay you $1,000 if we fail." 

A Doctor thinks this is a good opportunity to earn $1,000 and goes to his clinic. 

Doctor: "I have lost my sense of taste." 

Engineer: "Nurse, please bring the medicine from box 22 and put 3 drops in the patient's mouth." 

Doctor: "This is Gasoline!" 

Engineer: "Congratulations! You've got your taste back. That will be $500." 


The Doctor gets annoyed and goes back after a couple of days later to recover his money. 

Doctor: "I have lost my memory, I cannot remember anything." 

Engineer: "Nurse, please bring the medicine from box 22 and put 3 drops in the patient's mouth." 

Doctor: "But that is Gasoline!" 

Engineer: "Congratulations! You've got your memory back. That will be $500." 


The Doctor leaves angrily and comes back after several days, more determined than ever to make his money back.

Doctor: "My eyesight has become weak." 

Engineer: "Well, I don't have any medicine for this. Take this $1,000," passing the doctor a $500 note.

Doctor: "But this is $500..." 

Engineer: "Congratulations! You've got your vision back! That will be $500."
***
Not a dadjoke - but he told it to me anyway...
A bloke walks into a bar in New Zealand and orders a shandy. All the Kiwis sitting around the bar look up, expecting to see another Australian visitor. 

The barman says, "You aren't from around here, are ya?"


The guy says, "No, I'm from Canada." 


The bartender says, "What do you do in Canada?"


The guy says, "I'm a taxidermist." 


The bartender says, "A tixidermist? What the hick is a tixidermist? Do you drive a tixi?'

"No, a taxidermist doesn't drive a taxi. I mount animals." 


The bartender grins and yells, "He's okay, boys. He's one of us!" 
***
Two Beggars in Rome
Two beggars are sitting side by side on a street in Rome, Italy. One has a Cross in front of him; the other one is holding the Star of David. Many people go by, look at both beggars, but only put money into the hat of the beggar sitting behind the Cross.

The Pope comes by. He stops to watch the throngs of people giving money to the beggar who holds the Cross while none give to the beggar holding the Star of David. Finally, the Pope approaches the beggar with the Star of David and says, 

"My poor fellow, don't you understand? This is a Catholic country; this city is the seat of Catholicism. People aren't going to give you money if you sit there with a Star of David in front of you, especially when you're sitting beside a beggar who is holding a Cross. In fact, they would probably give more money to him just out of spite."

The beggar with the Star of David listened to the Pope, smiled, and turned to the beggar with the Cross and said, 

"Moishe, look who's trying to teach the Goldstein brothers about marketing!"
***
During the Cold War, the CIA wanted to create the perfect Russian spy.
So they train a cohort for years and then they choose the best candidate. They deploy him from a stealth submarine on a remote Russian coast and the spy starts making his way towards Moscow through the frozen tundra. After a few days he comes across a small trapping village and as he was starting to get hungry and wanting to give his skills a test run he decides to go in.

The people are extremely welcoming of the stranger. They share all they have with him and even throw a celebration that evening. The spy blends in perfectly, he speaks Russian with no accent, he knows all the songs, dances kazachok with the best of them and drinks all the Russians under the table with vodka.

At the end of the night, one of the villagers slaps him on the back and says with a wink: “You know, Igor, we really like you! But we know that you’re an American spy!”

Igor becomes sad: “But… I studied with the best, for years! What did I do wrong, how could you tell after just one day?!”

“But Igor,” says the Russian with a smile, “you’re black!”
***
The Deaf Mafia Bookkeeper
A mafia Godfather finds out that his bookkeeper of 20 years, Guido, has cheated him out of $10 million. Guido is deaf which is why he got the job in the first place. The Godfather assumed that since Guido could not hear anything, he could never testify in court.When the Godfather goes to confront Guido about his missing $10 million, he takes along his personal lawyer because he knows sign language.

The Godfather tells the lawyer, "Ask him where the money is!"

The lawyer, using sign language, asks Guido, "Where's the money?"

Guido signs back, "I don't know what you are talking about." The lawyer tells the Godfather, "He says he doesn't know what you are talking about."

The Godfather pulls out a pistol, puts it to Guido's head and says, "Ask him again or I'll kill him!"

The lawyer signs to Guido, "He'll kill you if you don't tell him." Guido trembles and signs back, "OK! You win! The money is in a brown briefcase, buried behind the shed at my cousin Bruno's house."

The Godfather asks the lawyer, "What did he say?"

The lawyer replies, "He says you don't have the balls to pull the trigger."
***
A man takes a business trip to a small town in a remote valley...NSFW
and when he checks into the only hotel in the town, he quietly asks the manager:

"Y'know, do you have any girls here, for, uh, 'nighttime favours'?"

"Not really", the manager answers, "we only have Bob." 

The man is a bit confused, replies "Hm, no thank you" and goes to his room.
At night, he is lying on his bed, sleepless, and cannot control his urges any longer, so he decides to call up the manager again.

"You know, I've changed my mind, please call Bob for me. How much does he usually charge?" 

"You'll need to pay about eighty bucks"

"Okay, fine, and how will we go about this? I give the eighty to Bob and then we'll fuck?"

"Nah, not really, you'll have to pay forty to the mayor, because it's his city and he doesn't really like it when this happens. So if you pay him first, he'll look the other way"

"Sure, so Bob only gets forty dollars, but then we'll fuck!"

"Ah, not quite. See, I'll take twenty of those, since it's my hotel, and I also don't really like it when this happens."

"Whatever, if Bob is satisfied with the twenty that are left over, it's fine. So I'll just give those to him, and then we can get it on?"

"Nope, John and Tony will be splitting the remaining twenty, they'll be holding Bob down, because he also doesn't really like it when this happens."
***
Smart Diagnosis Machine
One day, in line at the company cafeteria, Jack says to Mike behind him, "My elbow hurts like hell. I guess I better see a doctor." 

"Listen, you don't have to spend that kind of money," Mike replies. "There's a diagnostic computer at the drugstore at the corner. Just give it a urine sample and the computer'll tell you what's wrong and what to do about it. It takes ten seconds and costs ten dollars...a hell of a lot cheaper than a doctor." 

So Jack deposits a urine sample in a small jar and takes it to the drugstore. He deposits ten dollars, and the computer lights up and asks for the urine sample. He pours the sample into the slot and waits. 

Ten seconds later, the computer ejects a printout: You have tennis elbow. Soak your arm in warm water and avoid heavy activity. It will improve in two weeks. 

That evening while thinking how amazing this new technology was, Jack began wondering if the computer could be fooled. He mixed some tap water, a stool sample from his dog, urine samples from his wife and daughter, and masturbated into the mixture for good measure. 

Jack hurries back to the drugstore, eager to check the results. He deposits ten dollars, pours in his concoction, and awaits the results. 

The computer prints the following:
 
1. Your tap water is too hard. Get a water softener. 
2. Your dog has ringworm. Bathe him with anti-fungal shampoo. 
3. Your daughter has a cocaine habit. Get her into rehab. 
4. Your wife is pregnant...twin girls. They aren't yours. Get a lawyer. 
5. If you don't stop playing with yourself, your elbow will never get better.

***
Tax office sent an inspector.....
....to audit the books of a synagogue. While he was checking the books he turned to the Rabbi and said: "I notice you buy a lot of candles. What do you do with the candle drippings?"

"Good question," noted the Rabbi. "We save them up and send them back to the candle makers, and every now and then they send us a free box of candles."

"Oh," replied the auditor, somewhat disappointed that his unusual question had a practical answer. But on he went, in his obnoxious way: "What about all these biscuit purchases? What do you do with the crumbs?"

"Ah, yes," replied the Rabbi, realizing that the inspector was trying to trap him with an unanswerable question. "We collect them and send them back to the manufacturers, and every now and then they send a free box of holy biscuits."

"I see," replied the auditor, thinking hard about how he could fluster the know-it-all Rabbi. "Well, Rabbi," he went on, "what do you do with all the leftover foreskins from the circumcisions you perform?"

"Here, too, we do not waste," answered the Rabbi. "What we do is save up all the foreskins and send them to the Tax Office, and about once a year they send us a complete dick ".
***
Surrogate Father
The Smiths were unable to conceive children and decided to use a surrogate father to start their family. On the day the proxy father was to arrive, Mr. Smith kissed his wife goodbye and said, 'Well, I'm off now. The man should be here soon.'

Half an hour later, just by chance, a door-to-door baby photographer happened to ring the doorbell, hoping to make a sale. 'Good morning, Ma'am,' he said, 'I've come to...'

'Oh, no need to explain,' Mrs. Smith cut in, embarrassed, 'I've been expecting you.' 

'Have you really?' said the photographer. 'Well, that's good. Did you know babies are my specialty?'

'Well that's what my husband and I had hoped. Please come in and have a seat!'

After a moment she asked, blushing, 'Well, where do we start?'

'Leave everything to me.. I usually try two in the bathtub, one on the couch, and perhaps a couple on the bed. And sometimes the living room floor is fun. You can really spread out there.'

'Bathtub, living room floor? No wonder it didn't work out for Harry and me!'

'Well, Ma'am, none of us can guarantee a good one every time. But if we try several different positions and I shoot from six or seven angles, I'm sure you'll be pleased with the results.'

'My, that's a lot!' gasped Mrs. Smith.

'Ma'am, in my line of work a man has to take his time. I'd love to be In and out in five minutes, but I'm sure you'd be disappointed with that.'

'Don't I know it,' said Mrs. Smith quietly.

The photographer opened his briefcase and pulled out a portfolio of his baby pictures. 'This was done on the top of a bus,' he said.

'Oh, my God!' Mrs. Smith exclaimed, grasping at her throat.

'And these twins turned out exceptionally well - when you consider their mother was so difficult to work with..'

'She was difficult?' asked Mrs. Smith.

'Yes, I'm afraid so. I finally had to take her to the park to get the job done right. People were crowding around four and five deep to get a good look.'

'Four and five deep?' said Mrs. Smith, her eyes wide with amazement.

'Yes,' the photographer replied. 'And for more than three hours, too. The mother was constantly squealing and yelling. I could hardly concentrate, and when darkness approached I had to rush my shots. Finally, when the squirrels began nibbling on my equipment, I just had to pack it all in.'

Mrs. Smith leaned forward. 'Do you mean they actually chewed on your, uh...equipment?'

'It's true, Ma'am, yes.. Well, if you're ready, I'll set-up my tripod and we can get to work right away.'

'Tripod?'

'Oh yes, Ma'am. I need to use a tripod to rest my Canon on. It's much too big to be held in the hand very long.'

Mrs. Smith fainted.
***
Three engineers and three accountants are traveling by train to a conference.
At the station, the three accountants each buy tickets and watch as the three engineers buy only a single ticket.

”How are three people going to travel on only one ticket?” asks an accountant.

”Watch and you’ll see,” answers an engineer. All of them board the train.

The accountants take their respective seats but all three engineers cram into a restroom and close the door behind them.

Shortly after the train has departed, the conductor comes around collecting tickets. He knocks on the restroom door and says, “Ticket, please.”The door opens just a crack and a single arm emerges with a ticket in hand. The conductor takes it and moves on.

The accountants saw this and agreed it was  a clever idea.So after the conference, the accountants decide to copy the engineers on the return trip and save some money.

When they get to the station they buy a single ticket for the return trip.To their astonishment, the engineers don’t buy a ticket at all.

”How are you going to travel without a ticket?” says one perplexed accountant.

”Watch and you’ll see,” answers an engineer.

When they board the train the three accountants cram into a restroom and the three engineers cram into another one nearby. 

The train departs.Shortly afterward, one of the engineers leaves his restroom and walks over to the restroom where the accountants are hiding.

He knocks on the door and says, “Ticket, please.”
***
Girl friend of a boy starts farting at the dinning table...and she feels that no one has noticed it.....but....
A woman goes to her boyfriend's parents' house for dinner.  This is tobe her first time meeting the family and she is very nervous.  They all sit down and begin eating a fine meal. The woman is beginning to feel a little discomfort, thanks to her nervousness and the broccoli casserole. The gas pains are almost making her eyes water. Left with no other choice, she decides to relieve herself a bit and lets out a dainty fart.  It wasn't loud,but everyone at the table heard thepouf.  Before she even had a chanceto be embarrassed, her boyfriend's father looked over at the dog that had been snoozing at the woman's feet and said in a rather stern voice, "Skippy!". The woman thought, "This is great!" and a big smile came across her face.  A couple of minutes later, she was beginning to feel the pain again.  This time, she didn't even hesitate. She let a much louder and longer fart rip. The father again looked and the dog and yelled, "Dammit Skippy!" Once again the woman smiled and thought "Yes!".  A few minutes laterthe woman had to let another one rip. This time she didn't even think about it. She let rip a fart that rivaled a train whistle blowing!  Once again, the father looked at the dog with disgust and yelled,"Dammit Skippy, get away from her before she shits on you!"

***
An Italian guy is out picking up chicks in Roma
An Italian guy is out picking up chicks in Roma. 

While at his favorite bar, he manages to attract one rather attractive looking blonde. So they’re back at his place, and sure enough, they go at it. 
After a long while… He climaxes loudly. 
Then he rolls over, lights up a cigarette and asks her, “So…. you finish?” 
After a slight pause she replies, “No.” 

Surprised, but pleasantly, he puts out his cigarette, rolls back on top of her, and has his way with her again, this time lasting even longer than the first… and this time completing the deed with even louder shouts. 
Again he rolls over, lights a cigarette, and asks, “So…. you finish?”
And again, after a short pause, she simply says “No.” 

Stunned, but still acting reflexively on his macho pride, he once again puts out the cigarette, and mounts his companion du jour. This time, with all the strength he could muster up, he barely manages to end the task, but he does, after quite some time and energy is spent. 
Barely able to roll over, he reaches for his cigarette … lights it again, and then asks tiredly, “So… you finish?” 

She says “No. I’m Swedish.”
***
lawyer vs the blonde
A blonde and a lawyer are seated next to each other on a flight from LA to NY. The lawyer asks if she would like to play a fun game. The blonde, tired, just wants to take a nap, politely declines and rolls over to the window to catch a few winks. 

The lawyer persists and explains that the game is easy and a lot of fun. He explains, "I ask you a question, and if you don't know the answer, you pay me $5, and vise versa." Again, she declines and tries to get some sleep. 

The lawyer, now agitated, says, "Okay, if you don't know the answer you pay me $5, and if I don't know the answer, I will pay you $500." This catches the blonde's attention and, figuring there will be no end to this torment unless she plays, agrees to the game. 

The lawyer asks the first question. "What's the distance from the earth to the moon?" The blonde doesn't say a word, reaches into her purse, pulls out a $5 bill and hands it to the lawyer. "Okay," says the lawyer, "your turn." 

She asks the lawyer, "What North American mammal goes up a hill with three legs and comes down with four legs?" 

The lawyer, puzzled, takes out his laptop and searches all his references. No answer. He taps into the air phone with his modem and searches the net and the library of congress, no answer. Frustrated, he sends e-mail to all his friends and coworkers. No one knows. 

After an hour, he wakes the blonde and hands her $500. 
The blonde says, "Thank you," and turns back to get some more sleep. The lawyer, who is more than a little miffed, wakes the blonde again and asks, "Well, what's the answer?" 

Without a word, the blonde reaches into her purse, hands the lawyer $5, and goes back to sleep.

***
What starts with an F and ends with a K?

A first-grade teacher, Ms Brooks, was having trouble with one of her students.  The teacher asked, "Harry, what's your problem?" 


Harry answered, "I'm too smart for the 1st grade. My sister is in the 3rd grade and I'm smarter than she is!  I think I should be in the 3rd grade too!"


Ms. Brooks had enough.  She took Harry to the principal's office. 


While Harry waited in the outer office, the teacher explained to the principal what the situation was. The principal told Ms. Brooks he would give the boy a test.  If he failed to answer any of his questions he was to go back to the 1st grade and behave.  She agreed. 

Harry was brought in and the conditions were explained to him and he agreed to take the test. 


Principal: "What is 3 x 3?"

Harry: "9."


Principal: "What is 6 x 6?"


Harry: "36."

And so it went with every question the principal thought a 3rd grader should know. 

The principal looks at Ms. Brooks and tells her, "I think Harry can go to the 3rdgrade."


Ms. Brooks says to the principal, "Let me ask him some questions."

The principal and Harry both agreed.


Ms. Brooks asks, "What does a cow have four of that I have only two of?"


Harry, after a moment: "Legs."


Ms Brooks: "What is in your pants that you have but I do not have?"


The principal wondered why would she ask such a question! 


Harry replied: "Pockets."


Ms. Brooks: "What does a dog do that a man steps into?" 


Harry: "Pants."


The principal sat forward with his mouth hanging open. 

Ms. Brooks: "What goes in hard and pink then comes out soft and sticky?"

The principal's eyes opened really wide and before he could stop the answer, Harry replied, "Bubble gum."


Ms. Brooks: "What does a man do standing up, a woman does sitting down and a dog does on three legs?"

Harry: "Shake hands."

The principal was trembling. 


Ms. Brooks: "What word starts with an 'F' and ends in 'K' that means a lot of heat and excitement?"

Harry: "Firetruck."

The principal breathed a sigh of relief and told the 
teacher, "Put Harry in the fifth-grade, I got the last six questions wrong... "
***
A man sits down at the bar next to another man...

"Where are you from?"
"I'm from Ireland"
"I'm from Ireland too! Get this man a drink"

The second man asks
"Where in Ireland are you from?"
"I'm from Leinster"
"I'm from Leinster too! Get THIS man a drink"

"Where in Leinster are you from?"
"I'm from Dublin"
"No fucking way! I'm from Dublin too! Get this  man ANOTHER drink!"

"Where did you go to school?"
"I went to St. Andrews"
"NO FUCKING WAY! I went to St. Andrews too!"

A man at the other end of the bar is sitting there, mouth open in amazement. The bartender walks over and says,
"Don't mind them, it's just the O'Shaunessy twins getting drunk again"
***
The 10 Commandments
So an Archangel comes from heaven to give humanity these nifty new commandments from God.

First he goes to the French and says: 

"I have new Commandments from God, would you like to hear them?" 

"Ah, oui? What do zey say?"

"For example: Thou shalt not commit adultery"

"Oh, non, non, merci, non", and they send the Angel on his way.



The Angel then goes to the Germans:

"I have new Commandments from God."

"Ja? Vat do they say?"

"Well for example: Thou shalt not kill"

The Germans shake their heads, "I think's not, nein, danke!"


The Angel, perturbed, goes to the Jews and says:

"I have new Commandments from God..."

"How much?"

"Well...they're free"

"We'll take ten."
***
David Copperfield and Criss Angel walk into a bakery...
Using his masterful sleight of hand technique, Criss Angel immediately steals three pastries and puts them in his pocket, without anyone noticing, except David Copperfield.

He says to the David, "See how good I am? The owner didn't see a thing." David Copperfield replies, "That's typical of you Criss, first you steal tricks, now you steal cakes. I am going to show you an honest way to get the same result."

He goes to the owner of the bakery and says, "Give me a pastry and I will show you a magic trick."

Intrigued, the owner accepts and gives him a pastry. David Copperfield swallows it and asks for another one. The owner gives him another one. Then he swallows that one and asks for a third pastry and eats that, too.

The owner is starting to wonder where the magic trick is and asks, "So what did you do with the pastries?"

Pointing at Criss Angel, David Copperfield replies, "Look in that guy's back pocket....."
***
A meeting at the Pearly Gates
St. Peter was guarding the Pearly Gates, waiting for new souls coming to heaven. He saw Jesus walking by and caught his attention. "Jesus, could you mind the gate while I go do an errand?"

"Sure," replied Jesus. "What do I have to do?"

"Just find out about the people who arrive. Ask about their background, their family, and their lives. Then decide if they deserve entry into Heaven."

"Sounds easy enough. OK."

So Jesus manned the gates for St. Peter. The first person to approach the gates was a wrinkled old man. Jesus summoned him to sit down and sat across from him. Jesus peered at the old man and asked, "What did you do for a living?"

The old man replied, "I was a carpenter."

Jesus remembered his own earthly existence and leaned forward. "Did you have any family?" he asked.

"Yes, I had a son, but I lost him."

Jesus leaned forward some more. "You lost your son? Can you tell me about him?"

"Well, he had holes in his hands and feet."

Jesus leaned forward even more and whispered, "Father?"

The old man leaned forward and whispered, "Pinocchio?"
***
Benny and the Magic Urn
Once upon a time there was a man named Benny. Benny was a simple man with simple talents and simple desires. He was a quiet fellow who loved to walk the beach when he had some time to spare. He was the kind of guy you wouldn't mind having a drink with, but anything more might be tedious. One day, as Benny was walking the beach, he stumbled over a small black jar-shaped object. Benny curiously picked it up and began to brush off the sand.

*Woosh*

Benny winced as sand flew into his eyes, blinding him temporarily. By the time he opened his eyes, a shadow had been cast over him.

**"I AM KHALROG, GENIE OF THE URN, YOU HAVE AWOKEN ME FROM MY SLUMBER. WHAT IS YOUR ONE TRUE DESIRE?"** the genie bellowed.

Stunned, Benny could hardly believe what he was seeing. Benny thought for a moment as he regained his senses. Then he began to speak, "Well, I've always wanted a magnificent beard. I've always had a hard time with the ladies and I hear great beards are a wonderful attraction."

**"VERY WELL,"** replied the genie, **"YOU MAY HAVE YOUR BEARD. HOWEVER, I MUST WARN YOU THAT THIS BEARD COMES AT A PRICE: YOU MUST NEVER SHAVE IT OFF."**

Benny thought for a moment, then agreed to the genie's conditions. A brilliant beard protruded from Benny's chin and grew and grew until finally it reached his belly. This was fantastic! Surely he would be a ladies' man now!

Years passed by as Benny became an icon of beard lovers everywhere. He won contest after contest and seducing women had never been easier. Then one day, he met the woman of his dreams. They went on several dates together before she revealed to him that she would love nothing else than to see him without his beard. Benny loved his beard, but he loved this woman much more. Reluctantly, he agreed to shave it off in the morning.

The next morning, Benny grabbed his razor and started to shave his beard.


*POOF*


Suddenly, Benny was teleported into a round, black room!

"Egad!" Benny cried. "Where am I!?"

**"YOU HAVE DISOBEYED THE ONE RULE, BENNY,"** a voice behind him roared.

Benny stammered, "But I... I... it's only a beard! Why are you doing this to me?"

The genie replied, **"I AM THE GENIE OF THE URN, BENNY. I HAVE RULES. WHEN THOSE RULES ARE BROKEN, YOU MUST BE PUNISHED."**

"So... so... what's my... my punishment then?" Benny stuttered.

**"YOU WILL REMAIN HERE IN MY URN FOR ALL ETERNITY AND THE WORLD WILL KNOW YOUR FAULTS."** the genie exclaimed.


And from that day forth, Benny has taught all Bennys everywhere the most important lesson of all:


>*A Benny shaved is a Benny urned.*
***
As a Muslim redditor, I feel disappointed...
That my posts never blows up.

Edit 1: Everyone says that my jokes are the bomb, but still this shit didn't explode.

Edit 2: KA-BOOOM!

Edit 3: For those wondering, I am a Muslim for real and I find this shit funny af so chill out guys, no need to hate on religions, we're at /r/jokes after all. 

Edit 4: lmao this is Nagasaki all over again. 

For those who want so bad to insult me, here is a little secret...I get insulted if you insult the basis and principles of my religion, and the stuff you guys mention are not included. So feel free to say anything guys. Sorry for ruining the joke with this edit.    ¯\_(ツ)_/¯ 
***
A Chinese man and a Jewish man are in an elevator..
..As they ascend floors, the Jewish man turns to the Chinese man and blurts out "You know what.. I don't like Chinese people too much." Taken back, the Chinese man asks him why. "Because you guys were responsible for Pearl Harbor!" Shocked, the Chinese man responds "That was the Japanese.." The Jew snapped back "Chinese, Japanese, Taiwanese, you're all the same."

Understandably perturbed, the Chinese man retorts: "Well you know what? I don't really like Jews too much.." Expectedly, the Jewish man asks him why. "Because you guys sunk the Titanic!" Flabbergasted, the Jewish man exclaims, "What are you talking about!? That was an iceberg.."

"Iceberg, Greenberg, Steinberg, you're all the same!"
***
Some years ago, in a small coastal Irish community...
...Paddy married a woman, Maggie, half his age.

All was well at first until Maggie took delivery of a 'woman's magazine and began to read things about sex. It soon became clear that she had never climaxed during sex and, according to her Grandmother, all Irish women are entitled to a climax once in a while.

To resolve the problem, Paddy and Maggie went to see the Veterinarian since there was no doctor within thirty miles who could be relied upon not to gossip. However, the Vet didn't have a clue about people. But he did recall during hot summers, his mother and father would fan a cow that was having difficulty breeding with a big towel. 
Apparently, this cooled her down and helped her to relax. So he recommended they hire a strong, young man to wave a big towel over them while they were having sex. This, the Vet said, should cause the young wife to cool down, relax and possibly achieve the sought after climax.

So the couple hired a strong young man from Dublin to wave a huge bath towel over them as the Vet suggested. After many efforts, Maggie still had not climaxed so they went back to the Vet who suggested she change partners and let the young man have a go while Paddy waved the big towel.

They tried it that night and Maggie went into wild, screaming, ear-splitting climaxes, one right after the other for about two and a half hours.

When it was over, Paddy looked down at the exhausted young man and said loudly: "And dat, me auld son, is how ya wave a feckin' towel!"
***
A long series of jokes
503 bricks are on a plane. 1 falls off. How many are left?

_502._

How do you put an elephant in a fridge?

_Open door, put elephant in, close door._

How do you put a giraffe in the fridge?

_Open door, take elephant out, put giraffe in, close door._

The Lion King is having a B-day party. All the animals are there, except one. Which one?

_The giraffe. He's in a fridge._

Sally has to get across a large river home to many alligators. They are very dangerous, but Sally swims across safely. How?

_The gators are at the party._

Sally dies anyway. Why?

_She got hit in the head by a flying brick._

---

**EDIT:** Dang, over 300 points? That's pretty surprising!
***
The Mexican maid askes for a pay increase.
The wife was very upset about this and decided to talk to her about the raise. 

Wife: "Now Juanita, why do you want a pay increase?"

Juanita: "Well, Señora, there are three reasons why I want an increase. The first is that I iron better than you do."

Wife: "Who said that you iron better than me?" 

Juanita: "Your husband said so." 

Wife: "Oh yeah?" 

Juanita: "The second reason is that I am a better cook than you." 

Wife: "Nonsense. Who said you were a better cook than I am?" 

Juanita: "Your husband did." 

Wife, becoming increasingly agitated: "Oh he did, did he?" 

Juanita: "The third reason is that I am better at sex than you are." 

Wife, seething now, and through gritted teeth: "And did my husband say that as well?" 

Juanita: "No Señora.......the gardener did."

Wife: "Oh, ok! So, how much do you want?"
***
An old Jewish man is leaving the Soviet Union
An old Jewish man was finally allowed to leave the Soviet Union, to emigrate to Israel. When he was searched at the Moscow airport, the customs official found a bust of Lenin.

Customs: What is that?

Old man: What is that? What is that?! Don't say "What is that?" say "Who is that?" That is Lenin! The genius who thought up this worker's paradise!

The official laughed and let the old man through.

The old man arrived at Tel Aviv airport, where an Israeli customs official found the bust of Lenin.

Customs: What is that?

Old man: What is that? What is that?! Don't say "What is that?" say "Who is that?" That is Lenin! The sonofabitch! I will put him on display in my toilet for all the years he prevented an old man from coming home.

The official laughed and let him through.

When he arrived at his family's house in Jerusalem, his grandson saw him unpack the bust.
Grandson: Who is that?

Old man: Who is that? Who is that?! Don't say "Who is that?" say "What is that?" That, my child, is eight pounds of gold!
***
Are you a real pilot?
An old Marine Pilot sat down in a Starbucks, still wearing his old USMC flightjacket and ordered a cup of coffee. As he sat sipping his coffee, a young woman sat down next to him. She turned to the pilot and asked,  "are you a real pilot"?     
He replied, 'Well, I've spent my whole life flying planes, first Stearmans, then the early Grummans... Flew a Wildcat and Corsair in WWII, and later in the Korean conflict, Banshees and Cougars. I've taught more than 260 people to fly and given rides to hundreds, so I guess I am a pilot, and you, what are you?     
She said, 'I'm a lesbian. I spend my whole day thinking about naked women. As soon as I get up in the morning, I think about naked women. When I shower, I think about naked women. When I watch TV, I think about naked women. It seems everything makes me think of naked women.'      
The two sat sipping in silence.      
A little while later, a young man sat down on the other side of the old pilot and asked:     
"Are you a real pilot?"     
He replied, ‘I always thought I was, but I just found out I'm a lesbian.'
***
A Frenchman and an Italian were seated next to an Cornishman on an overseas flight.
After a few drinks, the men began discussing their home lives. 

"Last night I made love to my wife four times," the Frenchman bragged, "and this morning she made me delicious crepes and she told me how much she adored me." 

"Ah, last night I made love to my wife six times," the Italian responded, "and this morning she made me a wonderful omelette and told me she could never love another man." 

When the Cornishman remained silent, the Frenchman smugly asked, "and how many times did you make love to your wife last night?" 

"Once me ansum," he replied. 

"Only once?" the Italian arrogantly snorted. "And what did she say to you this morning?" 

"Don't stop."
***
The train was quite crowded.
A US marine walked the entire length of the train, looking for a seat, but the only seat left was taken by a poodle, owned by a well dressed, middle-aged, French Woman.

The war-weary Marine asked, 'Ma'am, may i have that seat ?'

The French woman just sniffed and said to no one in particular, 'Americans are so rude. My little Fifi is using that seat.'

The Marine walked the length of the entire train again, but the only seat left was under that dog.  'Please, ma'am.  May I sit down ? i'm very tired.'

She snorted, 'Not only are you Americans rude, you are also arrogant!'

This time the Marine didnt say a word; he just picked up the little dog. threw it out of the train window, and sat down.

The woman shrieked, 'Someone must defend my honor! This American should be put in his place.'

An Englishman sitting nearby spoke up, 'Sir, you Americans often seem to have a penchant for doing the wrong things, you live on the wrong side of the Ocean. You hold the fork in the wrong hand. You drive your cars on the wrong side of the road.  And now, sir, you seem to have thrown the wrong bitch out the window.'

***
Barack Obama was out jogging one day...
When he tripped, and fell over a bridge railing and landed in the river below. Before secret service could get to him, 3 kids who were fishing pulled him out of the water. He was so grateful he offered the kids whatever they wanted in return for saving his life. The first kid said, "I want to go to Disney world!" To which Obama replied, "not a problem, I'll even fly you there in Air Force one." The second kid then says, "I want a new pair of Nike Air Jordan's!" "You got it." Said Obama. "I'll even have Michael Jordan himself sign them." Then the third kid says, "I want a motorized wheelchair with a built in big screen tv and headset." Obama seemed a bit confused at this. "You don't look like yore handicapped." He said. To which the kid replied, "I will be after my dad finds out I saved you from drowning. 
***
Fifty bucks is fifty bucks!
Buddy and his wife Edna went to the state fair every year, and every year Buddy would say,

'Edna,I'd like to ride in that helicopter'

Edna always replied,

'I know Buddy, but that helicopter ride is fifty bucks, and fifty bucks is fifty bucks'

One year Buddy and Edna went to the fair, and Buddy said,

'Edna, I'm 85 years old. If I don't ride that helicopter, I might never get another chance'

To this, Edna replied,

"Buddy that helicopter ride is fifty bucks, and fifty bucks is fifty bucks'

The pilot overheard the couple and said,

'Folks I'll make you a deal. I'll take the both of you for a ride. If you can stay quiet for the entire ride and don't say a word I won't charge you a penny! But if you say one word it's fifty dollars.'

Buddy and Edna agreed and up they went.

The pilot did all kinds of fancy manoeuvres, but not a word was heard. He did his daredevil tricks over and over again, but still not a word...

When they landed, the pilot turned to Buddy and said,

'By golly, I did everything I could to get you to yell out, but you didn't. I'm impressed!'


Buddy replied,


'Well, to tell you the truth, I almost said something when Edna fell out, but you know, Fifty bucks is fifty bucks!'

EDIT1: I made it to the front page and my Karma has been destroyed :)

EDIT2: You guys can click on my post history and downvote all of my comments for a more efficient way to get back at me, I wanna see if I can get my Karma to 0. Thanks in advance
***
Grandpa gets Audited
 The IRS decides to audit Grandpa, and summons him to the IRS office. 

The IRS auditor was not surprised when Grandpa showed up with his attorney. 

The auditor said, 'Well, sir, you have an extravagant lifestyle and no full-time employment, Which you explain by saying that you win money gambling. I'm not sure the IRS finds that believable.' 

I'm a great gambler, and I can prove it,' says Grandpa. 'How about a demonstration?' 

The auditor thinks for a moment and said, 'Okay. Go ahead.' 

Grandpa says, 'I'll bet you a thousand dollars that I can bite my own eye.'

The auditor thinks a moment and says, 'It's a bet.' 

Grandpa removes his glass eye and bites it. The auditor's jaw drops. 

Grandpa says, 'Now, I'll bet you two thousand dollars that I can bite my other eye.' 

Now the auditor can tell Grandpa isn't blind, so he takes the bet. 

Grandpa removes his dentures and bites his good eye. 

The stunned auditor now realizes he has wagered and lost three grand, with Grandpa's attorney as a witness. He starts to get nervous. 

'Want to go double or nothing?' Grandpa asks 'I'll bet you six thousand dollars that I can stand on one side of your desk, and pee into that wastebasket on the other side, and never get a drop anywhere in between.' 

The auditor, twice burned, is cautious now, but he looks carefully and decides there's no way this old guy could possibly manage that stunt, so he agrees again. 

Grandpa stands beside the desk and unzips his pants, but although he strains mightily, he can't make the stream reach the wastebasket on the other side, so he pretty much urinates all over the auditor's desk. 

The auditor leaps with joy, realizing that he has just turned a major loss into a huge win. 

But Grandpa's own attorney moans and puts his head in his hands. 

'Are you okay?' the auditor asks. 

'Not really,' says the attorney. 'This morning, when Grandpa told me he'd been summoned for an audit, he bet me twenty-five thousand dollars that he could come in here and piss all over your desk and that you'd be happy about it!' 

I keep telling you! Don't Mess with Old People!!

***
The Pope was having a shower,
and although he's very strict about celibacy, he occasionally felt he needed to exercise the papal wrist, and this happened to be one of those occasions.

 
Just as he reached the Papal climax, he saw a photographer taking a picture of the Holy semen flying through the air.

 
"Hold on a minute!" said the Pope, “You can't do that - you'll destroy the reputation of the Church!".

 
"This is my lottery win", said the photographer, "I'll be financially secure for the rest of my life with these photos!"

 
So, the Pope offered to buy the camera from the photographer, and after much negotiation, they eventually settled on a figure of $2,000,000.

 
The Pope clothed himself and headed off to destroy the images on the camera.

 
Along the vast Vatican hallways, he bumped into his personal housekeeper.

 
Being a bit of a photography buff, she noticed the camera and said, "That looks like a really expensive digital SLR camera, how much did it cost you?"


 Not being one to lie, the Pope replied, "Two million Dollars.."


 "TWO MILLION Dollars!" replied the housekeeper, "Wow! They must have seen you coming!"
***
A blonde guy walks into a bar
A hefty, muscular gun toting blond guy from Austin Texas goes to a bar on his Harley Davidson. He parks the bike outside, goes in and orders a drink.

Now the regulars at this bar have a habit of picking on newcomers. So when the blond goes back his bike is missing from its spot. He walks back in.

He shouts out

Which one of ya'll fuckers stole my Harley?

Nobody answers. He caresses his gun and says

Here's what I'm gonna do. I'm gonna get another drink and if ma bike ain't back where I left it, I'm gonna do the same thing I did back in Austin. And I don't like what I did back in Austin.

True to his word, he orders a drink and goes back out, to find his Harley back where it was!

As he puts on his helmet, the bar owner asks him

If you don't mind me asking, what did you do back in Austin?

The blond replies

I had to walk back home
***
A man goes to a brothel.
The madam opened the brothel door in Winnipeg and saw a rather dignified, well-dressed, good-looking man in his late forties or early fifties.
 
 
 
 
"May I help you sir?" she asked.
 
 
 
 
The man replied,
 
 
"I wan to see Valerie."
 
 
 
 
"Sir, Valerie is one of our most expensive ladies.
 
Perhaps you would prefer someone else" said the madam.
 
 
 
 
He replied,
 
 
"No, I must see Valerie."
 
 
 
 
Just then, Valerie appeared and announced to the man she charged $5000 a visit.
 
 
 
 
Without hesitation, the man pulled out five thousand dollars and gave it to Valerie, and they went upstairs.
 
After an hour, the man calmly left.
 
 
 
 
The next night, the man appeared again, once more demanding to see Valerie.
 
 
Valerie explained that no one had ever come back
 
two nights in a row as she was too expensive.
 
 
"There are no discounts. The price is still $5000."
 
Again, the man pulled out the money, gave it to Valerie, and they went upstairs.
 
 
 
 
After an hour, he left.
 
 
 
 
The following night the man was there yet again.
 
 
 
 
Everyone was astounded that he had come for a third consecutive night, but he paid Valerie and they went upstairs.
 
 
 
 
After their session, Valerie said to the man,
 
 
"No one has ever been with me three nights in a row."
 
"Where are you from?"
 
 
 
 
The man replied,
 
 
" New Brunswick ."
 
"Really," she said. "I have family in New Brunswick ."
 
 
 
 
"I know." the man said.
 
 
"Your sister died, and I am her attorney."
 
"She asked me to give you your $15,000 inheritance."
***
Italian girl...
An 18 year old Italian girl tells her Mom that she has missed her period for two months. Very worried, the mother goes to the drugstore and buys a pregnancy kit. The test result shows that the girl is pregnant. Shouting, cursing, crying, the mother says, "Who was the pig that did this to you? I want to know!" The girl picks up the phone and makes a call. 

Half an hour later, a Ferrari stops in front of their house. A mature and distinguished man with gray hair and impeccably dressed in an Armani suit steps out of the of the Ferrari and enters the house. 

He sits in the living room with the father, mother, and the girl and tells them: "Good morning, your daughter has informed me of the problem. I can't marry her because of my personal family situation but I'll take charge. I will pay all costs and provide for your daughter for the rest of her life." "Additionally, if a girl is born, I will bequeath a Ferrari, a beach house, two retail stores, a townhouse, a beachfront villa, and a $2,000,000 bank account. If a boy is born, my legacy will be a couple of factories and a $4,000,000 bank account. If twins, they will receive a factory and $2,000,000 each. However, if there is a miscarriage, what do you suggest I do?" 

At this point, the father, who had remained silent, places a hand firmly on the man's shoulder and tells him, "You fuck her again." 
***
Uncle Ted
One day at the end of class, little Johnny's teacher asks the class to go home and think of a story to be concluded with the moral of that story.  The following day the teacher asks for the first volunteer to tell their story. Little Suzy raises her hand.  "My dad owns a farm and every Sunday we load the chicken eggs on the truck and drive into town to sell them at the market.  Well, one Sunday we hit a big bump and all the eggs flew out of the basket and onto the road." When the teacher asked for the moral of the story, Suzy replied, "Don't keep all your eggs in one basket." Little Lucy went next.  "My dad owns a farm too.  Every weekend we take the chicken eggs and put them in the incubator.  Last weekend only eight of the 12 eggs hatched."; Again, the teacher asked for the moral of the story. Lucy replied, "Don't count your chickens before they hatch." Next up was little Johnny.  "My uncle Ted fought in the Vietnam war, and his plane was shot down over enemy territory.  He jumped out before it crashed but could only take a case of beer, a machine gun and a machete.  On the way down, he drank the case of beer.  Then he landed right in the middle of 100 Vietnamese soldiers.  He shot 70 with his machine gun, but then he ran out of bullets!  So he pulled out his machete and killed 20 more.  Then the blade on his machete broke, so he killed the last ten with his bare hands." The teacher looked a little shocked.  After clearing her throat, she asked what possible moral there could be to this story. "Well," Johnny replied, "Don't fuck with Uncle Ted when he's been drinking."
***
Finally, a smart blonde joke.
A blonde walks into a bank in New York City and asks for the loan officer.
She says she's going to Europe on business for two weeks and needs to
borrow $5,000.

The bank officer says the bank will need some kind of security for the
loan, so the blonde hands over the keys to a new Rolls Royce.
The car is parked on the street in front of the bank,
she has the title and everything checks out.
The bank agrees to accept the car as collateral for the loan.

The bank's president and its officers all enjoy a good laugh at the
blonde for using a $250,000 Rolls as collateral against a $5,000 loan.

An employee of the bank then drives the Rolls into the bank's underground
garage and parks it there.

Two weeks later, the blonde returns, repays the $5,000 and the
interest, which comes to $15.41. The loan officer says, "Miss, we are very
happy to have had your business, and this transaction has worked out very
nicely, but we are a little puzzled.

We checked you out and found that you are a multimillionaire.
What puzzles us is, why would you bother to borrow $5,000?"

The blonde replies..... "Where else in New York City can I park my car for two
weeks for only $15.41 and expect it to be there when I return?"
***
A Texan walks into an Irish bar...
A Texan walks into a pub in Ireland and clears his voice to the crowd of drinkers. He says, "I hear you Irish are a bunch of hard drinkers. I'll give $500 American dollars to anybody in here who can drink 10 pints of Guinness back to back."

The room is quiet and no one takes up the Texan's offer. One man even leaves. Thirty minutes later the same gentleman who left shows back up and taps the Texan on the shoulder. "Is your bet still good?" asks the Irishman.

The Texan says yes and asks the bartender to line up 10 pints of Guinness. Immediately the Irishman tears into all 10 of the pint glasses, drinking them all back to back. The other pub patrons cheer as the Texan sits in amazement.

The Texan gives the Irishman the $500 and says, "If ya don't mind me askin', where did you go for that 30 minutes you were gone?"
The Irishman replies, "Oh...I had to go to the pub down the street to see if I could do it first."
***
A DEA officer stopped at a ranch in Texas
A DEA officer stopped at a ranch in Texas, and talked with an old rancher. He told the rancher, 

"I need to inspect your ranch for illegally grown drugs." 

The rancher said, 

"Okay , but don't go in that field over there", as he pointed out the location. The DEA officer verbally exploded saying, 

"Mister, I have the authority of the Federal Government with me!" 

Reaching into his rear pants pocket, the arrogant officer removed his badge and proudly displayed it to the rancher. 

"See this fucking badge?! This badge means I am allowed to go wherever I wish. On any land! No questions asked or answers given! Have I made myself clear?!!" 

The rancher nodded politely, apologized, and went about his chores. A short time later, the old rancher heard loud screams, looked up, and saw the DEA officer running for his life, being chased by the rancher's big bull...... With every step the bull was gaining ground on the officer, and it seemed likely that he'd sure enough get gored before he reached safety. The officer was clearly terrified. The rancher threw down his tools, ran to the fence and yelled at the top of his lungs.....

"Your badge, show him your fucking BADGE!!"
***
The Unemployed Engineer
An engineer who was unemployed for a long time decided to open a medical clinic. He puts a sign outside the clinic: "A cure for your ailment guaranteed at $500; we'll pay you $1,000 if we fail." A Doctor thinks this is a good opportunity to earn $1,000 and goes to his clinic. Doctor: "I have lost my sense of taste." Engineer: "Nurse, please bring the medicine from box 22 and put 3 drops in the patient's mouth." Doctor: "This is Gasoline!" Engineer: "Congratulations! You've got your taste back. That will be $500."
The Doctor gets annoyed and goes back after a couple of days later to recover his money. Doctor: "I have lost my memory, I cannot remember anything." Engineer: "Nurse, please bring the medicine from box 22 and put 3 drops in the patient's mouth." Doctor: "But that is Gasoline!" Engineer: "Congratulations! You've got your memory back. That will be $500."
The Doctor leaves angrily and comes back after several days, more determined than ever to make his money back. Doctor: "My eyesight has become weak." Engineer: "Well, I don't have any medicine for this. Take this $1,000," passing the doctor a $500 note. Doctor: "But this is $500..." Engineer: "Congratulations! You've got your vision back! That will be $500."
***
Two Jews walking down the street
Two Jews are taking an afternoon stroll. As they pass St. Joseph's Cathedral they notice a sign posted on the front door.

**CONVERT TO CATHOLICISM 
GET $50!**

"$50!!," exclaims David. "What a great deal, we can just convert back after!" 

"Hold your horses," says Aaron. "It could be a scam, tell you what, I will go and do it, we'll see if this deal is real."

Aaron goes into the cathedral and David waits outside. 

Finally, after an hour passes, Aaron comes out of the cathedral.

"So? Was it a scam? Did you get the $50??," asks David.

Aaron replies, "Is it always about the money with you people?"
***
A new priest at his first mass was so nervous he could hardly speak.
After mass he asked the monsignor how he had done.

The monsignor replied, "When I am worried about getting nervous on the pulpit, I put a glass of vodka next to the water glass. if I start to get nervous, I take a sip."

So next Sunday he took the monsignor's advice. At the beginning of the sermon, he got nervous and took a drink. He proceeded to talk up a storm.

Upon his return to his office after mass, he found the following note on the door:

1. Sip the Vodka, don't gulp. 
2. There are 10 commandments, not 12. 
3. There are 12 disciples, not 10. 
4. Jesus was consecrated, not constipated. 
5. Jacob wagered his donkey, he did not bet his ass. 
6. We do not refer to Jesus Christ as the late J. C. 
7. The Father, Son, and Holy Ghost are not referred to as Daddy, Junior and the Spook. 
8. David slew Goliath, he did not kick the shit out of him. 
9. When David was hit by a rock and was knocked off his donkey,don't say he was stoned off his ass. 
10. We do not refer to the cross as the "Big T." 
11. When Jesus broke the bread at the Last Supper he said, "Take this and eat it for it is my body." He did not say "Eat me" 
12. The Virgin Mary is not called "Mary with the Cherry," 
13. The recommended grace before a meal is not: Rub-A-Dub-Dub thanks for the grub, yeah God.
14. Next Sunday there will be a taffy pulling contest at St. Peter's, not a Peter pulling contest at St. Taffy's!
***
A man exits his work place and waves at a taxi passing by.
He gets into the taxi, and the cabbie says, "Perfect timing. You're just like Frank."

Passenger: "Who?"

Cabbie: "Frank Feldman. There's a guy who did everything right. Like my coming along when you needed a cab. It would have happened like that to Frank every single time."

Passenger: "There are always a few clouds over everybody."

Cabbie: "Not Frank. He was a terrific athlete. He could have gone on the pro tour in tennis. He could golf with the pros. He sang like an opera baritone and danced like a Broadway star and you should have heard him play the piano."

Passenger: "Sounds like he was something, huh?"

Cabbie: "He had a memory like a computer. Could remember everybody's birthday. He knew all about wine, which foods to order and which fork to eat them with. He could fix anything. Not like me. I change a fuse, and the whole neighborhood blacks out."

Passenger: "Wow, some guy, ehh?

Cabbie: "He always knew the quickest way to go in traffic and avoid traffic jams, not like me, I always seem to get into them."

Passenger: "Mmm, not many like that around."

Cabbie: "And he knew how to treat a woman and make her feel good and never answer her back even if she was in the wrong; and his clothing was always immaculate, shoes highly polished too."

Passenger: "An amazing fellow. How did you meet him?"

Cabbie: "Well, I never actually met Frank."

Passenger: "Then how do you know so much about him?"

Cabbie: "I married to his fucking widow!"
***
What did he say?
A Mafia Godfather finds out that his bookkeeper, Guido, has cheated him out of $10,000,000. His bookkeeper is deaf. That was the reason he got the job in the first place. It was assumed that Guido would hear nothing so he would never have to testify in court. When the Godfather goes to confront Guido about his missing $10 million, he takes along his lawyer who knows sign language.

The Godfather tells the lawyer, "Ask him where the money is!"

The lawyer, using sign language, asks Guido, "Where's the money?"

Guido signs back, "I don't know what you are talking about."

The lawyer tells the Godfather, "He says he doesn't know what you're talking about."

The Godfather pulls out a pistol, puts it to Guido's head and says, "Ask him again or I'll kill him!"

The lawyer signs to Guido, "He'll kill you if you don't tell him."

Guido trembles and signs, "OK! You win! The money is in a brown briefcase, buried behind the shed at my cousin Bruno's house."

The Godfather asks the lawyer, "What did he say?"

The lawyer replies, "He says you don't have the balls to pull the trigger!"
***
A busload of nuns goes over a cliff...
A bus load of nuns goes over a cliff in a snowstorm.  All the nuns go to heaven and line us at the pearly gates in front of Saint Peter.  

Sister Mary is first in line. St Peter asks her "Have you any sins to atone for?"  She responds, "Once, I looked at a man's penis."  St Peter tells her to splash some holy water on her eyes and enter heaven.

Sister Katherine is next.  St Peter questions her likewise "Have you an sins to atone for?"  She responds "I have, I gave a man a hand job."  St peter tells her to wash her hands and enter heaven.

About this time there is a commotion towards the rear.  St Peter quite angrily yells "What's all the commotion back there!"  Sister Julie exclaims "If I'm going to have to gargle that holy water, I'm doing it before Margaret sticks her ass in it!"
***
I walked into a bar once...
I went into a bar once and ordered a drink from the bartender. He puts down the drink and a side of peanuts. I take a sip of the drink and I hear faintly, "Man, you have great hair!" I was a little freaked out by it, because there isn't anyone in the bar besides me and the bartender, but the bartender is on the other side of the bar washing dishes. I shook it off as me hearing things after having a long day. I take another gulp of my drink and again I hear the voice: "That's a wonderful shirt you have on, sir!". I look around the bar again and still there is no one to be found. I thought maybe it's time to leave. So I take my third and final drink and again I hear the voice, but louder this time: "You're such a handsome man!!" Before I leave I call the bartender over to explain what is happening to me, maybe I was sick or something? I said, "Mr. Bartender, I keep hearing a voice say nice things about me every time I take a drink. Did you add something into the drink to make me hallucinate or something? Should I call an ambulance?" And the bartender says, "No, sir. It's the peanuts; they're complimentary!"
***
Heaven or Hell
While walking down the street one day a corrupt Senator (that may be redundant) was tragically hit by a car and died.

His soul arrives in heaven and is met by St. Peter at the entrance.

"Welcome to heaven," says St.. Peter. "Before you settle in, it seems there is a problem. We seldom see a high official around these parts, you see, so we're not sure what to do with you."

"No problem, just let me in," says the Senator.

"Well, I'd like to, but I have orders from the higher ups. What we'll do is have you spend one day in hell and one in heaven. Then you can choose where to spend eternity."

"Really? I've made up my mind. I want to be in heaven," says the Senator.

"I'm sorry, but we have our rules."

And with that, St. Peter escorts him to the elevator and he goes down, down, down to hell.

The doors open and he finds himself in the middle of a green golf course.

In the distance is a clubhouse and standing in front of it are all his friends and other politicians who had worked with him.

Everyone is very happy and in evening dress. They run to greet him, shake his hand, and reminisce about the good times they had while getting rich at the
expense of the people.

They played a friendly game of golf and then dine on lobster, caviar and the finest champagne.

Also present is the devil, who really is a very friendly guy who is having a good time dancing and telling jokes.

They are all having such a good time that before the Senator realizes it, it is time to go.

Everyone gives him a hearty farewell and waves while the elevator rises.

The elevator goes up, up, up and the door reopens in heaven where St. Peter is waiting for him, "Now it's time to visit heaven.”

So, 24 hours passed with the Senator joining a group of contented souls moving from cloud to cloud, playing the harp and singing. They have a good time
and before he realizes it, the 24 hours have gone by and St. Peter returns.

"Well, then, you've spent a day in hell and another in heaven. Now choose your eternity."

The Senator reflects for a minute, then he answers: "Well, I would never have said it before, I mean heaven has been delightful, but I think I would be better off in hell."

So St. Peter escorts him to the elevator and he goes down, down, down to hell...

Now the doors of the elevator open and he's in the middle of a barren land covered with waste and garbage. He sees all his friends, dressed in rags, picking up the trash and putting it in black bags as more trash falls to the ground.

The devil comes over to him and puts his arm around his shoulders.

"I don't understand," stammers the Senator. "Yesterday I was here and there was a golf course and clubhouse, and we ate lobster and caviar, drank champagne, and danced and had a great time. Now there's just a wasteland full of garbage and my friends look miserable. What happened?"
 

 


The devil smiles at him and says,
 

 

 


"Yesterday we were campaigning,

Today, you voted.."
***
A horse walks into a bar...
...and orders a beer. The bartender is in shock, an actual horse just walked into his bar, sat down at the bar like a person, and ordered a beer in perfect English. He tells the horse, 

"I'm sorry sir, I just have to go speak to my manager for a moment."

So the bartender goes to the back, and explains the situation to his manager. The manager thinks for a moment and then says to the bartender,

"Okay look, this is a bar so go ahead and serve that horse a beer. However considering he's a horse, he probably doesn't know how much beer costs, so go ahead and charge him $50 for it."

The bartender shrugs and goes back to the front, where the horse is still sitting, visibly watching football on the TV. The bartender gets to the bar and asks the horse,

"Okay, what'll you have?"

The horse turns back around and says,

"Gimme an IPA"

So the bartender pours him an IPA, and slides the beer across to him. He then slowly slides the $50 check across the bar to the horse. The horse picks up the check with his hooves, passively looks at it, pulls out his credit card, slowly slides it and the check back, and then calmly goes back to watching the game as he laps his beer. Now the bartender is still confused, the situation is difficult to get his head around, but he doesn't want to risk offending a 1000lb horse by asking the wrong questions. So he opts to start some small talk and says to the horse,

"You know, we don't really have too many horses coming in here."

The horse slowly, impassively turns back around to face the bartender and replies,

"You know with prices like these I'm not surprised."
***
Several centuries ago, the Pope decreed that all Muslims had to convert to Catholicism or leave Italy.
There was a huge outcry from the Muslim community, so the Pope offered a deal. He'd have a religious debate with the leader of the Muslim community. If the Muslims won, they could stay in Italy; and if the Pope won, they'd have to convert or leave. 

The Muslim people met and picked an aged and wise Mufti to represent them in the debate. However, as the Mufti spoke no Italian and the Pope spoke no Arabic, they agreed that it would be a "silent" debate. On the chosen day the Pope and Mufti sat opposite each other. The Pope raised his hand and showed three fingers. The Mufti looked back and raised one finger. Next, the Pope waved his finger around his head. The Mufti pointed to the ground where he sat. The Pope brought out a communion wafer and a chalice of wine. The Mufti pulled out an apple. With that, the Pope stood up and declared himself beaten and said that the Mufti was too clever. The Muslims could stay in Italy. 

Later the cardinals met with the Pope and asked him what had happened. The Pope said, "First I held up three fingers to represent the Trinity. He responded by holding up a single finger to remind me there is still only one God!  Then, I waved my finger around my head to show him that God was all around us. He responded by pointing to the ground to show that God was also right here with us. I pulled out the wine and wafer to show that God absolves us of all our sins. He pulled out an apple to remind me of the original sin. He beat me at every move and I could not continue!" 

Meanwhile, the Muslim community gathered to ask the Mufti how he'd won. "I haven't a clue," the Mufti said. "First, he told me that we had three days to get out of Italy, so I gave him the finger. Then he tells me that the whole country would be cleared of Muslims and I told him that we were staying right here!"" And then what?" asked someone, "Who knows?" said the Mufti. "He took out his lunch so I took out mine". 
***
So Satan asks God to let him back into Heaven...
God says "Satan, you've betrayed me before, but I am a just and forgiving god. You may get back into Heaven, if you can beat my only son in a programming contest."

Satan and Jesus meet to agree to the terms. The contest is a simple one. God will set a timer for six hours, and both Jesus and Satan will sit down at their desktops and pound out as much perfectly-formatted HTML as they possibly can. The contest is officially scheduled for Easter Sunday, and news spreads far and wide. 

Easter Sunday rolls around. People from all over flock to Heaven to witness the contest. It is broadcasted live on several news stations, and is even live-tweeted by some representatives from Google. At exactly 8:59 AM, Satan and Jesus both sit down at two computers, facing each other. They log in and open up their scripting program. At 9 AM, Archangel Michael drops a flag and the race begins. 

One hour, and several cups of coffee, pass. Both Satan and Jesus are going strong. Satan is adamant that he will beat Jesus and get back into Heaven, while Jesus just really enjoys coding (it's a hobby of his). The official line count is read off every hour, and at 10 AM, Satan is slightly ahead. 

By 11 AM, Jesus has caught up to Satan, because Satan found an error and had to rewrite several pages of code. He is slightly annoyed, but still determined to beat Jesus. 

By noon, Satan and Jesus have caught up again, as Jesus decided to reformat a large section of his work to make it more streamlined and perfectly formatted, as per the contest rules. Satan is starting to get cocky, showing off to the crowd by typing with his barbed tail, typing with his eyes shut, typing with his trident, et cetera. The crowd oohs and ahhs appropriately. 

At 1 PM, they both stop for some lunch. Satan decides to trick Jesus into taking a longer lunch break, so he gives Jesus five loaves of bread and three fishes. Jesus breaks off pieces to feed himself, but simply cannot finish his meal. With Satan getting ahead of him, he passes off the meal to the group of 5,000 men gathered around him. They are all fed, with leftovers. Jesus continues programming. 

By 2 PM, both Satan and Jesus are getting rather dehydrated, so they stop for a water break. To get even for the loaves and fishes trick earlier, Jesus pours Satan some water, but secretly turns it into wine. If Satan is drunk, his coding can't be perfectly formatted. 

2:59 rolls around. Satan has typed 5,638 lines of code, while Jesus has only typed 5,277. The crowd is tense as they race towards the finish line. Suddenly, God steps in, pulls the plugs on both computers, and loudly announces "JESUS CHRIST OF NAZARETH WINS! SATAN WILL NOT RE-ENTER HEAVEN!" 

Satan is furious. "How can this be?" He asks. "I had far more lines of code than Jesus! My code was perfectly formatted, too!"

Jesus taunts Satan. "Well I don't see your code, Satan. It must have been lost when the computers were shut off."

"Your computer was shut off, too!" Satan retorts. "I guess neither of us win!" 

God, rather proud of his son at this point, walks over and turns back on both computers. Predictably, Satan's coding cannot be found, but when Jesus's computer is booted back up, his program is right there on the desktop. God opens it, and it runs like a charm. 

"How can this be?" Satan snarls. "I finished more coding! It should be there! I should've won this!" 

"Satan, my friend," God says, "You have made a grave mistake. See, you may code faster, and perhaps even better than my son, but Jesus... 

Jesus saves." 

***
A girl with tight skirt tries to get on a bus....
In a crowded city at a busy bus stop, a woman who was waiting for a bus was wearing a tight leather skirt. As the bus stopped and it was her turn to get on, she became aware that her skirt was too tight to allow her leg to come up to the height of the first step of the bus. 

Slightly embarrassed and with a quick smile to the bus driver, she reached behind her to unzip her skirt a little, thinking that this would give her enough slack to raise her leg. Again, she tried to make the step only to discover she still couldn't.

 So, a little more embarrassed, she once again reached behind her to unzip her skirt a little more. For the second time she attempted the step, and once again, much to her chagrin, she could not raise her leg. With a little smile to the driver, she again reached behind to unzip a little more and again was unable to make the step. 

About this time, a large Texan who was standing behind her picked her up easily by the waist and placed her gently on the step of the bus. She went ballistic and turned to the would-be Samaritan and screeched, "How dare you touch my body! I don't even know who you are!' The Texan smiled and drawled, "Well, ma'am, normally I would agree with you, but after you unzipped my fly three times, I kinda figured we are friends."
***
A man walks into a bar...
...he approaches the barman and asks for a whiskey and coke.

"Take this apple."

"I don't want an apple. I want a JD and coke."

"Trust me, try the apple."

The man takes a bite, and exclaims "Christ! This tastes like Jack Daniels!"

"Yup. Turn it around."

"Wow!" He says after taking a bite from the other side of the apple, "This side tastes like coke!"

Before the man can ask the barman to explain the apple's mysteries, another patron walks in.

"Vodka and tonic please mate"

"Here's an apple."

"I don't want a fuckin' apple mate, I want a..."

"Trust me, try the man's apple. They're incredible!" Interrupts the first customer.

He takes the apple and begrudgingly takes a large bite and starts spluttering; "Bloody hell this tastes like neat vodka!"

Both the barman and the first customer yell "Turn it around!" in unison. The man obliges and exclaims "Wow! This tastes like tonic water. These apples are fantastic!"

A third man saunter's up to the bar; "Pint of IPA please mate".

"Hold on!" Says the second customer. "This guy has an apple in any flavour you want, it's incredible!"

"Any flavour?" Asks the third man.

"Any flavour you want sir." Say the barman.

"In that case, gimme an apple that tastes like pussy!"

"Um.. alright" says the barman as he hands him an apple.

The man takes a bite and immediately spits everything onto the bar.

"EEErrrughcchh!!! This apple tastes like *shit!!*"

**"TURN IT AROUND!!"**
***
Why some put angels as Christmas tree toppers.
One year, Santa procrastinated too much and had an hour to go over his naughty nice list. 

He was in a cabin gaining some progress when he heard a knock on his door. "Santa, we need your help in the workshop!"

Frustrated, Santa yelled "I'm busy right now, handle it yourselves. I can't afford to be interrupted!" And slammed the door.

Not 15 minutes later another knock is heard and his agitation is climbing. He opens the door and yells "What?!"

It was Mrs. Claus and she said startled "I brought you some food."

His face tuning red, he says "I've got a half hour left to check this list, I can't be interrupted!" He then slammed the door on his wife. He then says "I swear, the next interruption I get I'll just lose it."

About 20 minutes passed when he heard a knock at the door. He stormed to the door with a burning hatred when he opened it. It was an angel holding a Christmas tree. "Hey Santa, where do you want the tree?"
***
Irish Joke
John O'Reilly hoisted his beer and said, "Here's to spending the rest of me life, between the legs of me wife !" That won him the top prize at the pub for the best toast of the night ! He went home and told his wife, Mary, "I won the prize for the Best toast of the night." She said, "Aye, did ye now. And what was your toast?" John said, "Here's to spending the rest of me life, sitting in church beside me wife." "Oh, that is very nice indeed, John!" Mary said. The next day, Mary ran into one of John's drinking buddies on the street corner. The man chuckled leeringly and said, "John won the prize the other night at The pub with a toast about you, Mary." She said, "Aye, he told me, and I was a bit surprised myself. You know, he's only been in there twice in the last four years. "Once I had to pull him by the ears to make him come, and the other time he fell asleep."
***
Another Irish joke involving beer
While attending the World Beer Conference, the CEOs of Anhueser-Busch, Coors, and Guiness went out to eat together. When the waitress asked them what they would like to drink, the CEO of Anhueser-Busch replied, "Get me a Budweiser, the king of beers!" Not to be outdone, the Coors CEO told her, "I want a Coors. It's as refreshing as a Rocky Mountain spring!" The waitress turned to the Guiness CEO, who ordered a Diet Coke. Surprised, his companions asked why he hadn't ordered a Guiness. Smiling, he told them, "I figured if you fellows weren't going to have a beer, I shouldn't either."
***
The Redneck Joke
Two Tennessee Rednecks, Bubba and Jim Bob, are sitting at their favorite bar, drinking beer.
Bubba turns to Jim Bob and says, "You know, I'm tired of going through life without an education. Tomorrow I think I'll go to the Community College, and sign up for some classes." Jim Bob thinks it's a good idea, and the two leave.

The next day, Bubba goes down to the college and meets the Dean of Admissions, who signs him up for the four basic classes: Math, English, History, and Logic. "Logic?" Bubba says. "What's that?"

The dean says, "I'll show you. Do you own a weedeater?"

"Yeah."

"Then logically speaking, because you own a weedeater, I think that you would have a yard."

"That's true, I do have a yard."

"I'm not done," the dean says. "Because you have a yard, I think logically that you would have a house."

"Yes, I do have a house."

"And because you have a house, I think that you might logically have a family."

"I have a family."

"I'm not done yet. Because you have a family, then logically you must have a wife."

"Yes, I do have a wife."

"And because you have a wife, then logic tells me you must be a heterosexual."

"I am a heterosexual. That's amazing, you were able to find out all of that because I have a weedeater!"

Excited to take the class now, Bubba shakes the Dean's hand and leaves to go meet Jim Bob at the bar. He tells Jim Bob about his classes, how he is signed up for Math, English, History, and Logic. "Logic?" Jim Bob says, "What's that?"

Bubba says, "I'll show you. Do you have a weedeater?"

"No."

"Then you're homosexual."


Edit: "I bet there aint a weed eater among you" - Billy_willy
***
Jenny was not the best student in Sunday School.
Usually she slept through the class.

One day the teacher called on her while she was having a nap:

"Tell me, Jenny, who created the universe?"

She didn't stir, so Mike, a boy in the chair behind her, quickly took a pencil

and jabbed her in the rear.

"GOD ALMIGHTY!" shouted Jenny

And the teacher said, "Very good".

Soon, Jenny was fast asleep again. A while later the teacher asks Jenny:

"Who is our Lord and Saviour?" Once again, Mike pricked her with a pencil.

"JESUS CHRIST!" shouted Jenny.

And the teacher said, "very good."

Soon, a third question comes:  "What did Eve say to Adam after she had

her twenty-third child?"  And again, Mike jabbed her with the pencil.

Jenny jumped in her seat and shouted:

"IF YOU STICK THAT F*****G THING IN ME ONE MORE TIME, I'LL BREAK IT

IN HALF AND STICK IT UP YOUR ARSE!"
***
Four men reunite at a party and talk about their sons...
Four friends reunited at a party after 30 years. After a few laughs and drinks, one of them had to go to the rest room The ones who stayed behind began to talk about their kids and their successes.

The first guy says: “I am very proud of my son, he is my pride and joy. He started working at a very successful company at the bottom of the barrel. He studied Economics, Business Administration, and was promoted, began to climb the corporate ladder, becoming the General Manager, and now he is the president of the company. He became so rich that he gave his best friend a top of the line Mercedes Benz for his birthday.”

The second guy says: “Damn, that's terrific! My son is also my pride and joy, I am very proud of him. He started working at a travelling agency for a very big airline. He went to flight school to become a pilot and managed to become a partner in the company where he now owns the majority of the assets. He became so rich that he gave his best friend a brand new jet for his birthday.”

The third guy says: “Well, well, well congratulations! My son is also my pride and joy and he is also very rich. He studied in the best universities and became an Engineer. He started his own construction company and became very successful and a multimillionaire. He also gave away some very nice and expensive thing to his best friend for his birthday. He built a 30,000 sq. ft. mansion especially for his friend.”

The three friends congratulated each other mutually for the successes of their sons. The fourth friend who earlier had gone to rest room returned and asked: “What's going on, what are all the congratulations for?” One of the three said: “We were talking about the pride we feel for the successes of our sons. What about your son?”

The fourth man replied: “My son is Gay and he makes a living dancing as a stripper at a nightclub.”

The three friends said: “What a shame that must be, that is horrible, what a disappointment you must feel.”

The fourth man replied: “No, I am not ashamed. Not at all. He is my son and I love him just as well, he is my pride and joy. In addition, he is very lucky too. Did you know that his birthday just passed and the other day he received a beautiful 30,000 sq. ft. mansion, a brand new jet, and a top of the line Mercedes Benz from his three boyfriends?”
***
A German, a Frenchman and an Englishman go fishing...
They fish quite happily for a while until the German catches a huge golden fish, but as he pulls it off the hook it says "Please don't kill me! Spare my life and I'll grant you all a wish!"

The German throws the fish back and says "I wish for a mug of beer that will never empty", and immediately a foaming mug of ice-cold German ale appears in his hand. He takes a long swig and when he puts it down, it's still miraculously full! The Frenchman and Englishman are, of course, amazed.

"I wish," said the Frenchman, "For a wall to be built around France, ten miles high and ten miles thick, so that nobody can get in and nobody can get out."

The fish screws up its eyes in concentration for a moment then says. "Done! And what do you want?"

"Is there a wall around France?" asks the Englishman

"Yes." replies the fish.

"Is it ten miles high and ten miles thick?"

"Yes."

"And can nobody get in, and nobody get out?"

"Yes."

"Well then," says the Englishman, "I want you to fill it with water."
***
Goldie was sitting on a beach in Florida...
Goldie was sitting on a beach in Florida, attempting to strike up a conversation with the attractive gentleman reading on the blanket beside hers.

"Hello, sir." she said "Do you like movies?"

"Yes, I do." he responded, then returned to his book.
 
Goldie persisted. "Do you like gardening?"
 
The man again looked up from his book.

"Yes, I do." he said politely before returning to his reading.
 
Undaunted, Goldie asked. "Do you like pussycats?" 

With that, the man dropped his book and pounced on Goldie, ravaging her as she'd never been ravaged before.
 
As the cloud of sand began to settle, Goldie dragged herself to a sitting position and panted, "How did you know that was what I wanted?"
 
The man thought for a moment and replied, "How did you know my name was Katz?"
***
Trump asks what a tragedy is...
During one of his campaign trips, Donald Trump visits an elementary school and enters one of the classrooms. They are in the middle of a discussion related to words and their meanings.

The teacher asks Mr. Trump if he would like to lead the discussion of the word “Tragedy.” So he asks the class for an example of a tragedy.

One little boy stands up and offers: “If my best friend who lives on a farm, is playing in the field and a runaway tractor comes along and knocks him dead, that would be a tragedy.”

“No,” says Mr. Trump, “that would be an accident.”

A little girl raises her hand: “If a school bus carrying 50 children drove over a cliff, killing everyone inside, that would be a tragedy.”

“I’m afraid not,” explains the exalted businessman. “That’s what we would call a great loss.”

The room goes silent. No other children volunteer. Mr. Trump searches the room.

“Isn’t there someone here who can give me an example of a tragedy?”

Finally at the back of the room, a boy raises his hand. In a quiet voice he says: “If a private jet carrying you was struck by a missile and blown to smithereens, that would be a tragedy.”

“Fantastic!” exclaims Mr. Trump, “That’s absolutely right. And can you tell me why that would be a tragedy?”

“Well,” says the boy, “because it wouldn’t be a great loss and it probably wouldn’t be an accident either.”
***
Answered Prayer
The pastor asked if anyone in the congregation would like to express praise for answered prayers.

Suzie Smith stood and walked to the podium. She said, "I have a praise. Two months ago, my husband, Phil, had a terrible bicycle wreck and his scrotum was completely crushed. The pain was excruciating and the doctors didn't know if they could help him."

You could hear a muffled gasp from the men in the congregation as they imagined the pain that poor Phil must have experienced.

"Phil was unable to hold me or the children," she went on, "and every move caused him terrible pain. We prayed as the doctors performed a delicate operation, and it turned out they were able to piece together the crushed remnants of Phil's scrotum and wrap wire around it to hold it in place."

Again, the men in the congregation cringed and squirmed uncomfortably as they imagined the horrible surgery performed on Phil.

"Now," she announced in a quivering voice, "thank the Lord, Phil is out of the hospital and the doctors say that with time his scrotum should recover completely."

All the men sighed with unified relief. The pastor rose and tentatively asked if anyone else had something to say.

A man stood up and walked slowly to the podium. He said, "I'm Phil."

The entire congregation held its breath. "I just want to tell my wife the word is sternum."
***
A bunch of Indians capture a cowboy
A bunch of Indians capture a cowboy and bring him back to their camp to meet the chief. The chief says to the cowboy, "You going to die. But we sorry for you, so give you one wish a day for three days. On sundown of third day, you die. What is first wish?" 
The cowboy thinks for a moment and then responds, "I want to see my horse." The Indians get his horse. The cowboy grabs the horse's ear and whispers something, then slaps the horse on the ass. The horse takes off. 
Two hours later, the horse comes back with a naked blonde. She jumps off the horse and goes into the teepee with the cowboy. The Indians look at each other, figuring, "Typical white man - can only think of one thing." 
The second day, the chief says, "What your wish today?" 
The cowboy says, "I want to see my horse again." The Indians bring him his horse. The cowboy leans over to the horse and whispers something in the horses ear, then slaps it on the ass. 
Two hours later, the horse comes back with a naked redhead. She gets off and goes in the teepee with the cowboy. The Indians shake their heads, figuring, "Typical white man - going to die tomorrow and can only think of one thing." 
The last day comes, and the chief says, "This your last wish, white man. What you want?" 
The cowboy says, "I want to see my horse again." The Indians bring him his horse. 
The cowboy grabs the horse by both ears, twists them hard and yells, "Read my lips! POSSE, dammit! P-O-S-S-E!"

Edit : thanks a lot everyone! 
***
So Mike is this straight-laced corporate workaholic...
...whose only passions in life are job, family, and the gym.   

So for his 30'th birthday the wife decides to take him someplace a little racey - just so he can let his hair down and have some unconventional fun for a change. 

"Oh let's NOT go here!", begged Mike as the cab pulls in front of the local "Gentleman's Club" on his cake day.   "Let's just go have a nice dinner someplace quiet."

But the wife isn't having it.   She's going to get him into the club come Desert fucking Storm.   The entire time she's got him by his coat sleeves and pulling him toward the entrance, Mike cannot stop complaining and offering alternative spots. 

"Hey Mike - how's it going!" - says the Club's doorman. 

The wife stops for a second.  "Mike - have you been here before?"

Mike takes a deep breath and retorts:  "No. No.  He's just a guy who works out with me at the Gym - but let's go someplace else..."

The wife is undettered.  Before you know it, they're giving their coats to the girl at the coat-check.   "Hiiiii Mike" sings the checkout girl.

The wife shoots Mike a look and does a half-smile.  "You suuuuuure you haven't been here before?"

Mike lets out a breath of exasperation.  "She's the girl who signs people in at the gym honey.  Nothing more!"   

The wife seems to buy it, but clearly some doubts are starting to set in. 

So they get inside and sit down to enjoy the show.   The wife looks rather  intrigued by the entertainment, but Mike seems super uncomfortable.

This perfectly titted, topless little cocktail waitress comes over to take the drink orders.  "The usual gin and tonic Mike?"

At this point the wife starts to come unhinged.  "Mike??  The Usual gin and tonic!?   Am I the LAST person on the planet to find out you drink and hang out in strip clubs??!!!   Tell me I'm not Mike!!"   

Mike complies.  "No you're not honey!  I mean, she's an aerobics instructor at the gym!  And..."

Now the wife is hurt and angry.  She starts to storm out of the place while Mike follows - with lame explanations.

The wife starts emoting.  "You know, I could accept that you drink behind my back and stuff a few bucks down the g-strings of underage sluts in seedy clubs all over the city every now and again!!" 

"But DON'T lie to my fucking face like I'm a god-damned idiot!"  

Mike is now profusely apologizing and trying to smooth things over.  His explanations keep getting lamer and lamer as the wife hails a cab.  She gets in.  Mike follows right in behind her. 

As the wife continues her verbal assault, the cab driver starts laughing. 

She turns her wrath on the poor hapless cabby.  "You know, you can just go ahead and mind your own fucking business any time now!!!"

The cabby smiles broadly as he looks at Mike in his rear view mirror.  

"Hell of a bitch you picked up tonight Mike."



***
While visiting India , Donald Trump is invited to tea with Abdul Kalam.
While visiting India , Donald Trump is invited 
to tea with Abdul Kalam. He asks Kalam what his leadership philosophy is. He says that, it is to surround himself with intelligent people. 
Trump asks how he knows if they're intelligent. 
"I do so by asking them the right questions," says 
Kalam. "Allow me to demonstrate. " 
Trump watches as Kalam phones Manmohan Singh and says, 
"Mr. Prime Minister, please answer this question: 
Your mother has a child, and your father has a child, 
and this child is not your brother or sister. Who is it?"   

Manmohan immediately responds, 
"It's me, Sir !" 
"Correct. Thank you and good-bye" says Kalam. He hangs 
up and says," Did you get that, Mr. Trump ?" 
Trump nods: "Yes Mr. President. Thanks a lot. 
I'll definitely be using that!"  


Trump, upon returning to US, decides he'd better put Mike Pence to the test. Trump summons him and says, 
"Mike, I wonder if you can answer a question for me." 
"Why, of course, Sir!. What's on your mind?" 
Trump poses the question: "Uhh, your mother has a 
child, and your father has a child, and this child is not 
your brother or your sister. Who is it?"   

Mr. Pence was puzzled and finally asks, "Can I think about it and get back to you?" Trump agrees, and Pence leaves. Pence immediately calls a meeting of all staff, and they puzzle over the question for several hours, but nobody can come up with an answer. Finally, in desperation, Pence calls Ted Cruz and explains the problem. 
"Mr. Cruz, your mother has a child, and your father 
has a child, and this child is not your brother or your sister. 
Who is it?"     
Cruz answers immediately, "It's me, of course."   

Much relieved, Pence rushes back to Donald Trump, 
and exclaims, 
"I know the answer,Sir! I know who it is!   
It's our Ted Cruz!" 
And Trump replies in disgust,


"Wrong, it's Manmohan Singh!" 
***
Grown-up words.
A primary one teacher was speaking to her class on the first day of term.

>"Alright class, I'd like everyone to tell me what they did over the summer holiday. Remember, you're not at nursery any more, so you need to use grown-up words now. Jamie, you go first." 

So Jamie excitedly stood up and said
>"I went on a choo-choo!"

The teacher grimaced and replied

>"No Jamie, you rode on a train. Remember, grown-up words. Sarah, you next. What did you do?"

Sarah stood up and exclaimed

>"I went to see my granny!"

Again the teacher pulled a face and said
>"No Sarah, you went to visit your Grandmother. You're not in nursery any more, no baby words please. Jimmy, let's hear you?"

Jimmy got up and said

>"I read a book!"

The teacher smiled.

>"Very good Jimmy! Can you remember what the book was called?"

Jimmy smiled with confidence and proudly shouted

>"Winnie the SHIT."



***
Headache and testicles


Joe had suffered from really bad headaches for the last 20 years.

He eventually decides to go and see a Doctor.
 
The Doctor said, 'Joe, the good news is I can cure your headaches.
The bad news is that it will require castration.
You have a very rare condition, which causes your testicles to press on your spine and the pressure creates one hell of a headache.    

The only way to relieve the pressure is to remove the testicles.' 

Joe was shocked and depressed.He wondered if he had anything to live for.  

He had no choice but to go under the knife. The surgery cost him $15,000.

When he left the hospital, he was without a headache for the first time in 20 years, but he felt like he was missing an important part of himself.   

As he walked down the street, he realized that he felt like a different person. He could make a new beginning and live a new life. 

He saw a Men's clothing store and thought, 'That's what I need... A new Suit.' 

He entered the shop and told the salesman, 'I'd like a new Suit.' 

The elderly Tailor eyed him briefly and said, 'Let's see... size 44 long.

Joe laughed, 'That's right, how did you know?' 

'Been in the business 60 years!' the tailor said. 

Joe tried on the suit it fit perfectly. 

As Joe admired himself in the mirror, the salesman asked, 'How about a new shirt?' 

Joe thought for a moment and then said, 'Sure.' 

The salesman eyed Joe and said, 'Let's see, 34 sleeves and 16-1/2 neck.' 

Joe was surprised, 'That's right, how did you know?' 

'Been in the business 60 years.' 

Joe tried  the shirt and it fit perfectly. 

Joe walked comfortably around the shop and the salesman asked, 'How about some new Underwear?' 

Joe thought for a moment and said, 'Sure..' 

The salesman said, 'Let's see..... size 36. 

Joe laughed, 'Ah ha! I got you! I've worn a size 34 since I was 18 years old..' 

The salesman shook his head, 'You can't wear a size 34. A size 34 would press your Testicles up against the base of your spine and give you one hell of a Headache.'
***
A man wakes up for work, and in the shower he hears a voice in his head
"Sell everything you own, fly to Las Vegas" the voice says.

The man is confused, but shrugs it off and assumes he just imagined it. He gets out of the shower and brushes his teeth. After he gets dressed, he heads into the kitchen to make a quick breakfast. As he's looking in the fridge, he hears the voice again, "Sell everything you own, fly to Las Vegas."

This time around he's more than a little disconcerted, but still, he shrugs it off. He gets in his car, starts driving to work, and hears the voice again as he's parking, "Sell everything you own, fly to Las Vegas." Now he's starting to get a little freaked out. He tells himself the voice isn't real, and decides to ignore it.

By the time lunch rolls around, the voice is speaking every minute or so. "Sell everything you own, fly to Las Vegas." He's starting to lose it. When he gets home from work, the voice is talking in his head nonstop, "Sell everything you own, fly to Las Vegas. Sell everything you own, fly to Las Vegas. Sell everything you own, fly to Las Vegas."

He barely manages to fall asleep; he had to put headphones on and blast music just to drown the voice. He only gets a few hours of sleep, and when he wakes up, the voice is still going, nonstop, "Sell everything you own, fly to Las Vegas. Sell everything you own, fly to Las--"

"FINE!" the man screams, losing it, "FINE! I'll DO IT, I'LL DO IT, JUST STOP, PLEASE JUST STOP!"

The voice stops. The man rents a moving truck, hauls all of his belongings to the nearest pawnshop, and sells everything -- they barely had enough cash in their vault for him. He returns the moving truck, and sells his car to a used car dealership for cash. He puts all of his cash in a briefcase, heads to the airport, and buys a one-way ticket to Las Vegas, with tears of relief and sadness in his eyes.

Once on the plane, he notices it's quiet. Feeling relieved, he waits a few minutes to make sure the voice doesn't say anything, then closes his eyes for some much needed sleep.

He finally wakes up as the plane is landing; as the plane is pulling into the gate, he hears the voice again.

"Call a cab and go straight to Caesar's Palace."

At this point he doesn't have the energy to fight it anymore. "Fine. That's fine." he mumbles under his breath. As soon as he gets out of the airport, he hails a cab, gets in, and tells the driver to head to Caesar's Palace. The voice speaks again, "Call a cab and go straight to Caesar's Palace."

"I KNOW. I know. Shut up, for the love of god." he says. The voice doesn't speak for the rest of the ride.

The cab pulls up to the front, and he tips the driver and exits the cab. He walks up to the big front doors, and says "Now what?"

The voice chimes in, "Go inside, sit at the second roulette table on your right." The man sighs and heads inside. He hands over his suitcase of cash -- every last penny he owns -- and exchanges it for chips. He finds the second roulette table on the right, and sits down. The voice speaks again, "Bet everything you own on *black four*."

"Are you kidding me?" He questions the voice, and how he is about to risk everything he owns on a game of roulette. The voice just repeats the same thing, "Bet everything you own on *black four*."

The man sighs and reluctantly places the bet of a lifetime. "Well, here goes nothing." The table spins and spins, and finally the ball lands. It lands on red 23. He looks up angrily, and the voice speaks again --

"Shit."
***
C, E-flat, and G go into a bar...
The bartender says, "Sorry, but we don't serve minors." So E-flat leaves, and C and G have an open fifth between them. After a few drinks, the fifth is diminished, and G is out flat. F comes in and tries to augment the situation, but is not sharp enough. D comes in and heads for the bathroom, saying, "Excuse me; I'll just be a second." Then A comes in, but the bartender is not convinced that this relative of C is not a minor. Then the bartender notices B-flat hiding at the end of the bar and says, "Get out! You're the seventh minor I've found in this bar tonight." E-flat comes back the next night in a three-piece suit with nicely shined shoes. The bartender says, "You're looking sharp tonight. Come on in, this could be a major development." Sure enough, E-flat soon takes off his suit and everything else, and is au natural. Eventually C sobers up and realizes in horror that he's under a rest. C is brought to trial, found guilty of contributing to the diminution of a minor, and is sentenced to 10 years of D.S. without Coda at an upscale correctional facility.
***
A father-son hike
A Father and his son are hiking in the grand canyon. The go around some bends, over some hills, and through some nooks. They round the bend and see a native american sitting on a rock.

The father points to the native american and says, “son, native americans have the best memory of any peoples in the world”

The young son thinks he’s quite the smart one and goes up to the native american and says, “What did you have for breakfast last tuesday.”

Without hesitation the Native American responds, “eggs.” The son is impressed and goes on with the hike with his father.

30 years later the son is now a grown man, and is hiking the same trail with his own son. He goes around the same bends, over the same hills, and lo and behold, rounds the corner and there is that same native american on the same rock.

He’s an older wiser man now, and will really test this native american. He walks up, raises his hand in greeting and says “HOW”

Native American responds, “Scrambled.”
***
My favorite jokes.
1.
A hippie walks into a bus and sees a very sexy nun. He walks up to her and says, "Hey there, wanna have sex?" The nun is grossed out and walks out of the bus. As the hippie is about to leave the bus driver calls him over an tells him, "Dude i saw you hitting on the nun. Well just to let you know...every Friday at 8 P.M. she visits her dead boyfriend's memorial at the graveyard." Friday comes and the hippie goes to the cemetery, he sees the nun sitting by a tombstone and pretends to be the ghost of the nun's dead boyfriend and tells her, "I order you to have sex with me!" The nun accepts and after they are done the hippie takes off running and yells to her, "HAHA! I was actually the hippie!" To which the nun replied, "HAHA! I was actually the bus driver."

2.
A guy goes to his psychologist one day and tells him, "Doc...lately, at work, I've been wanting to put my dick in the pickle cutter." His psychiatrist tells him not to commit such a bad decision. The guy then asks for some sort of treatment to get him to stop thinking about it and the psychiatrist tells him he can only advise him not to do anything stupid. The next day the guy comes back to his psychiatrist and tell him, "Guess what Doc? I did it. I put my dick in the pickle cutter." To which the psychiatrist responds, "And what happened?" The guy says, "Well I got fired." The doctor asks, "And the pickle cutter?" And the guy says "Well, she got fired too."

-------------------------------------------------------------------
Hope you enjoyed. Thanks for reading. (:
***
A wife took her husband to a strip club as a birthday treat.
The doorman greeted them, "Hi Jim! How are you?"

"How does he know you?" asked the wife. "Oh dear, I play football with him," said Jim.

Inside, the bartender asked, "Hello Jim! The usual?"

Jim turned to his wife. "Before you say anything, he and I are on the darts team."

Then a stripper walked up to them. "Hi Jim! You craving the Special again?" she giggled.

The wife had enough and stormed out, dragging Jim along and pulling him into a taxi with her.

The cab driver turned around. "Hey Jimmy Boy! You picked up a butt ugly one this time ..."

Jim's funeral is on Saturday.
***
First Experience after marriage
A Delhi mother was lucky enough to see her 3 daughters get married the same year, so she called them after the wedding and told them

“Dont forget to text me your first night experience and text it in code”

So……. after a week, the 1st daughter texted

“NESCAFE”

and the next week the 2nd daughter text

“WILLS”

the mother being an intelligent woman went to get a Nescafe tin and read the label

“fantastic till the last drop”

went to her husband’s pack of WILLS cigarette and read
“Extra long, king size”

she smiled and said “not bad for their ages”.

After the next week, the 3rd daughter texted

“Indigo Delhi Hyderabad”,

the mother then called Indigo airways helpdesk to enquire about their Delhi Hyderabad flight and they replied

“it’s 5times daily, 7days a week, both ways and the flight duration is 75mins”.

Mother fainted
***
A Spaniard, an American, and a Japanese man are approached by a billionaire.
A Spaniard, an American, and a Japanese man are approached by a billionaire. The billionaire asks them to participate in a year-long experiment wherein they will be taken to a deserted island to survive.

He assigns them each tasks according to their heritage:

The Spaniard will be in charge of food.
The American will be in charge of shelter.
And the Japanese man will be in charge of supplies.

A year passes on the island and the billionaire returns to find only the Spaniard and American left.

"What happened?! Where is the Japanese man?" he asks.

"We're not sure! As soon as we got here he took off into the forest and we haven't seen him since."

Worried for the Japanese man, they decide to search the island.

After a few minutes of walking, all of the sudden, the Japanese man leaps out from the bushes and yells, "**SUPPLIES!**"

Edit: Woo hoo! Top 4 on /r/Jokes! Thanks guys, glad you liked it!
***
A young man was wandering, lost, in a forest...
When he came upon a small house. Knocking on the door he was greeted by an ancient Chinese man with a long, gray beard. 

"I’m lost," said the man. "Can you put me up for the night?" 

"Certainly," the Chinese man said," but on one condition. If you so much as lay a finger on my daughter I will inflict upon you the three worst Chinese tortures known to man."

"OK," said the man, thinking that the daughter must be pretty old as well, and entered the house. Before dinner the daughter came down the stairs. She was young, beautiful and had a fantastic figure. She was obviously attracted to the young man as she couldn’t keep her eyes off him during the meal. Remembering the old man’s warning he ignored her and went up to bed alone. But during the night he could bear it no longer and snuck into her room for a night of passion. He was careful to keep everything quiet so the old man wouldn’t hear and, near dawn, he crept back to his room, exhausted but happy.

He woke to feel a pressure on his chest. Opening his eyes he saw a large rock on his chest with a note on it that read, "Chinese Torture 1: Large rock on chest."

"Well, that’s pretty crappy," he thought. "If that’s the best the old man can do then I don’t have much to worry about." He picked the boulder up, walked over to the window and threw the boulder out.

As he did so he noticed another note on the window that read "Chinese Torture 2: Rock tied to left testicle." In a panic he glanced down and saw the line that was already getting close to taut.

Figuring that a few broken bones was better than castration, he jumped out of the window after the boulder. As he plummeted downward he saw a large sign on the ground that read, "Chinese Torture 3: Right testicle tied to bedpost." 
***
1 dollar for dirty joke
I was in Venice Beach in January and there was a homeless man with a sign that said “1 dollar for dirty joke.” Seemed like a good investment to me so I gladly handed over a dollar.

Homeless man: “Alright sir whats your name?

Me: “asstasticbum”

Homeless man: “So asstasticbum, there is black rooster alright? How many legs does that chicken have”

Me: “two?”

Homeless man: “Right, now how many wings this black rooster got?”

Me: “two?”

Homeless man: “Right, now how many eyes this black rooster got?”

Me: “two?”

Homeless man: “Right again, now there is this white cat walking around how many hairs are on that white cat?"

Me: “I don’t know? A lot?”

Homeless man: “Well asstasticbum, why do you know so much about black cock and not enough about white pussy.”


Credits to /u/asstasticbum. He is the owner and OP of this story. Im just retelling it. 

Front page whooo hooo!! First time this has happened for me :D Im estatic :) 

Edit:: Please dont gild this post. If any of you feel so strongly, go to /u/asstasticbum and gild him 

Sorry for not adding link earlier. I had saved this post on my ColorNote app and i found it today. Apologies to people who are whining i did this for karma (TEXT post gives NO KARMA) 
Link to original story HERE:: https://www.reddit.com/r/Jokes/comments/1rwb5t/i_paid_a_homeless_lady_in_nashville_1_for_two/cdrqcwl?context=3
***
Since is translate your national jokes day here it goes: a romanian one.
Bula is at school, the teacher enters the class and starts calling pupils to see who is missing:

"Andrei?" 

"Here." 

"Anda?"
 
"Here." 

"Bula?"

"Here."

Behind the class George starts laughing. 

"What's so funny George?"

"Miss! If you change the first letter from Bula's name you get Pula (Penis). Hahaha"

Bula frowns. 

The next day the same; George laughs.

The third day, after George laughs again at Bula's name: 

"Gina?" 

"Here." 

"George?" 

"Here." 

Bula starts laughing uncontrollably.

The teacher, startled, asks:

"What's the matter Bula?"

"Miss, if you change a few letters from George's name you get *Fuck You George And Your Inbred Family*. Haha!"
***
3 guys are shipwrecked on an island full of cannibals
The cannibals catch them and say"bring us 10 fruits or we will kill you" the first man  comes back with ten carrots the cannibals tell him"we'll stick them all up your ass if you dont move a muscle we'll let you live" they force the first one up his ass he doesnt say anything but as soon as they touch the other carrot he says Ow! They throw him in a cage the second man comes back with ten berries they tell him the same thing and start filling him up they stick the first one he doesnt say anything then the second one the the 3rd 5th 6th 7th 8th 9th but as soon as they stick the 10th on up his ass he starts laughing they throw him in a cage next to the other guy ,he says"DUDE you were doing so well why'd you laugh?" "Because i saw the other guy coming with ten watermelons"

***
The 6th grade science teacher
The 6th grade science teacher, Mrs. Parks, asked her class, "What human body part increases to ten times its size when stimulated?"
No one answered until little Mary stood up and said, "You should not be asking sixth-graders a question like that! I'm going to tell my parents, and they will go and tell the principal, who will then fire you!"
Mrs. Parks ignored her and asked the question again, "Which body part increases to 10 times its size when stimulated?"Little Mary's mouth fell open. Then she said to those around her, "Boy, is she going to get in big trouble!"
The teacher continued to ignore her and said to the class, "Anybody?"Finally, Billy stood up, looked around nervously, and said, "The body part that increases 10 times its size when stimulated is the pupil of the eye."
Mrs. Parks said, "Very good, Billy," then turned to Mary and continued. "As for you, young lady, I have three things to say:
One, you have a dirty mind.
Two, you didn't read your homework.
And three, one day you are going to be very, very disappointed." 


***
Cinderella was now 95 years old....
Cinderella was now 95 years old.

After a fulfilling life with the now-dead prince, she happily sat upon her rocking chair, watching the world go by from her front porch, with a cat named Bob for companionship.

One sunny afternoon, out of nowhere, appeared the fairy godmother.

Cinderella said, "Fairy Godmother, what are you doing here after all these years?"

The fairy godmother replied, "Cinderella, you have lived an exemplary life since I last saw you. Is there anything for which your heart still yearns?"

Cinderella was taken aback, overjoyed, and after some thoughtful consideration, she uttered her first wish: "The prince was wonderful, but not much of an investor. I'm living hand to mouth on my disability checks, and I wish I were wealthy beyond comprehension."

Instantly her rocking chair turned into solid gold.

Cinderella said, "Ooh, thank you, Fairy Godmother!"

The fairy godmother replied, "It is the least that I can do. What do you want for your second wish?"

Cinderella looked down at her frail body, and said, "I wish I were young and full of the beauty and youth I once had."

At once, her wish became reality, and her beautiful young visage returned - and Cinderella felt stirrings inside her that had been dormant for years.

Then the fairy godmother spoke once more: "You have one more wish; what shall it be?"

Cinderella looked over to the frightened cat in the corner and said, "I wish for you to transform Bob, my old cat, into a kind and handsome young man."

Magically, Bob suddenly underwent so fundamental a change in his biological make-up that, when he stood before her, he was a man so beautiful the likes of him neither she nor the world had ever seen.

The fairy godmother said, "Congratulations, Cinderella, enjoy your new life." With a blazing shock of bright blue electricity, she was gone as suddenly as she appeared.

For a few eerie moments, Bob and Cinderella looked into each other's eyes. Cinderella sat, breathless, gazing at the most beautiful, stunningly perfect man she had ever seen.

Then Bob walked over to Cinderella, who sat transfixed in her rocking chair, and held her close in his young, muscular arms. He leaned in close, blowing her golden hair with his warm breath as he whispered....

"Bet you're sorry now that you cut my nuts off!"

***
Drunken juggling
A Texas State trooper pulled a car over on I-35 about 2 miles south of Waco Texas. When the trooper asked the driver why he was speeding, the driver said he was a Magician and Juggler and was on his way to Austin Texas to do a show for the Shrine Circus. He didn't want to be late.

The trooper told the driver he was fascinated by juggling and said if the driver would do a little juggling for him then he wouldn't give him a ticket. He told the trooper he had sent his equipment ahead and didn't have anything to juggle.

The trooper said he had some flares in the trunk and asked if he could juggle them. The juggler said he could, so the trooper got 5 flares, lit them and handed them to him.

While the man was juggling, a car pulled in behind the State Troopers car. A drunken good old boy from central Texas got out, watched the performance, then went over to the Trooper's car, opened the rear door and got in. The trooper observed him and went over to the State car, opened the door asking the drunk what he thought he was doing.

The drunk replied, “You might as well take my ass to jail, cause there ain't no way I can pass that test.”
***
A train hits a bus filled with Catholic school girls...
and they all perish. They are in heaven trying to enter the pearly gates when St. Peter asks the first girl, " Tiffany, have you ever had any contact with a male organ? She giggles and shyly replies, "Well, I once touched the head of one with the tip of my finger." St. Peter says, " Okay, dip the tip of your finger in the Holy Water and pass through the gate."

St. Peter asks the next girl the same question, "Jennifer, have you ever had any contact with a male organ?" The girl is a little reluctant but replies, "Well, once I fondled and stroked one." St. Peter says, " Okay, dip your whole hand in the Holy Water and pass through the gate."

All of a sudden, there is a lot of commotion in the line of girls. One girl is pushing her way to the front of the line. When she reaches the front, St.Peter says, "Reeva, What seems to be the rush?" The girl replies, 
"If I’m going to have to gargle that Holy Water, I want to do it before Jessica sticks her ass in it.
***
Grandfather told me this one
A drunk walks into a bar and says to the bartender (with a drunken slur), "bartender, buy everyone in the house a drink, pour yourself one, and give me the bill."

So, the bartender does just that and hands the man a bill for $37.00.

The drunk says, "I haven't got it."

The bartender slaps the guy around a few times then threw him out into the street.

The very next day the same drunk walks into the bar and once again says (with a drunken slur), "Bartender, buy everyone in the house a drink, pour yourself one, and give me the bill."

The bartender looks at the guy and figures to himself that he can't possibly be stupid enough to pull the same trick twice, so he gives him the benefit of the doubt, pours a round of drinks for the house, has a drink himself and hands the drunk a bill for $37.00.

The drunk says, "I haven't got it." The bartender can't believe it, so he picks the guy up, beats the living day lights out of him, then throws him out into the street.

The next day the same drunk walks back into the same bar and says (with a drunken slur), "bartender, buy every one in the house a drink, give me the bill." In disgust the bartender says, "what, no drink for me this time?"

The drunk replies, "No, you get violent when you drink."

***
Should English be the only official language of the EU?
The European Commission has just announced an agreement whereby English will be the official language of the European Union rather than German, which was the other possibility. 

As part of the negotiations, the British Government conceded that English spelling had some room for improvement and has accepted a 5- year phase-in plan that would become known as "Euro-English". 

In the first year, "s" will replace the soft "c". Sertainly, this will make the sivil servants jump with joy. The hard "c" will be dropped in favour of "k". This should klear up konfusion, and keyboards kan have one less letter.

There will be growing publik enthusiasm in the sekond year when the troublesome "ph" will be replaced with "f". This will make words like fotograf 20% shorter. 

In the 3rd year, publik akseptanse of the new spelling kan be expekted to reach the stage where more komplikated changes are possible.

Governments will enkourage the removal of double letters which have always ben a deterent to akurate speling. 

Also, al wil agre that the horibl mes of the silent "e" in the languag is disgrasful and it should go away. 

By the 4th yer peopl wil be reseptiv to steps such as replasing "th" with "z" and "w" with "v". 

During ze fifz yer, ze unesesary "o" kan be dropd from vords kontaining "ou" and after ziz fifz yer, ve vil hav a reil sensi bl riten styl. 

Zer vil be no mor trubl or difikultis and evrivun vil find it ezi TU understand ech oza. Ze drem of a united urop vil finali kum tru. 

Und efter ze fifz yer, ve vil al be speking German like zey vunted in ze forst plas.
***
A Texan walks into an Irish pub...
A Texan walks into a pub in Ireland and clears his voice to the crowd of drinkers. He says, "I hear you Irish are a bunch of hard drinkers. I'll give $500 American dollars to anybody in here who can drink 10 pints of Guinness back-to-back."

The room is quiet and no one takes up the Texan's offer. One man even leaves. Thirty minutes later the same gentleman who left shows back up and taps the Texan on the shoulder. "Is your bet still good?", asks the Irishman.

The Texan says yes and asks the bartender to line up 10 pints of Guinness. Immediately the Irishman tears into all 10 of the pint glasses drinking them all back-to-back. The other pub patrons cheer as the Texan sits in amazement.

The Texan gives the Irishman the $500 and says, "If ya don't mind me askin', where did you go for that 30 minutes you were gone?"
The Irishman replies, "Oh...I had to go to the pub down the street to see if I could do it first".
***
A dog attacks a little girl
A man is walking in Central park in New York sees a little girl being attacked by a pit bull dog.  
He runs over and starts fighting with the dog.  
He succeeds in killing the dog and saving the girl's life.  
A journalist arriving soon takes pictures and says: \- "You are a hero, tomorrow you can read in the  newspapers: Brave New Yorker saves the life of little girl".  
The man says: \- "But I am not a New Yorker!"  
\- "Oh, then it will say in newspapers in the morning: Brave American saves life of little girl."  
\- "But I am not an American!" says the man.  
\- "Oh, where are you from then?"  
\- "I am from Iraq".

So the next day newspapers reads "Dangerous Islamic terrorist kills innocent American dog in front of a little girl".
***
C, E-flat, and G go into a bar
C, E-flat, and G go into a bar. The bartender says, "Sorry, but we don't
serve minors." So E-flat leaves, and C and G have an open fifth between
them. After a few drinks, the fifth is diminished, and G is out flat. F
comes in and tries to augment the situation, but is not sharp enough. D
comes in and heads for the bathroom, saying, "Excuse me; I'll just be a
second." Then A comes in, but the bartender is not convinced that this
relative of C is not a minor. Then the bartender notices B-flat hiding at
the end of the bar and says, "Get out! You're the seventh minor I've found
in this bar tonight." E-flat comes back the next night in a three-piece suit
with nicely shined shoes. The bartender says, "You're looking sharp tonight.
Come on in, this could be a major development." Sure enough, E-flat soon
takes off his suit and everything else, and is au natural. Eventually C
sobers up and realizes in horror that he's under a rest. C is brought to
trial, found guilty of contributing to the diminution of a minor, and is
sentenced to 10 years of D.S. without Coda at an upscale correctional
facility.
***
The deaf Italian Bookkeeper
A Mafia Godfather finds out that his bookkeeper of 20 years, Guido, has cheated him out of $10 million. Guido is deaf which is why he got the job in the first place.

The Godfather assumed that since Guido could not hear anything, he could never testify in court.When the Godfather goes to confront Guido about his missing $10 million,

he takes along his personal lawyer because he knows sign language. The Godfather tells the lawyer, "Ask him where the money is!"

The lawyer, using sign language, asks Guido, "Where's the money?"

Guido signs back, "I don't know what you are talking about." The lawyer tells the Godfather, "He says he doesn't know what you are talking about."

The Godfather pulls out a pistol, puts it to Guido's head and says, "Ask him again or I'll kill him!"

The lawyer signs to Guido, "He'll kill you if you don't tell him."

Guido trembles and signs back, "OK! You win! The money is in a brown briefcase, buried behind the shed at my cousin Bruno's house."

The Godfather asks the lawyer, "What did he say?"

The lawyer replies, "He says you don't have the balls to pull the trigger."

***
The boy with the 25 inches long penis ...
The boy with the 25 inches long penis decided that he had had way too much. He was now fed up of being the subject of constant jokes of his friends, relatives and many-a-times, complete strangers.  
  
There was a time when he was proud of his unusually long penis, thinking of it as an indicator of much masculinity. But that was few years ago. He had heard that most women liked it big, and was excited for his first time, but was severely disappointed when his then girlfriend had been so terrified after unzipping his pants, that she had straightway declined to even touch it. He had now come to realize that there is such a thing as a too large penis.  
  
So now, the boy, deciding that he had had enough, packed his bags and set out on a journey to find a way to reduce the size of his penis. After months of wandering around and seeking for a solution to his problem, he was told of a wise man who could most definitely solve his problem because, the legend said, the wise man had never ever failed to that day.  
  
After a long and an arduous journey, he found the man he was looking for. The wise man heard his tale and gave him the directions to a lake. He told the boy that on reaching the lake, he was to raise his voice and say his name. If he was lucky he would be answered by a mermaid. He was to ask the mermaid to marry him. That, according to the wise man, would solve his problems.  
  
The boy followed the path the wise man had given him and in a few days, he reached the lake. Quite a few times, he called his name loudly over the silence. Nothing happened. Just when he was disappointed, and thought that his entire journey had been in vain, a beautiful mermaid appeared out of the water and sat on the stone at the edge of the lake.  
  
Smiling, the mermaid asked, "How may I help you, human?"  
  
Excited, the boy hurriedly asked her that what he was supposed to ask, "O dear mermaid, will you marry me?"  
  
The mermaid, still smiling, simply said, "No."  
  
Suddenly, the boy's penis was reduced from 25 inches to 20 inches. Tears of happiness welled through his eyes. But even through this intense happiness, the boy found himself thinking, 20 inches is better than 25, but 15 would be even great.  
  
Thus, he asked the mermaid again, "Will you marry me?"  
  
The mermaid's smile faded a little, but even so, she replied curtly, "No."  
  
The boy's penis reduced from 20 inches to 15 inches. Now, again, he thought, 15 inches is better still, but a 10 inches penis would be ideal. A 10 inches penis would be perfect.  
  
Thus, he asked the mermaid again, "Will you marry me?"  
  
The mermaid, now visibly frowning, and clearly annoyed, replied in an irritated voice, "How many times do I have to say that to you?! No! No! No!"
***
An Englishman, a Scotsman and an Irishman are working on a sky scraper
The Englishman opens his sandwich box and exclaims "Bloody hell, ham and cheese again! I swear, if I have ham and cheese again tomorrow, i'm going to throw myself off this building!" The Scotsman then proceeds to open his sandwich box and exclaims "Aye, I've got fucking chicken mayo again, if I have this tomorrow i'll throw myself off this building as well!" The Irishman opens his lunch and says "I've got bacon again! If I have bacon again tomorrow, i'll join you in jumping off this building!"

So the next day the three men open their sandwich boxes and all have the same filling as the day before, so they all proceed to jump off of the sky scraper. A few days later at the funerals of the three men, their wives stood weeping. "If I would have known Pete didn't want ham and cheese then I would have mixed it up!" Said the English mans wife. The Scotsman's wife nodded "Yes, If i knew Stephen didn't want chicken mayo then I would have made something different." The Irishman's wife was crying harder than all and simply said "I just don't understand... Paddy made his own fucking sandwiches"
***
A hypnotist at a senior home...
It was entertainment night at the senior citizens' center. 
After the community sing along led by Alice at the piano, it was time for the star of the show- Claude the Hypnotist!  
Claude explained that he was going to put the whole audience into a trance. "Yes, each and every one of you and all at the same time." said Claude. 

The excited chatter dropped to silence as Claude carefully withdrew from his waistcoat pocket a beautiful antique gold pocket watch and chain.
"I want you to keep your eyes on this watch" said Claude, holding the watch high for all to see. "It is a very special and valuable watch that has been in my family for six generations" said Claude. 
 
He began to swing the watch gently back and forth while quietly chanting "Watch the watch --- Watch the watch ----Watch the watch" 
The audience became mesmerized as the watch swayed back and forth. The lights were twinkling as they were reflected from its gleaming surfaces. A hundred and fifty pairs of eyes followed the movements of the gently swaying watch. 
They were hypnotized.

And then, suddenly, the chain broke!! The beautiful watch fell to the stage and burst apart on impact"
 
"SHIT" said Claude!
 
It took them three days to clean the Senior Citizens' Center and Claude was never invited back.
***
QUEEN Elizabeth and Dolly Parton die on the same day.
QUEEN Elizabeth and Dolly Parton die on the same day, and both go before an Angel to find out if they'll be admitted to Heaven. Unfortunately, there's only one space left that day, so the Angel must decide which of them gets in. The Angel asks Dolly if there's some particular reason why she should go to Heaven. Dolly takes off her top and says, "Look at these, they're the most perfect breasts God ever created, and I'm sure it will please God to be able to see them every day, for eternity". The Angel thanks Dolly and asks Her Majesty the same question. The Queen takes a bottle of Perrier out of her purse, and drinks it down. Then, pees into a toilet and pulls the lever. The Angel says, "ok, your Majesty, you may go in". Dolly is outraged and asked,"What was that all about, I show you two of God's own perfect creations and you turn me down. She pees into a toilet and she gets in! Would you explain that to me"? "Sorry, Dolly says the Angel, but even in Heaven A Royal Flush Beats a Pair No Matter How Big They Are". 

***
As told to me by an 85 year old shriner clown.
Little 8 year old Susie is in her back yard digging a hole. Her neighbor Mr. Johnson peeks over the fence and says "gee Susie, what's going on?"

Susie says "I'm digging a hole, it's pretty obvious."

Mr. Johnson asks "why are you digging a hole?"

Susie replies "I'm burying my gold fish."

Mr Johnson laughs and asks "Why is the hole so big?"

Susie replies "Because my goldfish is inside your fucking cat".


Edit: He will be happy to know you liked it! Not sure he would get the whole reddit front page thing though. 
***
This is for Robin Williams
A man goes to see a doctor. Doctor asks what seems to be the trouble. The man says, "Doc, I'm depressed. Simply, I can't sleep sometimes, I can't eat, I feel down and irritable most days. I just can't feel 'happy.'" 

The Doctor says, "I've got the perfect fix for you. In town tonight is the great clown Pagliacci. He's hysterically funny and will make you laugh til you cry. You will experience a joy unprecedented." 

The man bursts into tears. The doctor, confused asks why. "Doc, I *am* Pagliacci."





Robin Williams was legendary. He was also human. He had his demons and battled them all his life. I don't like that he's gone, but I understand what he's dealt with. RIP. 


Edit: The "joke" ~~is from~~ I saw in Watchmen. It was the first thing I thought of upon hearing about his death and that it was as a result of a suicide. I don't have the words to rationalize my posting it. I'm just saddened immensely by his loss for I, like many others, loved Robin for his comedy and respected him for who he was as a person. 
***
You have Sinned
EDIT: I have never written this joke out. Most of this joke is about the delivery. This is a successful joke when you are forced into telling one. Use the names of those goading you into telling one!




Johnny, Mike, and Pete were driving late at night when a cat cut in front of the car. Pete swerved to avoid the cat but plowed right into a tree.

The next thing the men knew, they were in what appeared to be a white and cloudy waiting room. They looked at each other, shocked, and thought that they must be in heaven.

Before they could speak to each other, a loud voice spoke up and called to the first man.

"Pete, report to room 13". the first man nervously looked at his friends and walked down the hallway to room 13.

Pete turned the knob of the door and stepped inside. On the other end of the room was a vicious lion. The lion was roaring, gnashing its teeth, and tearing at the ground.

The loud voice boomed...

 "Pete, you have sinned. You must spend 10,000 years in this room before you can enjoy the fruits of heaven."

At that, the door slammed shut and locked. Johnny and Mike couldn't believe their ears. What a terrible fate for their friend, but before they could nervously bicker with each other the voice boomed again.

"Mike, report to room 5."

After hearing this, Mike was terrified. He looked over to Johnny but started inching down the hallway to room 5. When he got there, he turned the knob and walked into the room.

On the other end of the room, there is a pack of huge and ferocious hyenas growling and biting at each other. They were howling wildly and snarling, now bringing their gaze to Mike.

The loud voice boomed...

"Mike, you have sinned. You must spend 50,000 years in this room before you can enjoy the fruits of heaven."

No sooner had the sentence been heard did the door slam shut and lock.

Johnny is standing alone now, terrified. There is no doubt that Pete and Mike were both saints compared to him.

As Johnny is staring down the hallway, the voice booms...

"Johnny, report to room 1." 

Johnny looks down at the ground, and as slow as possible shuffles to the big door of room #1. He turns the knob and walks in with his eyes closed.

He opens his eyes and on the other end of the room he sees Scarlett Johansson standing there, naked. He cant believe his eyes, rubbing them in disbelief.

The loud voice booms...

"Scarlett Johansson, you have sinned."
***
Tiger Woods and Stevie Wonder are in a bar.
Tiger turns to Stevie and says, "How's the singing career going?"

Stevie replies, "Not too bad. How's the golf?"

Woods replies, "Not too bad, I've had some problems with my swing, but I think I've got that right now."

Stevie says, "I always find that when my swing goes wrong, I need to stop playing for a while and not think about it. Then, the next time I play, it seems to be all right."

Incredulous, Tiger says, "You play GOLF?"

Stevie says, "Yes, I've been playing for years."

Tiger says, "But—you're blind! How can you play golf if you can't see?"

Stevie Wonder replies, "Well, I get my caddy to stand in the middle of the fairway and call to me. I listen for the sound of his voice and play the ball towards him. Then, when I get to where the ball lands, the caddy moves to the green or farther down the fairway, and again I play the ball towards his voice."

"But how do you putt?" asks Tiger.

"Well," says Stevie, "I get my caddy to lean down in front of the hole and call to me with his head on the ground and I just play the ball toward his voice."

Tiger asks, "What's your handicap?"

Stevie says, "Well, actually—I'm a scratch golfer."

Woods, incredulous, says to Stevie, "We've got to play a round sometime."

Stevie replies, "Well, people don't take me seriously, so I only play for money, and never play for less than $10,000 a hole. Is that a problem?"

Woods thinks about it and says, "I can afford that; OK, I'm game for that. $10,000 a hole is fine with me. When would you like to play?"

Stevie Wonder says, "Pick a night."
***
So a Russian man shows up for a job interview.
He sits in a chair across from the interviewer on the top floor of a large corporate building. The interviewer, plainly unimpressed by the man sitting before him, decides to ask some loaded interview questions in order to quickly dispose of the Russian.

"Welcome," says the interviewer. "For your first question, I'd like you to draw the number 9 without using numbers." He hands the Russian man a pad of paper and a pencil to complete the exercise.

The Russian stares into space for a brief minute and then proceeds to draw three trees on the first piece of paper. He shows his drawings to the interviewer and says, "Here. Tree, tree, and tree equals 9."

The interviewer is slightly taken aback by this show of ingenuity, but he pushes onward. "Very well," he says. "Now, do the same thing with the number 99." 

The Russian's face goes blank as he stares into space for a time. Finally, he takes his pencil and draws a little smudge on the trunk of each tree. He gestures to the paper and says, "Here. Now each tree is dirty. Dirty-tree, dirty-tree, and dirty-tree equals 99."

The interviewer is begrudgingly impressed, but he really does not want to hire this man. He decides on one final, loaded question. "Fine. For your final question, perform the same exercise with the number 100."

The Russian man stares at the wall of the office for several minutes. Just as the interviewer is about to smugly ask him to leave, the Russian draws a little dot at the base of each tree on the paper. He points at the dots and says, "Here. Little doggy come by and poop by each tree. Now is dirty-tree and a turd, dirty-tree and a turd, and dirty-tree and a turd. This is 100. When do I start?"
***
A couple of sub-par jokes.
Chris returned home after a long day out on the course. Upon walking through the door, he was greeted by his wife, who asked about his game.

"Oh honey, it was awful," sighed Chris. "Glen- you know Glen; Trish's husband?- he had a heart attack and dropped dead on the second hole."

"My God," gasped his wife, "That's terrible! Oh you poor thing."

"Ay, you're telling me. It was awful. For the whole day it was 'hit the ball, drag Glen. Hit the ball, drag Glen.'"
________
A golfing couple were playing their routine course one afternoon. Feeling the peace and serenity of the day, the husband decided to confess his most regrettable action during their marriage.

"My dear, a few years back, I had an affair with my receptionist. I fired her shortly after. I'm telling you this because I felt guilty, and I know that you're the only one for me."

She remains silent for the remainder of the hole. The husband fear that his marriage is lost. Suddenly, she begins to speak.

"I too, have something to admit."

"Pray tell," says the husband, "I'm sure it is not as bad as my sins."

"Well," she says, "In the years before we knew each other, I was a man. I've gone through a sex change."

"WHAT?!" roars the husband. "AND YOU'VE BEEN HITTING FROM THE WOMEN'S TEE ALL THIS TIME?!"
________
Three men, an avid golf threesome, were considering adding a fourth to their weekly round. That day, a new woman overheard the guys talking about their golf game. She said, "You know, I used to play on my golf team in college and I was pretty good. Would you mind if I joined you next week?"

One of the men said it would be okay, but they would be starting early -- at 6:30 a.m. They figured the early tee-time would discourage her.

The woman said this may be a problem, and asked if she could be up to 15 minutes late.

They rolled their eyes, but said okay.

She smiled and said, "Good, I'll be there at 6:30 or 6:45."

She showed up at 6:30 sharp, and beat all three of them with an eye-opening 2-under par round. Back at the clubhouse, they congratulated her and invited her back the next week.. She smiled, and said, "I'll be there at 6:30 or 6:45."

The next week she again showed up at 6:30 sharp. Only this time, she played left-handed. The three guys were incredulous as she still beat them with an even par round, despite playing with her off-hand. They were totally amazed.

The third week, the guys showed up with a new intensity to win. But this time, she was 15 minutes late, which made the guys irritable. On this day, the women played right-handed, and narrowly beat all three of them.

Back in the clubhouse, all three guys were shaking their heads. They had a couple of beers, and finally, one of the men asked her point blank, "How do you decide if you're going to golf right-handed or left-handed?"

The lady blushed, and grinned. "That's easy," she said.."When my Dad taught me to play golf, I learned I was ambidextrous. I like to switch back and forth. When I got married after college, I discovered my husband always sleeps in the nude. From then on, I developed a silly habit. Right before I left in the morning for golf practice, I would pull the covers off him. If his Wee Duff was pointing to the right, I golfed right-handed; if it was pointed to the left, I golfed left-handed."

One of the guys shot back, "But what if it's pointing straight up?" 

She said, "Then, I'm fifteen minutes late."

***
The Jewish Samurai
There once was a powerful Japanese emperor who needed a new chief samurai. So he sent out a declaration throughout the entire known world that he was searching for a chief.

A year passed, and only three people applied for the very demanding position: a Japanese samurai, a Chinese samurai, and a Jewish samurai.

The emperor asked the Japanese samurai to come in and demonstrate why he should be the chief samurai. The Japanese samurai opened a matchbox, and out popped a bumblebee. Whoosh! went his sword. The bumblebee dropped dead, chopped in half.
The emperor exclaimed, "That is very impressive! “The emperor then issued the same challenge to the Chinese samurai, to come in and demonstrate why he should be chosen. The Chinese samurai also opened a matchbox and out buzzed a fly. Whoosh, whoosh, whoosh, whoosh! The fly dropped dead, chopped into four small pieces.
The emperor exclaimed, "That is very impressive!"
Now the emperor turned to the Jewish samurai, and asked him to demonstrate why he should be the chief samurai. The Jewish Samurai opened a matchbox, and out flew a gnat. His flashing sword went Whoosh! But the gnat was still alive and flying around.

The emperor, obviously disappointed, said, "Very ambitious, but why is that gnat not dead?"
The Jewish Samurai just smiled and said, "Circumcision is not meant to kill."
***
At the end of a Tax Year, the Tax Office sent an inspector to audit the books at a synagogue.
While checking the books, he turned to the rabbi and asked, "I notice you buy a lot of candles, what do you do with the candle drippings?" 

"Good question," retorted the rabbi, "we save them up and send them to candle makers, every now and then they send us a free box of candles."

The inspector was a bit disappointed that his unusual question had a practical answer. 

But he continued, in his obnoxious way,"What about all these biscuit purchases? What do you do with the crumbs? "

"Ah! Yes." replied the rabbi realizing that the inspector was trying to trap him with an unanswerable question. "We collect them and send them back to the manufacturers, every now and then they send us a free box of biscuits." 

The auditor thought hard about how he could fluster the know-it-all rabbi. "Well rabbi, what do you do with all the leftover foreskins from the circumcisions you perform?" 

"Here, too, we do not waste", said the rabbi. "What we do is save up all the foreskins and send them to the Tax Office, and once a year they send us a complete dick like you."
***
A Jewish Man Goes to his Friend With a Problem
“I have a problem with my son,” he says. “I sent him to Jerusalem so he could learn how to be a good Jew, and to how to have a good Jewish family, and he came back a Christian!” 


“Hmmmm, that’s a funny thing,” his friend responded. “I too had a son who I sent to Jerusalem to learn how to be a good Jew, and to how to have a good Jewish family, and he came back a Christian! Let’s take this to the Rabbi.”


So the two friends go to the local Synagogue to tell the Rabbi the tale of their sons conversion. 


“Rabbi,” the first Jewish man begins,” We had sons who we sent to Jerusalem to learn how to be good Jews, and to how to have good Jewish families, and they both came back Christian!”


“Hmmmm, that’s a funny thing,” the Rabbi says. “I too had a son who I sent to Jerusalem to learn how to be a good Jew, and to how to have a good Jewish family, and he came back a Christian! Let’s take this to the Lord.” 


So the three Jewish men begin praying in the Synagogue and the Rabbi says, 

“Lord, we had sons who we sent to Jerusalem to learn how to be good Jews, and to how to have good Jewish families, and they all came back Christian!”


Suddenly, dark clouds filled the sky and there was thunder and lightning and the Jewish men heard a deep voice coming from the heavens saying


“Hmmmm, that’s a funny thing.”


Edit: A Jewish man told me this joke. 
***
An Irishman walks into a bar...
...and says to the bartender, "Give me three pints of Guinness, lad". The bartender obliges, and the Irishman lifts two of the three glasses to the air, as if toasting some invisible person. He then set them down, and finished all three glasses by sipping from one, then the next, and the next until it was empty. Bartender, naturally curious, asks what's up.

"Oh, me two brothers all live about. Since we can't meet and have a pint together, we do it from afar like this."

This continues for a few more months, until finally, one day, the Irishman only orders two pints of Guinness. Bartender notices this and says solemnly, "Only two today? I'm sorry. Did one of your brothers pass away?"

"No, no, nothing of the sort. I've quit drinking!"
***
Either way, the results are not good
The phone rings and the lady of the house answers,  'Hello.'
 
'Mrs. Sanders, please.'
 
'Speaking.'
 
'Mrs. Sanders,  this is Doctor Jones at Saint Agnes Laboratory. When your husband's doctor sent  his biopsy to the lab last week, a biopsy from another Mr. Sanders arrived as  well. We are now uncertain which one belongs to your husband. Frankly, either  way the results are not too good.'
 
'What do you mean?' Mrs. Sanders asks  nervously.
 
'Well, one of the specimens tested positive for Alzheimer's  and the other one tested positive for HIV. We can't tell which is  which.'
 
'That's dreadful! Can you do the test again?' questioned Mrs.  Sanders.
 
'Normally we can, but Medicare will only pay for these expensive  tests one time.'
 
'Well, what am I supposed to do now?'
 
'The folks  at Medicare recommend that you drop your husband off somewhere in the middle of  town. If he finds his way home, don't sleep with  him.'
***
Sniper
There were three buddies playing golf in the local golf course when a stranger approached them and asked if he can join them. He explained how he just moved to the area and wants to make new friends. So the friends introduced themselves and let him join. As they start playing golf one of the friends (Kaboose) asked the new guy what he does for a living and the new guy replied "I'm a professional sniper." Kaboose didn't believe him and they all laughed at him. The sniper calmly reached into his golf bag and pulled out a sniper rifle from between his golf clubs. Everyone went silent. Kaboose asked if he can have a look at the rifle and the sniper let him. Kaboose looked through the scope and spotted his house. He zoomed in through the window and he saw his wife naked with some other man. He put the gun down and looked at the sniper,

**Kaboose:** How much do you charge to kill someone?

**Sniper:** I charge $1000 every time I pull the trigger

**Kaboose:** I'll give you $2000, I want you to shoot my wife in the mouth for being a total bitch and yelling at me all the time, and for banging my wife I want you to shoot the guy in his dick.

The sniper agreed and begins to take aim. A few minutes pass by and the sniper still didn't do anything yet.

**Kaboose:** What are you doing?

**Sniper:** Hold on....I'm about to save you $1000


edit: fixed bolding

Edit 2: Fixed tenses, thanks to /u/mr78rpm 
***
Gorilla needed mate
A small zoo in Arkansas obtained a very rare species of gorilla. 
Within a few weeks the gorilla, a female, became very difficult to handle. Upon examination, the veterinarian determined the problem. The gorilla was in heat. To make matters worse, there was no male gorilla available. In a desperate hope to solve the problem, the Zoo Keeper approached a local redneck, Bobby Lee with a proposition. Would he be willing to mate with the gorilla for $500.00? 

Bobby Lee showed some interest, but said he would have to think the matter over carefully. The following day, he announced that he would accept their offer, but only under four conditions. 


"First", Bobby Lee said, "I ain't gonna kiss her on the lips." The Keeper quickly agreed to this condition. 

"Second", he said, "You can't never tell no one about this." The Keeper again readily agreed to this condition. 

"Third", Bobby Lee said, "I want all the children raised Southern Baptist." Once again it was agreed. 

And last, Bobby Lee said, "I'll need another week to come up with the $500.00.”
***
The Irish Millionaire
Mick, from Dublin , appeared on 'Who Wants To Be A Millionaire' and towards the end of the program had already won 500,000 euros.

"You've done very well so far," said Chris Tarrant, the show's presenter, "but for a million euros you've only got one life-line left, phone a friend. Everything is riding on this question. Will you go for it?"

"Sure," said Mick. "I'll have a go!"

"Which of the following birds does NOT build its own nest?

a) Sparrow

b) Thrush,

c) Magpie,

d) Cuckoo?"

"I haven't got a clue." said Mick, ''So I'll use last lifeline and phone my friend Paddy back home in Dublin .."

Mick called up his mate, and told him the circumstances and repeated the question to him.

"Fookin hell, Mick!" cried Paddy. "Dat's simple it's a cuckoo."

"Are you sure?"

"I'm fookin sure."

Mick hung up the phone and told Chris, "I'll go with cuckoo as my answer."

"Is that your final answer?" asked Chris.

"Dat it is."

There was a long, long pause and then the presenter screamed, "Cuckoo is the correct answer! Mick, you've won 1 million euros!"

The next night, Mick went round to Paddy's to buy him a drink.

"Tell me, Paddy? How in Heaven's name did you know it was da Cuckoo that doesn't build its own nest?"

"Because he lives in a Fookin clock!"
***
An old man offered a lady $100 to lick her nipples...
An old man saw a beautiful lady walking down the street of the bar he just walked out of.  

He catches up to her and says, "Ma'am, I'll give you $100 dollars if you let me lick your nipples!"

Stunned, she says, "What kind of dirty old pervert are you?? Absolutely NOT!"

The old man, being persistent said "Fine, $1,000 dollars to lick your nipples! That's a fair offer."

To which the lady replied "What kind of woman do you think I am? Leave me alone or I'll call the cops!"

The old man, still not giving up, says "$10,000 dollars to lick your nipples, final offer!"

The lady's eyes got huge and she said "Well.... 10 grand is a lot of money....I guess if no one was around us then maybe...."

The old man says "Great!  Let's just go back behind this bar where nobody is and then we'll be out of sight!"

The old man leads the beautiful lady to the back of the bar.

She says, "Let's get this over with."

She drops down her dress far enough to where her breasts are fully exposed.

The old man starts squeezing on them, rubbing his face all over and in between them, pinching the nipples softly with his fingers and kissing all over her breasts.

She finally speaks up and says, "Are you going to lick my nipples or not? Let's get this over with!"

The old man replied, "Nope!  Too expensive!"
***
Morality stories
A teacher gave her fifth grade class an assignment: Get their parents to tell them a story with a moral at the end of it.

The next day the kids came back and one by one began to tell their stories. Kathy said, "My father's a farmer and we have a lot of egg-laying hens. One time we were taking our eggs to market in a basket on the front seat of the pickup when we hit a bump in the road and all the eggs went flying and broke and made a mess."

"And what's the moral of the story?" asked the teacher. 

"Don't put all your eggs in one basket!" "Very good," said the teacher.

Next little Lucy raised a hand and said, "Our family are farmers, too. But we raise chickens for the meat market. We had a dozen eggs one time, but when they hatched we only got ten live chicks and the moral to this story is, don't count your chickens until they're hatched."

"That was a fine story Lucy. Johnny, do you have a story to share?" 

"Yes, ma'am! My daddy told me this story about my Aunt Marge. She was a flight engineer during Desert Storm and her plane got hit. She had to bail out over enemy territory, and all she had was a bottle of whiskey, a machine gun and a Machete. So .. she drank the whiskey on the way down so it wouldn't break. Then she landed right in the middle of 100 enemy troops. She killed 70 of them with the machine gun until it ran out of bullets! Then she killed 20 more with the machete till the blade broke; then she killed the last 10 with her bare hands."

"Good heavens," said the horrified teacher, "what kind of moral did your daddy tell you from that horrible story?" 

"Stay away from Aunt Marge when she's been drinking."
***
A little boy was sitting in class...
The teacher decided that since it was Friday afternoon, and there was nothing left to do for the week, she'd let the students go home early if they could answer a question correctly.

The teacher said: "Okay class, which president said: 'The only thing we have to fear, is fear itself'?"

Little Timmy was bouncing up and down in his seat, arm raised: "OOH! OOH! I KNOW!"

Before the teacher could call on him, little Julie stood and said: "Franklin Roosevelt".

"Very good Julie, you can go." the teacher replied. "Okay class, which president said: 'Ask not what your country can do for you, ask what you can do for your country'?"

Again, little Timmy's hand shot into the air and he waved his arms excitedly. "OOH! OOH! I KNOW! PLEASE!"

Again, before she had a chance to call on anyone, little Sally stood and said: "John Kennedy"

"Very good Sally, you may leave also." The teacher asked again "Okay class, which President said: "Mr. Gorbachev, tear down this wall?"

Before Timmy could answer, little Jennifer jumped up and shouted: "Ronald Reagan!"

Frustrated, little Timmy mumbled to himself: "I wish these bitches would keep their fucking mouths shut!"

The teacher heard and shouted: "WHO SAID THAT!?!"

Timmy jumped up: "Bill Clinton! Can I go now?"
***
A wife came home early and,
One day, a wife came home early and found her husband in their bedroom making love to a very attractive young woman. Naturally, she was very upset. “You are a disrespectful pig!” she cried. “How dare you do this to me! I’m a faithful wife, the mother of your children! I’m leaving you. I want a divorce right away!”

The husband replied, “Hang on just a minute love, so at least I can tell you what happened.”

“Go ahead,” she sobbed, “but they’ll be the last words you’ll say to me!”

So the husband began, “Well, I was getting into the car to drive home, and this young lady here asked me for a lift. She looked so down and out and defenseless that I took pity on her and let her into the car.

I noticed that she was very thin, not well dressed and very dirty. She told me that she hadn’t eaten for three days. So, in my compassion, I brought her home and warmed up the enchiladas I made for you last night. The ones you wouldn’t eat because you’re afraid you’ll put on weight. The poor thing devoured them in moments!

Since she needed a good clean-up, I suggested a shower, and while she was doing that, I noticed her clothes were dirty and full of holes so I threw them away. Then, as she needed clothes, I gave her the designer jeans that you have had for a few years, but don’t wear because you say they are too tight.

I also gave her the underwear that was your anniversary present, which you don’t wear because I don’t have good taste. I found the sexy blouse my sister gave you for Christmas that you don’t wear just to annoy her and I also donated those boots you bought at the expensive boutique and don’t wear because someone at work has a pair the same.”

The husband took a quick breath and continued, “She was so grateful for my understanding and help that as I walked her to the door, she turned to me with tears in her eyes and said…”

“Do you have anything else that your wife doesn’t use?”
***
Dark jokes
1. Why can't orphans play baseball? They don't know where home is

2. What's the worst part about breaking up with a japanese person? You have to drop the bomb twice before they get the message

3. What did kermit the frog say at Jim henson's funeral? Nothing

4. What's white on top and black on the bottom? Society

5. What's the difference between john wayne and jack daniels? Jack daniels is still killing indians

6. Penn State moved the Jerry Sandusky statue to the library. When you see him, you have to stay quiet.

7. Why does dr pepper come in a bottle? His wife is dead

8. What's the difference between a garbanzo bean and a chick pea?
I wouldn't pay 40 bucks to have a garbanzo bean on my face.

9. What is the last thing a redneck says before he dies? Hold my beer

10. Who's the opposite of christopher reeves? Christopher walkin

11. What's the difference between usian bolt and hitler? Usian bolt can finish a race

12. Why did princess diana cross the road? She wasn't wearing a seatbelt

13. How many potatoes does it take to kill an irishman? Zero

14. What did the left tower say to the right tower? Can't talk right now, gotta catch a flight

15. Why are suicide jokes long? Cause people who commited suicide lived shorter

16. What's the difference between a lawyer and an onion? People cry when they cut up an onion

17. What did the disabled boy get for christmas? Cancer
***
A priest and a rabbi are seated together on a plane...
A Priest and a Rabbi were sitting next to each other on an airplane. After a while, the Priest turned to the Rabbi and asked, “Is it still a requirement of your faith that you not eat pork?”
The Rabbi responded, “Yes, that is still one of our laws.”
The Priest then asked, “Have you ever eaten pork?”
To which the Rabbi replied, “Yes, on one occasion I did succumb to temptation and tasted a ham sandwich.” The Priest nodded in understanding and went on with his reading.
A while later, the Rabbi spoke up and asked the Priest, “Father, is it still a requirement of your church that you remain celibate?” 
The Priest replied, “Yes, that is still very much a part of our faith.”
The Rabbi then asked him, “Father, have you ever fallen to the temptations of the flesh?” The Priest replied, “Yes, Rabbi, on one occasion I was weak and broke my faith.”
The Rabbi nodded understandingly and remained silent, thinking, for about five minutes. Finally, the Rabbi said, “Beats the shit out of a ham sandwich, doesn't it?”
***
Satan's engineer
An engineer dies and reports to the pearly gates. St. Peter checks his dossier and says, "Ah, you're an engineer — you're in the wrong place."

So the engineer reports to the gates of hell and is let in.

Pretty soon, the engineer gets dissatisfied with the level of comfort in hell, and starts designing and building improvements. After a while, they've got air conditioning, flush toilets and escalators, and the engineer is becoming a pretty popular guy.

One day God calls Satan up on the telephone and asks with a sneer, 

"So, how's it going down there in hell?" 

Satan replies, "Hey, things are going great. We've got air conditioning, flush toilets and escalators, and there's no telling what this engineer is going to come up with next."

God replies, "What??? You've got an engineer? That's a mistake — he should never have gotten down there; send him up here." 

Satan says, "No way! I like having an engineer on the staff, and I'm keeping him."

God says, "Send him back up here or I'll sue."

Satan laughs uproariously and answers, "Yeah right. And just where are YOU going to get a lawyer?"
***
The blonde and the crocodile.
Steve Irwin walks into a bar with his pet crocodile by his side. He puts
the croc up on the bar. He then turns to the astonished patrons and says: "I'll make you a deal. I'll open this croc's mouth and place my genitalia inside.
Then the croc will close his mouth for one minute. Then he'll open his
mouth and I'll remove my genitalia unscathed. In return for witnessing this
spectacle, each of you will buy me a drink."

The crowd murmured in unanimous approval. Steve stood up on the bar,
dropped his trousers, and placed his privates in the crocodile's open mouth. The croc closed his mouth as the crowd gasped. After a minute, Irwin grabbed a beer bottle and smacked the croc hard on the top of its head.

The croc opened his mouth and he removed his genitals unscathed as
promised.

The crowd cheered and the first of his free drinks were delivered. Steve
stood up again and made another offer. "I'll pay anyone $100 who's willing to give it a try."

A hush fell over the crowd. After a while, a hand went up in the back of
the bar.

A blonde woman timidly spoke up...

"I'll try it! Just don't hit me so hard with the beer bottle."

***
A cowboy with three beers
A cowboy, who just moved to Wyoming from Texas , walks into a bar and orders three mugs of Bud. He sits in the back of the room, drinking a sip out of each one in turn. When he finishes them, he comes back to the bar and orders three more.
 
The bartender approaches and tells the cowboy, "You know, a mug goes flat after I draw it. It would taste better if you bought one at a time."
 
The cowboy replies, "Well, you see, I have two brothers. One is in Arizona , the other is in Colorado . When we all left our home in Texas , we promised that we'd drink this way to remember the days when we drank together. So I'm drinking one beer for each of my brothers and one for myself."
 
The bartender admits that this is a nice custom, and leaves it there.
 
The cowboy becomes a regular in the bar, and always drinks the same way. He orders three mugs and drinks them in turn.
 
One day, he comes in and only orders two mugs. All the regulars take notice and fall silent. When he comes back to the bar for the second round, the bartender says, "I don't want to intrude on your grief, but I wanted to offer my condolences on your loss."

The cowboy looks quite puzzled for a moment, then a light dawns in his eyes and he laughs.

"Oh, no, everybody's just fine," he explains, "It's just that my wife and I joined the Baptist Church and I had to quit drinking."

"Hasn't affected my brothers though."
***
A Spanish man who spoke no English went into a department store...
A Spanish man who spoke no English went into a department store to buy socks. He found his way to the menswear department where a young lady offered to help him. 

"Quiero calcetines" said the man. 

"I don't speak Spanish, but we have some very nice suits over here." said the salesgirl. 

"No, no quiero trajes. Quiero calcetines." said the man. 

"Well, these shirts are on sale this week." declared the salesgirl. 

"No, no quiero camisas. Quiero calcetines." repeated the man. 

"I still don't know what you're trying to say. We have some fine pants on this rack." offered the salesgirl. 

"No, no quiero pantalones. Quiero calcetines." insisted the man. 

"These sweaters are top quality." the salesgirl probed. 

"No, no quiero sueter. Quiero calcetines." said the man. 

"Our undershirts are over here." fumbled the salesgirl, beginning to lose patience. 

"No, no quiero camisetas. Quiero calcetines." the man repeated. 

As they passed the underwear counter, the man spotted a display of socks and happily grabbed a pair. Holding them up he proclaimed "Eso sí que es!". 

"Well, if you could spell it, why didn't you do that in the beginning?" asked the exasperated salesgirl. 
***
21 One-Liners
1. I hate Russian dolls, they're so full of themselves.

2. I asked my North Korean friend how it was there, he said he couldn't complain.

3. My girlfriend started smoking, so I slowed down and applied Lubricant.



4. Don't let an extra chromosome get you down.

5. I haven't talked to my wife in three weeks. I didn't want to interrupt her.



6. People used to laugh at me when I would say "I want to be a comedian", well nobody's laughing now.

7. My wife told me to stop impersonating a flamingo. I had to put my foot down.

8. Throwing acid is wrong, in some people's eyes.

9. My wife and I were happy for twenty years; then we met.

10. I haven't slept for three days, because that would be too long.

11. The first time I got a universal remote control, I thought to myself "This changes everything."

12. My grandfather has the heart of a lion and a lifetime ban from the local zoo.

13. Say what you want about deaf people...

14. I've spent the past four years looking for my ex-girlfriend's killer, but no one will do it.

15. I saw a sign that said "watch for children" and I thought, "That sounds like a fair trade."

16. I refused to believe my road worker father was stealing from his job, but when I got home, all the signs were there.

17. I recently decided to sell my vacuum cleaner, all it was doing was gathering dust.

18. People say I'm condescending. That means i talk down to people.

19. You can never lose a homing pigeon - if your homing pigeon doesn't come back, what you've lost is a pigeon.



20. Whiteboards are remarkable.

21. I was at an ATM and this old lady asked me to help check her balance, so I pushed her over.
***
A man walks into a bar and sees a sign that says, "Free Beer For Life If You Can Pass Our Test!"
He asks the bartender, "What's this 'test' you have?" 
The bartender says, "Well first, you gotta chug a gallon of pepper tequilla. Next, you have to go out back and pull the sore tooth out of our angry alligator. And finally, we have a girl up stairs who's never slept with a man, and you gotta go make things right with her."
Laughing, the man exclaims, "Well that sounds like the stupidest test I've ever heard of!" He leaves to get drunk with his friends. 
Later that night, the man comes back to the bartender absolutely hammered drunk.
"Ok bartender! Let's do this test!"
The bartender hands him a gallon of pepper tequilla, and before he could warn him, the man starts chugging it. Teary eyed and near the point of fainting, the man finishes the gallon and slams it on the counter. Stunned, the bartender leads him out back to the alligator. 
A few minutes pass, and after a bunch of screaming and clatter, the man stumbles back in. His shirt is torn up and his body is bleeding profusely. 
He stares at the bartender and says, "Ok bartender, where's the girl with the sore tooth?"
***
The worst stash spot
At the back woods bum-duck county police station the phone rings...

'Hello, is this the Sheriff's Office?'

'Yes. What can I do for you?'

'Ah'm calling to report 'bout my neighbor Mr. Virgil Smith....ya see sir, he's hidin' marijuana inside all his firewood pieces! Don't quite know how he gets it inside dem logs, but he's a-hidin' it there.'

'Thank you very much for the call, sir.'

The next day, the Sheriff's Deputies descend on Virgil's house. They searched the shed where the firewood is kept. Using axes, they bust open every piece of wood, but find no sign of any marijuana. They sneer at Virgil and leave.

Shortly, the phone rings at Virgil's house.

'Hey, Virgil! This here's Floyd....Did the Sheriff come?'

'Yup sure did!'

'Did they chop all-a ya'all firewood?'

'Yup!'

'Happy Birthday, buddy!'
***
Hillary Clinton and her driver were cruising home along a country road
one evening when an ancient cow loomed in front of the car. The driver tried to avoid it , but couldn't. The aged cow was struck and killed. Hillary told her driver to go up to the farmhouse and explain to the owners what had happened and pay them for the cow. She stayed in the car making phone calls.
 
About an hour later the driver staggered back to the car with his clothes in disarray. He was holding a half-empty bottle of expensive wine in one hand, a huge Cuban cigar in the other, and was smiling happily, smeared with lipstick.
 
"What happened to you?," asked Hillary .
 
"Well," the driver replied, "the farmer gave me the cigar, his wife gave me the wine, and their beautiful twin daughters made passionate love to me."
 
"What did you tell them?" asked Hillary.
 
The driver replied, "I just stepped inside the door and said, 'I'm Hillary Clinton's driver and I've just killed the old cow.' The rest happened so fast I couldn't stop it."


***
A teacher was teaching her second grade class about the government
A teacher was teaching her second grade class about the government, so for homework that one day, she told her her students to ask their parents what the government is. When Little Johnny got home that day, he went up to his dad and ask his what the government was. His dad thought for a while and answered, "Look at it this way: I'm the president, your mom is Congress, your maid is the work force, you are the people and your baby brother is the future." "I still don't get it" responded the Little Johnny. "Why don't you sleep on it then? Maybe you'll understand it better," said the dad. "Okay then...good night" said Little Jonny went off to bed.  In the middleof the night, Little Johnny was awakened by his baby brother's crying.  He went to his baby brother's crib and found that his baby brother had taken a crap in his diaper.  So Little Johnny went to his parent's room to get help.  When he got to his parent's bedroom, he looked through the keyhole to check if his parents were asleep.  Through the keyhole he saw his mom loudly snoring, buthis dad wasn't there.  So he went to the maid's room.  When he looked through the maid's room keyhole, he saw his dad having sex with his maid.  Little Johnny was surprised, but then he just realized somethingand thinks aloud,  "OH!! Now I understand the government! The President is screwing the work force, Congress is fast asleep, nobody cares about the people, andthe future is full of shit!"
***
Art Appreciation - Three Black Men (nsfw)
At the National Art Gallery in Dublin, a husband and wife were staring at
a portrait that had them completely confused. The painting depicted 3 black 
men totally naked, sitting on a bench. Two of the figures had black penises, 
but the one in the middle had a pink penis.

The curator of the gallery realized that they were having trouble interpreting 
the painting and offered his personal assessment.  He went on for over half 
an hour explaining how it depicted the sexual emasculation of African
Americans in a predominately white, patriarchal society. 'In fact', he pointed 
out, 'some serious critics believe that the pink penis also reflects the cultural
and sociological oppression experienced by gay men in contemporary society'.

After the curator left, an Irishman approached the couple and said, 'Would 
you like to know what the painting is really about?'
'Now why would you claim to be more of an expert than the curator of the 
gallery', asked the couple?
'Because I am the artist, who painted the picture,' he replied. 'In fact, there are 
no African Americans depicted at all.  They're just three Irish coal miners. 
The guy in the middle went home for lunch.'
***
If I'm being subjective, I'd say that the greatest hero in Sci Fi is Doctor Who. But if I'm being completely objective...
I'd say it's Doctor Whom.

^*Edit: ^As ^a ^few ^have ^astutely ^pointed ^out, ^the ^character's ^name ^is ^just ^"The ^Doctor"; ^I ^should ^have ^said ^"the ^greatest ^sci ^fi ^show ^is ^Doctor ^Who" ^instead ^of ^"greatest ^hero ^in ^sci ^fi". ^Thankfully ^the ^dumb ^joke ^still ^works ^in ^that ^form.
***
FLUCTUATIONS
I was at my bank today; there was a short line.

There was just one lady in front of me, an Asian lady who was trying to exchange yen for dollars. It was obvious that she was a little irritated...

She asked the teller, "Why it change? Yesterday, I get two hunat dolla of yen. Today, I only get hunat eighty. Why it change?"

The teller shrugged his shoulders and said, "Fluctuations..."

The Asian lady says, "Fluc you white people too!"
***
Late Lent/Easter Joke
Eino, a Finn from Cook County in northern Minnesota, was an older, single gentleman who was born and raised a Lutheran. Each Friday night after work, he would fire up his outdoor grill and cook a venison steak.

Now, all of Eino’s neighbors were Catholic…..and since it was Lent, they were forbidden from eating meat on Fridays. The delicious aroma from the grilled venison steaks was causing such a problem for the Catholic faithful that they finally talked to their priest. The priest came to visit Eino, and suggested that Eino convert to Catholicism.
After several classes and much study, Eino attended Mass…..and as the priest sprinkled holy water over Eino, he said, “You were born a Lutheran and raised a Lutheran, but now you are Catholic.”

Eino’s neighbors were greatly relieved, until Friday night arrived, and the wonderful aroma of grilled venison filled the neighborhood.
The priest was called immediately by the neighbors and, as he rushed into Eino’s yard, clutching a rosary and prepared to scold Eino, he stopped in amazement and watched……

There stood Eino, clutching a small bottle of water which he carefully sprinkled over the grilling meat, and chanting: “You were born a deer, and raised a deer, but now you are a trout.
***
Saint Peter is at the gates of Heaven. He's had too much coffee and now needs to use the bathroom.
He sees Jesus walking by and stops him.

"Jesus, thank goodness your here. I have a favor to ask. Can you watch the gate while I use the bathroom?" 

Jesus, ecstatic at the chance to help says, "Of course... But what do I do?"

"Its simple, as people come up you must check their names to see if they are in this book I have. If they are then welcome them in! If not, turn them away." And with that Peter leaves to exorcise his bowels. 

Jesus waits for some time and eventually an elderly man walks up to him. Jesus greets him energetically and asks his name.

The old man looks dismayed. "I was hit on the head when i died... I don't remember it." 

"well sir," says Jesus, "tell me about yourself! Perhaps I can guess it?"

The old man's brow furrows in thought. "all I can remember is I was a carpenter and my son was beloved my millions of people.

Now Jesus begins to choke up at this.

"Dad... Daddy?"

The old man looks hard at Jesus and says 

"Pinnochio!?"
***
Barack Obama and Vladimir Putin were in a meeting
Obama said, "Mr. Putin, the reason that I love my country is that a man can walk right into The White House and say, 'I don't like the way that Barack Obama is running The United States of America.'"

Putin responded, "That's true in Russia, too. Anyone can walk into the Kremlin and say, 'I don't like the way that Barack Obama is running the United States of America.'"
***
My favorite clean joke - the Old Man and the Ferrari
A young investment banker goes out and buys the car of his dreams - a brand new Ferrari GTO. After paying  $500,000, he takes it out for a spin and stops at a red light. While waiting for the light to change, an frail looking old man on a yellow moped pulls up next to him. The old man looks over at the Ferrari and asks, "What kind of car ya' got there, Sonny?" 

The young man replies, "A Ferrari GTO. It cost half a million dollars!" 

"Wheeewee... that's a lot of money," says the old man as he tucks his thumbs up against his suspenders. "Why does it cost so much?" 

"Because this car can do up to 320 miles an hour!" states the banker proudly. 

The moped driver asks, "Mind if I take a look inside?" 

"No problem," replies the proud new owner. So the old man pokes his head in the window and looks around at all the bells and whistles lining the dashboard. Sitting back on his moped, the old man whistles and says, "That's a pretty nice car, all right... but I'll stick with my moped!" 

Just then the light changes, so the banker decides to show the old man just what his car can do. He floors it, and within 30 seconds, the speedometer reads 160 mph! Suddenly, he notices a yellow dot in his rear view mirror. It seems to be getting closer! He slows down to see what it could be, and suddenly... Whoooooosssshhhhh! Something blows by him, going much faster! 

"What in the hell could be going faster than my Ferrari?" the young man asks himself. He floors the accelerator and takes the Ferrari up to 250 mph. Then, up ahead of him, he sees that it's the old man on the moped! Amazed that the moped could pass his Ferrari, he gives it more gas and passes the moped at 275 mph. Whoooooosssshhhhh! 

He's feeling pretty good until he looks in his mirror and sees the old man gaining on him again! Dumbfounded, the banker floors the gas pedal and takes the Ferrari all the way up to 320 mph. Not ten seconds later, he sees the moped bearing down on him again! 

The Ferrari red lines and there's nothing more he can do! Suddenly, the moped plows into the back of his Ferrari, demolishing the rear end. The young man stops and jumps out, and unbelievably, the old man is still alive. He runs up to the mangled old man and says, "Oh my God! Is there anything I can do for you?" The old man whispers with his dying breath... "Unhook... my... suspenders... from... your.... side view mirror."
***
A frog walks into a bank...
...and approaches the teller. He can see from her nameplate that her name is Patricia Whack.

"Miss Whack, I'd like to get a $30000 loan to take a holiday."

Patty looks at the frog in disbelief and asks his name. The frog says his name is Kermit Jagger, his dad is Mick Jagger, and that it's OK, he knows the bank manager. Patty explains that he will need to secure the loan with some collateral.

The frog says, "Sure. I have this," and produces a tiny porcelain elephant, about half an inch tall - bright pink and perfectly formed.

Very confused, Patty explains that she'll have to consult with the bank manager and disappears into a back office. She finds the manager and says, "There's a frog called Kermit Jagger out there who claims to know you and wants to borrow $30000, and he wants to use this as collateral."

She holds up the tiny pink elephant.

"I mean, what in the world is this?"

The bank manager looks back at her and says, "It's a knick-knack, Patty Whack, give the frog a loan. His old man's a Rolling Stone."
***
4 Mexicans In A Rowboat
A U.S. Navy destroyer stops four Mexicans rowing towards Texas. 

The Captain gets on the megaphone and shouts, "Ahoy, small craft. Where are you headed?" 

One of the Mexicans puts down his oar, stands up, and shouts, "Gringo, we are invading the United States of America to reclaim the territory 
taken by the USA during the 1800's." 

The entire crew on the destroyer doubles over in laughter. The Captain finally catches his breath, gets back on the megaphone and asks, 
" Just the four of you?" 

The same Mexican stands up again and shouts, "No senor, we are the last four. The other 21 million are already there." 
***
A man walks into a drug store with his 10-year old son...
They happen to walk by the condom display, and the boy asks, "What are these, Dad?"
To which the man matter-of-factly replies, "Those are called Condoms son. Men use them to have safe sex."

"Oh I see," replied the boy pensively. I've heard of that in health class at school."
He looks over the display and picks up a package of 3 and asks, "Why are there 3 in this package?"

The dad replies, "Those are for high school boys, one for Friday, one for Saturday, and one for Sunday.."

"Cool" says the boy. He notices a 6 pack and asks, "Then who are these for?"

"Those are for college men," the dad answers, two for Friday, two for Saturday, and two for Sunday."

"WOW!" exclaimed the boy, "then who uses these?" he asks, picking up a 12 pack.
With a sigh, the dad replied,

"Those are for married men…
One for January, one for February, one For March......." 
***
There was this small church down in Texas that had a very busty organist.
Her breasts were so huge that they bounced and jiggled while she played the organ. Unfortunately, she distracted the congregation considerably. 

The very proper church ladies were appalled. They said something had to be done about this or they would have to get another organist. 

So, one of the ladies approached her very discreetly and told her to mash up some green persimmons and rub them on the nipples of her breasts and maybe they would shrink in size. They warned her, though, to not eat any of the green persimmons' because they are so sour they will make your mouth pucker up and you won't be able to talk properly for a while'. She agreed to try it. 

The following Sunday morning the minister got up in the pulpit and said...."Dew to thircumsthanthis bewond my contwol, we will not hath a thermon tewday."
***
A heroic biker . . .
Last week, a group of Illinois bikers were riding west on I-74 when they saw a girl about to jump off the Murray Baker Bridge.  So they stopped.

George, their leader, a big burly man of 53, gets off his Harley, walks through a group of gawkers, past the State Trooper, and says, "What are you doing?" 

The would-be jumper responded, "I'm going to commit suicide." 

While George didn't want to appear "sensitive," he didn't want to miss a legend-in-the-making opportunity either so he asked ... "Well, before you jump, why don't you give me a kiss?" 

So, with no hesitation at all, she leaned back over the railing and did just that ... and it was a long, deep, lingering kiss followed immediately by another one. 

After they finished, George gets approval from his biker-buddies, the onlookers, and even the State Trooper, and says, "Wow! That was the best kiss I have ever had!  That's a real talent you're wasting Sugar Shorts.  You could be famous if you rode with me. Why are you committing suicide?"

"My parents don't like me dressing up like a girl." 

It's still unclear whether she jumped or was pushed.
***
The Conductor.
There once was an aspiring young music stundent. His greatest desire in life was to become a worldknown conductor. He spent 8 hours a day in school, practicing most instruments he could find. He already mastered guitar, piano, bass, violin, oboe and flute fairly well. He spent 3 hours a day lsitening to classical music, analyzing it so he could learn to write it himself. At the tender age of 8 he had learned to read notes fluently.  

One day, he saw an ad in the local newspaper: "Conducting classes! For beginners and experts!" it said. The boy was thrilled. Finally, he had found a place where he could learn to conduct. So he went to the community center, to room 213, and was greeted by a rather small group spread out in a room with at least 40 chairs in rows. In the front of the room stood an elderly man, looking like he was passing through his eighties. He smiled a warm smile. The boy carefully made his way through the room. He sat down on a chair in the middle row, which was empty. He counted 13 other people in the room, including the elderly teacher. Most of them were older then he was, the oldest looking almost as old as teacher. "Probably pursuing a choldhood dream", the boy thought. 

Suddenly, the teacher spoke. "Welcome!" He said. "My name is Tony Stryker, and I will be your teacher in the conducting classes." He smiled that warm smile again. "Let's first of all try out your skills! I will be sitting by this piano" he pointed at an old, battered piano in the corner, "and pla, and you will all conduct me, one by one! No worries now, you're all here to learn!" He once again cracked into that lovely smile. "So, how about we start with you, young lady?" 

The lady he had nodded at rose. She was tall, slender, with a hard face. Probably around her thirties. She walked to the front of the room, and stood in front of the piano. The old teacher looked at her. "Whenever you're ready." He said, and smiled. The woman raised her hands, and started moving her right hand in a motion which looked like an anchor: Down, left, right, up. Then she repeated it. She was steady, and looked straight at the man, who played along in her pace. After a while, he stopped. "Good, good!" He said. "Have a seat. Now, how about... Ah, my fellow senior citizen in the back!" He chuckled a little.

The old man rose, and slowly walked to the front of the room, his fedora a little crooked on his broad head. He stood in front of the piano, and raised his hands. They shook, and there was no way of telling if it was of nervousness, or some sort of disease. Maybe both. He then started doing the same motion as the woman had done, only not so steady in pace and a little slower. The teacher played along acordingly. He then said "Great job, really! Thank you." The man did a little bow, then went back to his place. 

The teacher looked over the classroom. His eyes landed on the young boy. "How about you, lad?" He said, and smiled. THe boy stumbled a little as he rose, nervous and excited. He made his way to the front of the room, in front of the piano, and started moving his hands. It felt good. He knew what he was doing. He had watched so many concerts, he had memorized every move. He started speeding up the tempo. Faster and faster. Suddenly, the teacher started to look worried, but the boy paid no mind. He was having so much fun. The tempo roose and rose, until suddenly... Silence.

The teacher was bent over the piano. Someone yelled "Call 911!", others rushed to his side. But it was to late. The old man had had a heart attack. THe paramedics said it was fatal, but necessereily caused by something in his environment. Despite that, the boy was devastated. He couldn't help but feel it was somehow his fault. His parents felt so bad for him, they decided to move from the town, to escape all the bad memories. And so, they fled to New York. 

They got a small apartment, where they quickly settled in. The boy still was devastated, however. But yet, he still held on to his dream. He was to become a conductor. For years he practised, tried to perfect his pace and his discipline. Eventually, on his 20th birthday, his parents got him the greatest present of all: The chance to conduct the local high schools rendition of "The Phantom of the Opera". He was overjoyed. The very next day, he went to the school, to meet with the orchestra and the cast. 

He talked to them, told them his dreams, and befriended them. Then, it was time for rehersal. Granted, the orchestra didn't play so well, and the cast was just high school students after all, but it was all he wanted. They practised hard, and our concuvtor was very pleased with the result. Soon, it was time for the very first show. All the students parents were also, as well as the staff, and some who just wanted to see a cheap musical. The cast was nervous, but seemed to manage it: The orchetra was worse. All the musicians in the orchestra were having minor panic-attacks, and a few were crying. Our conductor gathered them all backstage, and held a pep talk. After it, all the participants felt inspired, and was calm again. Our conductor was pleased, and so the show began.

But something must have happened, because the moment the first song started, the audience flinched. It sounded awful. It was off-beat, different keys, and the wrong songs. The cast messed up their lines, and the tuba player fainted. A few of the parent walked out at that very moment. Our conductor was devastated: He knew it was his fault. He was nothing more than a bad conductor. He ran out of the school, and took the first train, going anywhere. 

He rode it to the end station before he realized where he was: Austin, Texas. He looked aroud, and wondered what he should do. He a little money, so he found a cheap hotel, and immedieatly started looking for a job. 

He was amazed when the first thing he found in the newspaper read "Assistant needed at Austin Concert Hall! Prior musical studies a must!". He thought about it, and then stood up. It was his dream. So he marched down to the Austin Concert Hall, and did an interview with the director. A few days later, he recieved a phone call in his hotelroom: He was hired. 

He worked there for a couple a months, cleaning, tuning instruments, taking care of some legal forms, when all of a sudden the conductor of the orchestra approched him. " heard you wanted to become a conductor." He said. "How would you like to try to conduct our orchestra, just for fun?" Our conductor was stunned. He didn't know what to say. Of course he did, but who knew what could happen? He said to himself that nothing bad could happen, and told the chief conductor that he would love to try. But still, he walked with heavy steps towards the hall.

Inside, the whole orchestra was assembled on stage. Flutes, Violins, Cellos, Harps, Oboes and percussions, all in one place. It was beautifull. Put conductor stepped up to the stage, and onto the conductors podium... And gripped the Conductors baton. "Okay, guys..." He said, shakingly, "Let's... Let's play Mozart's 5th." He starte moving the baton, and it was glorious. usic was all around him, and he lost himself in it. However, as he lost himself, he also lost grip of the baton. It flew out of his hand, and straight into the mouth of one of the violin players. 

She died immediately. Our conductor was charged with manslaughter, and taken to prison. He was sentanced to death, by the electric chair. They gave him his last meal, a last prayer, and put him in the chair. They strapped him up, put water on his forehead, and put on the headpiece. And then, they pulled the switch.

Nothing happened. The staff checked all the wires, all circuits, and tried again. Still nothing. They called in an electrician, who looked at the chair, and stated that nothing was wrong, that it should work properly. Once again, they tried. Nothing. Not so much as a twitch. After a few hours, the director of the prison walked up to the sentanced man and asked "Why won't you die? What is wrong you?!". Our protagonist looked at the director, and said in a tired voice "I suppose I'm just a poor conductor." 
***
On long plane trip, a woman is sitting next to a lawyer. She wants to sleep, but the lawyer does not stop talking...
*"Let's play a game"* - he suggests.


The woman ignores him.


*"To make it interesting"* - he continues - *"if I answer incorrectly to your question, I'll pay you $50. If you answer incorrectly to my question, you pay me $5."*


The woman agrees, and the lawyer asks the first question.


*"What is the distance between Earth and the Moon?"*


The woman hands him $5. Now it's her turn.


*"What goes up a hill with three legs and comes down with four?"*


The lawyer is astonished. He frantically surfs the Internet, searches his pocket encyclopedia and asks his scientist friends. He finds nothing. Hours later, when finally giving up looking for the answer, he wakes the woman, hands her $50 and asks:


*"So, what is the answer?"*


Without saying a word, she hands him $5 and goes back to sleep.




**Edit:** spacing.

**Edit2:** This is not original content, I never mentioned it was, I'm not doing it for karma (submissions on /r/jokes give no karma). I found this joke in a Portuguese jokes website and I felt like I needed to share it with Reddit. Throughout my translation from Portuguese to English I mistakenly applied the term "fellow" to the lawyer's friend, for which I thought the word "fellow" meant something like "buddy" and not "colleague". I'm sorry for this mistake, but English is not my native language and Google translator is not that great when it comes to sentences. Once again, my bad.
***
My dad CLAIMS to have invented this joke. I think it's too good and don't want to give him credit, but I can't find it online.
This story takes place in 1860. Back 150+ years ago, presidental candidates didn't have nearly the luxuries current candidates do. The didn't stay in five star hotels or travel by private jet - they stayed with normal families on their campaigns and in exchange for a place to stay, would do chores around the property before they headed to a new city. 

In 1860 Abraham Lincoln actually stayed with my great great great grandma. She was a pretty bossy lady and gave Lincoln a long list of chores to do as soon as she met him. Finally when he thought he was done, my grandma said "Last chores Abraham. For dinner we're having stew, corn on the cob, and apple pie. I'll work on the stew, but you're going to be on the front porch shucking corn and peeling apples until there's nothing left in front of you." And with that, she led him outside where there were two huge baskets filled to the brim with apples and corn. 

Abraham started peeling and shucking. Periodically my grandma would check on him to see how much he had left to get an idea of when they'd eat. Little known fact about Abraham Lincoln, but he is very bad at shucking corn and peeling apples. 

After checking on him for what felt like the tenth time, my grandma was real frustrated. She said "Abraham, how the hell can you be expected to lead a country if you can't even help with dinner!?" 

And Abraham Lincoln replied, "relax Mrs. Lee, I have four cores and seven ears to go."



My dad CLAIMS he invented this. He has lots of others like it with similar punchlines where he rewords common sayings - 'brass is always cleaner on the other slide,' etc. 


Edit: I'll post another of his originals. It'll take a bit to type up, but it'll be posted soon!
***
Into a Belfast pub comes Paddy Murphy, looking like he'd just been run over by a train. His arm is in a sling, his nose is broken, his face is cut and bruised and he's walking with a limp
"What happened to you?" asks Sean, the bartender.  

" Jamie O'Conner and me had a fight," says Paddy.  

"That little shite, O'Conner," says Sean,  

"He couldn't do that to you, he must have had something in his hand."  

"That he did," says Paddy, "a shovel is what he had, and a terrible lickin' he gave me with it."  

" Well," says Sean, "you should have defended yourself, didn't you have something in your hand?"  

That I did," said Paddy.  "Mrs. O'Conner's breast, and a thing of  
Beauty it was, but useless in a fight"
***
A guy jogging on the beach sees a girls with no arms or legs.
Her torso is just propped up on some sand. As he draws nearer he sees that she's crying. He doesn't want to intrude, but he figures she might need some help.

"Excuse me, miss. Why are you crying?" he asks.
She responds "I'm just so sad! I've never been kissed before and I don't guess I ever will!"

The guy feels uncomfortable but decides "what the hell" and kisses her full on the mouth, big sloppy kiss.
"Thank you, I feel so much better now!," the girl says as the guy continues his run on down the beach.

The next day on his morning run the guy sees the same girl, still armless, still legless, sitting on the beach crying her eyes out. 

The guy is a little peeved to see the girl repeating her routine from the day before so he runs up to her again to confront her.

"Why are you crying now? I kissed you yesterday and you felt better!"
"I know," she replied, "but I've just gotten really upset thinking about how I've never been fingered before!"

The guy feels really strange about fingering a girl on the beach, especially one with no arms or legs, but he decided there'd be no harm. After a good fingering session, he takes off down the beach on his run again, followed by the heartfelt "thank you's!" from the girl on the beach.

The next day while out running again, the guy sees the same girl lying on the beach, crying, crying, crying.
"What is it now, for chrissakes? I kissed you, I fingered you! What more do you want?!," the guy asks.
"I was just upset," the girl said, "because I've never been fucked."
The guy leans in, picks her up, and throws her into the ocean.
"You're fucked now, aren't you?"

edit: To everyone that says this joke's been posted a ton of times, and done better I apologize! This was the way I heard it years ago and I haven't seen it on here before! 
***
The Pope & his crossword puzzle
A man is preparing to board a train when he hears that the Pope is also going to be using that mode of transportation because he apparently wanted to try something different.

"This is exciting," the man thinks. "I've always been a big fan of the Pope. Perhaps I'll be able to see him in person."

Imagine his surprise when the Pope sits down in the seat next to him. But the gentleman was too shy to speak to the Pontiff.

Shortly after taking his seat, the Pope began a crossword puzzle. 

"This is fantastic," the man thinks. "I'm really good at crosswords. Perhaps, if the Pope gets stuck, he'll ask me for assistance."

Almost immediately, the Pope turns to the gentleman and says, "Excuse me, but do you know a four letter word referring to a woman that ends in 'u-n-t'?"

Only one word leaps to mind. The man feels uncomfortable. "My goodness," he thinks, "I can't tell the Pope that. There must be another word." He thinks for a while, then it hits him and he says, "I think the word you're looking for is 'aunt'."

"Of course," replies the Pope. "Do you have an eraser?"

EDIT: YAY, number one in /r/Jokes - thanks everybody, glad many of you liked it, I'll just attribute the downvotes to reddit's vote fuzzying, mkay?
***
A guy walks into a bar
A guy walks into a bar and takes a seat next to another guy.

The first guy says, "That's a familiar accent you got there, where ya from?"

The other guy says "I'm Irish".

First guy says "I'm Irish too! Where did you live in Ireland?"

The second guy says "Dublin". 

First guy:"Me too! When did you graduate?"

SG:"1978. What about you?"

FG:"I graduated in '78 too. Where'd you go to school?"

SG:"Saint Mary's. and you?"

FG"I went to Saint Mary's too!"

About that time, a new person walks into the bar. says to the bartender, "What's goin on?" 

The bartender says, "oh nothing much, the O'Reilly brothers are drunk again."
***
Three ladies all have separate boyfriends named Leroy...
One evening, while sharing a few drinks at the bar, one of the ladies suggests, "Let's name our Leroys after a soda pop, because I'm tired of getting my Leroy mixed up with your Leroy, and her Leroy mixed up with your Leroy."

The other two ladies agree.

The first lady speaks out, "Okay then, I'm gonna name my Leroy 7-Up because he has 7 inches and it's always up!"

The three ladies hoot and holler, and slap each other high fives.

Then, the second lady says, "I'm gonna name my Leroy Mountain Dew because he can mount and do me any day of the week."

Again, the three ladies hoot and holler, and slap each other more high fives.

The third lady then says, "You know, those two Leroys were good, but I'm gonna name my Leroy, Jack Daniels."

The other two ladies shout in unison, "Jack Daniels? That's not a soda pop... that's a hard liquor!"

The third lady bursts out, "That's my Leroy!"
***
Poor Boudreaux . . .
Boudreaux was feeling guilty, so he went to confession.

"Father, I kinda took a little lumber from that new construction site."

Priest: "What did you do with the lumber, my son?

Boudreaux: "Well, Father, my porch, she's had a hole for a long time. I'm afraid that someone will break their leg, so I fix the hole."

Priest: "Well, that's not so bad."

Boudreaux: "Well, Father, I had a little lumber left."

Priest: "What did you do with it?

Boudreaux: "Well, my poor dog Phideaux, he ain't never had no place to get outta the weather, so I make him his own little doghouse."

Priest: "OK, anything else?"

Boudreaux: "Well, Father, I had a little lumber left. So you know, my truck, she ain't never had no place to get outta de weather either, so I make her a two-car garage."

Priest: "Now, this is getting a little out of hand."

Boudreaux: "Well, Father, I still had a little lumber left."

Priest: "Yes?"

Boudreaux: "Well, my wife, she always want a bigger house. So I add two bedrooms and a new bathroom."

Priest: "OK! That's definitely too much. For your penance, you are going to have to make a Novena. You do know how to make a Novena, don't you?"

Boudreaux: "No, Father ... but if you got the plans, I got the lumber."
***
Choose Your Death
A Frenchman, an Englishman and an Irishman are exploring the jungle and are captured by a fierce tribe.

The chief tells them, "The bad news is that we've caught you, we're going to kill you, and then use your skins to build a canoe. The good news is that you get to choose how you die."

The Frenchman says, "I take ze poison." The chief gives him some poison; the Frenchman says, "Vive la France!" and drinks it down.

The Englishman says, "A pistol for me, please." The chief gives him a pistol; the Brit points it at his head, says, "God save the Queen!" and blows his brains out.

The Irishman says, "Gimme a fork." The chief is puzzled, but he shrugs and gives him a fork. The Irishman takes the fork and jabs himself all over -- the stomach, the sides, the chest, everywhere. Blood gushes from every hole.

The chief screams, "What are you doing?"

He looks at the chief and says, "Fuck your canoe, asshole!"
***
An Easter Joke (a bit late)
So after Christ rose from the dead he was on a stroll with some of his disciples. One of them said, "Say Jesus, do you mind showing us how you walked on water?"

Jesus said, "Well, these were miracles, not exactly parlor tricks. But you know what, I don't mind." 

^^^^Another ^^^^disciple ^^^^asked, ^^^^"What's ^^^^a ^^^^parlor?" 

So, Jesus and the disciples go down to a nearby river. Jesus takes a few steps out but halfway through starts to sink and immediately falls in the water. 

Jesus reemerges, laughs it off and decides to try a different part of the water, but unfortunately he falls in again after a few steps. 

Jesus emerges and tries once more in a different part of the river but as expected, he falls right in. After coming back on land, the disciples are stunned. They can't believe their prophet has failed at a miracle. 

One of the disciples says, "Jesus, why weren't you able to stand on water as you did before."

Jesus replies, "Well, it was a lot easier before I got these holes in my feet."
***
An American, a Briton, and a North Korean look at a picture of Adam and Eve
An American, a Briton, and a North Korean look at a picture of Adam and Eve in the garden of Eden and try to figure out what nationality they are. 

The American says, "Look at how free and independent they are, they must be Americans."

The Briton says, "What are you talking about, look at how calm and reserved they are, the are obviously British."

The North Korean says, "You two are both missing the point. They have no clothes, no shelter, they only have and apple to eat between them and yet they are being told that they live in paradise. They're clearly North Korean."
***
The Rabbi and the taxman
At the end of the tax year, the IRS sent an inspector to audit the books of a Synagogue. While he was checking the books he turned to the Rabbi and said, 'I notice you have a lot of candles. But according to these records you don't buy them often. How come?

'Good question,' noted the Rabbi. 'We save the candle drippings up and send them back to the candle makers, and every now and then they send us a free box of candles.'

'Oh,' replied the auditor, somewhat disappointed that his unusual question had a practical answer. But on he went:

'What about the matzah purchases? What do you do with the crumbs?'

'Ah, yes,' replied the Rabbi, realising that the inspector was trying to trap him with an unanswerable question. 'We collect them and send them back to the manufacturers, and every now and then they send us a free box of matzahs.'

'I see,' replied the auditor, thinking hard about how he could fluster the know-it-all Rabbi. 'Well, Rabbi,' he went on, 'what do you do with all the leftover foreskins from the circumcisions you perform?'

'Here, too, we do not waste,' answered the Rabbi...

'What we do is save all the foreskins and send them to the IRS Office, and about once a year they send us a complete dick
***
Close Call
A Newfoundland farmer named Angus had a car accident. He was hit by a truck owned  by the Eversweet Company.

In court, the Eversweet Company's hot-shot solicitor was questioning Angus.

"Didn't you say to the RCMP at the scene of the accident, 'I'm fine?'" asked the solicitor.

Angus responded:  "Well, I'll tell you what happened. I had just loaded my favourite cow, Bessie, into the-"
 
"I didn't ask for any details," the solicitor interrupted. "Just answer the question. Did you not say, at the scene of the accident, 'I'm fine!'?"

Angus continued, "Well, I had just got Bessie into the trailer and I was driving down the road..."

The solicitor interrupted again and appealed to the judge. "Your Honour, I am trying to establish the fact  that, at the scene of the accident, this man told the police on the scene that he was fine. Now   several weeks after the accident, he is trying   to sue my client. I believe he is a fraud. Please tell him to simply answer the question."

By this time, the Judge was fairly interested in Angus' answer and said to the solicitor: "I'd like to hear what he has to say about his favourite cow, Bessie."

Angus thanked the Judge and proceeded.

"Well as I was saying, I had just  loaded Bessie, my favorite cow, into the trailer and was driving her down the road when this huge  Eversweet truck and trailer came through a stop sign and hit my trailer right in the side. I was thrown into one ditch and Bessie was thrown into the  other. 

"I was hurt, very bad like, and didn't want to move, however, I could hear old Bessie moaning and groaning. I knew she was in terrible pain just by her groans. Shortly after the accident, a policeman on a motorbike turned up. He could hear Bessie  moaning and groaning so he went over to her. After he looked at her and saw her condition, he took out his gun and shot her right between the eyes. Then the policeman came across the road, smoking gun still in hand, looked at me, and said, 'How are you feeling?'

"Now what the F*#k would you say?"
***
A Jewish businessman in America decided to send his son to Israel...
 ...to absorb some of the culture of the homeland. When the son returned, the father asked him to tell him about his trip.

 The son said, "Pop, I had a great time in Israel. By the way, I converted to Christianity." "Oy vey," said the father. "What have I done?" 

He decided to go ask his friend Jacob what to do. Jacob said, "Funny you should ask. I too sent my son to Israel, and he also came back a Christian. Perhaps we should go see the rabbi and ask him what we should do."

 So they went to see the Rabbi. The Rabbi said, "Funny you should ask.I too sent my son to Israel. He also came back a Christian. What is happening to our young people? Perhaps we should go talk to God and ask him what to do." 

The three of them prayed and explained what had happened to their sons and asked God what to do. Suddenly a voice came loud and clear from Heaven. The Voice said, "funny you should ask, I too sent my son to Isreal..."
***
Pierre the fighter pilot
Pierre, a French fighter pilot, takes his girlfriend, Marie, out for a pleasant little picnic by the river Seine. It is a beautiful day and love is in the air, so Marie leans over to Pierre and says: "Pierre, kiss me".

So our hero grabs a bottle of red wine and splashes it on Marie's lips.

"What are you doing, Pierre?" shrieks Marie.

"Well, my name is Pierre, the French fighter pilot, and when I have red meat I like to have red wine!"

His answer is good enough for Marie and things begin to heat up. So she says: "Pierre,
kiss me lower."

Our hero rips off her blouse, grabs a bottle of white wine and starts pouring it all over her bosom.

"Pierre, what are you doing" she says.

"My name is Pierre, the French fighter pilot, and when I have white meat I like to have white wine!"

They resume their passionate interlude and things really steam up. Marie leans over once more and softly whispers into Pierre's ear..."Pierre, kiss me lower."

Pierre tears off her underwear, grabs a bottle of Cognac and sprinkles it all over her private region. He then grabs a match and lights it on fire.

Patting the flames out furiously, Marie screams, "PIERRE, WHAT ARE YOU DOING!!!?"

"My name is Pierre, the French fighter pilot, and when I go down, I go down in flames!!!"
***
A New Yorker is visiting Texas for the first time on a business trip
The New Yorker walks into the hotel bar and asks the bartender "is everything actually bigger in Texas?" 

The bartender chuckles "Partner, *everything* is bigger here. Order a Texas sized beer and a Texas sized steak and you can see for yerself." 

Being adventurous, the man agrees. The steak and the beer come and they're enormous. The Texas sized steak was the biggest steak he'd ever laid eyes on, he couldn't even finish half of it. The Texas sized beer had him completely plastered. He was so drunk he could barely sit on the barstool. 

Eventually after all that liquid from the Texas sized beer he asks the bartender where the bathroom is. 

"Sure thing city slicker, go down that hall and make your first left." The bartender instructs him. But being completely hammered the New Yorker takes his second left and falls into the hotel swimming pool.

The drunken New Yorker thrashes around in the water and comes up to the surface and screams at the top of his lungs "*OH GOD DON'T FLUSH!*"
***
Two beggars were sitting side by side on a street in Rome.
One had a Cross in front of him; the other one was holding a Star of David. Many people went by, looked at both beggars, but put money only into the hat of the beggar sitting behind the Cross.

One day, a procession came past, and it included His Holiness The Pope. He stopped to watch the throngs of people giving money to the beggar who held the Cross, while none gave to the beggar holding the Star of David.

After a few minutes, the Pope approached the beggar with the Star of David and said, "My poor fellow, don't you understand? This is a Catholic country.” "This city is the Seat of Catholicism. People aren't going to give you money if you sit there with a Star of David in front of you, especially when you're sitting beside a beggar who is holding a Cross. In fact, they would probably give more money to him just out of spite."

The beggar with the Star of David listened to the Pope, smiled, and turned to the beggar with the Cross and said, "Bernie, look who's trying to teach the Schwartz brothers about marketing!"
***
Theological debate
One day, the Pope decided he'd ban all Jews from the Vatican. The Jews understandibly got really angry about this, so the Pope proclaimed that if a Jew could manage to beat him in a theological debate, they could stay.

The Jews chose their wisest rabbi for the religious debate against the Pope. To make it more interesting, the rabbi proposed to make speaking forbidden for the duration of the debate. The Pope accepted. On the big day, the Pope and the rabbi sat down at a table and the followers of both religions gathered around them.

First, the Pope raised three fingers. Then the rabbi raised one finger.

Next, the Pope drew a circle in the air while the rabbi pointed to the ground.

Then, the Pope took out the bread and the wine. The rabbi answered by taking out an apple.

The Pope, amazed, stood up from the table.

'I give up' he said. 'You're too wise for me, rabbi. You and your fellow Jews can stay.'

Later, the cardinals asked the Pope what he talked about with the rabbi.

'First, I raised three fingers to remind him of the Holy Trinity. But he raised one finger to remind me there's only one God in both our religions. After that, I drew a circle in the air to show him God was everywhere around us. But he pointed to the ground to show that God is right here with us. Then I took out the sacramental bread and wine to show him God absolves us from our sins. However, he took out an apple to remind me of the original sin. He had an answer to everything, what could I possibly do?!'

At the same time, the Jews asked the same question from the rabbi.

'First, the Pope showed me we had three days to leave the city. But I made him understand that not even ONE Jew would leave. After that, he showed me around to say he'd cleanse the whole city from Jews. But I pointed to the ground, showing him that we'd stay right here.'

'And then?' asked the Jews.

The rabbi shrugged.

'I don't know. He took out his lunch, and so did I.'
***
American Soldier
An American soldier, serving in World War II, had just returned from several weeks of intense action on the German front lines. He had finally been granted R&R and was on a train bound for London. The train was very crowded, so the soldier walked the length of the train, looking for an empty seat. 

The only unoccupied seat was directly adjacent to a well dressed middle aged lady and was being used by her little dog. The war weary soldier asked, "Please, ma'am, may I sit in that seat?" 

The English woman looked down her nose at the soldier, sniffed and said, "You Americans. You are such a rude class of people. Can't you see my Little Fifi is using that seat?" 

The soldier walked away, determined to find a place to rest, but after another trip down to the end of the train, found himself again facing the woman with the dog. 

Again he asked, "Please, lady. May I sit there? I'm very tired." 

The English woman wrinkled her nose and snorted, "You Americans! Not only are you rude, you are also arrogant. Imagine!" 

The soldier didn't say anything else; he leaned over, picked up the little dog, tossed it out the window of the train and sat down in the empty seat. 

The woman shrieked and railed, and demanded that someone defend her and chastise the soldier.

An English gentleman sitting across the aisle spoke up, "You know, sir, you Americans do seem to have a penchant for doing the wrong thing. You eat holding the fork in the wrong hand. You drive your autos on the wrong side of the road. 

"And now, Sir, you've thrown the wrong bitch out the window."
***
There once was a Native American who had only one testicle...
There once was a Native American who had only one testicle and whose given name was 'Onestone'. 

He hated that name and asked everyone not to call him Onestone.

After years and years of torment, Onestone finally cracked and said,' If anyone calls me Onestone again I will kill them!' 

The word got around and nobody called him that any more.

Then one day a young woman named Blue Bird forgot and said, 'Good morning, Onestone.'

He jumped up, grabbed her and took her deep into the forest where he made love to her all day and all night. 

He made love to her all the next day, until Blue Bird died from exhaustion. 

The word got around that Onestone meant what he promised he would do.

Years went by and no one dared call him by his given name until a woman named Yellow Bird returned to the village after being away. 

Yellow Bird, who was Blue Bird's cousin, was overjoyed when she saw Onestone.

She hugged him and said, 'Good to see you, Onestone.'

Onestone grabbed her, took her deep into the forest, then he made love to her all day, made love to her all night, made love to her all the next day, made love to her all the next night, but Yellow Bird wouldn't die!

Why???

Everyone knows... You can't kill Two Birds with OneStone!!!
***
A Marine boarded a train on his way home from deployment...
The train was quite crowded, and the Marine walked the entire length looking for a seat. There seemed to be one next to a well-dressed middle-aged French woman, but when he got there he saw it was taken by the woman's poodle. The war-weary Marine asked, "Ma'am, may I have that seat?"
 The French woman sniffed and said to no one in particular, "Americans are so rude.. My little Fifi is using that seat.."
 The Marine walked the entire train again, but the only seat available was under that dog. "Please, Ma'am. May I sit down? I'm very tired." She snorted, "Not only are you Americans rude, you are also arrogant!" This time the Marine didn't say a word; he just picked up the little dog, tossed it out the train window and sat down.

The woman shrieked, "Someone must defend my honor! Put this American in his place!" An English gentleman sitting nearby spoke up.
 "Sir, you Americans seem to have a penchant for doing the wrong thing. You hold the fork in the wrong hand. You drive your autos on the wrong side of the road. And now, sir, you seem to have thrown the wrong bitch out the window."

***
A man walks into a bar and makes a bet with a bartender.
"I'll show you a trick, and if you think the trick is good enough, you give me a drink on the house." The bartender, having had a pretty boring day, accepts.

The man takes a rat out of his pocket and an equally tiny piano out of his other pocket. He sets the piano on the bar, and the rat jumps up and begins to play "The Entertainer".

The bartender is amazed and happily gives the man a free drink. After finishing, the man makes another bet: "If I show you an even better trick, will you put my entire tab for the night on the house as well?"

The bartender accepts again, thinking that there was no way that the man could produce a better trick. He proceeds to pull a bullfrog out of his pants pocket and sets it down next to the rat. The rat begins to play a different song, and the bullfrog starts to sing along in a crystal clear voice. The bartender is once again amazed, and agrees to pay for the man's drinks for the rest of the night.

An hour later, the man is enjoying his free drinks when a stranger comes up to the man and offers to buy the bullfrog for $100,000. "Sorry, he's not for sale," replies the man. The stranger offers to pay $500,000, and the man reluctantly sells the bullfrog and takes the money. The stranger leaves with glee, and the bartender is furious.

"That frog could've been worth millions of dollars to you, maybe even billions, but you sold it off for a mere five hundred thousand dollars!"

The man smiles and takes a sip of his drink.

"Don't worry, the frog doesn't mean that much to me. You see, the rat's a ventriloquist."
***
Funny Albert Einstein Joke (not mine)
An old, funny joke - I think I saw it on reddit a while ago, but haven't seen it in a while - so here it is:

When Albert Einstein was making the rounds of the speaker's circuit, he usually found himself eagerly longing to get back to his laboratory work. One night as they were driving to yet another rubber-chicken dinner, Einstein mentioned to his chauffeur (a man who somewhat resembled Einstein in looks & manner) that he was tired of speechmaking. 

"I have an idea, boss," his chauffeur said. "I've heard you give this speech so many times. I'll bet I could give it for you." Einstein laughed loudly and said, "Why not? Let's do it!" 

When they arrived at the dinner, Einstein donned the chauffeur's cap and jacket and sat in the back of the room. The chauffeur gave a beautiful rendition of Einstein's speech and even answered a few questions expertly. 

Then a supremely pompous professor asked an extremely esoteric question about anti-matter formation, digressing here and there to let everyone in the audience know that he was nobody's fool. Without missing a beat, the chauffeur fixed the professor with a steely stare and said, "Sir, the answer to that question is so simple that I will let my chauffeur, who is sitting in the back, answer it for me."
***
Two Italian Men Get On A Bus....
They sit down and engage in an animated conversation. The lady sitting behind them ignores them at first, but her attention is galvanized when she hears one of the men say the following:
"Emma come first. Den I come. Den two asses come together. I come once-a-more. Two asses, they come together again. I come again and pee twice. Then I come one lasta time."
"You foul-mouthed swine," retorted the lady indignantly. "In this country we don't talk about our sex lives in public!"
"Hey, coola down lady," said the man. "Who talkin' abouta sexa? I'm a justa tellin' my frienda how to spella 'Mississippi'."
***
The other night I was invited out for a night with the 'girls.'
I told my husband that I would be home by midnight, 'I promise!'

Well, the hours passed and the margaritas went down way too easily. Around 3 a.m., a bit loaded, I headed for home. Just as I got in the door, the cuckoo clock in the hallway started up and cuckooed 3 times. Quickly, realizing my husband would probably wake up, I cuckooed another 9 times.

I was really proud of myself for coming up with such a quick-witted solution, in order to escape a possible conflict with him. (Even when totally smashed... 3 cuckoos plus 9 cuckoos totals = 12 cuckoos MIDNIGHT!)

The next morning my husband asked me what time I got in, I told him 'MIDNIGHT'... he didn't seem pissed in the least.......... Whew, I got away with that one!

Then he said 'We need a new cuckoo clock.' When I asked him why, he said, 'Well, last night our clock cuckooed three times then said 'oh shit.' Cuckooed 4 more times, cleared its throat, cuckooed another three times, giggled, cuckooed twice more, and then tripped over the coffee table and farted.
***
Nobel award winning physicist and his limo driver
A Nobel award winning physicist, who was afraid of flying, was on speaking tour of the nation's top colleges. He travelled by limousine to each destination to give his speech.
After two dozen engagements, the physicist and the limousine driver were having dinner before the next speech. The limousine driver commented that he'd heard the speech enough times, and that even though he didn't understand it, he felt as if he could deliver it word-for-word. So the physicist agreed to trade places and let him give the speech, and the physicist would sit in the back and wear the limousine driver's uniform.
After giving the speech flawlessly, the limousine driver opened the floor for questions from the students (typically there were none). However, at this particular University there was a rather egotistical student who thought he was smart enough to compete mentally with the Nobel physicist. The question took 5 minutes to get out and would require a rather lengthy explanation and some complex calculus to answer.
Without batting an eye, the limousine driver responded to the young student by saying, "The answer to that question is so easy, I'll let my limousine driver, seated in the back, respond."
***
Little Johnny
So Little Johnny's teacher is warned at the beginning of the school year not to ever make a bet with Johnny unless she is absolutely sure she will win it. 

One day in class, Johnny raises his hand and says "teacher, I'll bet you $50 I can guess what color your underwear is." 

She replies, "okay, meet me after class and we'll settle it." 

But before class ends, she goes to the restroom and removes her panties. After class is over and the students clear out, Johnny makes his guess. "Blue." 

"Nope. You got it wrong," she says as she lifts her skirt to reveal she isn't wearing any underwear. 

"Well come with me out to my dads car, he's waiting for me, and I'll get you the money." She follows him out. When they get to the car she informs his dad that he got the bet wrong and that she showed Johnny that she wasn't wearing any underwear. 

His dad exclaims: "That mother fucker! He bet me $100 this morning that he'd see your pussy before the end of the day!"
***
A man who'd just died is delivered to a local mortuary...
... and he's wearing an expensive, expertly tailored black suit.


The mortician asks the deceased's wife how she would like the body dressed, pointing out that the man does look good in the black suit he is already wearing.


The widow, however, says that she always thought her husband looked his best in blue, and that she wants him in a blue suit. She gives the mortician a blank check and says, 'I don't care what it costs, but please have my husband in a blue suit for the viewing.'


The woman returns the next day and to her delight, she finds her husband dressed in a gorgeous blue suit with a subtle chalk stripe; the suit fits him perfectly.


She says to the mortician, 'Whatever this cost, I'm very satisfied.. You did an excellent job and I'm very grateful. How much did you spend?'


To her astonishment, the mortician presents her with the blank check, 'There's no charge.'


'No, really, I must compensate you for the cost of that exquisite blue suit,' she says.


'Honestly, ma'am,' the mortician says, 'it cost nothing. You see, a deceased gentleman of about your husband's size was brought in shortly after you left yesterday, and he was wearing an attractive blue suit. I asked his wife if she minded him going to his grave wearing a black suit instead, and she said it made no difference as long as he looked nice.'


'So I just switched the heads.'
***
Zolota Rybka: Golden Fish Ukrainian Joke
One day a Ukrainian and a Russian are out fishing, when the Russian got a tug on his line. He struggled to bring it ashore and saw it was the Golden Fish. The fish told him "I will give each of you two wishes if you throw me back." The Two fellows agreed. The Russian went first, "I wish that only **real** Russians were in Russia. Men with Slovic blood and vodka flowing through their veins. My second wish is that you build a huge cement wall all the way around our beautiful land so no foreigners can set foot on our holy soil." The Golden fish made it so. He then turned to the Ukrainian. The Ukrainian looked at him innocently but confidently said, "Mr. Fish we Ukrainians are simple folk. For this reason I only need one wish, but tell me, in Russia there are only Russians, right?" The Golden fish nodded. "And there is a huge wall surrounding all their land?" Again, nodding in affirmation. "Alright, just fill it full of water then."  
***
A burglar broke into a house one night.
He shined his flashlight around, looking for valuables when a voice in the dark said, “Jesus is watching you.”

He nearly jumped out of his skin, clicked his flashlight off, and froze.
When he heard nothing more, after a bit, he shook his head and continued.
Just as he pulled the stereo out so he could disconnect the wires, clear as a bell he heard: “Jesus is watching you.”

Freaked out, he shined his light around frantically, looking for the source of the voice.
Finally, in the corner of the room, his flashlight beam came to rest on a parrot. “Did you say that?” he hissed at the parrot.
“Yep,” the parrot confessed, then squawked, “I’m just trying to warn you that he is watching you.”

The burglar relaxed. “Warn me, huh? Who in the world are you?”
“Moses,” replied the bird.
“Moses?” the burglar laughed. “What kind of people would name a bird ‘Moses?’”

“The same kind of people who would name a Rottweiler ‘Jesus.’
***
No matter what this husband did in bed, his wife never achieved an orgasm.
 Since by Jewish law a wife is entitled to sexual pleasure, they decide to  consult their Rabbi.  

The Rabbi listens to their story, strokes his beard, and makes the following suggestion: 'Hire a strapping young man. While the two of you are  making love, have the young man wave a towel over you. That will help your  wife fantasize and should bring on an orgasm.'  

They go home and follow the Rabbi's advice. They hire a handsome young man  and he waves a towel over them as they make love. It does not help and the  wife is still unsatisfied. Perplexed, they go back to the Rabbi.  

"Okay,' he says to the husband, "Try it reversed. Have the young man make love to your wife and you wave the towel over them."  

Once again, they follow the Rabbi's advice. They go home and hire the same  strapping young man.  

The young man gets into bed with the wife and the husband waves the towel. The young man gets to work with great enthusiasm and soon she has an  enormous, room-shaking, ear-splitting screaming orgasm.  

The husband smiles, looks at the young man and says to him triumphantly, "See that, you schmuck? THAT'S how you wave a towel."
***
Farm kid writes letter home after joining Marines....
Dear Ma and Pa:

I am well. Hope you are. Tell Brother Walt and Brother Elmer the Marine Corps beats working for old man Minch by a mile. Tell them to join up quick before all of the places are filled.

I was restless at first because you get to stay in bed till nearly 6 a.m. But I am getting used to it, so I like to sleep late. Tell Walt and Elmer all you do before breakfast is smooth your cot, and shine some things. No hogs to slop, feed to pitch, mash to mix, wood to split, fire to lay. Practically nothing.

Men got to shave but it is not so bad, there’s warm water. Breakfast is strong on trimmings like fruit juice, cereal, eggs, bacon, etc., but kind of weak on chops, potatoes, ham, steak, fried eggplant, pie and other regular food, but tell Walt and Elmer you can always sit by the two city boys that live on coffee. Their food, plus yours, holds you until noon when you get fed again. It’s no wonder these city boys can’t walk much.

We go on “route marches,” which the platoon sergeant says are long walks to harden us. If he thinks so, it’s not my place to tell him different. A “route march” is about as far as to our mailbox at home. Then the city guys get sore feet and we all ride back in trucks.

The sergeant is like a school teacher. He nags a lot. The Captain is like the school board. Majors and colonels just ride around and frown. They don’t bother you none.

This next will kill Walt and Elmer with laughing. I keep getting medals for shooting. I don’t know why. The bulls-eye is near as big as a chipmunk head and don’t move, and it ain’t shooting at you like the Higgett boys at home. All you got to do is lie there all comfortable and hit it. You don’t even load your own cartridges. They come in boxes.

Then we have what they call hand-to-hand combat training. You get to wrestle with them city boys. I have to be real careful though, they break real easy. It ain’t like fighting with that ole bull at home. I’m about the best they got in this except for that Tug Jordan from over in Silver Lake . I only beat him once. He joined up the same time as me, but I’m only 5’6″ and 130 pounds and he’s 6’8″ and near 300 pounds dry.

Be sure to tell Walt and Elmer to hurry and join before other fellers get onto this setup and come stampeding in.

Your loving daughter,

Alice
***
Classic joke for our Muslim friends today
There were two white christian men, John and Mike, whose plane crashed into a desert. Luckily they survived unharmed. As they traveled through the hot desert looking for food and water, they gave up and sat down, thinking of what to do.

As the dust in the air settled, they suddenly could view a mosque ahead. They became very hopeful. But then John said ''Muslims are there. They might help us if we say we are Muslim.'' Then Mike said ''No way, I won't say I'm Muslim, I'm gonna be honest''.

So John and Mike went to the Mosque ahead and were greeted by an Arab Muslim, who asked what their names were.

John thought of a Muslim name and said, 'My name is Muhammad'. And Mike said 'My name is Mike'.

The Arab man said 'Hello Mike.' And told these other men to take Mike and give him food and drink.

Then he turned to John and said, 'Salaam Muhammad. Ramadan Mubarak! (Hello Muhammad, Happy Ramadan)

***
Two Jewish mothers are at lunch...
During the meal, one of the mothers says to her friend, "I have some distressing news. I sent my son to Israel to become a better Jew, but he came back a Christian." 
Her friend looks up in surprise and says, "Funny story! I also sent my son to Israel to become a better Jew, and he came back a Christian! Let us go and talk to the Rabbi."
The two mothers stroll down to the local synagogue and lay their problems before the Rabbi, whom, upon hearing their Lamentations replies, "Funny story! I also sent my son to Israel to become a Jew, and he came back a Christian! Let us pray for guidance."
The three of them kneel in prayer, and are answered by the voice of God: "What troubles you, my children?" He says.
"Father," says the Rabbi, "Each of us sent our sons to Israel to become better Jews, and each of them has become a Christian."
To which God replies:
"Funny story..." 
***
Running a special this week.....
A priest was called away for an emergency. Not wanting to leave the confessional unattended, he called his rabbi friend from across the street and asked him to cover for him.The rabbi told him he wouldn't know what to say, but the priest told him to come on over and he'd stay with him for a little bit and show him what to do.

The rabbi comes, and he and the priest are in the confessional. In a few minutes, a woman comes in and says, 'Father, forgive me for I have sinned.'

The priest asks, 'What did you do?'

The woman says, 'I committed adultery.'

The priest says, 'How many times?'

And the woman replies, 'Three.'

Priest: 'Say two Hail Mary's, put $5 in the box, and go and sin no more.'

A few minutes later a man enters the confessional. He says, 'Father forgive me for I have sinned.'

'What did you do?'

‘I committed adultery.'

'How many times?'

'Three times.'

The priest says, 'Say two Hail Mary's, put $5 in the box and go and sin no more.'

The rabbi tells the priest that he thinks he's got it, so the priest leaves. A few minutes later another woman enters and says, 'Father, forgive me for I have sinned.'

The rabbi says, 'What did you do?'

The woman replies, 'I committed adultery.'

The rabbi, getting it off pat, says, 'How many times?'

The woman replies, 'Once.'

The rabbi said, 'Go and do it two more times, We have a special this week, three for $5.'
***
An Irish Confession
A  married Irishman went into the confessional and said to his priest, 'I  almost had an affair with another woman.' 

The priest said, 'What  do you mean, almost?' 

The Irishman said,  'Well, we got undressed and rubbed together, but then I stopped.' 

The priest said,  'Rubbing together is the same as putting it in. You're not to see that  woman again. For your penance, say five Hail Marys and put $50 in the  poor box.' 

The  Irishman left the confessional, said his prayers, and then walked over  to the poor box. 

He paused for a moment  and then started to leave. 

The priest, who was  watching, quickly ran over to him saying, 'I saw that! You didn't put any money in the poor box!' 

The Irishman replied,  'Yeah, but I rubbed the $50 on the box, and according to you, that's the same as putting it in!' 

***
Hilary Clinton dies
While walking down the street one day a corrupt Hillary Clinton was tragically hit by a car and died.

Her soul arrives in heaven and is met by St. Peter at the entrance.

"Welcome to heaven," says St. Peter. "Before you settle in, it seems there is a problem. We seldom see a high official around these parts, you see, so we're not sure what to do with you."

"No problem, just let me in," says Hillary Clinton. 

"Well, I'd like to, but I have orders from the higher ups. What we'll do is have you spend one day in hell and one in heaven. Then you can choose where to spend eternity."

"Really?, I've made up my mind. I want to be in heaven," says Hillary Clinton.

"I'm sorry, but we have our rules."

And with that, St. Peter escorts her to the elevator and he goes down, down, down to hell.

The doors open and she finds herself  in the middle of a green golf course. In the distance is a clubhouse and standing in front of it are all her friends and other politicians who had worked with her.

Everyone is very happy and in evening dress. They run to greet her, shake her hand, and reminisce about the good times they had while getting rich at the expense of the people.

They played a friendly game of golf and then dine on lobster, caviar and the finest champagne.

Also present is the devil, who really is a very friendly guy who is having a good time dancing and telling jokes.

They are all having such a good time that before Hillary Clinton realizes it, it is time to go.

Everyone gives her a hearty farewell and waves while the elevator rises.

 The elevator goes up, up, up and the door reopens in heaven where St. Peter is waiting for her, "Now it's time to visit heaven...

So, 24 hours passed with that Hillary Clinton joining a group of contented souls moving from cloud to cloud, playing the harp and singing. They have a good time and, before she realizes it, the 24 hours have gone by and St. Peter returns.

 "Well, then, you've spent a day in hell and another in heaven. Now choose your eternity."

Clinton reflects for a minute, then answers: "Well, I would never have said it, I mean heaven has been delightful, but I think I would be better off in hell."

So, Saint Peter escorts her to the elevator and she goes down, down, down to Hell. 

Now the doors of the elevator open and she is in the middle of a barren land covered with waste and garbage. She sees all of her friends, dressed in rags, picking up the trash and putting it in black bags. The devil comes over to her and grins menacingly. 

"I don't understand," stammer Hilary. "Yesterday I was here and there was a golf course and a club and we ate lobster and caviar and danced and had a great time. Now all there is is a wasteland full of garbage and my friends look miserable."

The devil looks at Hilary, smiles and says,

"Yesterday we were campaigning. Today you voted for us!"
***
Putin and Obama meet in Moscow
They're debating the merits of their respective societies. They argue about moral values and which country is doing better.

Obama: I've heard that all Russian are alcoholics.

Putin: That's a Russophobic myth. I bet there's not a single drunk out in Moscow tonight. 

Obama: I don't believe you. I bet if we take your limo out for a spin I'll see some drunks staggering around. 

Putin: Okay, let me prove you wrong. We'll drive around and if you see a single drunk you can shoot them with my own gun. 

Putin let's the FSB know what they're doing, and tells them to do a sweep and round up every single drunk on their route. He says if Obama sees a single drunk everyone will get sent to Siberia. 

Obama and Putin drive around for 10 minutes, and the streets are empty. Not a single person is out, let alone a drunk. Obama is about to accept defeat when a visibly drunk man staggers out of an apartment building, singing a Russian folk song. Obama leans out the window and shoots him. 

Obama: See Vlad, I saw one person and he was drunk! All Russians are drunks!

Six months later Putin travels to Washington DC and he and Obama are having the same argument about morals and society. Putin suggests they do the same thing they did in Moscow, and he will shoot any drunks that he sees on Washington's streets. Obama let's the Secret Service know to go ahead and make sure there are no drunks anywhere on their route. 

The two presidents drive around for 10 minutes, without seeing anyone. Just as they're turning around a huge group of drunks stumbles out of a bar. Putin gets excited, leans out the window and mows them all down. He teases Obama for the rest of the night. 

Putin: Barack, you said Russians were worse drunks than Americans. I just killed 20 of them, looks like Russia wins again! 

The next morning Vladimir Putin picks up the newspaper and sees the headline: 20 Russian Embassy Workers Slain In Drive-By Shooting.
***
10 Funny Pun Jokes
1.    Did you hear about the guy whose whole left side was cut off? *He's all right now*

2.	I'm reading a book about anti-gravity. *It's impossible to put down.*

3.	I wondered why the baseball was getting bigger. *Then it hit me.*

4.	I'm glad I know sign language, *it's pretty handy.*

5.	It's not that the man did not know how to juggle, *he just didn't have the balls to do it.*

6.	I couldn't quite remember how to throw a boomerang, *but eventually it came back to me.*

7.	I used to have a fear of hurdles, *but I got over it.*

8.	There was a sign on the lawn at a drug re-hab center that said *'Keep off the Grass'.*

9.	Did you hear about the guy who got hit in the head with a can of soda? *He was lucky it was a soft drink.*
10.	There was once a cross-eyed teacher who couldn't control his pupils.
***
Joe had a terrible headache, and went to the Doctor.
The Doctor said: "The good news is I can cure your headaches...The bad news 
is that it will require castration. You have a very rare condition which 
causes your testicles to press up against the base of your spine and the 
pressure creates one hell of a headache. The only way to relieve the 
pressure is to remove the testicles."
 
Joe was shocked and depressed. He wondered if he had anything to live for. 
He couldn't concentrate long enough to answer, but decided he had no choice 
but to go under the knife.

When he left the hospital, he was headache free for the first time in over 
20 years, but he felt as if he was missing an important part of himself.

As he walked down the street he realized he felt like a different person. He 
could make a new beginning and live a new life. He saw a men's clothing 
store and thought, "That's what I need, a new suit."
 
The elderly salesman eyed him quickly and said, "Let's see, you're a size 44 long."
 
Joe laughed and said, "That's right, how did you know?"
 
"Been in the business 60 years!"
 
Joe tried on the suit. It fit perfectly. As Joe admired himself in the 
mirror, the tailor asked, "How about a new shirt?" Joe thought for a moment 
and then said, "Sure."
 
"Let's see, 16 and a half neck, 34 sleeve."
 
Joe was surprised. "How did you know?"
 
"Been in the business 60 years." The shirt fit perfectly.
 
As Joe looked at himself in the mirror, the salesman said, "You could use new shoes."
 
Since Joe was on a roll, he said, "Sure."
 
The man eyed Joe's feet and said, "9-1/2E."
 
Joe was astonished. "That's right. How did you know?"
 
"Been in the business 60 years." Joe tried on the shoes and they also fit perfectly.
 
As Joe walked comfortably around the shop, the salesman asked, "How about new underwear?"
 
Joe thought for a second and said, "Why not."
 
The man stepped back, eyed Joe's waist and said, "Let's see, size 36."
 
Joe laughed. "Finally I've got you! I've worn size 32 since I was 18 years old."
 
The tailor shook his head. "You can't wear a size 32. Size 32 underwear 
would press your testicles against the base of your spine and give you one 
hell of a headache."
***
The difference between before/after getting hired
When Timmy went in for an interview at ABC company, he was hired after a very brief interview. A little skeptical at first, Timmy asked the company representative a few questions.


It went like this:

ABC: Trust me, this company could really use someone new

Timmy: If there is too much work, I'm going to quit...

ABC: We'd NEVER let something like that happen

Timmy: Do employees get every Saturday and Sunday off?

ABC: That's a granted.

Timmy: Are employees required to work overtime without pay?

ABC: No way. Where did you even come up with such a ridiculous idea?

Timmy: Are meals subsidized?

ABC: You BET.

Timmy: Do the new employees usually end up doing ALL the work?

ABC: That's impossible. There are so many other experienced people in our company.

Timmy: If I did well, would I ever become a manager?

ABC: Yes. Absolutely.

Timmy: Wow. Is this for real?


After working there for several months, Timmy noticed that the job wasn't panning out the way he had been promised. Quite upset, he went to file a complaint to the HR dept. The next day, Timmy was summoned into the management's office, where they threatened to fire him for voicing out.

To see his conversation with the management, read the conversation above again.... from the bottom to the top.
***
The Funeral Dog
A Jewish man was leaving a convenience store with his espresso when he noticed a most unusual Italian funeral procession approaching the nearby cemetery.  A black hearse was followed by a second black hearse about 50 feet behind the first one. Behind the second hearse was a solitary Italian man walking a dog on a leash. Behind him, a short distance back, were about 200 men walking single file. The man couldn't stand the curiosity. He respectfully approached the Italian man walking the dog and said:
 
"I am so sorry for your loss, and this may be a bad time to disturb you, but I've never seen an Italian funeral like this. Whose funeral is it?"

"My wife's."

''What happened to her?" 

"She yelled at me and my dog attacked and killed her."
 
He inquired further, "But who is in the second hearse?"
 
The Italian man answered, "My mother-in-law. She was trying to help my wife when the dog turned on her."
 
A very poignant and touching moment of Jewish and Italian brotherhood and silence passed between the two men...
 
The Jewish man then asked "Can I borrow the dog?"
 
The Italian man replied, "Get in line."
 
 
***
Thrifty therapy... 
A couple, both aged 70, went to a sex therapist's office. The doctor asked, "What can I do for you?" The man said, "Will you watch us have sexual intercourse?" The doctor looked puzzled, but agreed. When the couple finished, the doctor said, "There's nothing wrong with the way you have intercourse." The doctor charged them $82 for the session. This happened several weeks in a row: the couple would make an appointment, have intercourse with no apparent problems, pay the doctor, and then leave. Finally the doctor asked, "Just exactly what are you trying to find out?" The old man replied, "We're not trying to find anything out. She's married and we can't go to her house. I'm married and we can't go to my house. The Sheraton charges $90 and the Hilton charges $108. We do it here for $82, and I get $68 back from Medicare."
***
It was the first day of a school in USA and a...
...and a new Indian student named Chandrasekhar Subramanian entered the fourth grade.

The teacher said, "Let's begin by reviewing some American History. Who said 'Give me Liberty, or give me Death'?"

She saw a sea of blank faces except for Chandrasekhar, who had his hand up: 'Patrick Henry, 1775,' he said.

'Very good! Who said 'Government of the People, by the People, for the People, shall not perish from the Earth?''

Again, no response except from Chandrasekhar. 'Abraham Lincoln, 1863' said Chandrasekhar.

The teacher snapped at the class, 'Class, you should be ashamed. Chandrasekhar, who is new to our country, knows more about our history than you do.'

She heard a loud whisper: 'F ___ the Indians'

'Who said that?' she demanded. Chandrasekhar put his hand up. 'General Custer, 1862.'

At that point, a student in the back said, 'I'm gonna puke.'

The teacher glares around and asks 'All right! Now, who said that?' Again, Chandrasekhar says, 'George H. W. Bush to the Japanese Prime Minister, 1991.'

Now furious, another student yells, 'Oh yeah? Suck this!'

Chandrasekhar jumps out of his chair waving his hand and shouts to the teacher, 'Bill Clinton, to Monica Lewinsky, 1997.'

Now with almost mob hysteria someone said 'You little shit. If you say anything else, I'll kill you.' Chandrasekhar frantically yells at the top of his voice, 'Michael Jackson (musician) to the child witnesses testifying against him, 2004.'

The teacher fainted. And as the class gathered around the teacher on the floor, someone said, 'Oh shit, we're screwed!' And Chandrasekhar said quietly, 'I think it was Lehman Brothers, September 15th, 2008'.

***
You Might be a Redneck Jedi If…
* You ever heard the phrase, "May the force be with ya’ll."
* Your Jedi robe is camouflage.
* You have ever used your light saber to open a bottle of Bud Light.
* At least one wing of your X-Wings is primer colored.
* You can easily describe the taste of an Ewok.
* You have ever had a land-speeder up on blocks in your yard.
* The worst part of spending time on Dagobah is the dadgum skeeters.
* Wookies are offended by your B.O.
* You have ever used the Force to get yourself another beer so you didn’t have to wait for a commercial.
* You have ever used the Force in conjunction with fishing/bowling.
* Your father has ever said to you, "Shoot, son come on over to the dark side… it’ll be a hoot."
* You have ever had your R-2 unit use its self-defense electro-shock thingy to get the barbecue grill to light.
* You have a Confederate flag painted on the hood of your land-speeder.
* You have the doors of your X-wing welded shut and you have to get in through the window.
* Although you had to kill him, you kinda thought that Jabba the Hutt had a pretty good handle on how to treat his women.
* You have a cousin who bears a strong resemblance to Chewbacca.
* You were the only one drinking Jack Daniels during the cantina scene.
* Your business cards read "Billy Bob, Jedi Master".
* You know Ewoks squeal like pigs.
* You use your R-2 unit as a beer coaster.
* Your land-speeder had a light saber rack.
* If you hear … "Billy Bob, I am your father … AND your uncle!"
***
Joke I heard while in Hungary
Two cops are standing by the street side in New York City. A foreigner approaches them looking slightly panicked.

"Parlez vous Francais?" He asks them. The cops, not knowing a word of French merely shrug their shoulders at the man.

Frustrated, he asks them, "Ustedes hablan español?" Again, the cops merely shrug.

The foreigner continues with the same result with Dutch, Russian, and German. Eventually, he leaves, knowing that there's no hope for him to communicate with the officers.

"I keep telling you we should learn more languages!" says one cop to the other.

"Why?" he responds. "That man knows five, and it didn't get him anywhere."

EDIT: Spleling and grammar. (I did get it correct that time, right?)
***
It was only three times... promise.
Sam was very ill and it looked like the end might be approaching so he calls his wife Becky near. Sam says to her, "Becky, I was wondering - have you ever cheated on me?"

Becky replies, "Oh Sam, why would you ask such a question now? You don't want to ask that question..."

"Yes, Becky, I really want to know. Please..."

"Well, all right. Yes, 3 times..."

"Three? Well, when were they?" he asked.

"Well, Sam, remember when you were 35 years old and you really wanted to start a business on your own and no bank would give you a loan? Remember, then one day the bank president himself came over the house and signed the loan papers, no questions asked?"

"Oh, Becky, you did that for me! I respect you even more than ever, to do such a thing for me. So, when was number 2?"

"Well, Sam, remember when you had that last heart attack and you were needing that very tricky operation, and no surgeon would touch you? Then remember how Dr. Smith came all the way up here, to do the surgery himself, and then you were in good shape again?"

"I can't believe it! Becky, you should do such a thing for me, to save my life. I couldn't have a more wonderful wife. To do such a thing, you must really love me darling. I couldn't be more moved. So, all right then, when was number 3?"

"Well, Sam, remember a few years ago, when you really wanted to be president of the golf club and you were 26 votes short..?" 
***
Two Assholes
Stanley died in a fire and his body was burned pretty badly.

The morgue needed someone to identify the body, so they sent for his two best friends, Cooter and Gomer.

The three men had always done everything together.

Cooter arrived first, and when the mortician pulled back the sheet,

Cooter said, 'Yup, his face is burned up pretty bad. You better roll him over.'

The mortician rolled him over and Cooter said, 'Nope, ain't Stanley .'

The mortician thought this was rather strange.

So he brought Gomer in to confirm the identity of the body.

Gomer looked at the body and said, 'Yup, he's pretty well burnt up.

Roll him over.'

The mortician rolled him over and Gomer said, 'No, it ain't Stanley '

The mortician asked, 'How can you tell?'

Gomer said, 'Well, Stanley had two assholes.'

'What? He had two assholes?' asked the mortician.

'Yup, we never seen 'em, but everybody used to say:

'There's Stanley with them two assholes.'
***
Worst Ethnic Joke Ever
An Englishman, a Scotsman, an Irishman, a Welshman, a Latvian, a Turk, a German, an Indian, several Americans (including a southerner, a New Englander, and a Californian), an Argentinean, a Dane, an Australian, a Slovakian, an Egyptian, a Japanese, a Moroccan, a Frenchman, a New Zealander, a Spaniard, a Russian, a Guatemalan, a Colombian, a Pakistani, a Malaysian, a Croatian, a Uzbek, a Cypriot, a Pole, a Lithuanian, a Chinese, a Sri Lankan, a Lebanese, a Cayman Islander, a Ugandan, a Vietnamese, a Korean, a Uruguayan, a Czech, an Icelander, a Mexican, a Finn, a Honduran, a Panamanian, an Andorran, an Israeli, a Venezuelan, a Fijian, a Peruvian, an Estonian, a Brazilian, a Portuguese, a Liechtensteiner, a Mongolian, a Hungarian, a Canadian, a Moldovan, a Haitian, a Norfolk Islander, a Macedonian, a Bolivian, a Cook Islander, a Tajikistani, a Samoan, an Armenian, a Aruban, an Albanian, a Greenlander, a Micronesian, a Virgin Islander, a Georgian, a Bahaman, a Belarusian, a Cuban, a Tongan, a Cambodian, a Qatari, an Azerbaijani, a Romanian, a Chilean, a Kyrgyzstani, a Jamaican, a Filipino, a Ukrainian, a Dutchman, a Taiwanese, an Ecuadorian, a Costa Rican, a Swede, a Bulgarian, a Serb, a Swiss, a Greek, a Belgian, a Singaporean, an Italian, a Norwegian and 47 Africans walk into a fine restaurant....
....... "I'm sorry," said the maître d', "you can't come in here without a Thai."
***
A man goes to a cathouse with only $5 to his name.
"What can $5 get me?" he asked the lady inside.  

"Let's see.. well, I can give you a penguin job," she replied.  

The call girl unzips the man's pants and leaves them around his ankles, and goes to work with her mouth.  

"Oh wow, this is fantastic, you sure know what you're doing!"  The man was really enjoying his $5 penguin job.  

It was only a short while before the climactic finish was approaching, and he made no delay with vocalizing this.  

"I'm going to come, I'm going to come!"  

The courtesan quickly stopped, got to her feet, and walked out the door of the room they were in.  

"Wait baby, wait, wait!  Where are you going?!"  The man, pants still down around his ankles, waddled after the woman as fast as he could.  

"That's a penguin job, and that'll be $5," she said, with a laugh.  
***
Three vampires walk into a bar...
The 1st one, quite thirsty promptly says to the bartender "I'll have a glass of blood, type AB-, on the rocks", quickly followed by the 2nd making his request for "A Bloody Mary, type B+" and lastly the 3rd one, after a little consideration, asks for "A glass of hot water please". 

The first 2 vampires immediately give a look of contempt to the 3rd one, one of them exclaiming "A glass of hot water? What kind of pansy order is that?". To which the 3rd vampire, while taking a used tampon out of his cloak pocket replies "Can't a guy just enjoy a GODDAMNED TEA!?"
***
A little-known risk with blood transfusions . . .
A wealthy Arab Sheikh was admitted to hospital for heart surgery, but prior to the surgery, the doctors needed to store his type of blood, in case the need arose. As the gentleman had a rare type of blood, it couldn't be found locally, so, the call went out.
 
Finally a Scotsman was located who had a similar blood type.  The Scot willingly donated his blood for the Arab.  After successful surgery, the Arab sent the Scotsman in appreciation for giving His blood, a new BMW, a 5-carat diamond and $50,000 dollars.
 
A few months later, once again, the Arab had to go through a corrective surgery.  So the hospital telephoned the Scotsman who was more than happy to donate more of his blood again.
 
After the second surgery, the Arab sent the Scotsman a thank-you card and a box of chocolates.  Needless to say, the Scotsman was shocked that the Arab did not reciprocate his kind gesture as he had before.  He phoned the Arab and asked him: "I thought you would be generous again, that you would give me another BMW, diamonds and money ... but you only gave me a thank-you card and a box of chocolates."
 
To this the Arab replied: "Aye laddie, but I now have Scottish blood in ma veins".
***
Cow Jokes

What do you call a cow with only two legs? Lean Beef.

What do you call a cow with no legs? Ground Beef.

Two cows are grazing in the field. One cow says to the other, "Hey Dorris, you worried about this Mad-Cow Disease epidemic?" The other cow turns and says, "Why would I be? I'm a chicken."

What do you call a fat cow with a terrible personality? My ex girlfriend.

What is the proper term for a pregnant cow? Also my ex girlfriend.

Whoaa Nellie, that escowlated quickly.

Growing up in rural Texas, we had to find ways of entertain ourselves as kids. We used to sneak into local shops and businesses after hours and rearrange things, or play games with the merchandise. One night, we broke into the town butchery. After several minutes of throwing knives at the wall, my attention turned to the ceiling. There, right above our heads, hung the freshly butchered carcass of a full grown cow. My buddy nudged me in the side and said, "Hey, I betchya two dolla' that you can't rip off one of them cow legs."

I shook my head and said, "I'm sorry, Rick, but the steaks are too high."

Another time, we all went out cow tipping. We dressed up in black, and made our way to farmer Dalton's ranch. I went first to do the tipping. After hopping the fence, I snuck up real quiet to the first bull (a big fella', mind you)... took my hands out of my pocket... and tossed fifty cents into the jar labeled "GRATUITIES ACCEPTED" that lay on the ground next to him.

***
So there’s a far-off place that consists of a perfectly triangular lake surrounded by land, with three kingdoms on the three sides...
So there’s a far-off place that consists of a perfectly triangular lake surrounded by land, with three kingdoms on the three sides of the lake. The first kingdom is rich and powerful, filled with wealthy, prosperous people. The second kingdom is more humble, but has its fair share of wealth and power, too. The third kingdom is struggling and poor, and barely has an army.

The kingdoms eventually go to war over control of the lake, as it’s a valuable resource to have. The first kingdom sends 100 of their finest knights, clad in the best armor and each with their own personal squire. The second kingdom sends 50 of their knights, with fine leather armor and a few dozen squires of their own. The third kingdom sends their one and only knight, an elderly warrior who has long since passed his prime, with his own personal squire.

The night before the big battle, the knights in the first kingdom drink and make merry, partying into the late hours of the night. The knights in the second kingdom aren’t as well off, but have their own supply of grog and also drink late into the night. In the third camp, the faithful squire gets a rope and slings it over the branch of a tall tree, making a noose, and hangs a pot from it. He fills the pot with stew and has a humble dinner with the old knight.

The next morning, the knights in the first two kingdoms are hung over and unable to fight, while the knight in the third kingdom is old and weary, unable to get up. In place of the knights, the squires from all three kingdoms go and fight. The battle lasts long into the night, but by the time the dust settled, only one squire was left standing - the squire from the third kingdom.

..and it just goes to show you that the squire of the high pot and noose is equal to the sum of the squires of the other two sides.
***
Seeing that Ramadan started this week, here's a joke.
There were two white christian men, Adam and Jack, whose plane crashed into a desert. Luckily they survived unharmed. As they traveled through the hot desert looking for food and water, they gave up and sat down, thinking of what to do.


As the dust in the air settled, they suddenly could view a mosque ahead. They became very hopeful. But then Adam said ''Muslims are there. They might help us if we say we are muslim.'' Then Jack said ''No way, I won't say I'm muslim, I'm gonna be honest''.


So Adam and Jack went to the Mosque ahead and were greeted by an Arab Muslim, who asked what their names were.


Adam thought of a Muslim name and said, 'My name is Muhammed'. And Jack said 'My name is Jack'.


The Arab man said 'Hello Jack.' And told these other men to take Jack and give him food and drink.


Then he turned to Adam and said, 'Salaam Muhammed. Ramadan Mubarak! (Hello Muhammad, Happy Ramadhan)
***
A man walks into a hooker bar with $49...
A man walks into a hooker bar with $49.  

A black hooker approaches him and begins giving him a lapdance.  She asks him if he wants to go to the back room and fuck her for $50.  The man responds, "I would, but I only have $49."  

The black hooker says, "Sorry then", and walks away.

A few minutes later, a white hooker comes up to him, then starts giving him a lapdance.  She asks him if he'd like to go to the back room and fuck her for $50.  The man responds, "I would, but I only have $49."  

But the white hooker says, "Eh, that's fine, let's go", and the two go to the back room to have sex.

-------------------------------------------------------------------------------

The man returns to the hooker bar 10 years later.  When he walks in, the white hooker, still working there, recognizes him and approaches him.  He remembers her as well.  She tells him, "You'll never believe this, but I had a son after we had sex, and you're the father!"  In disbelief, the man shakes his head and doesn't know what to say.  The hooker tells him, "Our son is here, and he's always wanted to meet you."

She walks the man over to the son, then returns to her work.  Now in private, the son speaks up: "Wow, you're really my father.  I have so much to ask, but there's one thing I've always wanted to know most - what is my last name?"

The man then tells him, "It's Goldberg."

The son frowns in disappointment.  He says, "Goddammit, are you telling me I'm a Jew?"

The man sighs, but then responds, "Yeah, but don't sound so disappointed.  For another dollar, you would've been a nigger."
***
Happy May
Most people don't know that back in 1912, Hellmann's mayonnaise was manufactured in England. In fact, the Titanic was carrying 12,000 jars of the condiment scheduled for delivery in Vera Cruz, Mexico, which was to be the next port of call for the great ship after its stop in New York. 

This would have been the largest single shipment of mayonnaise ever delivered to Mexico. But as we know, the great ship did not make it to New York. The ship hit an iceberg and sank, and the cargo was forever lost. 

The people of Mexico, who were crazy about mayonnaise, and were eagerly awaiting its delivery, were disconsolate at the loss. Their anguish was so great, that they declared a National Day of Mourning, which they still observe to this day. 

The National Day of Mourning occurs each year on May 5th and is known, of course, as Sinko de Mayo.
***
Three male coworkers are upset to find that the fourth member of their weekly golf outing will no longer be joining them...
...a female coworker overhears their plight and asks if she can join. The men are hesitant, but in the name of equality they decide to allow it. 

"We like to take our time, so we start early," says one of the men. 

"No worries," says the woman, "I'll be there at 7:30 or 8:00."

Sunday arrives, and the woman shows up at 7:30. She assumes a left-handed stance and aces every hole. At the end of the day, the men are so impressed that they invite her back next week. 

"That's great," she says, "I'll be there at 7:30 or 8:00."

The next Sunday arrives and the woman shows up at 7:30. This time she assumes a right-handed stance and aces every hole. The men are flabbergasted and duly impressed. 

One of the men asks, "how do you decide whether you're going to play lefty or righty?"

She responds, "well, if I wake up and see that my husbands penis is leaning to the left, I play lefty. If it's leaning to the right, I play righty."

One of the men decides to be funny and asks, "well what if his penis is pointing straight up?"

She responds, "well, then I don't get here until 8:00"
***
Two pirates, Morty and sol are at a bar
Sol has a patch over one eye,  a hook for a hand, and a wooden peg leg. “Ye gads, matey,” says Morty. “What happened to ya?”

Sol says, “Me pirate ship was attacked, and a lucky shot lopped off me leg. So now I got me a wooden peg.”

“And yer hand?” asks Marty.

“When me ship sank, a shark bit me hand off. So now I got me a hook.”

“OK, but what’s with the eye patch?”

“I was standin’ on a dock, and the biggest seagull I ever saw poops right in me eye.”

“But ya don’t go blind from no seagull poop.”

“True,” says Sol. “But it was me first day with the hook.”
***
A cowboy rode into town and stopped at a saloon for a drink.
Unfortunately, the locals always had a habit of picking on strangers, which he was. When he finished his drink, he found his horse had been stolen.

He went back into the bar, handily flipped his gun into the air, caught it above his head without even looking and fired a shot into the ceiling.


“Which one of you sidewinders stole my horse?!”, he yelled with surprising forcefulness.


No one answered.
“Alright, I’m gonna have another beer, and if my horse ain’t back outside by the time I finish, I’m gonna do what I dun in Texas! And I don’t like to have to do what I dun in Texas!”


Some of the locals shifted restlessly. The man, true to his word, had another beer, walked outside, and his horse has been returned to the post.


He saddled up and started to ride out of town. The bartender wandered out of the bar and asked, “Say partner, before you go… what happened in Texas?”


The cowboy turned back and said, “I had to walk home.”
***
Headaches.
A man strides into a bar, grinning from ear to ear. He sets down at the bar and orders a beer. "In fact, make that a round on me." 

The bar cheers, and the bartender brings him his drink, he asks, "So, why the celebration?"

"I am reinventing myself! A new man! Just a month ago, I was miserable. But then..." He laughs. "Then my life changed! I had to put it all behind me. I always wanted to live in California, so I sold everything I had, broke my lease, and moved here. I got an apartment right over there across from the bar, and just today I landed my dream job." He drains half his beer, "Life is GREAT!"

The bartender stands back and beams, hands on his hips, sharing the man's joy, "That's great man...y'know, most guys would not have the balls to pack up and leave like that."

At that, the man lets out a peal of laughter, spilling his beer and nearly falling off his stool. "And that's the kicker! I don't have ANY balls! None at all!" As you might expect, the bartender looked confused. The man leans over the bar. "You see, starting about 10 years ago, I started getting terrible headaches. I mean they were crippling, man. Couldn't sleep. Couldn't eat, Couldn't work...hell, sometimes I could barely walk. And they just kept getting worse. I finally found a doc that found the problem....turns out it was something with my balls, pressing into the base of my spine. The pressure was causing the headaches. I mean...it was a hard decision...but the headaches were ruining my life. I was damn near suicidal. So...well...off they came. And now I'm completely reinventing myself. Next step, get a new wardrobe." He holds up his glass in a toast and drains it, waggling for another as he swallows. 

The bartender's jaw has dropped. "That...that's incredible." He turns to fill the glass and looks up as the beer pours in.  "Hey...y'know... I think I can set you up." he looks up over the bar and scans around. He quickly sees who he's looking for. "Barry! Hey Barry, get over here...this man needs a new suit." He looks back to the new customer. "This guy's amazing, totally old school. Can size a guy just by looking at him. Makes all of his suits himself, and I'll get him to cut you a deal."

Up walks a thin, bespectacled, immaculately dressed elderly man. He approaches the bar, "Yes?", he says in a clipped voice. 

"Got a customer for ya, Barry. Treat him nice, he's been through a lot."

"Ah! You are wanting a new suit?" He looks the man up and down. He pulls his spectacles down on his nose. "A...reinvention of yourself?"

Then man beams, "Yes! Exactly! new job, new city, new friends...and now I need a new suit."

"Hmmm...collar is 15, yes?"

"Yes! Exactly!"

"42 long jacket feels to long, 42 feels too short, yes?"

"Yes! Exactly!"

"I will cut it custom for you. Tall and slender...waist 32..inseam 34..."

"Ah...you got the waist right, but I'm a 32 inseam. Always have been."

Barry waves his hand dismissively and continues his examination. "No...no..you are are a 34 inseam. 32 is too short. A 32 would push your balls right up into your spine. Give you one hell of a headache."
***
A man walks into a bar...
.... And orders a drink. As the bartender is getting it for him, he notices a jar of ten dollar bills on the counter.

"What are those for?" He asks.

"We have a competition running." Replies the bartender. "You put ten dollars in the jar and I give you three tasks. If you complete the tasks, you get the whole jar, which is valued at approximately $10,000."

"What are the tasks?" Asks the man.

"Doesn't work like that. You have to put the money in first." Says the bartender.

The man shrugs and puts the money in. "Alright, what are the tasks?"

"First, you have to scull a quart of tequila in under a minute. Secondly, there's a pit bull chained up out back with a rotten tooth, you have to remove that tooth with your bare hands. And lastly, there's an ninety year old woman upstairs who's never had sex, you have to rectify that."

"Stuff that!" Exclaims the man. "Just give me my drink."

An hour or so later, the man is incredibly drunk. "Alright!" He slurs "Gimme my tequila!" He sculls it in 58 seconds.

He then gets up from his seat, cracks his neck and walks out the back door, slamming it behind him.

The bar is quiet as the sounds of a terrible commotion come from under the door; barking, yelling, tearing until suddenly, silence.

The door bursts open as the man stumbles in. He's covered in sweat, has a chunk of flush missing from his shoulder and his clothes are in tatters,

"Right!" He calls out "Time to take care of that old lady with the rotten tooth!"
***
The Devil on Sunday
One Sunday morning, Satan appeared before a small town congregation. Everyone started screaming and running for the front church door, trampling each other in a frantic effort to get away.

Pretty Soon, everyone was gone, except for an elderly gentleman who sat calmly. Satan walked up to the man and said, "Don't you know who I am?"

The man replied, "Yep, sure do."

Satan asked, "Aren't you going to run?"

"Nope, sure ain't," said the man.

Perturbed, Satan asked, "Why aren't you afraid of me?"

The man calmly replied, "Been married to your sister for over 48 years."

***
Apparently it's no longer politically correct to direct a joke at any racial or ethic minority, so...
An Englishman, a Scotsman, an Irishman, a Welshman, a Gurkha, a Latvian, a Turk, an Aussie, two Kiwis, a German, an American, a South African, a Cypriot, an Egyptian, a Japanese, a Mexican, a Spaniard, a Pole, a Lithuanian, a Swede, a Finn, a Dane, a Romani, a Bulgarian, a Swiss, a Greek, a Bulgarian, a Singaporean, a Norwegian, a Libyan, a Hindu, a Muslim, a Monk, an Italian, a Serb, a Russian and an Ethiopian went to a bar.

The bouncer said, "I'm sorry, you can't come in here without a Thai"
***
A Golf Story
John decided to go golfing in Scotland with his buddy, Keith, so they loaded up John's minivan and headed north.
After driving for a few hours, they got caught in a terrible blizzard. So they pulled into a nearby farm and asked the attractive lady who answered the door if they could spend the night.

'I realize it's terrible weather out there and I have this huge house all to myself, but I'm recently widowed,'she explained and 'I'm afraid the neighbours will talk if I let you stay in my house.'
 
'Don't  worry,' John said.'We'll be happy to sleep in the barn and if the weather breaks, we'll be gone at first light.'
The lady agreed, and the two men found their way to the barn and settled in for the night. 
 
Come morning, the weather had cleared, and they got on their way. They enjoyed a great weekend of golf..
 
But about nine months later, John got an unexpected letter from an attorney.
 
It took him a few minutes to figure it out, but he finally determined that it was from the attorney of that attractive widow he had met on the golf weekend.
 
He dropped in on his friend Keith and asked, 'Keith, do you remember that good-looking widow from the farm we stayed at on our golf holiday in Scotland about 9 months ago?'
 
'Yes, I do.' Said Keith.
 
'Did you, er, happen to get up in the middle of the night, go up to the house and pay her a visit?'
 
'Well, um, yes!,' Keith said,a little embarrassed about being found out, 'I have to admit that I did.'
 
'And did you happen to give her my name instead of telling her your name?'
 
Keith's face turned beet red and he said, 'Yeah, look, I'm sorry, buddy. I'm afraid I did.'
 
'Why do you ask?'
 
 
'She just died and left me everything.'

***
Josey wasn't the best pupil at Sunday school.
Josey wasn't the best pupil at Sunday school. She often fell asleep and one day while she was sleeping, the teacher asked her a question. "Who is the creator of the universe?" Joe was sitting next to Josey and decided to poke her with a pin to wake her up. Josey jumped and yelled, "God almighty!" The teacher congratulated her. A little later the teacher asked her another question, "Tell me who is our lord and savior?" Joe poked Josey again and she yelled out, "Jesus Christ!" The teacher congratulated her again. Later on the teacher asked, "What did Eve say to Adam after their 26th child?" Joe poked Josey again and she shouted, "If you stick that thing in me again, I'll snap it in half and stick it up your ass!"
***
The Irish have a way with words.
Into a Belfast pub comes Paddy Murphy,looking like he’d just been run over by a train.His arm is in a sling, his nose is broken,his face is cut and bruised and he's walking with a limp.

''What happened to you?" asks Sean, the bartender. "Jamie O'Conner and me had a fight," says Paddy.

"That little sh!t, O'Conner," says Sean,"he couldn't do that to you. He must have had something in his hand.''

"That he did," says Paddy, "a shovel is what he had,and a terrible lickin' he gave me with it.''

” Well," says Sean, "you should have defended yourself,didn't you have something in your hand?""

''That I did," said Paddy."Mrs. O'Conner's breast, and a thing of beauty it was, but absolutely useless in a fight." 

***
Karma is a weird name...
They should rename "karma" to "creddit" 

They should also rename the "share" button to "spreaddit" 

They should then also rename the "delete" button to "shreddit" 

But they don't, and I don't geddit
   
       

* Eddit: Wow, I did not expect to get gold for that one. Thank you all!
***
Tarzan and Jane
One day, Jane decides to teach Tarzan about sex.
As she is giving him the basics, Tarzan goes:
"Oh, Tarzan know sex. Tarzan sometimes do with hole in tree"
Horrified, Jane goes:
"My word, Tarzan, no, that's so terribly wrong. Here," she lays down on her back and opens her legs "You have to put it in here."
Tarzan takes off his loincloth, walks up to Jane and - BAM - kicks her as hard as he can, right in the snatch.
Jane proceeds to roll around on the ground in agony.
Finally, once she is able to draw breath, she goes
"Dear God, what the hell did you do that for?"
With a huge grin, he replies 
"Tarzan not stupid. Always check for bees first"
***
A Pirate Joke that doesn't end with "ARRRR."
A pirate walks into bar and sits down. The bartender notices that he has a peg leg, a hook for a hand, and a patch over one eye. The pirate orders a beer, and while he's pouring it the bartender asks "So what's the story with the leg?"
"Well it were many a year ago," says the pirate. "I were walkin on the deck a me ship and a rogue wave swept me overboard, and a shark swum up and bit me leg clean off! I swum ashore and were fitted fer a peg leg that very night."
"That's terrible," says the bartender. "What about the hand?"
"Well it were the very next day," says the pirate. "I were walkin on the deck a me ship and a rogue wave swept me overboard again, and a whale came up and bit me hand clean off! I swum ashore and were fitted fer a hook that very night."
"Wow," says the bartender. "So what about the eye?"
"Well it were the very next day," says the pirate. "I were walkin on the deck a me ship, and I were lookin out fer rogue waves, and a seagull flew over and shit right in me eye!"
"Oh man," says the bartender. "And that blinded you?"
"Well no," says the pirate. "But it were me first day with the hook."
***
5 Russian Jokes about Vodka
#1

A Gentleman comes to the shop and asked,

- Give me a bottle of vodka and a bottle of Coca-cola.

After Half an hour he comes again and asked again,

- Give me a bottle of vodka and a bottle of Coca-cola.

After one hour he comes again and asked to the shopkeeper

- Give me a bottle of vodka and a bottle of... of Sprite. It seems Coca-cola makes me sick! :)


#2
A patient went to a doctor. Patient was suffering from insomnia, nervous breakdown and Depression. After some checking the doctor said,

 

Doctor: This medicine is for insomnia, this one is for nervous break-down, and also take this one for depression. 

 

Patient: Thank you very much, doctor, but do you have any other medicine besides vodka?

#3

Tell us, what forces you to drink vodka every day?

- Nothing. I'm a volunteer.




#4


The Traffic police stops a car.

Policeman asked the man, Have you drunk vodka today?

Driver: No.

Policeman: Breathe into the tube... Well, no alcohol is detected... Maybe the tube is broken… (breathes into the tube himself) No, it's working! 


#5

Two Russian friends Went in a bar and ordered beer vodka.

 One of them adds: - Make sure the mug glass is clean! 

After a minute the waiter brings two beer mugs vodka glasses and asks: - Which of you ordered beer vodka in a clean mug glass?





Courtesy: 
http://www.flowingevents.com/2012/01/5-best-russian-jokes-about-vodka.html
***
A man died and went to heaven..
As he stood in front of St. Peter at the Pearly Gates, he saw a huge wall of clocks behind him. He asked, 

"What are all those clocks?"

St. Peter answered, "Those are Lie-Clocks. Everyone on Earth has a Lie-Clock. Every time you lie the hands on your clock will move."

"Oh," said the man, "whose clock is that?"

"That's Mother Teresa's. The hands have never moved, indicating that she never told a lie." 

"Incredible," said the man.

"That's Abraham Lincoln's clock. The hands have moved twice, telling us that Abe told only two lies in his entire life."

"Where's Obama's clock?"

"His clock is in Jesus' office. He's using it as a ceiling fan."

EDIT: Alright I think we've all established this joke is pretty interchangeable. TIL; Clinton and Bush are commonly used as well. 
***
An Irishman was drinking in a bar in London......
.......when he gets a call on his cell phone. He orders drinks for everybody in the bar as he announces his wife has just produced a typical Irish baby boy weighing 25 pounds.

Nobody can believe that any new baby can weigh in at 25 pounds, but the man just shrugs, "That's about average up our way, folks...like I said - my boy's a typical County Clare baby boy."

Two weeks later the man returns to the bar.. The bartender says, "You're the father of that typical Irish baby that weighed 25 pounds at birth, aren't you? Everybody has been making bets about how big he'd be in two weeks.... so how much does he weigh now?"

The proud father answers, "Seventeen pounds."

The bartender is puzzled and concerned. "What happened? He was 25 pounds the day he was born."

The father takes a slow swig of his Jameson Irish Whisky, wipes his lips on his shirt sleeve, leans into the bartender and proudly says, "Had him circumcised."
***
The train was very crowded, so the soldier walked the length of the train, looking for an empty seat.
The train was very crowded, so the soldier walked the length of the train, looking for an empty seat. The only unoccupied seat was directly adjacent to a well dressed middle-aged French lady and was being used by her little dog. The war weary soldier asked, "Please ma'am, may I sit in that seat?"
 
The French woman looked down her nose at the soldier, sniffed and said, "You Americans.. You are such a rude class of people. Can't you see my little Fifi is using that seat?"
 
The soldier walked away, determined to find a place to rest, but after another trip down to the end of the train, found himself again facing the woman with the dog. Again he asked, "Please lady, may I sit there? I'm very tired."
 
The French woman wrinkled her nose and snorted, "You Americans! Not only are you rude, you are also arrogant." The soldier didn't say anything else; he leaned over, picked up the little dog, tossed it out the window of the train and sat down in the empty seat. The woman shrieked and railed, and demanded that someone defend her and chastise the soldier.
 
An English gentleman sitting across the aisle spoke up, "You know sir, you Americans do seem to have a penchant for doing the wrong thing. You eat holding the fork in the wrong hand. You drive your cars on the wrong side of the road. And now, sir, you've thrown the wrong bitch out the window."
***
On Christmas morning a cop on horseback is sitting at a traffic light, and next to him is Little Johnny on his shiny new bike.
The cop says to the Little Johnny, "Nice bike you got there. Did Santa bring that to you?"Little Johnny replies, "Yeah."The cop says, "Well, next year tell Santa to put a tail-light on that bike."The cop then proceeds to issue the kid a $20.00 bicycle safety violation ticket.Little Johnny takes the ticket and before he rides off says, "By the way, that"s a nice horse you got there. Did Santa bring that to you?"Humoring Little Johnny, the cop says, "Yeah, he sure did."Little Johnny continued, "Well, next year tell Santa to put the dick underneath the horse, instead of on top."
***
A man died and went to Heaven.
As he stood in front of the Pearly Gates, he saw a huge wall of clocks behind him.
He asked, "What are all those clocks for?"
St. Peter answered, "Those are Lie-Clocks. Everyone who has ever been on earth has a Lie-Clock. Every time you lie, the hands on your clock move."
"Oh", said the man. "Whose clock is that?"
"That's Mother Teresa's", replied St. Peter.
"The hands have never moved, indicating that she never told a lie."
"Incredible", said the man.
"And whose clock is that one?"
St. Peter responded, "That's Abraham Lincoln's clock.
The hands have moved twice, telling us that Abraham told only two lies in his entire life."
"Where's Donald Trump's clock?" asked the man.
St. Peter pointed upwards and said, "Right there, we're using it as a ceiling fan.
***
an old man died and was delivered to the local mortuary.....
... and he's wearing an expensive, expertly tailored black suit.

The mortician asks the deceased's wife how she would like the body dressed, pointing out that the man does look good in the black suit he is already wearing.

The widow, however, says that she always thought her husband looked his best in blue, and that she wants him in a blue suit. She gives the mortician a blank check and says, 'I don't care what it costs, but please have my husband in a blue suit for the viewing.'

The woman returns the next day and to her delight, she finds her husband dressed in a gorgeous blue suit with a subtle chalk stripe; the suit fits him perfectly.

She says to the mortician, 'Whatever this cost, I'm very satisfied.. You did an excellent job and I'm very grateful. How much did you spend?'

To her astonishment, the mortician presents her with the blank check, 'There's no charge.'

'No, really, I must compensate you for the cost of that exquisite blue suit,' she says.

'Honestly, ma'am,' the mortician says, 'it cost nothing. You see, a deceased gentleman of about your husband's size was brought in shortly after you left yesterday, and he was wearing an attractive blue suit. I asked his wife if she minded him going to his grave wearing a black suit instead, and she said it made no difference as long as he looked nice.'

'So I just switched the heads.'
***
A guy walks into a bar and sits down.
Bartender asks: "What can I get you?"

Guy says: "Jack and coke"

Bartender nods, goes under the bar, gets up, and puts an apple on the bar. The guy says, "I ordered a Jack and coke, what the hell is this." Bartender says "Just try it." The guy takes a bite and says to the bartender: "Holy shit this tastes just like Jack Daniels!" The bartender says "Turn it around." Guy turns the apple around, takes another bite and says "Holy shit this tastes just like coke!"

Another guy comes into the bar, sits near the first guy. 

Bartender asks: "What can I get you?" 

Guy says: "Vodka tonic."

Bartender nods, goes under the bar, pulls out an apple, and places it on the bar. The guy says "What the hell is this?" Bartender says, "Just try it." The guys does and exclaims "This tastes just like tonic!" The bartender says "Turn it around." The guy does and says "Wow! This tastes like vodka!"

A third guy walks into the bar and sits down. The other two guys say: "This bartender has magic apples that taste like whatever you want! Seriously order ANYTHING and he'll give you an apple that tastes like it!"

The guy says to the bartender: "Okay then, I want an apple that tastes like pussy."

The bartender nods, goes under the bar, takes out an apple, and places an apple on the bar. The guy picks it up, takes a bite and immediately spits it out.

The guys says: "This is disgusting! This tastes like ass!!"

The bartender says: "Turn it around."
***
A police officer pulls over a speeding car..
A police officer pulls over a speeding
car. The officer says, *‘I clocked you at 120 km/h sir.’*  

The driver says, *‘Christ, officer I had it on cruise control at 100,  perhaps your radar gun needs calibrating.’*  

Not looking up from her knitting the wife says, *‘Now don’t be silly dear, you know that this car doesn’t have cruise control.’*  

As the officer writes out the ticket, the driver looks over at his wife and growls, *‘Can’t you please keep your mouth shut for once?’*  

The wife smiles demurely and says, *‘You should be thankful your radar detector went off when it did.’*  

As the officer makes out the second ticket for the illegal radar detector unit. The man glowers at his wife and says through clenched teeth, *‘F**k it woman, can’t you keep your mouth shut?’*  

The officer frowns and says, *‘And I notice that you’re not wearing your seat belt sir. That’s an automatic $75 fine.’*  

The driver says, *‘Yeah well, you see officer, I had it on but took it off when you pulled me over so that I could get my license out of my back pocket.*’  

The wife says, *‘Now dear, you know very well that you didn’t have your seat belt on. You never wear your seat belt when you’re driving.’*  

And as the police officer is writing out the third ticket the driver turns to his wife and barks, *‘WHY DON’T YOU shut the f**k up?*  

The officer looks over at the woman and asks, *‘Does your husband always talk to you this way Ma’am?’*  

The Wife replies, *‘Only when he’s drunk.’*
***
A wife came home early and,
One day, a wife came home early and found her husband in their bedroom making love to a very attractive young woman. Naturally, she was very upset. “You are a disrespectful pig!” she cried. “How dare you do this to me! I’m a faithful wife, the mother of your children! I’m leaving you. I want a divorce right away!”
The husband replied, “Hang on just a minute love, so at least I can tell you what happened.”
“Go ahead,” she sobbed, “but they’ll be the last words you’ll say to me!”
So the husband began, “Well, I was getting into the car to drive home, and this young lady here asked me for a lift. She looked so down and out and defenseless that I took pity on her and let her into the car.
I noticed that she was very thin, not well dressed and very dirty. She told me that she hadn’t eaten for three days. So, in my compassion, I brought her home and warmed up the enchiladas I made for you last night. The ones you wouldn’t eat because you’re afraid you’ll put on weight. The poor thing devoured them in moments!
Since she needed a good clean-up, I suggested a shower, and while she was doing that, I noticed her clothes were dirty and full of holes so I threw them away. Then, as she needed clothes, I gave her the designer jeans that you have had for a few years, but don’t wear because you say they are too tight.
I also gave her the underwear that was your anniversary present, which you don’t wear because I don’t have good taste. I found the sexy blouse my sister gave you for Christmas that you don’t wear just to annoy her and I also donated those boots you bought at the expensive boutique and don’t wear because someone at work has a pair the same.”
The husband took a quick breath and continued, “She was so grateful for my understanding and help that as I walked her to the door, she turned to me with tears in her eyes and said…”
“Do you have anything else that your wife doesn’t use?”
***
My Grandpa's favorite "dumb blonde" joke.
A blonde is on an airplane to Chicago and gets up from her seat in coach and goes into the first class cabin and sits down. 

The flight attendant goes up to the blonde and politely tells her that she does not have a first class ticket and must go back to coach. The blonde refuses and says , "I'm blonde, I'm beautiful, I am going to Chicago, and I am staying right here." 

After repeated attempts and no success at convincing the woman to move, the flight attendant goes into the cockpit and informs the pilot and co-pilot that there's a blonde bimbo sitting in first class who refuses to go back to her proper seat. The co-pilot goes back to the woman and explains why she needs to move, but once again the woman replies by saying, "I'm blonde, I'm beautiful, I'm going to Chicago and I'm staying right here." 

The co-pilot returns to the cockpit and suggests that perhaps they should have the arrival gate call the police and have the woman arrested when they land. The pilot says, "you say she's blonde? I'll handle this. I'm married to a blonde. I speak blonde." He goes back to the woman and whispers quietly in her ear, and she says, "Oh, I'm sorry," then quickly moves back to her seat in coach.

The flight attendant and co-pilot are amazed and ask him what he said to get her to move back to economy without causing any fuss. 

"I told her first class isn't going to Chicago."

edit: Consistency. Apparently, just typing out this joke gives you 'dumb blonde syndrome'. 


***
An Englishman, an Irishman and a Scotsman..
A Scotsman, an Irishman, and an Englishman are each sentenced to a year in solitary confinement; before being locked away, each is to be granted a year's supply of whatever he wants to help him get through the long, long spell alone.

The Scotsman asks for a year's supply of whisky; it's given to him and he's locked away.

The Irishman asks for a year's supply of Guinness so he's locked up with several thousand bottles of it.

The Englishman asks for a year's supply of cigarettes and he's given a pile of cartons and the cell door is shut on him.

One year later, the doors are all unlocked.

The Scotsman staggers out and shouts, 'I'm free!' and then keels over dead from alcohol poisoning.

The Irishman is dragged out into the light, whereupon he promptly dies of liver failure.

When the door to the Englishman's cell is opened, everybody watches eagerly to see what sort of a wreck the man has made of himself.

To their surprise, he walks right out the door, sidles up to the first person he sees, and asks, 'I say you wouldn't happen to have a match, would you?'


***
While in China...
While in China , an American man is very sexually promiscuous and does not use a condom the entire time he is there.
 
A week after arriving back home in the States, he wakes one morning to find his penis covered with bright green and purple spots.
 
Horrified, he immediately goes to see a doctor. The doctor, never having seen anything like this before, orders some tests and tells the man to return in two days for the results.
 
The man returns a couple of days later and the doctor says, “I’ve got bad news for you, you’ve contracted Mongolian VD. It’s very rare and Almost unheard of here in the US , we know very little about it.”
 
The man looks a little perplexed and says, “Well, give me a shot or something and fix me up, Doc.”
 
The doctor answers, “I’m sorry, there's no known cure. We’re going to have to amputate your penis.”
 
The man screams in horror, “Absolutely not! I want a second opinion!!!”
 
The doctor replies, “Well, it’s your choice. Go ahead, if you want but surgery is your only option.”
 
The next day, the man seeks out a Chinese doctor, figuring that he’ll know more about the disease.
 
The Chinese doctor examines his penis and proclaims, “Ah, yes, Mongolian VD.  Vewy ware disease.”
 
The guy says to the doctor, “Yeah, yeah, I already know that, but what can we do? My American doctor wants to cut off my penis!”
 
The Chinese doctor shakes his head and laughs. “Stupid American docttah, always want opawate. Make more money dat way. No need amputate!”
 
“Oh, thank God!” the man exclaims.
 
“Yes,” says the Chinese doctor. “Wait two week. Fall off by itself!”
***
He grasped me firmly but gently just above my elbow and guided me into a room...
He grasped me firmly but gently just above my elbow and guided me into a room, his room. 

Then he quietly shut the door and we were alone.

He approached me soundlessly, from behind, and spoke in a low, reassuring voice close to my ear, “Just relax.”

Without warning, he reached down and I felt his strong, calloused hands start at my ankles, gently probing, and moving upward along my calves slowly but steadily.

My breath caught in my throat. 

I knew I should be afraid, but somehow I didn’t care.

His touch was so experienced, so sure.

When his hands moved up onto my thighs, I gave a slight shudder, and partly closed my eyes. 

My pulse was pounding.

I felt his knowing fingers caress my abdomen, my ribcage. 

And then, as he cupped my firm, full breasts in his hands, I inhaled sharply.

Probing, searching, knowing what he wanted, he brought his hands to my shoulders, slid them down my tingling spine and into my panties.

Although I knew nothing about this man, I felt oddly trusting and expectant.

This is a man, I thought. 

A man used to taking charge.

A man not used to taking ‘no’ for an answer. 

A man who would tell me what he wanted.

A man who would look into my soul and say...

“Okay, ma’am, you can board your flight now.”
***
A Chinese man and a Jew are talking
The Jew says "I still haven't forgiven your people for attacking Pearl Harbor."

To which the Chinese man replies, "That was the Japanese! I'm Chinese you idiot!"

The Jew says "Chinese, Japanese, what's the difference?"

Then the Chinese man says "You know, I haven't forgiven your people for sinking that Titanic."

Shocked, the Jew replies "That was an iceberg you idiot!"

To which the Chinese man says "Iceberg, Goldberg, what's the difference?"

---

I didn't write this joke but it's always funny when I see it. Thought I'd share.
***
Houdini and Criss Angel
Criss Angel and Houdini walk into a bakery. Criss palms 3 Donuts with one hand and puts them in his pocket without anyone noticing. He says, "Do you see how masterful I am Houdini, I make donuts disappear at will!" 

Houdini responds, "Not bad, not bad at all." 

Houdini then goes to the Bakery owner and asks him if he wants to see a magic trick. The curious owner answers, "Of course!" 

Houdini proceeds to ask him for a Doughnut, and then eats it. He asks him for another one, and then eats it as well. He then asks him for a third one, which the owner reluctantly gives up. 

"So where is the magic trick? I gave you 3 donuts already!"

Houdini responds, "Go check Criss Angel's pocket."

***
Drinking problem
A bartender is sitting behind his bar when a well dressed but obviously intoxicated man stumbles in. 

"Bartender! A drink for everyone, a drink for me, and a drink for yourself!" The man yells as he approaches. 

Bartender pours all the drinks, the the whole bar cheers, they all drink. Bartender hands the bill to the man, and he just shrugs and says, "Oh I didn't bring my wallet with me tonight, sorry."
The bartender proceeds to beat the living daylights out of the man and throws him out.

Next night, bartender is again behind his bar when the same well dressed but intoxicated man stumbles in. 

"Bartender! A drink for everyone, a drink for me, and a drink for yourself!" The man happily announces as he approaches. 

Bartender thinks: "This guy cant be that stupid, he probably came to pay. Now I feel bad for beating him so hard previous night." 

He pours all the drinks, the the whole bar cheers, they all drink. Bartender hands the bill to the man, and he again shrugs and says, "Oh I didn't bring my wallet with me again, sorry."
The bartender proceeds to beat the man even harder and kicks him out.

Third night in the row, bartender just cant believe his eyes when he sees the man return.

"Bartender! A drink for everyone, and a drink for me!" The man calls out as he approaches. 

Bartender is fuming and grins sardonically: "What, no drink for ME tonight?"

The drunk looks at him and says: "Nah man, you get way too violent when you drink."



/edit
Removed word too many
***
How many lawyers does it take to change a lightbulb?
Such number as may be deemed necessary to perform the stated task in a timely and efficient manner within the strictures of the following agreement. Whereas the party of the first part, who will be henceforth be addressed as 'the lawyers' and the party of the second part, henceforth addressed as 'the light bulb' do hereby agree to a transaction wherein the party of the second part (light bulb) shall be removed from the current position as a result of failure to perform previously agreed upon duties, i.e. the lighting, elucidation, and otherwise illumination of the area ranging from the front (North) door, through the entryway, terminating at an area just through the primary living area, demarcated by the beginning of the carpet, any spillover illumination being at the option of the party of the second part (light bulb) and not required by the aforementioned agreement between the parties.


The aforementioned removal transaction shall include, but not be limited to, the following steps:


The party of the first part (lawyer) shall, with or without elevation at his option, by means of a chair, step stool, ladder or any other means of elevation, grasp the party of the second part (light bulb) and rotate the party of the second part (light bulb) in a counter clockwise direction, said direction being non-negotiable. Said grasping and rotation of the party of the second part (light bulb) shall be undertaken by the party of the first part (lawyer) to maintain the structural integrity of the party of the second part (light bulb), notwithstanding the aforementioned failure of the party of the second part (light bulb) to perform the customary and agreed upon duties. The foregoing notwithstanding, however, both parties stipulate that structural failure of the party of the second part (light bulb) may be incidental to the aforementioned failure to perform and in such case the party of the first part (lawyer) shall be held blameless for such structural failure insofar as the non-negotiable directional codicil (counter-clockwise) is observed by the party of the first part (lawyer) throughout.


Upon reaching a point where the party of the second part (light bulb) becomes separated from the party of the third part ('receptacle'), the party of the first part shall have the option of disposing of the party of the second part (light bulb) in a manner consistent with all applicable state, local, and federal statutes.


Once separation and disposal have been achieved, the party of the first part (lawyer) shall have the option of beginning the installation of the party of the fourth part ('new light bulb'). This installation shall occur in a manner consistent with the reverse procedures described in step one of this self-same document, being careful to note that the rotation should occur in a clockwise direction, said direction also being non-negotiable and only until the party of the fourth part (new light bulb) becomes snug in the party of the third part (receptacle) and in fact actually becomes the party of the second part (light bulb).


NB: The above described steps may be performed, at the option of the party of the first part (lawyer), by said party of the first part (lawyer), or by his or her heirs and assigns, or by any and all persons authorized by him or her to do so with the objective being to produce a level of illumination in the immediate vicinity of the aforementioned front (North) door consistent with maximization of ingress and revenue for the party of the fifth part, also known as 'The Firm'.

***
Marijuana-Filled Firewood
At the back woods bum-duck county police station the phone rings...

'Hello, is this the Sheriff's Office?'

'Yes. What can I do for you?'

'Ah'm calling to report 'bout my neighbor Mr. Virgil Smith....ya see sir, he's hidin' marijuana inside all his firewood pieces! Don't quite know how he gets it inside dem logs, but he's a-hidin' it there.'

'Thank you very much for the call, sir.'

The next day, the Sheriff's Deputies descend on Virgil's house. They searched the shed where the firewood is kept. Using axes, they bust open every piece of wood, but find no sign of any marijuana. They sneer at Virgil and leave.

Shortly, the phone rings at Virgil's house. 

'Hey, Virgil! This here's Floyd....Did the Sheriff come?'

'Yup sure did!'

'Did they chop all-a ya'all firewood?'

'Yup!'

'Happy Birthday, buddy!' 


by mid_nite_poet


***
A Rapey looking man follows two Nuns...SFW
There were two nuns... 

One of them was known as Sister Mathematical (SM) , 

and the other one was known as Sister Logical (SL) 

It is getting dark and they are still far away from the convent. 

SM: Have you noticed that a man has been following us for the past thirty-eight and a half minutes? I wonder what he wants. 

SL: It's logical He wants to rape us. 

SM: Oh, no! At this rate he will reach us in 15 minutes at the most! What can we do? 

SL: The only logical thing to do of course is to walk faster. 

SM: It's not working. 

SL: Of course it's not working. The man did the only logical thing. He started to walk faster, too. 

SM : So, what shall we do? At this rate he will reach us in one minute. 

SL: The only logical thing we can do is split. You go that way and I'll go this way. He cannot follow us both. 

So the man decided to follow Sister Logical. 

Sister Mathematical arrives at the convent and is worried about what has happened to Sister Logical . 

Then Sister Logical arrives. 

SM: Sister Logical ! Thank God you are here! Tell me what happened! 

SL : The only logical thing happened. The man couldn't follow us both,so he followed me 

SM : Yes, yes! But what happened then? 

SL : The only logical thing happened. I started to run as fast as I could and he started to run as fast as he could. 

SM : And? 

SL : The only logical thing happened. He reached me 

SM : Oh, dear! What did you do? 

SL : The only logical thing to do. I lifted my dress up. 

SM : Oh, Sister! What did the man do? 

SL : The only logical thing to do. He pulled down his pants. 

SM: Oh, no! What happened then? 

SL : Isn't it logical, Sister? 

A nun with her dress up can run faster than man with his pants down. 
***
Every Friday, Ms. Jane ends class a little early...
and plays a game with the kids. She will read off famous quotes, and if one of the students in her 5th grade class can correctly name who said it, they get to leave school a little early. Today the quotes would come from US Presidents. She saw Tommy, who always won this game, sitting in the back, at attention, ready to go home early. She made note to try and let some other people win today. 

The first quote she read was "Speak softly and carry a big stick." Immedietly, little Tommy's hand shot up. She glanced around the room and saw Sara meekly raising her hand, so she picked her. "Who said that, Sara?" Sara correctly responded Teddy Roosevelt, so Ms. Jane let her go home early. 

The next quote was "My fellow Americans, ask not what your country can do for you, ask what you can do for your country." Tommy's hand went right up again, but so did Karen's. Ms. Jane picked Karen, who correctly said John F. Kennedy, so she was allowed to leave early. 

As Ms. Jane looked down, she heard from the back of the classroom, "Jesus, I wish these bitches would just keep their goddamn mouths shut!" Horrified, she looked up and asked who said that. Tommy raised his hand and said "Bill Clinton, can I go home now?"
***
A guy sits at a bar in a skyscraper restaurant high above the city. He slams a shot of tequila, goes over to the window and jumps out.
The guy sitting next to him can’t believe what he just saw. He’s more surprised when, 10 minutes later, the same guy walks back into the bar and sits down next to him.


The astonished onlooker asks, “How did you do that? I just saw you jump out the window, and we’re hundreds of feet above the ground!”



The jumper responds by slurring, “Well, I don’t get it either. I slam a shot of tequila, and when I jump out the window, the tequila makes me slow down right before I hit the ground. Watch.” He takes a shot, goes to the window and jumps out.



The other guy runs to the window and watches as the guy falls to just above the sidewalk, slows down and lands softly on his feet. A few minutes later, the jumper walks back into the bar.



The other guy has to try it, too, so he orders a shot of tequila. He slams it and jumps out the window. As he reaches the bottom, he doesn’t slow down at all. SPLAT!


The first guy orders another shot of tequila. The bartender shakes his head. “You really are an asshole when you’re drunk, Superman.”
***
Fred and Mary got married
Fred and Mary got married, but can't afford a honeymoon, so they go back to Fred's parent'shome for their first night together.

In the morning, Johnny, Fred's little brother, gets up and has his breakfast. As he is going out of the door to go to school, he asks his Mom if Fred and Mary are up yet. 

She replies, 'No'. 

Johnny asks, 'Do you know what I think?' His mom replies, 'I don't want to hear what you think! Just go to school.' 

Johnny comes home for lunch and asks his mom, 'Are Fred and Mary up yet?'

She replies, 'No.'

Johnny says, 'Do you know what I think?' 

His mom replies, 'Never mind what you think! Eat your lunch and go back to school.' 

After school, Johnny comes home and asks again, 'Are Fred and Mary up yet?'

His mom says, 'No.'

He asks, 'Do you know what I think?' 

His Mom replies, 'Ok, tell me what you think?'

He says, 'Last night Fred came to my room for the Vaseline and I think I gave him my airplane glue.' 
__________________
***
A Jewish man sends his son to Israel to live there for a while . . .
A Jewish man sends his son to Israel to live there for a while. Eventually he returns home and he is now a Christian.  The man finds this to be odd and mentions it to his friend.

The friend listens, thinks for a moment and says, "That's odd.  I sent my son to Israel as a Jew and he returned as a Christian."  So the two of them went to see the Rabbi.  

They told the Rabbi the story of how they had both sent their sons to Israel as Jews, and how both sons had returned as Christians.  The Rabbi listened, thought for a minute and then said "That's odd.  I also sent my son to Israel as a Jew and he returned as a Christian."

So the three of them decide to go to Israel to find out what's going on over there.  The arrive and go straight to the Western Wall to pray.  They explain to God all about how they sent their sons to Israel as Jews and how the all returned as Christians."

There is a long silence, and then God begins to speak saying, "That's odd . . . "
***
Unique Dildo!
A blonde walks into a porno shop and asks, "How much for the white dildo?"

 Salesman answers, "$35."

 Blonde: "How much for the black one?"

 Salesman: "$35 for the black one, $35 for the white one."

 Blonde: "I think I'll take the black one. I've never had a black one before." She pays him, and off she goes.

 A little bit later a black woman comes in and asks "How much for the black dildo?"

 Salesman: "$35."

 Black Woman: "How much for the white one?"

 Salesman: "$35 for the white one, $35 for the black one."

 Black Woman: "Hmmm... I think I'll take the white one. I've never had a white one before..." She pays him, and off she goes.

 About an hour later a young blonde woman comes in and asks, "How much are your dildos?"

 Salesman: "$35 for the white, $35 for the black." 

Blonde: "Hmmmmm..., how much is that plaid one on the shelf?"

 Salesman: "Well, that's a very special dildo... it'll cost you $165."

 Blonde: She thinks for a moment and answers, "I'll take the plaid one, I've never had a plaid one before," She pays him, and off she goes.

 Finally, the guy's boss returns and asks, "How did you do while I was gone?"

 To which the salesman responded, "I did really good, I sold one white dildo, one black dildo, and I sold your thermos for $165."
***
An Irishman walks into a bar...
An Irishman arrived at J.F.K. Airport and wandered around the terminal with tears streaming down his cheeks. An airline employee asked him if he was already homesick. “No,” replied the Irishman “I’ve lost all me luggage!” “How’d that happen?” “The cork fell out!” said the Irishman.

An Irish priest is driving down to New York and gets stopped for speeding in Connecticut. The state trooper smells alcohol on the priest’s breath and then sees an empty wine bottle on the floor of the car. He says, “Sir, have you been drinking?” “Just water,” says the priest. The trooper says, “Then why do I smell wine?” The priest looks at the bottle and says, “Good Lord! He’s done it again!”

Two Irishmen were sitting at a pub having beer and watching the brothel across the street. They saw a Baptist minister walk into the brothel, and one of them said, “Aye, ’tis a shame to see a man of the cloth goin’ bad.” Then they saw a rabbi enter the brothel, and the other Irishman said, “Aye, ’tis a shame to see that the Jews are fallin’ victim to temptation as well.” Then they see a catholic priest enter the brothel, and one of the Irishmen said, “What a terrible pity…one of the girls must be dying.

Three Irishmen, Paddy, Sean and Seamus, were stumbling home from the pub late one night and found themselves on the road which led past the old graveyard.. “Come have a look over here,” says Paddy, “It’s Michael O’Grady’s grave, God bless his soul. He lived to the ripe old age of 87.” “That’s nothing,” says Sean, “here’s one named Patrick O’Toole, it says here that he was 95 when he died.”! Just then, Seamus yells out, “Good God, here’s a fella that got to be 145!” “What was his name?” asks Paddy. Seamus stumbles around a bit, awkwardly lights a match to see what else is written on the stone marker, and exclaims, “Miles, from Dublin.”

Drunk OleMulvihill (From the Northern Irish Clan) staggers into a Catholic Church, enters a confessional box, sits down, but says nothing. The Priest coughs a few times to get his attention but OleMulvihill just sits there. Finally, the Priest pounds three times on the wall. The drunk mumbles, “ain’t no use knockin, there’s no paper on this side either.”

Mary Clancy goes up to Father O’Grady’s after his Sunday morning service, and she’s in tears. He says, “So what’s bothering you, Mary my dear?” She says, “Oh, Father, I’ve got terrible news. My husband passed away last night.” The priest says, “Oh, Mary, that’s terrible. Tell me, did he have any last requests?” She says, “That he did, Father…” The priest says, “What did he ask, Mary?” She says, “He said, ‘Please Mary, put down that damn gun!’ “

Happy St. Patrick's Day!
***
Old man and young wife
An older Jewish gentleman marries a younger lady, and they are very much in love.  However, no matter what the husband does sexually, the woman never reaches orgasm.  They go to their rabbi for advice and he says
	“Hire a good looking young man.  While the two of you are making love, have the young man wave a towel over you. That will help her fantasize and orgasm”
	They go home and follow the rabbi’s advice.  They hire a handsome young man and he waves a towel over them as they make love. It doesn’t work.  So they go back to the rabbi and he tells them, “Let’s try it reversed.  Have the young man make love to your wife and you wave the towel over them.” So they go back home to follow the rabbi’s advice again.
	The young man gets into bed with the wife and the old man waves the towel. The young man gets to work with great enthusiasm and the wife soon has an enormous, room shaking, screaming orgasm.
	The husband smiles, looks at the young man and says to him triumphantly, “Schmuck, That’s the way you wave a towel!”
***
Jesus on the cross..
After a brutal and tough day carrying the cross up Golgatha, the Romans nailed Jesus with no remorse to the heavy wooden structure. Golgatha was a grand hill, and as the cross was raised Jesus looked down upon all those gathered before him.

He saw his wonderful mother Mary.
He saw gods children.
He saw Jerusalem in all its glory.

But his eyes finally fell on his good friend and disciple Peter.

"Peteeer", he called through painful breaths, "Peeteerr".

Peter, the must loyal of all Jesus's follows, jumped in shock. He began to run toward Jesus.

"Yes my lord?", Peter replied.

But as soon as he began to get close the Romans roared "NO!", and viciously chopped off poor Peters Legs.

Peter, wallowing in pain, heard his messiah call him again, "Peeetteeer...peeter", growing more faint with each call.

So once again Peter tried, crawling with his arms...pulling as hard as he could.

Suddenly, more sharp Roman swords fell upon him. They took his arms this time, leaving him limbless. But as he lay there, face down in the mud, Peter heard the Son of God once more, "Peeteer".

So Peter rolled this time with all his might, reaching the bottom of the cross. "Yes my lord, Yes, Yes", he screamed with anticipation, "how can I serve you?"

And in his fading breaths, whimpering and quiet, Jesus replied

"Peeter...Peter...I..I can see your house from here!". 

***
A prospector struck it rich...
so he came down from the mountains and walked into a saloon in the nearest town. "I'm lookin' for the meanest, roughest and toughest whore in the Yukon!" he said to the bartender.

"Well, we got her!" replied the barkeep. "She's upstairs in the second room on the right." The prospector handed the bartender a gold nugget to pay for the whore and two botles of beer.

He grabbed the bottles, stomped up the stairs, kicked open the second door on the right and yelled, "I'm lookin' for the meanest, roughest and toughest whore in the Yukon!"

The woman inside the room looked at the miner and said, "You found her!" Then she stripped naked, bent over and grabbed her ankles. "How do you know I want to do it in that position?" asked the miner.

"I don't," replied the whore, "but I thought you might like to open those beers first."
***
A train hits a bus filled with Catholic school girls...
and they all perish. They are in heaven trying to enter the pearly gates when St. Peter asks the first girl, " Tiffany, have you ever had any contact with a male organ? She giggles and shyly replies, "Well, I once touched the head of one with the tip of my finger." St. Peter says, " Okay, dip the tip of your finger in the Holy Water and pass through the gate."
St. Peter asks the next girl the same question, "Jennifer, have you ever had any contact with a male organ?" The girl is a little reluctant but replies, "Well, once I fondled and stroked one." St. Peter says, " Okay, dip your whole hand in the Holy Water and pass through the gate."
All of a sudden, there is a lot of commotion in the line of girls. One girl is pushing her way to the front of the line. When she reaches the front, St.Peter says, "Reeva, What seems to be the rush?" The girl replies, "If I’m going to have to gargle that Holy Water, I want to do it before Jessica sticks her ass in it.
***
A severely obese man walks into a doctor's office to get his medical results.
He waddles his way into the room before he manages to climb up onto the examination table. The room falls silent while the doctor reads through his file. 

"So we did your blood work and I'm sorry to be the one to tell you this...but you have a pretty bad weight problem."

The man sitting on the examination table looks at him with a face of confusion as silence fills the room. He finally answers "...you realize I know that, right? I've been overweight for years. You aren't telling me anything that I don't already know." 

The doctor tosses the man's file onto his desk before cupping his hands over his mouth in momentary thought. "You don't seem to understand the *weight* of your situation so let me attempt to break this down for you. I have been in practice for almost 15 years and you are literally the fattest man who has ever walked into this office. You aren't just fat, you are at a level of obesity that I personally didn't even think was medically possible. The fact that you were able to walk into this office on your own strength alone is a miracle that would make Jesus Christ ask *How'd he do that?* and that guy walked on water. 

When we did your blood work, your blood sugar level was at 500 which effectively makes you a brand of coffee sweetener. I couldn't even take your blood pressure with a normal pressure cuff because of how fat your arms are. I had to jerry-rig a cuff out of the spare tire of my Ford F150. Your cholesterol level came back as Land-O-Lakes. My goal is to try and get that to "I can't believe it's not butter" but even that's a long shot. Your blood was so thick and meaty that we received a call from the blood center asking us why we decided to send them a tube of Ragu to analyze. Are you following me on this or do you need me to give you some more examples?"

The room goes quiet again as the severely obese man stares at the doctor with a face that is beat red from anger. 

"You know what? I didn't come in here to be insulted. I came here to get my medical results from someone who I thought was supposed to be helping me. You may think that you're trying to help me but what exactly are you accomplishing by being such a scumbag about it?"

The doctor goes silent for a moment before finally responding. 

"I was gonna sugar coat it but I was concerned you might eat me."
***
George Bush was visiting the queen of England...
when he asked her "I must say, you run a real tight ship over here, would you mind telling me some of your secrets or advice?".

The queen said "sure, its quite simple, I surround myself with smart people, for example, watch this". She then calls upon Tony Blair. "Tony, I have a simple question, if you mother has a child and your father has a child, and it's not your brother or sister, then who is it?"

Tony Blair thinks for a moment and responds "Well it would be me"

"Correct. Thank you very much Tony" says the queen.

Bush says "Ahh, you know, that's real clever, I might have to try that on some of my cabinet members. Thank you very much"

Bush is now back home in the U.S and calls Donald Rumsfeld to his office.

"Donald, I have a question for you. If your mother has a child and your father has a child and it's not your brother or sister, who is it?"

Donald thinks long and hard and says "You know George, I'm not sure, but I'll give you an answer by tomorrow"

Bush agrees and lets Donald go.

Donald then gathers up the cabinet and asks them the question. Nobody knows the answer, and after many failed attempts somone speaks up and says "I know! lets ask Colin Powell! He's a smart man, he should know". So they call up Colin Powell.

They ask him, "Colin, we have an important question for you... if your mother has a child and your father has a child and it's not your brother or sister, who is it?"

"You bunch of morons, it would be myself!" says Colin Powell.

"Ahhh!! We get it now!" says the members of the cabinet.

The next day Donald Rumsfeld approaches the president.

"Sir, I believe I have the answer to that question you asked me the other day." says Donald.

"Well ok, Donald, what is the answer?"

"Colin Powell!" says Rumsfeld

Bush looks at him for a second and gets up and yells "No you god damn idiot, it's Tony Blair!"
***
An Englishman is having breakfast in  Paris one morning....
...(coffee, croissants, bread, butter and jam) when a Frenchman chewing bubble-gum, sits down next to him. The Englishman ignores the Frenchman who, nevertheless, starts a conversation. 

Frenchman: 'You English folk eat the whole bread??' 

Englishman (in a bad mood): 'Of course.' 

Frenchman: (after blowing a huge bubble) 'We don't. In  France , we only eat what's inside.. The crusts we collect in a container, recycle it, transform them into croissants and sell them to  England .' The Frenchman has a smirk on his face. 

The Englishman listens in silence. 

The Frenchman persists: 'Do you eat jam with the bread??' 

Englishman: 'Of Course.' 

Frenchman: (cracking his bubble-gum between his teeth and chuckling). 

'We don't. In  France we eat fresh fruit for breakfast, then we put all the peels, seeds, and leftovers in containers, recycle them, transform them into jam, and sell the jam to  England .' 

After a moment of silence, The Englishman then asks: 'Do you have sex in  France ?' 

Frenchman: 'Why of course we do', he says with a big smirk. 

Englishman: 'And what do you do with the condoms once you've used them?' 

Frenchman: 'We throw them away, of course.' 

Englishman: 'We don't. In  England , we put them in a container, recycle them, melt them down into bubble-gum, and sell them to  France .'
***
Poodle and Leopard
A wealthy old lady decides to go on a photo safari in  Africa, taking her faithful old poodle, Cuddles, along for the company. 

One day the poodle starts chasing butterflies and before long, Cuddles discovers that he's lost. Wandering about, he notices a leopard heading rapidly in his direction with the intention of having lunch. 

The old poodle thinks, 'Oh, oh! I'm in deep doo-doo now!' Noticing some bones on the ground close by, he immediately settles down to chew on the bones with his back to the approaching cat. Just as the leopard is about to leap the old poodle exclaims loudly, 'Boy, that was one delicious leopard!  I wonder if there are any more around here?' 

Hearing this, the young leopard halts his attack in mid-strike, a look of terror comes over him and he slinks away into the trees. 'Whew!' says the leopard, 'That was close! That old poodle nearly had me!' 

Meanwhile, a monkey who had been watching the whole scene from a nearby tree, figures he can put this knowledge to good use and trade it for protection from the leopard. So off he goes, but the old poodle sees him heading after the leopard with great speed, and figures that something must be up. The monkey soon catches up with the leopard, spills the beans and strikes a deal for himself with the leopard. 

The young leopard is furious at being made a fool of and says, 'Here, monkey, hop on my back and see what's going to happen to that conniving canine! 

Now, the old poodle sees the leopard coming with the monkey on his back and thinks, 'What am I going to do now?', but instead of running, the dog sits down with his back to his attackers, pretending he hasn't seen them yet, and just when they get close enough to hear, the old poodle says. 

'Where's that damn monkey? I sent him off an hour ago to bring me another leopard! 
***
A seriously depressed woman stands at the edge of a cliff.
Trying to get up the nerve to jump.
A passing hobo stops and says, "Since you're about to  kill yourself  anyway, would you mind if we had sex first?"  
The woman said  "Hell no! Get  away from me  you sicko!"  
The bum turned to leave  and muttered,  "Fine,  I'll just go  wait at the bottom".  

***
A British tourist visits a brothel in Germany
Geoffrey, a middle-aged British tourist on his first visit to Germany finds the red light district and enters a large brothel. The madam asks him to be seated and sends over a young lady to entertain him.

They sit and talk, frolic a little, giggle a bit, drink a bit, and she sits on his lap. He whispers in her ear and she gasps and runs away! Seeing this, the madam sends over a more experienced lady to entertain the gentleman.

They sit and talk, frolic a little, giggle a bit, drink a bit, and she sits on his lap. He whispers in her ear, and she too screams, "No!" and walks quickly away.

The madam is surprised that this ordinary looking man has asked for something so outrageous that her two girls will have nothing to do with him. She decides that only her most experienced lady, Lola, will do. Lola has never said no, and it's not likely anything would surprise her. So the madam sends her over to Geoffrey's. They sit and talk, frolic a little, giggle a bit, drink a bit, and she sits on his lap. He whispers in her ear and she screams, "NO WAY, BUDDY!" and smacks him as hard as she can and leaves.

Madam is by now absolutely intrigued, having seen nothing like this in all her years of operating a brothel. She hasn't done the bedroom work herself for a long time, but she's sure she has said yes to everything a man could possibly ask for. She just has to find out what this man wants that has made her girls so angry. Besides she sees a chance to teach her employees a lesson.

So she goes over to Geoffrey and says that she's the best in the house and is available. She sits and talks with him. They frolic, giggle, drink and then she sits in his lap.

He leans forwards and whispers in her ear, "Can I pay in Pounds?"
***
An Australian, and Englishman, and a Japanese guy are shipwrecked...
An Australian, and Englishman, and a Japanese guy are shipwrecked after their cruiseship sank. 

After they compose themselves, the Englishman takes charge of the situation.

He turns to the Australian: "alright chap, I think I shall go down the beach to search for food, shelter, supplies... you know, things that will keep all 3 of us alive until we are rescued."

"No worries." The Australian replies. "You go up the beach, I'll go down the beach and look for supplies."

They turn to the Japanese man. 

The Australian says to him: "maybe you should head inland and look for supplies?"

He is met with a blank stare. After repeating himself, it becomes clear that the Japanese guy knows very little english. 

It takes a lot of gesturing and yelling, but soon the Japanese man nods enthusiastically and runs inland to look for supplies. The other 2 men head off to also search.

Towards sundown, the Englishman and the Australian return with some supplies, but the Japanese man is nowhere to be seen. Worried, the two men head inland to look for him.

They walk for almost an hour, and begin to lose hope. Suddenly, they hear a rustle in the bushes... scared and curious, both men move closer to the noise... and out jumps the Japanese man, yelling "**SUPPLIES!**"


***
Chinese Torture
A young man was wandering, lost, in a forest when he came upon a small house. Knocking on the door he was greeted by an ancient Chinese man with a long, gray beard. "I'm lost," said the man. "Can you put me up for the night?" 

"Certainly," the Chinese man said, "but on one condition. If you so much as lay a finger on my daughter I will inflict upon you the three worst Chinese tortures known to man." 

"OK," said the man, thinking that the daughter must be pretty old as well, and entered the house. Before dinner the daughter came down the stairs. She was young, beautiful and had a fantastic figure. She was obviously attracted to the young man as she couldn't keep her eyes off him during the meal - it didn't hurt his chances that he was the first man she had seen besides her father in years. Remembering the old man's warning he ignored her and went up to bed alone. But during the night he could bear it no longer and snuck into her room for a night of passion. He was careful to keep everything quiet so the old man wouldn't hear and, near dawn, he crept back to his room, exhausted but happy.

He woke to feel a pressure on his chest. Opening his eyes he saw a large rock on his chest. The old man was standing over him "First Chinese torture test: Large rock on chest." "Well, that's pretty crappy," he thought. "If that's the best the old man can do then I don't have much to worry about." He picked the boulder up, waddled over to the window and heaved the boulder out. As he did so the old man smiled softly, "Second Chinese torture test: Rock tied to left testicle." In a panic he glanced down and saw the line that was already getting close to taut. Figuring that a few broken bones was better than castration, he jumped out of the window after the boulder. As he plummeted downward the old man leaned out the window with a large grin, "Third Chinese torture test: Right testicle tied to bedpost." 
***
Anger management (warning: wall of text)

You know, when you occasionally have a really bad day, and you just need to take it out on someone, don't take it out on someone you know, take it out on someone you don't know:

I was sitting at my desk when I remembered a phone call I'd forgotten to make. 

I found the number and dialed it. 

A man answered, saying 'Hello.' 

I politely said,  'This is Chris. Could I please speak with Robyn Carter?' 

Suddenly a manic voice yelled out in my ear 
'Get the right f***ing number!' 
And the phone was slammed down on me. 

I couldn't believe that anyone could be so rude. 

When I tracked down Robyn's correct number to call her, 
I found that I had accidentally transposed the last two digits. 

After hanging up with her, I decided to call the 'wrong' number again. 

When the same guy answered the phone, I yelled 'You're an asshole!' 
And hung up. 

I wrote his number down with the word 'asshole' next to it, 
And put it in my desk drawer. 

Every couple of weeks, when I was paying bills or had a really bad day, 
I'd call him up and yell, 'You're an asshole!' 

It always cheered me up. 

When Caller ID was introduced, I thought my therapeutic 'asshole' calling would have to stop. 

So, I called his number and said, 'Hi, this is John Smith from the telephone company. 
I'm calling to see if you're familiar with our Caller ID Program?' 

He yelled 'NO!' And slammed down the phone. 

I quickly called him back and said, 'That's because you're an asshole!' 
And hung up. 

One day I was at the store, getting ready to pull into a parking spot. 

Some guy in a black BMW cut me off and pulled into the spot I had patiently waited for. 

I hit the horn and yelled that I'd been waiting for that spot, but the idiot ignored me. 

I noticed a 'For Sale' sign in his back window, so I wrote down his number. 

A couple of days later, right after calling the first asshole (I had his number on speed dial) 
I thought that I'd better call the BMW asshole, too. 

I said, 'Is this the man with the black BMW for sale?' 

He said, 'Yes, it is.' 

I then asked, 'Can you tell me where I can see it?' 

He said, 'Yes, I live at 34 Oaktree Blvd. , in Fairfax 
It's a yellow ranch style house And the car's parked right out in front.' 

I asked, 'What's your name?' 

He said, 'My name is Don Hansen.' 

I asked, 'When's a good time to catch you, Don?' 

He said, 'I'm home every evening after five.' 

I said, 'Listen, Don, can I tell you something?' 

He said, 'Yes?' 

I said, 'Don, you're an asshole!' 

Then I hung up, and added his number to my speed dial, too. 

Now, when I had a problem, I had two assholes to call. 

Then I came up with an idea... 

I called asshole #1. 

He said, 'Hello' 

I said, 'You're an asshole!' 
(But I didn't hang up.) 

He asked, 'Are you still there?' 

I said, 'Yeah!' 

He screamed, 'Stop calling me' 

I said, 'Make me.' 

He asked, 'Who are you?' 

I said, 'My name is Don Hansen.' 

He said, 'Yeah? Where do you live?' 

I said, 'Asshole, I live at 34 Oaktree Blvd., in Fairfax, a yellow ranch style home and I have a black Beamer parked in front.' 

He said, 'I'm coming over right now, Don. 
And you had better start saying your prayers.' 

I said, 'Yeah, like I'm really scared, asshole,' and hung up. 

Then I called Asshole #2. 

He said, 'Hello?' 

I said, 'Hello, asshole,' 

He yelled, 'If I ever find out who you are...' 

I said, 'You'll what?' 

He exclaimed, 'I'll kick your ass' 

I answered, 'Well, asshole, here's your chance. 
I'm coming over right now.' 

Then I hung up and immediately called the police, saying that I was on my way over to 34 Oaktree Blvd, in Fairfax, to kill my gay lover. 

Then I called Channel 7 News about the gang war going down in Oaktree Blvd in Fairfax .
I quickly got into my car and headed over to Fairfax . 

I got there just in time to watch two assholes beating the crap out of each other in front of six cop cars, an overhead news helicopter and surrounded by a news crew. 

NOW I feel much better. 

Anger management really does work.
***
A mathematician, a philosopher, and an idiot arrive at the pearly gates...
...St. Peter says to them" Sorry, heaven is quite full, so we can only let one of you in."
Suddenly "Poof!" Lucifer appears. 
Lucifer tells them "You may each ask me one question. If you are able to ask me a question that I cannot answer, you will be allowed into heaven; if not you will be sent to HELL."
With that, the mathematician steps forward and asks Lucifer "What is the most complex mathematical theory ever formulated?!"
Lucifer replies "Easy!" and with the snap of his fingers a stack of papers appears. 
The mathematician goes through the papers and eventually exclaims "Yes, this is the most complex mathematical theory ever formulated." 
Lucifer responds "HAHAHA! Now, go to HELL!!" and the mathematician vanishes.
Next the philosopher approaches. He states "What is a summary of all of Socrates' teachings!?" 
"Easy!" Cries Lucifer, and he snaps his fingers again, making another stack of papers appear. 
The philosopher carefully reads through the pages. Eventually, in defeat, he exclaims "Yes, this must be every single teaching of Socrates."
Lucifer's evil laugh continues, "AAHAHAHAAA! Now, go to HELL!" the philosopher is banished to hell.
Lastly, the idiot steps forward.
"Bring me a chair!" the idiot tells Lucifer. So the devil brings forth a wooden chair. "Drill 6 holes in the seat!" the idiot demands.
So the devil does just that.
Just then, the idiot sits down on the chair and farts very loudly. He then stands up and yells his question at Lucifer "Now, which hole did my fart come out of!!?"
The devil takes the chair, inspecting it closely. He replies "HAHAHA! The third hole from the left, you are mine!!!"
"Wrong!" replies the idiot "It was my asshole!!"
And with that St. Peter opens the gates, and the idiot goes to heaven.
***
An airline joke my 83 YO dad sent me . Slightly NSFW
Dear Airlines:

Dump the male flight Attendants.  No one wanted them in the first place.

Replace all the female flight attendants with YOUNG good-looking strippers!  What the hell!!  They don't even serve food anymore, so what's the loss?

The strippers would at least triple the alcohol sales and get a "party atmosphere" going in the cabin.  And, of course, every businessman in this country would start flying again, hoping to see naked women.  Because of the tips, female flight attendants wouldn't need a salary, thus saving money while the flight attendants jobs would be better paying than ever before.

Muslims would be afraid to get on the planes for fear of seeing naked women.  Hijackings would come to a screeching halt, and the airline industry would see record revenues.  We would not have any need for Air Marshalls, the TSA, etc.  This would make flying easier and safer again and would save even more money.

This is  definitely a win -- win situation if we handle it right -- a golden opportunity to turn a liability into an asset.

Why didn't Bush or Obama think of this?

Why do I still have to do everything myself?


Sincerely,
Donald Trump 
***
Penis Contest
Three third-graders, a Jew, an Italian, and an African American are on the playground at recess. The Jewish kid suggests that they play a new game. "Let's see who has the largest dick," he says. "Okay," they all agree.

The Jewish kid pulls down his zipper and whips it out. "That's nothing," says the Italian kid. He whips his out. His is a couple of inches longer. Not to be outdone, the African American whips his out. It is by far the biggest, dwarfing the other two in both length and width. The Jewish and Italian kid are stunned and amazed. "Wow, that thing is huge!" they exclaim.

That night, eating dinner at home, the African American's mother asks him what he did at school today.

"Oh, we worked on a science project, had a math test and read out loud from a new book ...and during recess, my friends and I played "Let's see who has the largest dick."

"What kind of game is that, honey?" asks his mother.

"Well, me, Sidney and Anthony each pulled out our penises, and I had the biggest! The other kids say its because I'm black. Is that true, Mom?"

The mom replies: "No, honey. It's because you're twenty-three." 
***
Tony and Maria get married...
..and they're spending their honeymoon night at her mother's house. Maria, being a good Italian girl, is a virgin, and has never seen a naked man. The newlyweds go upstairs and start getting undressed.

Tony takes his shirt off, and Maria shrieks and runs downstairs where her mother is making some tomato sauce.

"Momma, momma! Tony has a hairy chest!" cries Maria.

"Men are supposed to have hairy chests, go back upstairs."

So Maria sheepishly goes back upstairs.

When she gets back, Tony starts pulling off his pants, and again, Maria shrieks and runs downstairs.

"Momma, momma! Tony has hairy legs!"

"Men are supposed have hair legs, go back upstairs."

And back upstairs she goes. When she gets back, she watches Tony pull off his socks and notices he's missing three toes on his left foot. He explains he got his foot stepped on by a horse and lost those toes. Once more, Maria runs downstairs.

"Momma, momma! Tony has a foot and a half!"

"Stir the sauce, honey, momma will handle this."

Edit: obviously my self post would make front page XD
***
Isis and the Christian man
An ISIS member stopped the car of a Christian couple.
ISIS member: Are you Muslim?
Christian man: Yes, I'm Muslim.

ISIS member: If you are a Muslim, then recite a verse of Quran.
Christian man recited a verse from the Bible.
ISIS member: Ok yallah go.

Later his wife tells him: "I cannot believe the risk you just took. 
Why did u tell him that we are Muslims? 
If he knew you were lying he would have killed both of us."

"Do not worry! If they knew the Quran they would not kill people" answered the Husband.
***
A Texan walks into an Irish pub...
and clears his voice to the crowd of drinkers. He says, "I hear you Irish are a bunch of hard drinkers. I'll give $500 American dollars to anybody in here who can drink 10 pints of Guinness back-to-back."

The room is quiet and no one takes up the Texan's offer. One man even leaves. Ten minutes later the same gentleman who left shows back up and taps the Texan on the shoulder. "Is your bet still good?", asks the Irishman.

The Texan says yes and asks the bartender to line up 10 pints of Guinness. Immediately the Irishman tears into all 10 of the pint glasses drinking them all back-to-back. The other pub patrons cheer as the Texan sits in amazement.

The Texan gives the Irishman the $500 and says, "If ya don't mind me askin', where did you go for that 10 minutes you were gone?"

The Irishman replies, "Oh...I had to go to the pub down the street to see if I could do it first".
***
An Irish couple took in an 18-year-old girl
An Irish couple took in an 18-year-old girl as a lodger.

She asked if she could have a bath, but the woman of the house told her they didn't have a bath, although if she wanted to, she could use a tin bath in front of the fire. "Monday's the best night, when my husband goes out to darts," she said.

The girl agreed to have a bath the following Monday. After her husband had gone to the pub for his darts match, the woman filled the bath and watched the girl get undressed. She was surprised to see that the lass didn't have any hair "down there. "

She mentioned this to her husband when he came home. He didn't believe her, so she said: "Next Monday, when you go to darts, leave a little early and wait in the back garden. I'll leave a gap in the curtains so you can see for yourself."

So the following Monday, while the girl again got undressed, the wife asked: "Do you shave?" "No," replied the girl. "I've just never grown any hair down there. Do you have hair?"

"Oh, yes," said the woman, and she pulled up her nightdress and showed the girl that she was really generously endowed in the hair department.....very generously indeed.

The girl finished her bath and went to bed. Later that night, when the husband came in, the wife asked him, "Did you see it?" "Yes," he said, "but why the hell did you have to show her yours."

"Why ever are you worried about that?" she said. "You've seen it often enough before."

"I know," he said, "but the entire dart team hadn't!" 
***
a Polish man moved to the USA and married an american girl.
A Polish man moved to the USA and married an American girl.
 
Although his English was far from perfect, they got along very well.
 
One day he rushed into a lawyer's office
and asked him if he could arrange a divorce for him.
The lawyer said that getting a divorce would depend on the circumstances,
and asked him the following questions:
 
Have you any grounds?
Yes, an acre and half and nice little home.
 
No, I mean what is the foundation of this case?
It made of concrete.
 
I don't think you understand.
Does either of you have a real grudge?
No, we have carport, and not need one.
 
I mean what are your relations like?
All my relations still in Poland .
 
Is there any infidelity in your marriage?
We have hi-fidelity stereo and good DVD player.
 
Does your wife beat you up?
No, I always up before her.
 
Is your wife a nagger?
No, she white.
 
Why do you want this divorce?
She going to kill me.
 
What makes you think that?
I got proof.
 
What kind of proof?
She going to poison me.
She buy a bottle at drugstore and put on shelf in bathroom.
I can read English pretty good, and it say:
                 ~~~Polish Remover~~~
***
What do you do all day?
A man came home from work and found his 5 children outside, still in their pyjamas, playing in the mud, with empty food boxes and wrappers strewn around garden, The door of his wife's car was open, as was the front door to the house and no sign of the dog,  
Walking in the door, he found ...an even bigger mess. A lamp had been knocked over, the throw rug was against one wall, In the front room the TV was on loudly with the cartoon channel, the family room was strewn with toys and various items of clothing. In the kitchen, dishes filled the sink, breakfast food was spilled on the counter, the fridge door was open wide, dog food was spilled on the floor, a broken glass lay under the table, and a small pile of sand was spread by the back door.  
He quickly headed up the stairs, stepping over toys and more piles of clothes, looking for his wife. He was worried she might be ill, or that something serious had happened. He was met with a small trickle of water as it made its way out the bathroom door. As he peered inside he found wet towels, scummy soap and more toys strewn over the floor. Miles of toilet paper lay in a heap and toothpaste had been smeared over the mirror and walls.  
As he rushed to the bedroom, he found his wife still curled up in the bed in her pyjamas, reading a novel...  
She looked up at him, smiled and asked how his day went.  
He looked at her bewildered and asked, 'What happened here today?'  
She again smiled and answered, 'You know every day when you come home from work and you ask me what in the world do I do all day?...  
''Yes," was his incredulous reply..  
She answered, 'Well, today I didn't do it.’
***
Some great one-liners from Phyllis Diller
Whatever you may look like, marry a man your own age. As your beauty fades, so will his eyesight.

Housework can't kill you, but why take a chance?

Cleaning your house while your kids are still growing up is like shoveling the walk before it stops snowing.

The reason women don't play football is because 11 of them would never wear the same outfit in public.

Best way to get rid of kitchen odors: Eat out.

A bachelor is a guy who never made the same mistake once.

I want my children to have all the things I couldn't afford. Then I want to move in with them.

Most children threaten at times to run away from home. This is the only thing that keeps some parents going.

Aim high, and you won't shoot your foot off.

Any time three New Yorkers get into a cab without an argument, a bank has just been robbed.

We spend the first twelve months of our children's lives teaching them to walk and talk and the next twelve telling them to sit down and shut up.

Burt Reynolds once asked me out. I was in his room.

You know you're old if your walker has an airbag.

I'm eighteen years behind in my ironing.

What I don't like about office Christmas parties is looking for a job the next day.

The only time I ever enjoyed ironing was the day I accidentally got gin in the steam iron.

I've been asked to say a couple of words about my husband, Fang. How about short and cheap?

His finest hour lasted a minute and a half.

Old age is when the liver spots show through your gloves.

My photographs don't do me justice - they just look like me.

There's so little money in my bank account, my scenic checks show a ghetto.

I admit, I have a tremendous sex drive. My boyfriend lives forty miles away.

My cooking is so bad my kids thought Thanksgiving was to commemorate Pearl Harbor.

My mother-in-law had a pain beneath her left breast. Turned out to be a trick knee.

I asked the waiter, 'Is this milk fresh?' He said, 'Lady, three hours ago it was grass.'

You know you're old if they have discontinued your blood type.
***
an Irish daughter...
had not been home for over 5 years. Upon her return, her father cursed her. 

Where have ye been all this time? Why did ye not write to us, not even a line? Why didn't ye call? Can ye not understand what ye put yer old mum thru? 

The girl, crying, replied, "Sniff, sniff....dad....I became a prostitute...." 

"Ye what!!? Out of here, ye shameless harlot! Sinner! You're a disgrace to this family." 

"OK, dad-- as ye wish. I just came back to give mum this luxurious fur coat, title deed to a ten bedroom mansion plus a savings certificate for £5 million." 

"For me little brother, this gold Rolex and for ye daddy, the sparkling new Mercedes limited edition convertible that's parked outside plus a membership to the country club....(takes a breath)....and an invitation for ye all to spend New Years' Eve on board my new yacht in the Riviera, and...." 

Now what was it ye said ye had become?" says dad. 

Girl, crying again, "Sniff, sniff....a prostitute dad! Sniff, sniff. 

"Oh! Be Jesus! Ye scared me half to death, girl! I thought ye said a Protestant. Come here and give yer old man a hug!"

***
A Chinese couple named Mr. and Mrs. Wong went to the hospital to have a baby...
Mrs. Wong had the baby soon after they arrived, and after they got to see their child, a nurse took it away for medical examinations. When she returned, she was carrying a white baby, not an Asian one. Mr. Wong was surprised and a little annoyed at the mistake and curtly told the nurse to go back and get their actual baby. The nurse insisted that it was the correct child, but Mr. Wong was positive that a mistake had been made, because, as he put it, "Two Wongs don't make a white."
***
A big earthquake with the strength of 8.1 on the Richter scale hits the Middle East .
Two million Muslims die and over a million are injured.

Iraq, Kuwait, UAE, Saudi Arabia and Syria are totally ruined and the governments don't know where to start with providing help to rebuild.

The rest of the world is in shock.

Britain is sending troops to help keep the peace.

Saudi Arabia is sending oil & monetary assistance.

Latin American countries are sending clothing.

New Zealand and Australia are sending sheep, cattle and food crops.

The Asian countries are sending labor to assist in rebuilding the infrastructure.

Canada is sending medical teams and supplies.

President Trump, not to be outdone, is sending back two million replacement Muslims.
***
Can we get married?
On their way to get married, a young Catholic couple is involved in a fatal car accident. The couple find themselves sitting outside the Pearly Gates waiting for St. Peter to process them into Heaven.

While waiting, they begin to wonder: Could they possibly get married in Heaven? When St. Peter showed up, they asked him.

St. Peter said, 'I don't know. This is the first time anyone has asked. Let me go find out,' and he leaves.

The couple sat and waited, and waited. Two months passed and the couple are still waiting. While waiting, they began to wonder what would happen if it didn't work out; could you get a divorce in heaven. After yet another month, St. Peter finally returns, looking somewhat bedraggled.
'Yes,' he informs the couple, 'you can get married in Heaven.'

'Great!' said the couple, 'But we were just wondering, what if things don't work out? Could we also get a divorce in Heaven?'
St. Peter, red-faced with anger, slammed his clipboard onto the ground. 'What's wrong?' asked the frightened couple.

'OH, COME ON!', St. Peter shouted, 'It took me three months to find a priest up here! Do you have any idea how long it'll take me to find a lawyer ?
***
The Geography of a man and women
THE GEOGRAPHY OF WOMAN AND MEN

The Geography of a Woman


Between 18 and 22, a woman is like Africa . Half discovered, half wild, fertile and naturally Beautiful!

Between 23 and 30, a woman is like Europe. Well developed and open to trade, especially for someone of real value.

Between 31 and 35, a woman is like Spain, very hot, relaxed and convinced of her own beauty.

Between 36 and 40, a woman is like Greece, gently aging but still a warm and desirable place to visit.

Between 41 and 50, a woman is like Great Britain, with a glorious and all conquering past.

Between 51 and 60, a woman is like Israel, has been through war, doesn't make the same mistakes twice, takes care of business.

Between 61 and 70, a woman is like Canada, self-preserving, but open to meeting new people.

After 70, she becomes Tibet .
Wildly beautiful, with a mysterious past and the wisdom of the ages.
An adventurous spirit and a thirst for spiritual knowledge.


THE GEOGRAPHY OF A MAN

Between 1 and 80, a man is like Iran ,
ruled by a pair of nuts.

THE END.
***
If every joke happened in the same universe...
A horse walks into a bar. The bartender says, "why the long face?" The horse stands there, staring blankly at the bartender. Everyone starts to feel a little awkward.
The horse's handler comes in and leads it out, but not before it's knocked over a couple of glasses and soiled itself. Needless to say, the bar is closed for the rest of the day.
Jesus walks up to the bar, but it's closed for hygiene reasons and he goes next door to a hotel. He hands the receptionist a couple of nails and says "Can you put me up for the night?"
The receptionist takes a moment to understand, not speaking Aramaic, but is able to explain in mime that nails are not legal tender. After Jesus leaves disgruntledly, a duck that has been kind of harrassing the receptionist for the last few days by asking for grapes waddles in. The duck asks if the receptionist has any nails, and the receptionist finally snaps.
Deciding to walk out on the most ludicrous workday of his life, receptionist goes to the bar, and is infuriated to find it closed. He jimmies open a window, not caring who sees. But two old friends across the street, a priest and a rabbi, DO see. They decide they should do something to calm this agitated man down, and follow him into the bar.
The bartender, having spent all day cleaning up after the horse, sees the receptionist, the priest and the rabbi come into the bar, and stops scrubbing shit long enough to ask "Is this some kind of a joke?"
***
A teacher was teaching her second grade class about the government
so for homework that one day, she told her her students to ask their parents what the government is.

When Little Johnny got home that day, he went up to his dad and ask his what the government was.

His dad thought for a while and answered, ''Look at it this way: I'm the president, your mom is Congress, your maid is the work force, you are the people and your baby brother is the future.''

''I still don't get it'' responded the Little Johnny.

''Why don't you sleep on it then? Maybe you'll understand it better,'' said the dad.

''Okay then...good night'' said Little Johnny went off to bed. In the middle of the night, Little Johnny was awakened by his baby brother's crying. He went to his baby brother's crib and found that he had taken a crap in his diaper. So Little Johnny went to his parent's room to get help. When he got to his parent's bedroom, he looked through the keyhole to check if they were asleep. Through the keyhole he saw his mom loudly snoring, but his dad wasn't there. So he went to the maid's room. When he looked through the maid's room keyhole, he saw his dad having sex with his maid. Little Johnny was surprised, but then he just realized something and thinks aloud, ''OH!! Now I understand the government! The President is fucking the work force, Congress is fast asleep, nobody cares about the people, and the future is full of shit!''
***
A man, an ostrich and a cat walk into a bar...
One day, a man walks into a bar with an ostrich and a cat. The man orders a beer, and so does the ostrich. The cat orders half a pint, and refuses to tip the bartender. The bartender tells them their bill is $10.78. The man reaches into his pocket and gets exactly $10.78.

The next day, the man, the ostrich and the cat go back to the bar. They order the same thing as the day before, and again the cat is really rude to the bartender and won't tip him. The bartender tells them that their bill is $10.78. The man reaches into his pocket and gets exactly $10.78.

The next day, the man, the ostrich and the cat go back into the bar. This time the man and the ostrich order a double scotch. The cat orders a scotch and is rude to the bartender. The bartender smiles to himself, knowing that there is no chance the man will get the exact amount of money, and he's getting pissed at the cheapskate cat. He tells the man that their bill is $15.63.

The man reaches into his pocket and gets the exact change! The bartender is astonished. He asks the man how he always gets the right amount of change.

The man tells him, "Well, one day I came across a lamp. I rubbed it and a genie came out. He told me I could have any three wishes I wanted. My first wish was that I could reach into my pocket and get the exact change of anything I was buying."

"Very smart," said the bartender.

"My second wish was to have a high tolerance for alcohol."

"Good choice!" the bartender exclaimed. "What was your third wish?"

"Well, that wasn't too bright on my part. I wished for a chick with long legs and a tight pussy." 
***
So I went to a mixed religion seminar...
The Christian Priest came, laid his hands on my hand and said, “By the will of Jesus Christ, you will walk today!”

I smiled and told him I was not paralysed.
 
The Rabbi came, laid his hands on my hand and said, “By the will of God Almighty, you will walk today!

I was less amused when I told him there was nothing wrong with me.
 
The Mullah came, took my hands and said, “Insha Allah, you will walk today!”

I snapped at him, “There’s nothing wrong with me”
 
The Buddhist Monk came, held my hands and said, “By the will of The Great Buddha, you will walk today!”

I rudely told him there was nothing wrong with me.
 
After the sermons, I stepped outside and found my car had been stolen.

Edit: Thanks for the upvotes 😊
If I have inadvertently upset anyone, I apologize. It was just meant as a joke intended 2 give u a chuckle.
***
A priest is fishing at a local watering hole...
A priest is fishing a local watering hole one afternoon and catches an odd looking fish.  The guy down the shore explains it’s called a Sonofabitch fish.  The priest is not amused but the fisherman swears it is correct.  When he gets back to the church rectory the priest gives the fish to the groundskeeper to clean and says “Here’s a Sonofabitch we can have for dinner!”  “FATHER!” he gasps, and the priest explains that’s the real name of the fish.   The groundskeeper later gives the fillets to the head nun and says “You can cook this Sonofabitch for dinner.” “MY DEAR SIR!” she exclaims, and the groundskeeper chuckles and agrees it’s an odd name but is truly correct.  

That evening during dinner the pope himself stops in for a surprise visit and takes a seat at the table.  “This is the most wonderful fish!” the pope exclaims.  “I caught the Sonofabitch!” says the priest; “I cleaned the Sonofabitch!” barks the groundskeeper; “Yes, and I cooked the Sonofbitch!” announces the nun.  Nodding, the pope looks around the table slyly and says “You know what?  You fuckers are alright.”
***
A kid goes to church to confess...
"Bless me Father, for I have sinned. I have been with a loose girl." 

The priest asks, "Is that you, little Joey Pagano?"

"Yes, Father, it is." 

"And who was the girl you were with?" 

"I can't tell you, Father. I don't want to ruin her reputation." 

"Well, Joey, I'm sure to find out her name sooner or later so you may as well tell me now. Was it Tina Minetti?"

"I cannot say." 

"Was it Teresa Mazzarelli?" 

"I'll never tell." 

"Was it Nina Capelli?" 

"I'm sorry, but I cannot name her." 

"Was it Cathy Piriano?" 

"My lips are sealed."

"Was it Rosa DiAngelo, then?" 

"Please, Father! I cannot tell you." 

The priest sighs in frustration. "You're very tight lipped, and I admire that. But you've sinned and have to atone. You cannot be an altar boy now for 4 months. Now you go and behave yourself." 

Joey walks back to his pew, and his friend Franco slides over and whispers, "What'd you get?" 

"Four months vacation and five good leads..."

***
Really busy century in heaven
Three guys die and go to heaven. St. Peter says "Listen - we're having a really busy century, so we need to manage admissions tightly. Right now we can only admit people who have died in horrible fashions, and those who have died in a more mundane way will have to wait in limbo, and it could take a decade or two to work you in."

So St. Peter takes aside the first man, and asks him how he died. "Well, I'd been suspicious of my wife having an affair for some time now, so today I came home from work early. I just knew the guy was in my apartment, but I couldn't find him. I looked everywhere and was just about to give up, when I went out on the balcony of my 23rd story apartment and there he was hanging over the edge! He was just barely hanging on, there was no way he could climb back onto the balcony. It was a really stupid place to try to hide. I was livid, so I started punching him and clawing at his fingers, but he held on. Finally I went to get a hammer and started pounding on his fingers, and he fell down. But what really angered me was that he landed in some bushes and fell to the ground dazed, but basically OK! I was so mad I grabbed the refrigerator, threw it off the balcony and it landed on him. Unfortunately I was so riled up by the incident I had a heart attack and died."

St. Peter was taken aback, and said "While you did die in a dramatic fashion, I think we need to look at that whole second degree murder before we let you in - off to limbo with you." He then approached the second man and asked him how he had died.

"I was riding my exercise bike on the balcony of my 24th story apartment, when the thing broke and threw me over the railing! I grabbed furiously at the railing and slipped, but managed to catch on the balcony below mine. I tried to climb up but it just wasn't possible. I thought I was going to fall but then someone came out on the balcony. I thought he would help me, until he started hitting me! I held on as best I could, but when he got a hammer and started hitting me I finally couldn't hold on anymore and fell. Somehow, though, I fell in some bushes and fell to the ground dazed, but basically OK! Just as I'm coming around, I look up and BAM this refrigerator lands on me. So here I am."

St. Peter immediately admitted this second man to heaven, and pulled aside the third man and asked him for his story.

"Picture this: I'm hiding naked in a refrigerator...
***
Two beggars are sitting side by side on a street in Rome
Two beggars are sitting side by side on a street in Rome, Italy. One has a Cross in front of him, the other one is holding the Star of David.

Many people go by, look at both beggars, but only put money into the hat of the beggar sitting behind the Cross.
The Pope comes by;He stops to watch the throngs of people giving money to the beggar who holds the Cross while none give to the beggar holding the Star of David.

Finally, the Pope approaches the beggar with the Star of David and says:
"My poor fellow, don't you understand?  This is a Catholic country, this city is the Seat of Catholicism.  People aren't going to give you money if you sit there with a Star of David in front of you, especially when you're sitting beside a beggar who is holding a Cross. In fact, they would probably give more money to him just out of spite."

The beggar with the Star of David listened to the Pope, smiled, and turned to the beggar with the cross and said:  
"Moishe, look who's trying to teach the Goldstein brothers about
marketing!"
***
The CEO of Budweiser, Miller and Carlsberg walks into a bar.
The CEO of Budweiser walks up to the bar and orders a Budweiser, after which the CEO of Miller orders a Miller. Then the CEO of Carlsberg says to the bartender: "I'll have a glass of water." The others looks baffled and asks him: "Why didn't you order a Carlsberg?". He replies: "Well, since you're not having beer..."
***
The seven dwarves went to the Vatican and when the Pope answered the door, Dopey stepped forward...
"Your Excellency," he said. "I wonder if you could tell me if there are any dwarf nuns in Rome?" 

"No, Dopey, there aren't," the Pope replied.

Behind Dopey, the six dwarfs started to titter. 

"Well, are there any dwarf nuns in Italy?" Dopey persisted. 

"No, none in Italy," the Pope answered more sternly. 

A few more dwarfs began to laugh openly.

"Well, are there any dwarf nuns in Europe?" 

This time the pope was much more firm. 

"Dopey, there are no dwarf nuns in Europe."

By this point, the other dwarfs were laughing out loud and rolling on the ground. 

"Pope," Dopey demanded. "Are there any dwarf nuns in the world?" 

"No Dopey!" He snapped. "There are no dwarf nuns anywhere in the world."

Whereupon the six dwarfs started jumping up and down chanting, "Dopey fucked a penguin! Dopey fucked a penguin!"
***
Three Italian nuns die and go to heaven...
Three Italian nuns die and go to heaven, where they are met at the Pearly Gates by St. Peter. He says, "Ladies, you all led such wonderful lives, that I'm granting you six months to go back to Earth and be anyone and do anything you want."

The first nun says, "I want-a to be Taylor Swift" and *poof!* she's gone.

The second says, "I want-a to be Madonna" and *poof!* she's gone.

The third says, "I want-a to be Alberto Pipalini."

St. Peter looks perplexed. "Who?" he says.

"Alberto Pipalini" replies the nun.

St. Peter shakes his head and says "I'm sorry but that name just doesn't ring a bell."

The nun then takes a newspaper out of her habit and hands it to St. Peter. He reads the paper and starts laughing. He hands it back to her and says "No Sister, this says 'Alberta Pipeline laid by 800 men in 6 months'! " 
***
English can be a silly language...
The European Union commissioners have announced that an agreement has been reached to adopt English as the preferred language for European communications (rather than German, which was the other possibility).

As part of the negotiations, the British government conceded that English spelling had some room for improvement and has accepted a five-year phased plan for what will be known as EuroEnglish (Euro for short).

In the first year, "s" will be used instead of the soft "c". Sertainly, sivil servants will resieve this news with joy. Also, the hard "c" will be replaced with "k". Not only will this klear up konfusion, but keyboards kan have one less letter.

There will be growing publik enthusiasm in the sekond year, when the troublesome "ph" will be replaced by "f". This will make words like "fotograf" and "fosforous" up to 20 persent shorter.

In the third year, publik akseptanse of the new spelling kan be expekted to reach the stage where more komplikated changes are possible. Governments wil enkourage the removal of double leters, which have always ben a deterent to akurate speling. Also, al wil agre that the horible mes of silent "e"s in the languag is disgrasful, and they would go.

By the fourth year, peopl wil be reseptiv to steps such as replasing "th" by "z" and "w" by "v".

During ze fifz year, ze unesesary "o" kan be dropd from vords kontaining "ou", and similar changes vud of kors be aplied to ozer kombinations of leters.

After zis fifz yer, ve vil hav a sensibl riten styl. Zer vil be no mor trubls or difikultis and evrivun vil find it ezi tu understand ech ozer.
Zen ze drem vil hav finali kum tru.

> Copied from /u/banditski in an /r/funny thread, apparently it's been around for a while, but I enjoyed it.
***
Donald Trump visits an elementary school
Donald Trump is visiting a elementary school and he visits one of the classes. They are in the middle of a discussion related to words and their meanings. The teacher asks Mr Trump if he would like to lead the discussion of the word "tragedy."
So he asks the class for an example of a tragedy. One little boy stands up and offers: "If my best friend who lives on a farm, is playing in the field and a runaway tractor comes along and knocks him dead, that would be a tragedy."
"No," says Mr Trump, "that would be an accident."
A little girl raises her hand: "If a school bus carrying 50 children drove over a cliff, killing everyone inside, that would be a tragedy."
"I'm afraid not," explains the exalted businessman. "That's what we would call a great loss."
The room goes silent. No other children volunteer. Mr Trump searches the room. "Isn't there someone here who can give me an example of a tragedy?"
Finally at the back of the room, little Johnny raises his hand. In a quiet voice he says: "If a private jet carrying you was struck by a missile and blown to smithereens, that would be a tragedy."
"Fantastic!" exclaims Mr Trump, "That's right. And can you tell me why that would be a tragedy?"
"Well," says the boy, "because it sure as hell wouldn't be a great loss and it probably wouldn't be an accident either."

***
A radio station was having a contest to see who could come up with a new word
Host: “96 FM here, what’s your name?”

Caller: “Hi, my name’s Dave.”

Host: “Dave, what’s your word?”

Caller: “Goan... spelt G-O-A-N pronounced ‘go-an’.”

Host: “You are correct, Dave, ‘goan’ is not in the dictionary. Now, for a trip to the Bahamas: What sentence can you use that word in that would make sense?”

Caller: “Goan fuck yourself!”

The host cut the caller off and took other calls, all unsuccessful until:

Host: “96 FM, what’s your name?”

Caller: “Hi, me name’s Jeff.”

Host: “Jeff, what’s your word?”

Caller: “Smee, spelt S-M-E-E, pronounced ‘smee’.”

Host: “You are correct, Jeff, ‘smee’ is not in the dictionary. Now, for a trip to the Bahamas: What sentence can you use that word in that would make sense?”

Caller: “Smee again! Goan fuck yourself!”
***
Italian and a Rabbi are riding on a train together...
They get acquainted, and at one point the Italian takes some sausage out of his bag and offers some to his companion.

Rabbi asks, "Is it made from pork?"

"Yes", replies the Italian.

"Well then, I can't eat it.  It's not kosher.  God's law."

The Italian shrugs and eats the sausage, then pulls out a bottle of wine, offering some.

Rabbi looks at the bottle and says, "It's not kosher, I can't drink it.  God's law."

Italian says, "Wow your god is strict.  What if there was nothing kosher around to eat or drink?"

Rabbi replies, "Well, he makes exceptions in situations of life and death."

With that, the Italian points a gun at the rabbi and says, "Drink the wine or I'll blow your head off!!"

Rabbi grabs the bottle, and with a very annoyed look on his face, downs the rest of it.

"Please don't be upset with me.  I just wanted you to have some wine", says the Italian.

Rabbi says, "Of course I'm upset!  Where was the gun when you had some sausage left?!?"
***
Jesus is watching you
A burglar broke into a house one night. He shined his flashlight around, looking for valuables when a voice in the dark said, ‘Jesus knows you’re here.’ 

He nearly jumped out of his skin, clicked his flashlight off, and froze. When he heard nothing more, after a bit, he shook his head and continued. Just as he pulled the stereo out so he could disconnect the wires, clear as a bell he heard a voice....say, ‘Jesus is watching you.’

 Freaked out, he shined his light around frantically, looking for the source of the voice. Finally, in the corner of the room, his flashlight beam came to rest on a parrot. ‘Did you say that?’ he hissed at the parrot. 

‘Yep’, the parrot confessed, then squawked, ‘I’m just trying to warn you that he is watching you.’ The burglar relaxed. ‘Warn me, huh? Who in the world are you?’


‘I'm Moses.’ replied the bird. 

‘Moses?’ the burglar laughed. ‘What kind of people would name a bird Moses?’



‘The same kind of people that would name their Rottweiler Jesus.’
***
The train was quite crowded and a U. S. Marine walked...
The train was quite crowded and a U. S. Marine walked the
 entire length looking for a seat. 

There seemed to be one
 next to a well-dressed French woman, but when he got there,
 he saw it was taken by the woman's poodle. 

The war-weary
 Marine asked, "Ma'am, may I have that seat?"
 The French woman sniffed and said to no one in particular,
 "Americans are so rude. My precious little Fifi is using
 that seat."


 The Marine walked the entire train again, but the only seat
 available was under that dog. "Please, ma'am. May I sit
 down? I'm very tired."
 She snorted, "Not only are you Americans rude, you are also
 arrogant!"


 This time the Marine didn't say a word; he just picked up
 the little dog, tossed it out the train window and sat down.
 The woman shrieked, "Someone defend me! Put this American in
 his place!"


 An English gentleman sitting nearby spoke up. "Sir, you
 Americans seem to have a penchant for doing the wrong thing.
 You hold the fork in the wrong hand. You drive your autos on
 the wrong side of the road. And now, sir, you seem to have
 thrown the wrong bitch out the window.


Happy Memorial Day
Semper Fi


EDIT:  Well clearly some people need to unsubscribe from this subreddit because you clearly cannot handle a joke. 

Also, when I say Happy Memorial Day, it is a meaning of respect just to say those words. I'm not trying to make this out to be the barbecue day that most think it is, I tell everyone Happy Memorial Day as a remembrance of those who have paid the ultimate sacrifice.
***
A frog goes into a bank...
A frog goes into a bank and approaches the teller. He can see from her nameplate that her name is Patricia Whack. "Miss Whack, I'd like to get a $30,000 loan to take a vacation." Patty looks at the frog in disbelief and asks his name. The frog says his name is Kermit Jagger, his dad is Mick, and that it's okay, he knows the bank manager.
Patty explains that he will need to secure the loan with some collateral. The frog says, "Sure. I have this," and produces a tiny porcelain elephant, about an inch tall, bright pink and perfectly formed. Very confused, Patty explains that she'll have to consult with the bank manager and disappears into a back office.
She finds the manager and says, "There's a frog called Kermit Jagger out there who claims to know you and wants to borrow $30,000, and he wants to use this as collateral." She holds up the tiny pink elephant. "I mean, what in the world is this?"
The bank manager looks back at her and says...
"It's a knick-knack, Patty Whack. Give the frog a loan. His old man's a Rolling Stone."
***
It's Saturday morning and John's just about to set off on a round of golf...
It's Saturday morning and John's just about to set off on a round of golf when he realizes that he forgot to tell his wife that the guy who fixes the washing machine is coming around at noon. So John heads back to the clubhouse and phones home.
"Hello?" says a little girl's voice.

"Hi, honey, it's Daddy," says John. "Is Mommy near the phone?"

"No, Daddy. She's upstairs in the bedroom with Uncle Fred."

After a brief pause, John says, "But you haven't got an Uncle Fred, honey!"

"Yes, I do, and he's upstairs in the bedroom with Mommy!"

"Okay, then. Here's what I want you do. Put down the phone, run upstairs and knock on the bedroom door and shout in to Mommy and Uncle Fred that my car's just pulled up outside the house."

"Okay, Daddy!" A few minutes later, the little girl comes back to the phone. "Well, I did what you said, Daddy."

"And what happened?"

"Well, Mommy jumped out of bed and ran around screaming, then she tripped over the rug and went out the front window and now she's all dead."

"Oh, my God! What about Uncle Fred?"

"He jumped out of bed too, and he was all scared, and he jumped out the back window into the swimming pool. But he must have forgot that last week you took out all the water to clean it, so he hit the bottom of the swimming pool and now he's dead too."

There is a long pause.

"Swimming pool? Is this 555-3097?"
***
So the Pope is on state visit...
So the Pope is on state visit to the US and is travelling in his limousine towards the hotel from JFK. Halfway there he tries to convince his chauffeur if he may drive it himself.

"Sorry mr Pope. 'Tis against company policy for clients to drive."

"Yeah but can't you make an exception just for today? Come on. The Vatican is too small for driving around and this thing sounds like it's got a V8 in it."

So after a lot of haggling the chauffeur relents. This is the Pope after all.

The Pope gets behind the wheel and the driver slides into the back. His holiness then promptly tries to see how fast the limo would go. Needless to say, a state trooper pulls him over.

After the Pope has winded down the drivers window the state trooper loses all colour in his face. 

He pulls out his radio: "C-c-control, this is unit 4. Need advice on procedure after pulling over a VIP for speeding."

Control responds: "Unit 4. You know the drill. No exceptions for VIP's according to state law."

He looks at the Pope again.

"Er... I don't think you quite understand. This is actually VVIP."

Control gets agitated: "Damn you unit 4. So who exactly is this VVIP?"

"I think it's God because the Pope is his chauffeur."

***
An elderly woman enters the Canadian National Bank with a bag full of money
She insisted she wanted to speak with the president of the National Bank in order to open an account, saying "a lot of money" was to be dealt with.

After some hesitation, the staff escorted the elderly woman to the president's office. The president asked how much money she wished to deposit in the bank.

'$165,000' she answered, and poured the bank notes from her bag on the table.

Obviously, the president got really curious about the origin of all this money, so he asked where the cash came from.

'Gambling' she muttered.

'What kind of gambling?' the president asked.

'Bets. Let me give you a real example. I'll bet you $25,000 that your balls are rectangular.'

'Hahaha. That's a stupid bet. You could never win.'

'Would you care to accept the bet, then?' asked the elderly woman in a challenging tone.

'Of course! I'll bet $25,000 that my balls aren't rectangular!'

'Since it's such a large sum, would it be possible for me to return tomorrow morning with my attorney as our witness?'

'Sure' said the president of the bank in an extremely satisfied tone.

That night, the president actually got scared because of the bet. He spent quite some time in front of the mirror, checking his balls, turning them to the left, to the right, and to the left again. He meticulously inspected them to make 100% sure his balls weren't rectangular so he could win the bet.

The next morning, the elderly woman entered the president's office with her lawyer. She introduced the latter to the president and repeated the bet.

'So $25,000 that the president's balls are rectangular!'

The president accepted the bet once again, then the little old woman asked him to lower his pants so they could all see his balls. The president complied. The elderly woman inspected his balls really closely, then inquired whether she could touch them, which the president accepted... after all, he had the opportunity to win $25,000!

That's when he noticed the woman's lawyer started to bang his head against the wall.

'What's the problem with your attorney, m'am?'

'Oh, nothing. Only that yesterday I bet him $100,000 that today I'd hold the president of the Canadian National Bank's balls in my hand.'
***
Everything is bigger in Texas
A Texan man was driving thru rural NSW with his Aussie chaperone when they passed a cornfield.

'You know back where I am from in Texas our cornfields are ten times larger then that' scoffs the Texan.

Next they drive past a couple of barns.

'You know back where I am from in Texas our barns are ten times larger then that'

They continue along when they pass an open field with kangaroos jumping about. 

'What do you call those things' asks the shocked Texan.

The Aussie chaperone replies 'don't you have grasshoppers in Texas?' 
***
The Smuggler
Juan comes up to the Mexican border on his bicycle. He's got two large bags over his shoulders. The guard stops him and says, "What's in the bags?" 

"Sand," answered Juan.

The guard says, "We'll just see about that. Get off the bike." The guard detains Juan overnight and has the sand analyzed, only to discover that there is nothing but pure sand in the bags. He releases Juan and lets him cross the border.

A week later, the same thing happens. The guard asks, "What's in the bags?" 

"Sand," says Juan. 

The guard does his thorough examination and discovers that the bags contain nothing but sand. He gives the sand back to Juan, and Juan crosses the border on his bicycle. 

This sequence of events is repeated every day for three years. 

Finally, Juan doesn't show up one day and the guard meets him in a Cantina in Mexico. 

"Hey Buddy," says the guard, "I know you are smuggling something. It's driving me crazy. It's all I think about...Just between you and me, what are you smuggling?" 

Juan sips his beer and says, "Bicycles."
***
A couple went golfing one day at a very exclusive course lined with million dollar homes.
On the third tee, the husband cautioned, Honey, be careful when you drive. If we break one of those windows, it'll cost us a fortune to repair.

Of course, she immediately shanked her drive right through the window of the biggest house on the course. The husband cringed, I warned you to watch out! Now we'll have to go up there and apologize and see how much that lousy drive is going to cost us.

They walked up, knocked on the door, and a warm voice said, "Come on in". When they opened the door they saw glass all over the place and a broken antique bottle lying on its side near the broken window. A man reclining on the couch asked, Are you the people that broke the window?

Uh yeah, we're very sorry about that, the husband replied.

"Oh, no apology is necessary. Actually I want to thank you. You see, I'm a genie, and I've been trapped in that bottle for a thousand years. Now that you've released me, I'm allowed to grant three wishes. I'll give you each one wish, and I'll keep the last one for myself."

"Wow, that's great!" the husband said. He pondered a moment and blurted out, "I'd like a million dollars a year for the rest of my life."

"No problem," said the genie, "You've got it. I have already put a million dollars in your bank account. It's the least I can do."

"And now you, young lady, what do you want?" the genie asked.

"I'd like to own a gorgeous home complete with servants in every country in the world," she said.

"Consider it done. The deeds are now in your name" the genie said.

"And now," the couple both asked in unison, "what's your wish, genie?"

"Well, since I've been trapped in that bottle and haven't been with a woman in a thousand years, my wish is to have sex with your wife."

The husband looked at his wife and said, "Gee, honey, you know we both now have a fortune, and all those houses. What do you think?"

She mulled it over for a few moments and said, "You know, you're right. Considering all that, I guess I wouldn't mind."

The genie and the woman went upstairs where he ravished her for the rest of the afternoon. Both satisfied each other repeatedly, and afterwards, the genie rolled over and looked at the wife and asked, "How old are you and your husband?"

"Why, we're both thirty-five," she responded breathlessly.

"No shit! Thirty-five years old and both of you still believe in genies..."
***
A duck walks into a pub...
*(Stolen from Facebook.  Apologies if it's a repost.)*

A duck walks into a pub and orders a pint of beer and a ham sandwich.
The barman looks at him and says, "Hang on! You're a duck."

"I see your eyes are working," replies the duck.

"And you can talk!" exclaims the barman.

"I see your ears are working, too," says the duck. "Now if you don't mind, can I have my beer and my sandwich please?"

"Certainly, sorry about that," says the barman as he pulls the duck's pint. "It's just we don't get many ducks in this pub. What are you doing round this way?"

"I'm working on the building site across the road," explains the duck. "I'm a plasterer."

The flabbergasted barman cannot believe the duck and wants to learn more, but takes the hint when the duck pulls out a newspaper from his bag and proceeds to read it.

So, the duck reads his paper, drinks his beer, eats his sandwich, bids the barman good day and leaves.

The same thing happens for two weeks, then one day the circus comes to town.

The ringmaster comes into the pub for a pint and the barman says to him, "You're with the circus, aren't you? Well, I know this duck that could be just brilliant in your circus. He talks, drinks beer, eats sandwiches, reads the newspaper and everything!"

"Sounds marvelous," says the ringmaster, handing over his business card. "Get him to give me a call."

So the next day when the duck comes into the pub the barman says, "Hey Mr. Duck, I reckon I can line you up with a top job, paying really good money."

"I'm always looking for the next job," says the duck. "Where is it?"

"At the circus," says the barman.

"The circus?" repeats the duck.

"That's right," replies the barman.

"The circus?" the duck asks again “with the big tent?"

"Yeah," the barman replies.

"With all the animals who live in cages, and performers who live in caravans?" says the duck.

"Of course," the barman replies.

"And the tent has canvas sides and a big canvas roof with a hole in the middle?" persists the duck.

"That's right!" says the barman.

The duck shakes his head in amazement, and says, "What on earth would they want with a plasterer??!"
***
Selling war insurance
Airman Jones was assigned to the induction center where he was to advise new recruits about their government benefits, especially their GI insurance. 

It wasn't long before Captain Smith noticed that Airman Jones had almost a 100% record for insurance sales, which had never happened before. 

Rather than ask about this, the Captain stood in the back of the room and listened to Jones's sales pitch.

Jones explained the basics of the GI Insurance to the new recruits, and then said:"If you have GI Insurance and go into battle and are killed, the government has to pay $200,000 to your beneficiaries. If you don't have GI insurance, and you go into battle and get killed, the government has to pay only a maximum of $6000. "


"Now," he concluded," which bunch do you think they are going to send into battle first?"
***
Shingles
 Kevin walked into a doctor's office and the receptionist asked him what he had. Kevin said: "Shingles." So she wrote down his name, address, medical insurance number and told him to have a seat.

Fifteen minutes later a nurse's aide came out and asked Kevin what he had. Kevin said, "Shingles." So she wrote down his height, weight, a complete medical history and told Kevin to wait in the examining room.

A half hour later a nurse came in and asked Kevin what he had. Kevin said, "Shingles." So the nurse gave Kevin a blood test, a blood pressure test, an electrocardiogram, and told Kevin to take off all his clothes and wait for the doctor.

An hour later the doctor came in and found Kevin sitting patiently in the nude and asked Kevin what he had.

Kevin said, "Shingles."

The doctor asked, "Where?"

Kevin said, "Outside on the truck. Where do you want me to unload 'em?"
***
A tourist in London decides to skip his tour group and explore the city on his own.
He wanders around, seeing the sights, occasionally stopping at a quaint British pub to soak up the local culture, chat with the locals, and have a few pints of stout.

After a while, he finds himself in a very nice neighborhood with big, stately residences...no pubs, no stores, no restaurants, and worst of all NO PUBLIC RESTROOMS.

He really, really has to go, after all those drinks. He finds a narrow side street, with high walls surrounding the adjacent buildings and decides to use the wall to solve his problem.

As he is unzipping, he is tapped on the shoulder by a London police officer, who says, "I say, sir, you simply cannot do that here, you know."

"I'm very sorry, officer," replies the tourist, "but I really, really have to go, and I just can't find a public restroom."

"Ah, yes," said the policeman."Just follow me". He leads the tourist down a back delivery alley to a gate, which he opens.

"In there," points the policeman. "Go ahead sir, anywhere you like."

The fellow enters and finds himself in the most beautiful garden he has ever seen. Manicured grass lawns, statuary, fountains, sculptured hedges, and huge beds of gorgeous flowers, all in perfect bloom.

Since he has the policeman's blessing, he relieves himself and feels much more comfortable. As he goes back through the gate, he says to the police officer, "That was really decent of you... is that what you call English hospitality?"

"No sir," replied the police officer, "that is what we call the French Embassy."

***
There once were two airplane mechanics from New Jersey...
... Who were also drinking buddies.

One night, the mechanics (Rick and Paul) were finishing up their shift and discussing where they should go for a drink afterwards. 

"I don't know, man," said Rick. "We've been to every bar in town. The scene's getting old."

"Well," replied Paul, "there is one other option. I've heard drinking jet fuel gives you a pretty good buzz."

"Fuck it, I'll try anything once," said Rick, and they grabbed the nearest can of jet fuel and had the kind of time that only drinking buddies can.

The next morning, Rick awoke expecting the hangover from hell. To his surprise, he felt fine. Better than fine, even; he felt great! 

"This is amazing," he thought. "All the fun of drinking, but with no negative effects!"

Just then, he receives a call from Paul.

"Hey man," said Paul. "How ya feelin'?"

"I feel great!" Exclaimed Rick. "You?"

"Pretty good, but there's just one thing... Did you fart yet?"

"No," said a puzzled Rick. "Why do you ask?"

"Because," Paul said. "I'm in Arizona."
***
A Texan buys a round of drinks...
.. for all in the bar because, he announces, his wife has just gave birth to "a typical Texas" baby boy weighing 25 pounds. Congratulations resounded. Two weeks later, he returns to the bar. The bartender says, "Say, you're the father of the typical Texas baby that weighed 25 pounds at birth. How much does he weigh now?"

The proud father answers, "Seventeen pounds," The bartender is concerned: "What the hell happened? He already weighed 25 pounds at birth."

The Texas father takes a slow swig from his Lone Star beer, wipes his lips on his shirt sleeve, leans into the bartender and proudly says, "Had him circumcised." 
Mush luv fellow lurker/redditors- Feellz liek dis- http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=pURJDToKA0k
my other r/Jokes are a little bit piddle worthy too I think...
for the sake of fuck, you guys have given me a god complex now, that only a vagina could crush. Thanks a lot.
***
So a guy walks into a bank in Manhattan and asks for the loan officer
The loan officer comes over immediately.

“How can I help you, sir?” he asks.

“I’m going out of town on business for two weeks and need to borrow $5,000,” the man answers.

The loan officer tells him that the bank will need some form of security for the loan.

So, the man holds out his hand and opens his palm, saying, “These are the keys to my car, which is sitting out front.”

“Here are the documents, as well,” he says as he hands over a tiny stack of papers.

The loan officer peeks out the window and sees a brand new Ferrari parallel parked directly in front of the bank.

“One moment, please.”

The loan officer walks into a back office to consult with the president of the bank. Everything checks out.

So, after sharing a laugh with the president at this man leaving a $750,000 car as security for a $5,000 loan, the loan officer returns and tells the man that they will happily accept the Ferrari.

An employee of the bank then drives the car into the bank’s underground garage and parks it.

Two weeks later, the man returns and pays the $5,000 plus interest, which comes to $15.41.

The loan officer smiles and says, “Sir, we are very happy to have your business. This transaction has worked out very nicely.”

Then he adds, “But to be honest, we are a little bit puzzled.”

“While you were away, we checked you out and found out that you are a multi-millionaire. So what puzzled us is why you’d bother to borrow $5,000?”

The man replies, “Where else in Manhattan can I park my car for two weeks for just $15.41 and expect it to be there when I return?”
***
Heresy
I was walking across a bridge one day, and I saw a man standing on the edge, about to jump off. I immediately ran over and said "Stop! Don't do it!"  

"Why shouldn't I?" he said.  

I said, "Well, there's so much to live for!"  

"Like what?"  

"Well ... are you religious or atheist?"  

"Religious."  

"Me too! Are you Christian or Jewish?"  

"Christian."  

"Me too! Are you Catholic or Protestant?"  

"Protestant."  

"Me too! Are you Episcopalian or Baptist?"  

"Baptist."  

"Wow! Me too! Are you Baptist Church of God or Baptist Church of the Lord?"  

"Baptist Church of God."  

"Me too! Are you Original Baptist Church of God, or are you Reformed Baptist Church of God?"  

"Reformed Baptist Church of God."  

"Me too! Are you Reformed Baptist Church of God, reformation of 1879, or Reformed Baptist Church of God, reformation of 1915?"  

"Reformed Baptist Church of God, reformation of 1915!"  

To which I said, "Die, heretic scum!" and pushed him off.
~Emo Philips
***
Why Irish pubs are the best
"As good as this bar is," said the Scotsman, "I still prefer the pubs back home. In Glasgow, there's a wee place called McTavish's. The landlord goes out of his way for the locals. When you buy four drinks, he'll buy the fifth drink."

"Well, Angus," said the Englishman, "At my local in London, the Red Lion, the barman will buy you your third drink after you buy the first two."

"Ahhh, dat's nothin'," said the Patty Sheehan, then Irishman. "Back home in me favorite pub, the moment you set foot in the place, they'll buy you a drink, then another, all the drinks you like, actually. Then, when you've had enough drinks, they'll take you upstairs and see dat you gets laid, all on the house!"

The Englishman and Scotsman were suspicious of the claims.

"Did this actually happen to you?", the Pom said.

"Not meself, personally, no," admitted the Irishman, "but it did happen to me sister quite a few times." 
***
A Marine boarded a train on his way home from deployment...
The train was quite crowded, and the Marine walked the entire length looking for a seat. There seemed to be one next to a well-dressed middle-aged French woman, but when he got there he saw it was taken by the woman's poodle. The war-weary Marine asked, "Ma'am, may I have that seat?"  
The French woman sniffed and said to no one in particular, "Americans are so rude.. My little Fifi is using that seat.."  
The Marine walked the entire train again, but the only seat available was under that dog. "Please, Ma'am. May I sit down? I'm very tired."
She snorted, "Not only are you Americans rude, you are also arrogant!"
This time the Marine didn't say a word; he just picked up the little dog,
tossed it out the train window and sat down.

The woman shrieked, "Someone must defend my honor! Put this American in his
place!"
An English gentleman sitting nearby spoke up.  
"Sir, you Americans seem to have a penchant for doing the wrong thing. You hold the fork in the wrong hand. You drive your autos on the wrong side of the road. And now, sir, you seem to have thrown the wrong bitch out the window."
***
An engineer dies...
An engineer dies and stands before St. Peter at the gates of heaven.  After going through all his records, St. Peter finds that the man must go to hell.  The engineer complains, as he's always been loyal to his wife and friends, never stolen, and always tried to lead a good life.

"I'll take it up with the boss," says St. Peter.  "But it will be a few weeks before we get an answer, and until then you'll have to stay in hell."

Two weeks later, after the case has been gone over, St. Peter calls down to Satan, telling him that a mistake as been made and to release the engineer.

"No," says Satan.

"Why not?"

"In the past two weeks he fixed the air conditioner, fixed my wireless network, upgraded the internet to high speed, and within a week we're going to have a new ice cream machine.  He's staying," comes Satan's answer.

"You can't do this!" exclaims St. Peter.  "By all rights he should be in heaven!  We'll take you to court if we have to!"

"Sounds fair," says Satan calmly.  "But where are you going to find a lawyer."
***
Little Johnny is in the confessional booth...
...and after he confessed a couple of sins, the priest asks him:

"Isn't there anything else you want to confess, Johnny?"

"Uhm, I don't think so, no."

The priest asks again:

"Are you sure, Johnny? Are you sure you haven't done something like stealing money from the church?"

Little Johnny replies "Sorry Father, I can't hear you very well. What did you just say?"

The priest sighs and goes for it again:

"Johnny, I know you can hear me perfectly, and I know you stole money from the church. Why don't you confess it was you?"

So, Little Johnny says again: "Sorry Father, I can't hear you! This confessional booth doesn't work very well."

The priest argues, "There's nothing wrong with this booth. I can hear you perfectly from this side."

Until Johnny says, "I swear I can't hear you. Do you want to switch places and see it by yourself?"


So Little Johnny and the priest switch places in the confessional booth.

As soon as they sit, Little Johnny asks the priest:

"So, Father, do you have any idea of who's banging my mom while my dad's at work?"

"Holy Mother of God, it's true, I can't hear a damn thing!"
***
London lawyer
A London lawyer runs a stop sign and gets pulled over by an Irish cop. He thinks that he is smarter than the cop because he is a lawyer from LONDON and is certain that he has a better education then any Irish cop. He decides to prove this to himself and have some fun at the Irish cop's expense! 

Irish cop says,"License and registration, please." 

London Lawyer says, "What for?" 

Irish cop says,"Ye didnae come to a complete stop at the stop sign." 

London Lawyer says, "I slowed down, and no one was coming." 

Irish cop says,"Ye still didnae come to a complete stop. License and registration, please" 

London Lawyer says, "What's the difference?" 

Irish cop says, "The difference is, ye havte come to complete stop, that's the law. License and registration,please!" 

London Lawyer says, "If you can show me the legal difference between slow down and stop, I'll give you my license and registration and you give me the ticket. If not, you let me go and don't give me the ticket." 

Irish cop says, "Sounds fair. Exit your vehicle, sir." 

The London Lawyer exits his vehicle. 

The Irish cop takes out his baton and starts beating the living shit out of the lawyer and says, "Daeye want me to stop, or just slow down? " 
***
The Irish brothel
Three Irishmen are sitting in the pub window seat, watching the front door of the brothel over the road. 
The local Methodist pastor appears and quickly goes inside. 
"Would you look at that!" says the first Irishman, "Didn't I always say what a bunch of hypocrites they are?" 
No sooner are the words out of his mouth than a Rabbi appears at the door, knocks, and goes inside. 
The second Irishman says "Another one trying to fool everyone with pious preaching and stupid hats!" 
They continue drinking their beer, roundly condemning the vicar and the rabbi, when they see their own Catholic priest knock on the door. 
"Ah, now dat's sad." says the third Irishman. "One of the girls must have died."
***
Vacation in Jamaica
Lady goes on vacation to Jamaica.  Upon arriving, she meets a black
man, and after a night of passionate love making she asks him, 'What
is your name?'

'I can't tell you,' the black  man says.

Every night they meet and every night  she asks him again what his
name is, and he always responds the same, he can't tell her. On her
last  night there she asks again 'Can you please tell me your name?'

'I can't tell you my name because you will laugh at me.' says the black  man.

'There is no reason for me to laugh at you,'  the lady says.
'Fine, my name is Snow!'  the  black man replies. And the lady bursts
into laughter, and the black man gets mad and  says, ' I knew you
would make fun of it'.

The  lady replied, 'I'm not making fun of your name. I'm  thinking of
my husband who won't believe me when I  tell him that I enjoyed 10 inches
of Snow every day in  Jamaica.💃🗻🍆
***
The other night I was invited out for a night with the 'girls.'
I told my husband that I would be home by midnight, 'I promise!'

Well, the hours passed and the margaritas went down way too easily. Around 3 a.m., a bit loaded, I headed for home. Just as I got in the door, the cuckoo clock in the hallway started up and cuckooed 3 times. Quickly, realizing my husband would probably wake up, I cuckooed another 9 times.

I was really proud of myself for coming up with such a quick-witted solution, in order to escape a possible conflict with him. (Even when totally smashed... 3 cuckoos plus 9 cuckoos totals = 12 cuckoos MIDNIGHT!)

The next morning my husband asked me what time I got in, I told him 'MIDNIGHT'... he didn't seem pissed in the least.......... Whew, I got away with that one!

Then he said 'We need a new cuckoo clock.' When I asked him why, he said, 'Well, last night our clock cuckooed three times then said 'oh shit.' Cuckooed 4 more times, cleared its throat, cuckooed another three times, giggled, cuckooed twice more, and then tripped over the coffee table and farted.

***
The greatest swordsman in the world.
There was a competition going on in Spain to see who the worlds greatest swordsman was. The final three competitors had been chosen and were brought on stage in front of the anticipating crowd to showcase their talent. The first swordsman stepped forward causing the crowd to hush. One of the judges proceeded to release a small black fly and let it buzz around the stage. With the flick of his wrist and faster than you can blink the fly hit the ground in two pieces. The audience bursts into applause as the swordsman steps back. Next is the second swordsmans turn and he faces the same challenge. The fly is is released and in two swift motions he cuts the fly into four pieces. The audience is even more impressed and gives the man a standing ovation. Finally the third swordsman takes the spotlight and another fly is released onto the stage. The swordsman takes one quick swish at the fly but it continues to fly around the stage. The audience is dumbstruck. Finally someone from the audience speaks up:
"sir... The fly is still alive."
"Ah, si" replies the swordsman "but he will never be a father"
***
Barmaid is indeed pissed...!!
Bloke goes into a pub, and the barmaid asks what he wants.

"I want to bury my face in your cleavage and lick the sweat from between your tits," he says.

"You dirty bastard!" shouts the barmaid, "get out before I get my husband."

The bloke apologizes and promises not to repeat his gaffe. The Barmaid accepts this and asks him again what he wants.

"I want to pull your pants down, spread yoghurt between the cheeks of your arse and lick it all off."

She says, "You dirty filthy pervert! You're banned. Get out!!"

Again, the bloke apologizes and swears never ever to do it again.

"One more chance," says the barmaid, "Now, what do you want?"

"I want to turn you upside down, tear your knickers off and fill your pussy with Guinness, and then drink every last drop from the hairy cup."

The barmaid is furious at this personal intrusion, and runs upstairs to fetch her husband, who's sitting quietly watching the TV.

"What's up love?" he asks.

"There's a bloke in the bar who wants to put his head between my tits and lick the sweat off," she says.

"I'll kill him.. How dare he?" storms the husband.

"Then he said he wanted to pour yoghurt down between my arse cheeks and lick it off," she screams.

"Right. He's dead!" says the husband, reaching for a baseball bat.

"Then he said he wanted to turn me upside down, fill my fanny with Guinness and then drink it all," she cries!

The husband puts down his bat and returns to his armchair, and switches the TV back on.

"Aren't you going to do something about it?" she cries hysterically.

"Look love, I'm not messing with any bloke who can drink 15 pints of Guinness..."
***
What is a tragedy?
During one of his campaign trips Donald Trump is visiting an elementary school and goes into one of the classes. They are in the middle of a discussion related to words and their meanings.

The teacher asks Mr. Trump if he would like to lead the discussion of the word “Tragedy.”  So he asks the class for an example of a tragedy.

One little boy stands up and offers: “If my best friend who lives on a farm, is playing in the field and a runaway tractor comes along and knocks him dead, that would be a tragedy.”

“No,” says Mr. Trump, “that would be an accident.”

A little girl raises her hand: “If a school bus carrying 50 children drove over a cliff, killing everyone inside, that would be a tragedy.”

“I’m afraid not,” explains the exalted businessman. “That’s what we would call a great loss.”

The room goes silent. No other children volunteer.  Mr. Trump searches the room.

“Isn’t there someone here who can give me an example of a tragedy?”

Finally at the back of the room, a boy raises his hand. In a quiet voice he says: “If a private jet carrying you was struck by a missile and blown to smithereens, that would be a tragedy.”

“Fantastic!” exclaims Mr. Trump, “That’s absolutely right. And can you tell me why that would be a tragedy?”

“Well,” says the boy, “because it wouldn’t be a great loss and it probably wouldn’t be an accident either.”
***
Little Billy at it again (NSFW)
Little Billy wakes up early on Saturday morning to go play with his new dog... After looking for a while he finds the dog flat on his back, legs in the air!


Confused he runs and gets his father. His father realising that the dog has passed on thinks for a while on how he is going to break it to Little Billy.


Finally the dad says "Son, unfortunately the dog has passed away and it is laying on it's back with it's legs in the air so that GOD can reach him easier and take him to the Kingdom"


With that, Little Billy starts breaking down hard... After a while of sobbing Little Billy says to his father that if that is the case, then we nearly lost mummy yesterday... 

The father confused, asks Little Billy what he means by that.


Little Billy then proceeds to explain how yesterday school was a half day and when he came home from school early he went looking for mummy. He found her in the bedroom, laying flat on her back with her legs in the air yelling "GOD! I'M COMING, I'M COMING..." - If it wasn't for the Postman being on top of her, we would have lost her for sure...


:o :0
***
A collection of OC jokes!
Well I hope they're funny, anyway. The past few months I've been writing down anything that seems vaguely amusing to me. I imagine that some of them might be already-existing jokes without knowing it, but I hope you enjoy!

* I was offered a job studying fog but I turned it down. In hindsight, I think it was a mist opportunity.
* What vegetable likes to wait around in lines? Queuecumbers
* What's a pensioner's favourite genre of music? Hip-op
* I decided to drink something from a scientist's test tube. It tasted vial.
* Why did the artist visit the bank? To draw some money.
* What's the best thing about walking through a friendly forest? All the pleasantrees
* I was going to make a joke about alcoholism, but I decided against it because I thought it'd be a bit too whiskey.
* how do you greet the world's cleanest woman? "Hi, Jean".
* I got kicked out of the wig shop because I didn't want toupee.
* I bought an album called "Sounds of the Railway", but I didn't like any of the tracks
* I tried to get into the Guinness Book of Records by smashing up music albums. I broke a lot of records.
* Why were there clouds at the theatre production? Because it had been over cast.
* I used to have a job testing the durability of trainers. You might think that sounds easy, but it was sole-destroying work...
* Did you hear about the fellow who went insane trying to clear his sinuses? He ended up in a menthol hospital
* I used to be obsessed with going to the bank. I'm trying to stop but I have withdrawal symptoms...
* Why did the eagle go to church? Because it's a bird of pray.
* Where do fish go to earn a degree? Tunaversity.
* Someone suggested I should grow my hair down the back of my head. I wasn't keen on the idea, but I told them I'd mullet over.
* I watched a movie documentary about the history of tea exports, it was rated PG tips.
* Who stands outside the toddler nightclub? Baby bouncers.
* I have a very special type of dog - it was cross-bred with a vegetable. It's a border cauliflower
* What happened to the last aftershave in the cupboard? It felt colognely
* What do you inject into a suit to make it look bigger? Bowtux.



Bonus jokes that I didn't think were very good but decided to include anyway!!!!

* I had a dinner cooked by Dr. Who. It tasted dalektable (like... delectable)
* What do you call a sour supervisor? A lime manager.
* What food keeps you warm on a cold day? Fajitas... (like uh, fa-heaters...)
* What's the funniest type of cereal? A muesli (like... amuse-li?)
* The Bow and Arrow is an excellent weapon, with one drawback.
* Gambling can be very dangerous, if roulette it take over your life.
* What do you call a boring, unoriginal piece of fruit? A banalna.
* What do you call a piece of fruit that doesn't really matter? Not applic-apple.



***
Take that back Olympics
Here are the top nine comments made by sports commentators during the Olympics that they would like to take back....

1. Weightlifting commentator: "This is Gregoriava from Bulgaria . I saw her snatch this morning during her warm up and it was amazing."

2. Dressage commentator: "This is really a lovely horse and I speak from personal experience since I once mounted her mother."

3. Paul Hamm, Gymnast: "I owe a lot to my parents, especially my mother and father."

4. Boxing Analyst: "Sure there have been injuries, and even some deaths in boxing, but none of them really that serious."

5. Softball announcer: "If history repeats itself, I should think we can expect the same thing again."

6. Basketball analyst: "He dribbles a lot and the opposition doesn't like it. In fact you can see it all over their faces."

7. At the rowing medal ceremony: "Ah, isn't that nice, the wife of the IOC president is hugging the cox of the British crew."

8. Soccer commentator: "Julian Dicks is everywhere. It's like they've got eleven Dicks on the field."

9. Tennis commentator: "One of the reasons Andy is playing so well is that, before the final round, his wife takes out his balls and kisses them . . . Oh my God, what have I just said?...:)
***
An Englishman, a Welshman and a Pakistani man were sat in the waiting room of the maternity ward at the local hospital...
An Englishman, a Welshman and a Pakistani man were sat in the waiting room of the maternity ward at the local hospital.

A nurse comes out and says to the men "I'm sorry, but there's a been a mix-up and we don't know which baby belongs to which mother. Any chance one of you could come in and see if you can help?"

The Englishman stands up and says that he'll help. He walks into the ward and, a couple of minutes later walks out with what is obviously a Pakistani baby. The Pakistani man stands up and shouts "What do you think you're doing?!"

And the Englishman said "Look, one of those babies in there is Welsh, and I'm not taking any chances."
***
My joke was removed for comparing Trump to Hitler
Apparently it's against the rules to make personal attacks on someone even after they've been dead for over 70 years.

edit: FYI I never had a joke removed, I just said that because otherwise I didn't really have much of a joke, I thought it was implicit that the mods didn't remove any jokes because they generally only do that if you attack another redditor directly or just don't make any attempt at humour. Also, don't actually think Trump and Hitler are similar, I didn't even say they were so you can stop PMing me about it.
***
Little Timmy Is taking a shower with his Mother..
and says, "Mom, what are those things on your chest!?" Unsure of how to reply, she tells Timmy to ask his dad at breakfast tomorrow, quite certain the matter would be forgotten. 

Timmy didn't forget. The following morning he asked his father the same question. His father, always quick with the answers, says, "Why Timmy, those are balloons. When your mommy dies, we can blow them up and she'll float to heaven." Timmy thinks thats neat and asks no more questions. 

A few weeks later, Timmy's dad comes home from work a few hours early. Timmy runs out of the house crying hysterically, "Daddy! Daddy! Mommys dying!!" His father says, "Calm down son! Why do you think Mommys dying?" "Uncle Harry is blowing up Mommys balloons and shes screaming, "Oh God, Im coming!"
***
A Mom visits her son for dinner who lives with a girl roommate
 
A Mom visits her son for dinner who lives with a girl roommate.

During the course of the meal, his mother couldn't help but notice how pretty his roommate was. She had long been suspicious of a relationship between the two, and this had only made her more curious.

Over the course of the evening, while watching the two interact, she started to wonder if there was more between him and his roommate than met the eye.

Reading his mom's thoughts, the son volunteered, “I know what you must be thinking, but I assure you, we are just roommates."

About a week later, his roommate came to him saying, “Ever since your mother came to dinner, I've been unable to find the silver plate. You don't suppose she took it, do you?"

He said ,"Well, I doubt it, but I'll email her, just to be sure."

He sat down and wrote :

Dear Mother:

I'm not saying that you ‘did' take the silver plate from my house, I'm not saying that you ‘did not' take the silver plate .. But the fact remains that it has been missing ever since you were here for dinner.

Love,

your son

Several days later, he received an email from his Mother which read:

Dear Son:

I'm not saying that you ‘do' sleep with your roommate, and I'm not saying that you ‘do not' sleep with her. But the fact remains that if she was sleeping in her OWN bed, she would have found the silver plate by now, under the pillow…

Love,

Mom.﻿
***
An elderly Jewish woman
wins the lottery, $30 million after taxes. She goes to her Rabbi to discuss what to do with the money.

She first says, "I'd like to spend $10 million on myself and my family."

The Rabbi replies, "It would be good to enjoy your winnings, and family is important."

She then says she'd like to donate another $10 million to the synagogue and the charity they run, since the synagogue has always been there for her, she'd like to give back.

The Rabbi says they could always use the money.

Then she says "I'd like to spend the last $10 million on a ten-foot golden statue of Adolf Hitler."

Naturally the Rabbi is quite horrified. "Why would you want to memorialize such a monster?" he cries.

She rolls up her sleeve and responds, "He gave me the winning numbers."
***
Three Irishmen and Three Scots are on a train
Three Scots and three Irishmen are traveling by train to a conference. At the station, the three Irishmen each buy tickets and watch as the three Scots buy only a single ticket.
"How are three people going to travel on only one ticket?" asks an Irishman.
"Watch and you'll see," answers a Scot.
They all board the train. The Irishmen take their respective seats but all three Scots cram into a bathroom and close the door behind them.
Shortly after the train has departed, the conductor comes around collecting tickets. He knocks on the bathroom door and says,"Ticket, please." The door opens just a crack and a single arm emerges with a ticket in hand. The conductor takes it and moves on.
The Irishmen see this and agree it was quite a clever idea. So after the conference, the Irishmen decide to copy the Scots on the return trip and save some money (being clever with money,and all that). When they get to the station, they buy a single ticket for the return trip. To their astonishment, the Scots don't buy a ticket at all.
"How are you going to travel without a ticket?" says one perplexed Irishman. Watch and you'll see," answers a Scot.
When they board the train the three Irishmen cram into a bathroom and the three Scots cram into another one nearby. The train departs. Shortly afterwards, one of the Scots leaves his bathroom and walks over to the bathroom where the Irishmen are hiding.
He knocks on the door and says, "Ticket, please."
***
Hillary Clinton is elected President.
On her first night in the White House (not counting when she was first lady), she is visited by the ghost of George Washington.

She asks, "What can I do to help America?"

Washington replies "Serve your country selflessly and always be honest"

*Hillary laughs in his face*

On her second day in the White House, she is visited by the ghost of Thomas Jefferson.

She asks, "What can I do to help America?"

Jefferson replies "Remember that governments derive their power from the consent of the governed, and that the individual is to have sovereignty over himself."

*Hillary laughs in his face*

On her third day in the White House, she is visited by the ghost of Abraham Lincoln.

She asks, "What can I do to help America?"

Lincoln replies "Go to the theater."
***
A Mafia Godfather finds out that his bookkeeper has cheated him ...
A Mafia Godfather finds out that his bookkeeper, Guido, has cheated him out of $10,000,000.


 His bookkeeper is deaf. That was the reason he got the job in the first place. It was assumed that Guido would hear nothing so he would not have to testify in court.
When the Godfather goes to confront Guido about his missing $10 million, he takes along his lawyer who knows sign language. The Godfather tells the lawyer, "Ask him where the money is!"


The lawyer, using sign language, asks Guido, "Where's the money?" Guido signs back, "I don't know what you are talking about." The lawyer tells the Godfather, "He says he doesn't know what you are talking about". 
The Godfather pulls out a pistol, puts it to Guido's head and says, "Ask him again and tell him if he doesn't answer I'll kill him!"
The lawyer signs to Guido, "He'll kill you if you don't tell him."


Guido trembles and signs back, "OK! You win! The money is in a brown briefcase, buried behind the shed at my cousin Bruno's house."


The Godfather asks the lawyer, "What did he say?" The lawyer replies, "He says you don't have the balls to pull the trigger."
***
Two jews are walking past an evangelical church...
When they see a sign in the window, "accept Jesus today and we'll give you $10,000"

Goldberg says to his buddy Strausman, "Hey Straussy wait here I'm gonna go rip these goyim out of ten grand!" 

"Wait!" Strausman responds, "what if you get sucked in and you lose your faith?!"

"Don't worry, Strausman. Once a Jew always a Jew. I'll say *I am found,* I'll do the dunking thing, I'll accept Jesus, badabing badaboom, and Ill walk out with $10,000!"

So Goldberg goes in and an hour later walks out to a worried Strausman. "So? Did you get the ten grand?"

"You jews, all you think about is money!"
***
An Irishman, a Greek, and a Jew die and stand at the gates of heaven
The keeper of the gates tells them "Well, you have all lived pretty decent lives, but you all fall victim to your respective stereotypes. So here's what's going to happen. You all will go back down to earth for 24 hours and you must avoid your weaknesses.
"Irishman, alcohol cannot touch your lips.
"Jew, you cannot touch money.
"And Greek, if you even think about having sex...
"You go straight to hell."
So they all find themselves back on earth. They go about their day just find, until they pass by a pub.
The Irishman shakes and shakes. "I CAN'T TAKE IT ANYMORE!" he cries. He runs into the bar and orders a beer. As soon as he takes his first sip, he disappears into a puff of smoke. The Jew and the Greek look at each other in disbelief.
They leave the pub and walk a little bit. Then they spot a crisp $100 bill on the ground. The jew shakes and shakes. "I CAN'T TAKE IT ANYMORE!" he cries. He runs over to the bill, bends over and they both go to hell.
***
A Jewish man and a Chinese man strike up a conversation...
Before long they're arguing... 

Jewish man: "You know what? I hate you." 

Chinese man: "For what?"

Jewish man: "Pearl Harbor!" 

Chinese man: "That was the Japanese! I'm Chinese!" 

Jewish man: "eh, Japanese, Chinese what's the difference?"

Chinese man: "Well, you kow what? I hate you." 

Jewish man: "For what?!?" 

Chinese man: "The Titanic!" 

Jewish man: "An iceberg sunk the Tatanic!" 

Chinese man: "eh, Iceberg, Goldberg, what's the difference?"

***
God offers the ten commandments
God went to the Arabs and said: "I have Commandments that'll make your lives better."

The Arabs asked: "What are they, can you give us an example?"

God said: "Thou shall not kill."

The Arab were shocked and refused Gods offering

So he went to the Mexicans and said: "I have commandments that'll make your lives better."

When asked for an example God said: "Thou shall not steal."

The Mexicans were insulted and refused.

Lastly, God went to the Jews: "I have Co..."

Before he could finish the Jews blasted out: "HOW MUCH DO THEY COST??"

God replied: "Nothing, they're free."

The Jews answered: "Good, we shall take ten!"

***
A car full of Irish nuns is sitting at a traffic light in downtown Dublin, when a bunch of rowdy drunks pull up alongside of them.
A car full of Irish nuns is sitting at a traffic light in downtown Dublin, when a bunch of rowdy drunks pull up alongside of them.

"Hey, show us yer tits, ya bloody penguins!" shouts one of the drunks.
Quite shocked, Mother Superior turns to Sister Mary Immaculata and says, "I don't think they know who we are; show them your cross."

Sister Mary Immaculata rolls down her window and shouts, "Piss off, ya fookin' little wankers, before I come over there and rip yer balls off!"

Sister Mary Immaculata then rolls up her window, looks back at Mother Superior, quite innocently, and asks, "Did that sound cross enough?
***
The double flavored apple store
A man just moved to a new town from far away, and one day decides to take a walk around to get to know the area.

While walking down the street and checking out all the stores along the way, he notices one that seemed unusual. The sign above read "Jerry's Double Flavored Apples." Curious, the man walks inside to check it out.

He walks up to the storekeeper behind the counter and he begins to ask him about his product.

"I've never heard of double flavored apples, how can there be such a thing?" he asks.

The storekeeper replies, "They are exactly as advertised, good sir. My specialty! Think of any combination of flavors, and we have an apple for it!"

Still skeptical, the man asks for a sample. "I must try one before I can believe you" he says.

The storekeeper is happy to oblige, and hands him a carefully selected apple from behind the counter. The man takes a bite.

"Peaches!" he exclaims. "I definitely didn't expect that."

The storekeeper then smiles and says "That's only the half of it. Now flip it over and take another bite."

So the man flips it over and takes another bite, and his eyes widen. "Tastes like cream! Peaches and cream! This is brilliant! Are you telling me that every apple in this store is flavored like this?"

The storekeeper is now very pleased. He hands the man another apple and tells him to take another bite.

"Strawberries!" The man is now speechless.

The storekeeper says "Now flip it over."

"Chocolate! Chocolate covered strawberries! This is the most amazing thing ever!"

The storekeeper says "We have all kinds of flavors here. Anything you want, we've got it!"

Still baffled and a little unsure, the man asks "Any flavor I want? Are you certain about this?"

The storekeeper confidently replies "Yessir! Anything you can think of, we've got it!"

"Anything??"

"Yes! Just try me."

The man then thinks really hard for a moment, and comes up with something. He says "Well, there's one thing I haven't tasted in a very, very long time. I would really like to taste some good pussy again. If you can get me one that tastes like some really good pussy, I'll finally believe you."

The storekeeper is now delighted, and says "Ah, sir, you're in luck! I have just the thing for you! Wait here." Then, he goes into the back room. Minutes later, he comes out with a perfectly shaped, shiny red apple. "Here," he says excitedly, "try this!" 

Equally delighted, the man takes the apple, and takes a large bite. He chews it slowly for a moment, but his face quickly turns sour and spits the apple out in disgust.

"Shit!! This apple tastes like total shit! What the hell is this you gave me??"

The storekeeper then says, "Ah, now flip it over..."
***
A wife treats her husband by taking him to a strip club for his birthday.
At the club, the doorman says, "Hi Jim, how are you?"

The wife asks, "How does he know you?"

Jim says, "Oh dear, I play football with him."

Inside the Bartender Says, "The Usual, Jim?"

Jim says to Wife, "Before you say anything, He's on the Darts team."

Next a stripper Says, "Hi Jim! Do you crave the special again?"

The Wife storms out dragging Jim with her & jumps into a taxi. The Taxi driver Says, "Hey Jimmy boy! You picked up an ugly one this time..."



Jim's Funeral is on Sunday!!!
***
An American soldier, serving in World War II had just returned
from several weeks of intense action on the German front lines. He had finally been granted R&R and was on a train bound for London. 

The train was very crowded, so the soldier walked the length of the train, looking for an empty seat. The only unoccupied seat was directly adjacent to a well dressed middle aged lady and was being used by her little dog. The war weary soldier asked, "Please, ma'am, may I sit in that seat?" The English woman looked down her nose at the soldier, sniffed and said, "You Americans. You are such a rude class of people. Can't you see my little Fifi is using that seat?" 

The soldier walked away, determined to find a place to rest, but after another trip down to the end of the train, found himself again facing the woman with the dog. Again he asked, "Please, lady. May I sit there? I'm very tired." The English woman wrinkled her nose and snorted, "You Americans! Not only are you rude, you are also arrogant. Imagine!" 

The soldier didn't say anything else. He leaned over, picked up the little dog, tossed it out the window of the train and sat down in the empty seat. The woman shrieked and demanded that someone defend her and chastise the soldier. An English gentleman sitting across the aisle spoke up, "You know, sir, you Americans do seem to have a penchant for doing the wrong thing. You eat holding the fork in the wrong hand. You drive your autos on the wrong side of the road. 

And now, sir, you've thrown the wrong b!tch out of the window."
***
A man comes home to his wife from his job at a relish factory one day...
He has a confused, lost look on his face, so his wife asks what's wrong.

The man turns to her and says, "I've been having the strangest urge at work lately."

His wife, being the caring woman she is, asks "What is it."

The man sighs and says, "I keep wanting to put my dick in the pickle slicer."

The woman stifles a laugh tells her husband not to put his penis in the pickle slicer.

A few weeks go by, and the man only wabts to put his penis in the pickle slicer more and more, so he goes to his manager, to ask for help, and the manager refers him to an occupational therapist and gives him some time off.  Nothing helps though, the therapist refers him to a real psychologist, hoping that maybe they can cure this man's affliction.

So one day the man comes home to his wife and says with a sigh, "Honey, I got fired today. I put my penis in the pickle slicer."

She gasps, crying out "oh my god! You have to go to the hospital!"

The man looks up at her, "Oh no, I'm perfectly fine. I feel great, actually."

His wife is now completely bewildered, "But, bu--your peni- and the pickle slicer!?"

The man shrugs, "Yeah, she got fired, too."
***
Heaven or Hell . . .
An old lady was chatting it up with St. Peter at the Pearly Gates when all of a sudden she hears the most awful, blood curdling screams.
 
"Don't worry about that," says St. Peter, "It's only someone having  the holes put into her shoulder blades for wings." 
 
The old lady looks a little uncomfortable but carries on with the conversation.  Ten minutes later, there are more blood curdling  screams. 
 
"Oh my God", says the old lady, "Now what is happening?" 
 
"Not to worry," says St. Peter, "She's just having her head drilled  to fit the halo."
 
"I can't do this," says the old lady, "I'm going to hell." 
 
"You can't go there", says St. Peter. "You'll be raped and sodomized." 
 
"Maybe so", says the old lady, "but I already have the holes for that".
***
What is a tragedy?
During one of his campaign trips Donald Trump is visiting an elementary school and goes into one of the classes. They are in the middle of a discussion related to words and their meanings.

The teacher asks Mr. Trump if he would like to lead the discussion of the word “Tragedy.”  So he asks the class for an example of a tragedy. 
 
One little boy stands up and offers: “If my best friend who lives on a farm, is playing in the field and a runaway tractor comes along and knocks him dead, that would be a tragedy.” 
 
“No,” says Mr. Trump, “that would be an accident.” 
 
A little girl raises her hand: “If a school bus carrying 50 children drove over a cliff, killing everyone inside, that would be a tragedy.” 
 
“I’m afraid not,” explains the exalted businessman. “That’s what we would call a great loss.” 
 
The room goes silent. No other children volunteer.  Mr. Trump searches the room. 
 
“Isn’t there someone here who can give me an example of a tragedy?” 
 
Finally at the back of the room, a boy raises his hand. In a quiet voice he says: “If a private jet carrying you was struck by a missile and blown to smithereens, that would be a tragedy.” 
 
“Fantastic!” exclaims Mr. Trump, “That’s absolutely right. And can you tell me why that would be a tragedy?” 
 
“Well,” says the boy, “because it wouldn’t be a great loss and it probably wouldn’t be an accident either.”
***
Some topical jokes for the Brits:
Government cuts bite deep as former prime ministers slashed by 25%.

What's the difference between Margaret Thatcher and Jimmy Savile? Nothing: they're both dead and fucked miners.

Margaret Thatcher has died peacefully following a stroke at the age of 87. I for one am truly devastated about this... she went peacefully.

It has been announced that Thatcher's corpse will be thrown down one of the pits she closed and a public toilet built on top of it charging £5 a dump. Funds raised are expected to clear the national debt by Friday lunchtime.
***
WHY I FIRED MY SECRETARY..
Last week was my birthday
and I didn't feel very well
waking up on that morning.

I went downstairs for breakfast
hoping my wife would be pleasant
and say, "Happy Birthday!", and
possibly have a small present for me

As it turned out,
she barely said good morning,
let alone "Happy Birthday."

I thought...
Well, that's marriage for you,
but the kids....
They will remember.

My kids came bounding down stairs to
breakfast and didn't say a word.
So when I left for the office,
I felt pretty low and somewhat despondent.

As I walked into my office,
my secretary Jane said,
"Good Morning Boss,
and by the way Happy Birthday! "
It felt a little better that at least someone had remembered.

I worked until one o'clock,
when Jane knocked on my door
and said, "You know,
It's such a beautiful day outside,
and it is your Birthday,
what do you say we go out to lunch,
just you and me."
I said, "Thanks, Jane,
that's the greatest thing
I've heard all day.
Let's go!"

We went to lunch.
But we didn't go
where we normally would go.
She chose instead a quiet bistro
with a private table.
We had two martinis each
and I enjoyed the meal tremendously.
On the way back to the office,
Jane said, "You know,
It's such a beautiful day...
We don't need to go straight back to the office, Do We ?"

I responded,
"I guess not. What do you have in mind?"
She said, "Let's drop by my apartment,
it's just around the corner."

After arriving at her apartment,
Jane turned to me and said,
" Boss, if you don't mind,
I'm going to step into the bedroom
for just a moment.
I'll be right back."
"Ok," I nervously replied.

She went into the bedroom and,
after a couple of minutes,
she came out carrying a huge birthday cake .
Followed by my wife, my kids,
and dozens of my friends and co-workers, all singing "Happy
Birthday.

And I just sat there...

On the couch...

Naked....
 

***
Three men end up in hell
Three guys found themselves in Hell: we will call them Carl, Bob, and Brett, they were a little confused at their present situation, and they were startled to see a door in the wall open, and behind the door was perhaps the ugliest woman they had ever seen. She was 3'4", dirty, and you could smell her even over the Brimstone. The voice of the Devil was heard, "Brett, you have sinned! You are condemned to spend the rest of eternity in bed with this woman!" And Brett was whisked through the door by a group of lesser demons to his torment.

This understandably shook up the other two, and so they both jumped when a second door opened, and they saw an even more disgusting example of womanhood gone wrong. She was over 7' tall, monstrous, covered in thick black hair, and flies circled her. The voice of the Devil was heard, "Carl, you have sinned! You are condemned to spend the rest of eternity in bed with this woman!" And Carl, like Brett, was whisked off.

Bob, now alone, felt understandably anxious, and feared the worst when the third door opened. And as the door inched open, he strained to see the figure of ... Cindy Crawford. Delighted, Bob jumped up, taking in the sight of this beautiful woman, barely dressed in a skimpy bikini. Then he heard the voice of the Devil saying:

 "Cindy, you have sinned ........" 
***
Two Cows
**Edit: Just to make it clear, I am not taking credit for the joke(s). I just merely found it/them whilst browsing around and thought you guys would appreciate it/them.**



SOCIALISM

You have 2 cows.

You give one to your neighbour



COMMUNISM

You have 2 cows.

The State takes both and gives you some milk

FASCISM

You have 2 cows.

The State takes both and sells you some milk



NAZISM

You have 2 cows.

The State takes both and shoots you

BUREAUCRATISM

You have 2 cows.

The State takes both, shoots one, milks the other, and then
throws the milk away

TRADITIONAL CAPITALISM

You have two cows.

You sell one and buy a bull.

Your herd multiplies, and the economy
grows.

You sell them and retire on the income

ROYAL BANK OF SCOTLAND (VENTURE) CAPITALISM

You have two cows.

You sell three of them to your publicly listed company, using letters of credit opened by your brother-in-law at the bank, then execute a debt/equity swap with an associated general offer so that you get all four cows back, with a tax exemption
for five cows.

The milk rights of the six cows are transferred via an intermediary to a Cayman Island Company secretly owned by the majority shareholder who sells the rights to all seven cows back to your listed company.
The annual report says the company owns eight cows, with an option on one more. You sell one cow to buy a new president of the United States , leaving you with nine cows. No balance sheet provided with the release.

The public then buys your bull.

SURREALISM

You have two giraffes.

The government requires you to take harmonica lessons.

AN AMERICAN CORPORATION

You have two cows.

You sell one, and force the other to
produce the milk of four cows.

Later, you hire a consultant to analyse why
the cow has dropped dead.

A GREEK CORPORATION

You have two cows. You borrow lots of euros to build barns, milking sheds, hay stores, feed sheds,
dairies, cold stores, abattoir, cheese unit and packing sheds.

You still only have two cows.


A FRENCH CORPORATION

You have two cows.

You go on strike, organise a riot, and block the roads, because you want three cows.

A JAPANESE CORPORATION

You have two cows.

You redesign them so they are one-tenth the size of an ordinary cow and produce twenty times the milk.

You then create a clever cow cartoon image called a Cowkimona and
market it worldwide.

AN ITALIAN CORPORATION

You have two cows, but you don't know where they are.

You decide to have lunch.

A SWISS CORPORATION

You have 5000 cows. None of them belong to you.

You charge the owners for storing them.

A CHINESE CORPORATION

You have two cows.

You have 300 people milking them.

You claim that you have full employment, and high bovine productivity.

You arrest the newsman who reported the real situation.

AN INDIAN CORPORATION

You have two cows.

You worship them.

A BRITISH CORPORATION

You have two cows.

Both are mad.

AN IRAQI CORPORATION

Everyone thinks you have lots of cows.

You tell them that you have none.

No-one believes you, so they bomb the ** out of you and invade your country.

You still have no cows, but at least you are now a Democracy.

AN AUSTRALIAN CORPORATION

You have two cows.

Business seems pretty good.

You close the office and go for a few beers to celebrate.
***
Baseball heaven?
There were two old guys, Abe and Sol, sitting on a bench in a park feeding pigeons and talking about baseball, just like they did every day. Abe turns to Sol and says, "Do you think there's baseball in heaven?"

Soloman thinks about it for a minute and replies, "I dunno, Abe. But let's make a deal: If I die first, I will come back and tell you, and if you die first, you come back and tell me, if there is basebal l in heaven."

They shake on it and, sadly, a few months later poor Abe passes on. One day soon afterward, Sol is sitting there feeding the pigeons by himself when he hears a voice whisper, "Sol... Sol...."

Sol responds, "Abe! Is that you?"

"Yes it is Sol," whispers the spirit of Abe.

Sol, still amazed, asks, "So, is there baseball in heaven?"

"Well," says Abe says, "I got good news and I got bad news."

"Gimme the good news first," says Sol.

Abe says, "Well... there is baseball in heaven."

Sol says, "That's great! What news could be bad enough to ruin that!?"

Abe sighs and whispers, "You're pitching on Friday."

***
A frog hops into a bank
and approaches the teller. He can see from her nameplate that her name is Patricia Whack.

"Miss Whack, I'd like to get a $30,000 loan to take a holiday."

Patty looks at the frog in disbelief and asks his name. The frog says his name is Kermit Jagger, his dad is Mick Jagger, and that it's okay, he knows the bank manager. Patty explains that he will need to secure the loan with some collateral.

The frog says, "Sure. I have this," and produces a tiny porcelain elephant, about an inch tall, bright pink and perfectly formed. Very confused, Patty explains that she'll have to consult with the bank manager and disappears into a back office.

She finds the manager and says, "There's a frog called Kermit Jagger out there who claims to know you and wants to borrow $30,000, and he wants to use this as collateral." She holds up the tiny pink elephant. "I mean, what in the world is this?"

The bank manager looks back at her and says...

"It's a knickknack, Patty Whack. Give the frog a loan. His old man's a Rolling Stone."
***
Who Am I?
One Monday morning a mailman is walking the neighborhood on his usual route. As he approaches one of the homes he noticed that both cars were in the driveway. His wonder was cut short by Bob, the homeowner, coming out with a load of empty beer and liquor bottles. "Wow Bob, looks like you guys had one hell of a party last night." the mailman comments. 

Bob in obvious pain replies, "Actually we had it Saturday night. This is the first I have felt like moving since 4:00 am Sunday morning. We had about fifteen couples from around the neighborhood over for Christmas Cheer and it got a bit wild. Hell, we got so drunk around midnight that we started playing WHO AM I." 

The mailman thinks a moment and says, "How do you play that?" 

Well all the guys go in the bedroom and we come out one at a time with a sheet covering us and only our "privates" showing through a hole in the sheet. Then the women try to guess who it is." 

The mailman laughs and says, "Damn, I'm sorry I missed that." 

Probably a good thing you did," Bob responds. "Your name came up four or five times." 
***
The wife came home early and found her husband in their bedroom making love to a very attractive young woman and was somewhat upset.
"You are a disrespectful pig!” she cried. “How dare you do this to me –faithful wife, the mother of your children! I’m leaving you. I want a divorce!

And the husband replied “Hang on just a minute love, so at least I can tell you what happened.”

“Fine, go ahead,” she sobbed, “but they’ll be the last words you’ll say to me!”

And the husband began — “Well, I was getting into the car to drive home and this young lady here asked me for a lift. She looked so down and out and defenseless that I took pity on her and let her into the car. I noticed that

she was very thin, not well dressed and very dirty. She told me that she hadn’t eaten for three days! So, in my compassion, I brought her home and warmed up the enchiladas I made for you last night, the ones you wouldn’t eat because you’re afraid you’ll put on weight. The poor thing devoured them in moments.

Since she needed a good clean up I suggested a shower, and while she was doing that I noticed her clothes were dirty and full of holes so I threw them away. Then, as she needed clothes, I gave her the designer jeans that you have had for a few years, but don’t use because you say they are too tight. I also gave her the underwear that was your anniversary present, which you don’t use because I don’t have good taste. I found the sexy blouse my sister gave you for Christmas that you don’t use just to annoy her, and I also donated those boots you bought at the expensive boutique and don’t use because someone at work has a pair the same.”

The husband took a quick breath and continued – “She was so grateful for my understanding and help and as I walked her to the door she turned to me with tears in her eyes and said, Please … do you have anything else that your wife doesn’t use?”

***
A man finally gets a job as a Wal-Mart greeter...
So I finally landed a job as a Wal-Mart greeter, and about two hours into my first day on the job a loud, mean, and unattractive woman enters the store with her two children, yelling obscenities at them the whole way.

Per my greeter instructions, I pleasantly said, "Good Morning and welcome to Wal-Mart. Nice children you have there, are they twins?"

Agitated, the women sharply fires back, "Hell no, they ain't twins. This one here's 7, and this one here's 10. Why would you think they're twins? Are you blind, stupid, or both?" 

To which I replied, "Ma'am, I am neither blind nor stupid. I just couldn't believe that someone slept with you twice." 

EDIT: Removed last line, per request.

***
A Jewish man Sent his son on a trip to Israel
When his son returned, it was brought up that, while on the trip, he had converted to Christianity. Distraught, the Jewish man went to a close friend of his and explained the situation. 

The other man replied, "Well that's strange, I too sent my son to Israel a Jew, and he too came back a Christian!" The two men were saddened, yes, but also intrigued. They went to their Rabbi with the concerns, again explaining the situation.

As they were explaining what had happened, the Rabbi had a pained look on his face, and when they were done he responded, "Well that's strange, my son went on the same trip as a Jew, and he too came back a Converted Christian!"

The three men devised a plan to figure out what was going on. They got on a plane and flew to Israel, determined to find out what was converting their sons! They found nothing, and went to the West Wall to pray about it. They screamed to the sky, "GOD, WE HAVE SENT OUR SONS TO ISRAEL AS JEWS, AND THEY CAME BACK CHRISTIAN, WHY HAVE YOU DONE THIS TO US?!"

There was a moment of complete silence, followed by a booming voice from the sky...

"Well that's strange..."
***
A balding, white haired man from Bellville, in Cape Town
walked into a jewellery store in Tygervalley this past Friday evening with a beautiful much younger blond at his side.
He told the jeweler he was looking for a special ring for his girlfriend. The jeweler looked through his stock and brought out a $5,000 ring.

The man said, 'No, I'd like to see something more special.'

At that statement, the jeweler went to his special stock and brought another ring over. 'Here's a stunning ring at only $240,000 the jeweler said. The lady's eyes sparkled and her whole body trembled with excitement. The old man seeing this said, 'We'll take it.'

The jeweler asked how payment would be made and the man stated, 'by check. I know you need to make sure my check is good, so I'll write it now and you can call the bank Monday to verify the funds and I'll pick the ring up Monday afternoon.'

On Monday morning, the jeweler angrily phoned the old man and said 'There's no money in that account.'

'I know,' said the old man,
'But let me tell you about MY GREAT WEEKEND!' 
***
Two Italian men get on a bus...
They sit down and engage in an animated conversation. The lady sitting behind them ignores them at first, but her attention is galvanized when she hears one of the men say the following:
"Emma come first. Den I come. Den two asses come together. I come once-a-more. Two asses, they come together again. I come again and pee twice. Then I come one lasta time."
"You foul-mouthed swine," retorted the lady indignantly. "In this country we don't talk about our sex lives in public!"
"Hey, coola down lady," said the man. "Who talkin' abouta sexa? I'm a justa tellin' my frienda how to spella 'Mississippi'."
***
These exchanges were recorded verbatim by court reporters and published in the book, "Disorder in the American Courts".
ATTORNEY: This myasthenia gravis, does it affect your memory at all?

WITNESS: Yes.

ATTORNEY: And in what ways does it affect your memory?

WITNESS: I forget..

ATTORNEY: You forget? Can you give us an example of something you forgot?

WITNESS: How would I know?
___________________________________________
ATTORNEY: Now doctor, isn't it true that when a person dies in his sleep, he doesn't know about it until the next morning?

WITNESS: Did you actually pass the bar exam?
____________________________________
ATTORNEY: The youngest son, the twenty-year-old, how old is he? 


WITNESS: He's twenty -- much like your IQ.
__________________________________________
ATTORNEY: Were you present when your picture was taken?

WITNESS: Are you kiddin' me?
_____________________________________

ATTORNEY: She had three children, right?

WITNESS: Yes.

ATTORNEY: How many were boys?

WITNESS: None.

ATTORNEY: Were there any girls?

WITNESS : Your Honor, I think I need a different attorney. Can I get a new attorney?
____________________________________________
ATTORNEY: How was your first marriage terminated?

WITNESS: By death.

ATTORNEY: And by whose death was it terminated?

WITNESS: Take a guess.
__________________________________________
ATTORNEY: Can you describe the individual?

WITNESS: He was about medium height and had a beard.

ATTORNEY: Was this a male or a female?

WITNESS: Unless the Circus was in town, I'm going with 'a male'.
_____________________________________
ATTORNEY: Doctor, how many of your autopsies have you performed on dead people?

WITNESS: All of them. The live ones put up too much of a fight. 

_________________________________________ 
ATTORNEY: ALL your responses MUST be oral, OK? What school did you go to?

WITNESS: Oral.
_________________________________________
ATTORNEY: Do you recall the time that you examined the body?

WITNESS: The autopsy started around 8:30 p.m..

ATTORNEY: And Mr. Denton was dead at the time?

WITNESS: If not, he was by the time I finished.
____________________________________________
ATTORNEY: Are you qualified to give a urine sample?

WITNESS: Are you qualified to ask that question?
______________________________________
And the best for last:

ATTORNEY: Doctor, before you performed the autopsy, did you check for a pulse?

WITNESS: No.

ATTORNEY: Did you check for blood pressure?

WITNESS: No.

ATTORNEY: Did you check for breathing?

WITNESS: No.

ATTORNEY: So, then it is possible that the patient was alive when you began the autopsy?

WITNESS: No.

ATTORNEY: How can you be so sure, Doctor?

WITNESS: Because his brain was sitting on my desk in a jar.

ATTORNEY: I see, but could the patient have still been alive, nevertheless?

WITNESS: Yes, it is possible that he could have been alive and practicing law.








***
Scottish Flirting
A couple went out to the pub in Scotland for a few drinks. The boyfriend went to the loo, leaving his girlfriend alone at the bar.

A sauced fellow approaches her at the bar. "Wow," he says in his thick accent, "you're so beautiful! If yous was my girlfriend, I'd kiss ye all over!"

The girl, offended, retorts, "Ye can't say that to me! When my boyfriend comes back, he'll beat ye on up!"

The man says, "That's not all! If yous was me girlfriend, I'd take yer shirt off and slap yer titties around!"

She says, "Ye can't say that to me! When me boyfriend comes back, he'll beat ye on up!"

He says, "Well that's not all! If yous was me girlfriend, I'd fill your pussy with beer and drink it all up!"

She says, essentially shouting now, "Ye can't say that to me! When me boyfriend comes back, he'll beat your ass bloody!"

The man leaves, walking across the bar as the girl's boyfriend returns from the loo. She tells him everything the man said to her. "Ye won't believe what this man said to me! He said if he was me boyfriend, he'd kiss me all over!"

The boyfriend says, enraged, "Where is this fucker? I'll beat him on up!"

She says, "That's not all! He said if he was me boyfriend, he'd take me shirt off and slap me titties around!"

"I'll kick this lad's ass up through his neck," her boyfriend seethes.

"That's not all!" says the girlfriend, "he said if he was me boyfriend he'd fill me pussy with beer and drink it all up!"

The boyfriend goes silent and throws a bill on the bar. "C'mon honey, we're leaving."

"Why?" she says, "I thought you were gonna beat him bloody!"

"Honey," he says, looking her in the eye. "I won't be fightin' a man that can drink that much beer."

***
My friend knows everyone...
Dave was bragging to his boss one day:
"You know, I know everyone there is to know. Just name someone, anyone, and I know them."
Tired of his boasting, his boss called his bluff, "OK, Dave, how about Tom Cruise?"
"No drama boss, Tom and I are old friends, and I can prove it."
So Dave and his boss fly out to Hollywood and knock on Tom Cruise's door and sure enough, Tom Cruise shouts, "Dave! What's happenin?!? Great to see you! Come on in for a beer!"
Although impressed, Dave's boss is still sceptical. After they leave Cruise's house, he tells Dave that he thinks his knowing Cruise was just lucky.
"No, no, just name anyone else," Dave says.
"President Bush,"his boss quickly retorts.
"Yup," Dave says, "Old buddies, let's fly out to Washington."
And off they go. At the White House, Bush spots Dave on the tour and motions him and his boss over, saying "Dave, what a surprise,I was just on my way to a meeting, but you and your friend come on in and let's have a cup of coffee first and catch up."
Well, the boss is very shaken by now but still not totally convinced. After they leave the White House grounds he expresses his doubts to Dave, who again implores him to name anyone else.
"The Pope," his boss replies.
"Sure!" says Dave. "My folks are from Poland, and I've known the Pope a long time."
So off they fly to Rome.  Dave and his boss are assembled with the masses in Vatican Square when Dave says "This will never work. I can't catch the Pope's eye among all these people.
Tell you what, I know all the guards so let me just go upstairs and I'll come out on the balcony with the Pope."
And he disappears into the crowd headed toward the Vatican. Sure enough, half an hour later Dave emerges with the Pope on the balcony but by the time Dave returns, he finds that his boss has fainted and is surrounded by paramedics.
Working his way to his boss' side, Dave asks him "What happened?"
His boss looks up and says "I was doing fine until you and the Pope came out on the balcony and the man next to me said, "Who the f*ck's that on the balcony with Dave?"
***
Bruce Willis, Arnold Schwarzenegger and Sylvester Stallone are planning a costume party
and the theme is composers. Bruce tells the other stars,  "I'll dress up as Mozart". Sylvester responds, "I'd be a great Beethoven". As the two are planning their costumes, Arnold checks the time and notices he's late for an appointment. As he hurries out the door, Bruce and Stallone ask "Hey, Arnold, who'll you dress up as? Arnold responds, as he walks out of the room, "I'll be Bach".
***
A Chinese family moved into my neighborhood when I was in high school...
They had a pair of twins, named Ving and Ling, who were my age. I liked Ving, but his sister Ling was kind of a bitch. Eventually, Ling told me that he hated his name, and he wanted to change it. I asked him, "What do you want to change your name to?" and he said "Lee. You know, like Bruce Lee?" Ling overheard, and chimed in, saying that their father would disown him if he changed his name.

One day, Ving decided he had had enough. He went to town hall, with me in tow. His sister caught wind and decided to come along  to talk him out of it. 

So we got the name change document, and Ving filled it out and almost turned it in, when he suddenly got choked up and realized that he couldn't go through with the name change. He told the receptionist that he wanted to cancel, and she told him that he could cancel the name change, but he'd need to pay a one-time fee of $20. Ving didn't have any money on him, but his sister did. She was about to hand him $20 when suddenly, a short, elderly Chinese man in an American flag T-shirt, ray-bans and cargo shorts entered the building. Ving stared at him in awe.

"D..Dad?" he stammered, tearfully. 

With a huge smile on his face, the man ran up and embraced his son.

I'll never forget what his father said that day:

> "Don't stop, be Lee, Ving.  
> Hold on the that fee, Ling"
***
God went to a Frenchman
He said 'I've got some commandments, do you want some?'

'What are they like?' The Frenchman replied 

'Thou shall not commit adultery' Answered God

'I don't think so...' Slurred the Frenchman, so God went to a German and asked if he wanted any.

'What are they like?' The German questioned 

'Thou shall not kill' God replied 

'Hmmm, perhaps not' The German sighed, so God went to an Italian, offering him some commandments

'What are they like?' The Italian inquired 

'Thou shall not steal' Answered God 

'Perhaps not' The Italian replied. So God went to a Jew and offered him some commandments 

'How much are they?' The Jew asked

'They're free' God answered 

'I'll take ten' Said the Jew 








***
Paddy died in a fire and was burnt pretty badly...
So the morgue needed someone to identify the body. His two best friends, Seamus and Sean, were sent for. Seamus went in and the mortician pulled back the sheet.

Seamus said, "Yup, he's burnt pretty bad. Roll him over."
So the mortician rolled him over. Seamus looked and said, "Nope, it ain't Paddy."
The mortician thought that was rather strange and then he brought Sean in to identify the body.

Sean took a look at him and said, "Yup, he's burnt real bad, roll him over."
The mortician rolled him over and Sean looked down and said, "No, it ain't Paddy."

The mortician asked, "How can you tell?"
Sean said, "Well, Paddy had two arseholes."
"What? He had two arseholes?" said the mortician.
"Yup, everyone knew he had two arseholes. Every time we went into town, folks would say, 'Here comes Paddy with them two arseholes'.
***
An elderly couple, Margaret and Bert, live in Arkansas.
An elderly couple, Margaret and Bert, live in Arkansas.

Bert always wanted a pair of authentic cowboy boots. So seeing some on sale one day, he buys them, wears them home, walking proudly.

He walks into the house and says to his wife ‘Notice anything different about me?’

Margaret looks him over, ‘Nope.’

Frustrated, Bert storms off into the bathroom, undresses, and walks back into the room completely naked except for the boots.

Again, he asks, a little louder this time ‘Notice anything different NOW?’

Margaret looks up and says, ‘Bert, what’s different? It’s hanging down today, it was hanging down yesterday, and it’ll be hanging down again tomorrow.’

Furious, Bert yells, AND DO YOU KNOW WHY IT’S HANGING DOWN, MARGARET?

‘Nope’ she replies.

‘IT’S HANGING DOWN BECAUSE IT’S LOOKING AT MY NEW BOOTS!!!!!’ Bert yells.

To which Margaret replies…”Shoulda bought a hat, Bert. Shoulda bought a hat.”
***
Banker's balls (nsfw)
A little old lady went into the Bank of Canada one day, carrying a bag of money. She insisted that she must speak with the president of the bank to open a savings account because, "It's a lot of money!" After much hemming and hawing, the bank staff finally ushered her into the president's office.

The bank president then asked her how much she would like to deposit. She replied, "$165,000!" and dumped the cash out of her bag onto his desk. The president was of course curious as to how she came by all this cash, so he asked her, "Madam, I'm surprised you're carrying so much cash around. Where did you get this money?" The old lady replied, "I make bets." The president then asked, "Bets? What kind of bets?" The old woman said, "Well, for example, I'll bet you $25,000 that your balls are square." The president laughs, "That's a stupid bet. You can never win that kind of bet!" The old lady challenged, "So, would you like to take my bet?" The president agrees, "Sure, I'll bet $25,000 that my balls aren't square!" The little old lady then said, "Okay, but since there is a lot of money involved, may I bring my lawyer with me tomorrow at 10am as a witness?"
"Sure!" replied the confident president.

That night, the president got very nervous about the bet and spent a long time in front of a mirror checking his balls, turning from side to side, again and again. He thoroughly checked them out until he was sure that there was absolutely no way his balls were square and that he would win the bet. The next morning, at precisely 10am, the little old lady appeared with her lawyer at the president's office.

She introduced the lawyer to the president and repeated the bet "$25,000 says the president's balls are square!" The president agreed with the bet again and the old lady asked him to drop his pants so they could all see. The president complied. The little old lady peered closely at his balls and then asked if she could feel them. "Well, Okay," said the president, "$25,000 is a lot of money, so I guess you should be absolutely sure."

Just then, he noticed that the lawyer was quietly banging his head against the wall. The president asked the old lady, "What the hell's the matter with your lawyer?" She replied, "Nothing, except I bet him $100,000 that at 10am today I'd have The Bank of Canada's president's balls in my hand."
***
A woman gets accidentally pregnant as a teenager and ends up giving birth to twin boys...
Unfortunately, she is forced to give them up for adoption since she doesn't have the resources to support them, and the father wants nothing to do with them since he is a teenager himself. In the hope that she will get to see them some day, she leaves her personal information with the adoption agency just in case the boys want to meet their biological mother in the future. One of the boys gets adopted by a family in Egypt and is named “Ahmal.” The other was taken in by a family in Spain, and they name him “Juan.” She hopes that their new lives will have more to offer them, and that they will be happy there.


Years later, the woman is much better off financially, and is living a new life in a nice house with a new man in her life. However, she still always thinks about her sons, and keeps her information at the agency up to date just in case they ask for her.


As luck has it, Juan decides one day that he wants to reconnect with his birth mother. He gets her information from the agency and sends her a picture of himself. Upon receiving the picture she is absolutely thrilled to see how he has grown, how handsome he is, and how happy he seems to be. She hopes that Ahmal is doing well too and tells her husband that she wishes she had a picture of Ahmal as well. Her husband responds, "They’re identical twins, honey. If you’ve seen Juan, you’ve seen Ahmal.”
***
A grade school teacher was asking students what their parents did for a living.
A grade school teacher was asking students what their parents did
for a living.  

"Tim, you be first," she said.  "What does your mother do all day?"

Tim stood up and proudly said, "She's a doctor."

"That's wonderful.  How about you, Amie?"

Amie shyly stood up, scuffed her feet and said, "My father is a mailman."

"Thank you, Amie," said the teacher.  "What about your father, Billy?"

Billy proudly stood up and announced, "My daddy plays piano in a whorehouse."

The teacher was aghast and promptly changed the subject to geography.

Later that day she went to Billy's house and rang the bell.  Billy's father answered the door.  The teacher explained what his son had said and demanded an explanation.

Billy's father replied, "Well, I'm really an attorney.  But how do you explain a thing like that to a seven-year-old child?"

***
An engineer dies and goes to heaven...
He meets St. Peter at the pearly gates, and St. Peter checks the list. St. Peter doesn't find his name, so he says 'sorry, looks like you are supposed to go to the other place'.

So the engineer then goes down to Hell. Soon, he starts seeing things that could be improved. He builds a central air conditioning unit to help control the heat. He starts installing a central sewage system.

God notices, and quickly calls Satan. He calls and says 'there's been a mistake! The engineer is supposed to be up here with us!'

Satan replies: 'you know, we're pretty happy with what the changes he had been making, I think we'll keep him'

God gets mad and says 'you send him up here this minute or else I'll sue you!'

Satan laughs and says, 'yeah, you and what lawyers?'
***
Two elves walk into Santa's office.
Santa looks up and says, "Gary, Larry, how can I help you?" Gary and Larry look at each other, then turn to Santa.  
"Santa", Gary says, "Are there any elf nuns in the workshop?" Santa checks a list and says, "No, I'm sorry but there are no elf nuns in the workshop."  
Gary asks, "Well Santa, are there any elf nuns working any where in the compound?" Santa checks a list then says, "I'm sorry, but there are no elf nuns working in the coumpound."  
Gary looks at Larry and asks, "Santa, are there any elf nuns in the North Pole at all?" Santa looks at his list for a few minutes and says, "I'm sorry Gary, but there aren't any elf nuns in the North Pole."  
Larry finally busts out laughing and says, "See? I knew you fucked a penguin!"  
  
'Tis the season for giving, post your best holiday joke!
***
Joe the Train Conductor
Joe, a train conductor, was driving his train when he fell asleep at the controls. The train suffered a terrible crash and only those in the front of the train survived. Joe was put on trial for the negligent homicide of nearly a hundred people. He was found guilty and sentenced to death by the electric chair.

When asked what he'd like for his last meal, he replied simply with "A banana, if you will." The prison guard shrugged, got a banana, and gave it to the poor man. Joe ate the banana in regular fashion and braced himself for death. He was seated on the chair, fastened in, and was ready for what was about to happen.

However, after the electricity was activated, nothing happened. The guard was astonished. Not knowing what to do, he simply let Joe go.

A few days later, Joe was back to work conducting trains. Shortly after his return, he managed to derail yet another train, again killing nearly a hundred people but surviving the crash. As before, he was charged and found guilty of multiple negligent homicides. Again, he was sentenced to death by electric chair.

It was the same prison guard as before. He was surprised to see Joe again but held his tongue, for the man was about to die and it would be rude to question him. "What would you like for your last meal, sir?" Joe respond as he did last time: "A banana, if you will." The prison guard shrugged, got a banana, and gave it to the poor man. Joe ate the banana in regular fashion and again braced himself for death. He was seated on the chair, fastened in, and was ready for what was about to happen.

The electricity was activated and Joe was prepared. But, as before, he was unhurt. The prison guard checked for any malfunctions but found nothing, not believing the entire situation was possible. Now even more incredulous than before, and not knowing what to do, the guard let him go.

Joe was, against all odds, alive and was incredibly still allowed to continue his job as a train conductor even though he was responsible for the deaths of almost two hundred people.

He was thankful to be allowed to continue his job but also scared. He would try to drive more carefully from now on. However, this effort didn't help much, as the very next train he was conducting, he managed to somehow crash. He was the only survivor of the train, which again contained over a hundred people. He was again charged, and again found responsible for the deaths of over a hundred people. He was sentenced to death by electric chair.

The prison guard was the same, the meal was the same, the procedure was the same. After giving Joe the banana, the guard was silent. He couldn't bring himself to say anything, all he could do was prepare the chair.

Joe sat in the chair, expecting death. The guard activated it and, again, Joe was unscathed. The prison guard couldn't contain himself. He simply had to ask, "Sir, how did you manage to crash a train 3 times? And how did you survive the chair 3 times? Did the banana have something to do with it?" 

Joe paused for a moment. Then he replied: "No, I suppose I'm just a terrible conductor."
***
A man gets his fiance, Wendy's name tattooed on his penis....
So when he's hard it says "Wendy," but when it's soft it just says, "W Y." 

So they get married and go to Jamaica on their honeymoon. They're dancing in the club and drinking and having a good time when inevitably the man has to go to the bathroom. 

He's standing at the urinal and notices a big tall jamaican guy next to him has "W Y" tattooed on his penis. 

The newlywed says, "Excuse me, but I noticed you have "W Y" on your penis. 

The Jamaican replies, "Ya mon. I see you have it too.. Tell me mon, what does yours say when it's hard?" 

The man says proudly, "When mine's hard, it says 'Wendy'. What does yours say?"

 The jamaican says, "Ah Mon, when mine is hard it says 'Welcome to the island of Jamaica, Have a nice day!"
***
Pilot and Co-Pilot
The pilot was Jewish, and the co-pilot was Chinese. It was the first time they had flown together, and it was obvious by the silence that they didn't get along. After 30 minutes, the Captain finally spoke. He said, "I don't like Chinese."

The co-pilot replied, "Ooooh, no like Chinese? WHY is that?"

The pilot said, "You guys bombed Pearl Harbor. THAT'S why I don't like Chinese!"

The co-pilot said, "Nooooo, noooo ...Chinese not bomb Pearl Harbor. That JAPANESE, not Chinese!"

And the pilot answered, "Chinese, Japanese, Vietnamese ... it doesn't matter. They're ALL ALIKE."


Another 30 minutes of silence. Finally the co-pilot said, "No like Jew."

The pilot replied, "Why not? WHY don't you like Jews?"

"Jews sink Titanic" said the co-pilot.

The pilot tried to correct him, "NO, NO!! The JEWS didn't sink the Titanic. It was an ICEBERG!"

"Iceberg, Goldberg, Rosenberg .. no mattah .. ALL SAME!"
***
De parrot, he is dead
At dawn the telephone rings,

"Hello, Señor Bob? This is Ernesto, the caretaker at your country house."

"Ah yes, Ernesto. What can I do for you? Is there a problem?"

"Um, I am just calling to advise you, Señor Bob, that your parrot, he is dead".

"My parrot? Dead? The one that won the International competition?"

"Si, Señor, that's the one."

"Damn! That's a pity! I spent a small fortune on that bird. What did he die from?"

"From eating the rotten meat, Señor Bob."

"Rotten meat? Who the hell fed him rotten meat?"

"Nobody, Señor. He ate the meat of the dead horse."

"Dead horse? What dead horse?"

"The thoroughbred, Señor Bob .."

"My prize thoroughbred is dead?"

"Yes, Señor Bob, he died from all that work pulling the water cart."

"Are you insane? What water cart?"

"The one we used to put out the fire, Señor."

"Good Lord! What fire are you talking about, man?"

"The one at your house, Señor! A candle fell and the curtains caught on fire."

"What the hell? Are you saying that my mansion is destroyed because of a candle?!"

"Yes, Señor Bob."

"But there's electricity at the house! What was the candle for?"

"For the funeral, Señor Bob .."

"WHAT BLOODY FUNERAL??!!"

"Your wife's, Señor Bob. She showed up very late one night and I thought she was a thief, so I hit her with your new Ping G15 204g titanium head golf club with the TFC 149D graphite shaft."

SILENCE...........

LONG SILENCE.........

VERY LONG SILENCE............

"Ernesto, if you broke that driver, you're in deep shit."
***
The Muslim Ban
 Several centuries ago, the Pope decreed that all Muslims had to convert to Catholicism or leave Italy. There was a huge outcry from the Muslim community, so the Pope offered a deal. He'd have a religious debate with the leader of the Muslim community. If the Muslims won, they could stay in Italy; and if the Pope won, they'd have to convert or leave.

The Muslim people met and picked an aged and wise Mufti to represent them in the debate. However, as the Mufti didn't speak Italian, and the Pope didn't speak Arabic, they agreed that it would be a "silent" debate.

On the chosen day the Pope and Mufti sat opposite each other. The Pope raised his hand and showed three fingers. The Mufti looked back and raised one finger. Next, the Pope waved his fingers around his head. The Mufti pointed to the ground where he sat. The Pope brought out a communion wafer and a chalice of wine. The Mufti pulled out an apple. With that, the Pope stood up and declared himself beaten and said that the Moulana was too clever. The Muslims could stay in Italy.

Later the cardinals met with the Pope and asked him what had happened. The Pope said, "First I held up three fingers to represent the Trinity. He responded by holding up a single finger to remind me there is still only one God! Then, I waved my finger around my head to show him that God was all around us. He responded by pointing to the ground to show that God was also right here with us. I pulled out the wine and wafer to show that God absolves us of all our sins. He pulled out an apple to remind me of the original sin. He beat me at every move and I could not continue!"

Meanwhile, the Muslim community gathered to ask the Mufti how he'd won. "I haven't a clue," the Mufti said. "First, he told me that we had three days to get out of Italy, so I gave him as they call it 'the finger.' Then he tells me that the whole country would be cleared of Muslims and I told him that we were staying right here!" "And then what?" asked a woman. "Who knows?" said the Mufti. "He took out his lunch so I took out mine."

Edit: First time I heard this joke was around a year ago, but I had never heard the Jewish one until shortly after. So yeah, I'm well aware it's a repost, but, obviously by the votes, not that many people heard it the first time around (or second, third...fifth...twenty-second...etc.) so thank you, but it has already been pointed out.
***
How do you know?
An air traffic control tower suddenly lost communication with a small twin engine aircraft. A moment later the tower landline rang and was answered by one of the employees. The passenger riding with the pilot who lost communications was on a cellular phone.

“Mayday, mayday! The pilot had an instant and fatal heart attack. I grabbed his cell phone out of his pocket and he had told me before we took off he had the tower on his speed dial memory. I am flying upside down at 18,000 feet and traveling at 180 mph. Mayday, mayday!”

The employee in the tower immediately put him on speaker phone. “Calm down, we acknowledge you and we’ll guide you down after a few questions. The first thing is not to panic. Remain calm!”

He began his series of questions:

Tower: “How do you know you are traveling at 18,000 feet??”

Aircraft: “I can see that it reads 18,000 feet on the altimeter dial in front of me.”

Tower: “Okay, that’s good, remain calm. How do you know you’re traveling at 180 mph?”

Aircraft: “I can see that it reads 180 mph on the airspeed dial in front of me.”

Tower: "Okay, this is great so far, but it’s heavily overcast. So how do you know you’re flying upside down?"

Aircraft: “The shit in my pants is running out of my shirt collar.”
***
Brexit's Worst-Case Scenario:
Brexit to be followed by Grexit. Departugal. Italeave. Fruckoff. Czechout. Oustria. Finish. Slovlong. Latervia. Byegium.. until EU reach the state of Germlonely.
***
Here's a joke from Bulgaria, translated for your convenience.
One a motorway near the coast in Varna a musclebound mafioso (refered to as mutra in Bulgaria) is driving with his subordinates in his brand new Mercedes S63 AMG. When he nears a traffic signal, he gets rear ended. Pissed off, he gets out to have a look. Turns out that an elderly gentleman in a rusty Lada smashed into him. He gets him out of the car and starts yelling at him:

-What the f***, man! This is my brand new ride, I ain't even got no insurance on this b****, 'cause I bought it with all my "revenue"! You... you are ohing to literally pay for this! Right here, right now! I don't care how, just get busy or me and my boys are going to stop being nice!

So the shaking old man humbly replies:

-I am terribly sorry sir, I can't pay you back right this moment, but my son might be able to help. He's a dolfin trainer. Do you mind if I call him over?

-Shure, whatever, just do it now!

So he does, and after ten minutes two Hummers park in front and behind them, a dosen strong men jump out from inside and beat the living hell out of the magiosos. Then the old man's son goes over to him and says:

-Der father, how many times do I have to tell you, I'm not a dolfin trainer, I'm a seal instructor!
***
Materialism
A Wall Street broker parked his brand new Lamborghini on the street at the front of his office so that all of his coworkers could see it and envy him.  As he was opening the door, a cab flew by, clipped the door, and then kept going.  The broker sat there for a moment in shock, staring through his windshield at the remains of his door, 20 feet in front of his brand new, very expensive car.
He finally snaps out of it and is livid.  He gets out of the car and screams at the fleeing cab, shaking his fist in fury.  Realizing that it was pointless to continue yelling at the cab, he called the police and yelled at them, demanding that they catch the man responsible for this.
When the police arrive, the man is further frustrated because he can't remember any distinguishing features about the cab and "yellow" doesn't help much in New York City.
"This is ridiculous!" he screamed, "It's going to cost a fortune to fix this, it'll be in the shop for months, and it'll never be quite right!"
The officer just looked at him, flabbergasted, "Sir, I can't believe you..."
"Me...you can't believe me!?" the broker screamed back, "What about the idiot who did this to my car?!"
"You Wall Street people are all the same," the officer continued calmly, "you're all so materialistic."
"Someone did thousands of dollars worth of damage and you're standing here lecturing me on materialism!? What's it matter to you?! Just do your job!"
"But, sir, when you opened your door, it took more than your door," the officer said, pointing at the bloody stump where the broker's left hand used to be.
The broker looked down and, after a moment of shock, screamed, "OH MY GOD! MY ROLEX!!"
***
Husband & Wife Diary Entries
Wife's Diary

Bob has been acting so weird lately. Yesterday, we had made plans to meet at a nice restaurant for supper. I’d been shopping with Jenny all day, so I thought he was upset because I was a bit late, but he didn't say anything about it. 

Conversation over supper wasn't flowing, so I asked him what was wrong; He said, "Nothing." I asked him if it was my fault that he was upset. He said he wasn't upset, that it had nothing to do with me, and not to worry about it. On the way home, I told him that I loved him. He smiled slightly, and kept driving.

Tonight, when he came home from work, he skipped supper altogether, piddled in the garage for two hours, then headed straight for his recliner and sat there quietly staring at the TV. When I asked him about the fire they’d just covered on the news, he said he hadn’t followed the story. It had just been on! 

Finally, with silence all around us, I decided to go to bed. About 15 minutes later, he came to bed, but he was distant and distracted. He didn't even kiss me goodnight -- he just fell asleep. I lay there for hours wondering what was wrong. I don't know how to reach him. I don’t know what to do. 

 Husband's Diary:

 Boat still won’t start. Can't figure it out.
***
A Blonde and A lawyer.
A lawyer and a blonde are waiting at the airport next to each other.  The lawyer asks if she would like to play a fun game of Find the Answer.  The blonde, tired, just wants to take a nap, politely declines and rolls over to the window to catch a few winks.  The lawyer persists and explains that the game is easy and a lot of fun. 

 He explains, "I ask you a question, and if you don't know the answer, you pay me $5.00, and vice versa.  " Again, she declines and tries to get some sleep.  The lawyer, now agitated, says, "Okay, if you don't know the answer you pay me $5.00, and if I don't know the answer, I will pay you $500.00."  This catches the blonde's attention and, figuring there will be no end to this torment unless she plays, agrees to the game. 

 The lawyer asks the first question.  "What's the distance from the earth to the moon?"  The blonde doesn't say a word, reaches into her purse, pulls out a $5.00 bill and hands it to the lawyer. 

 "Okay" says the lawyer, "your turn."  

She asks the lawyer, "What goes up a hill with three legs and comes down with four legs?"  

The lawyer, puzzled, takes out his laptop computer and searches all his references, no answer.  He searches on the airport wifi, no answer. Frustrated, he sends e-mails to all his friends and coworkers, to no avail.  After an hour, he wakes the blonde, and hands her $500.00. 

 The blonde says, "Thank you," and turns back to get some more sleep.  

The lawyer, who is more than a little miffed, wakes the blonde and asks, "Well, what's the answer?"  

Without a word, the blonde reaches into her purse, hands the lawyer $5.00, and goes back to sleep. 
***
There once was an Indian who had only one testicle...
There once was an Indian who had only one testicle and whose given name was 'Onestone'. He hated that name and asked everyone not to call him Onestone. 


After years and years of torment, Onestone finally cracked and said,' If anyone calls me Onestone again I will kill them!' The word got around and nobody called him that any more. 


Then one day a young woman named Blue Bird forgot and said, 'Good morning, Onestone.' 


He jumped up, grabbed her and took her deep into the forest where he made love to her all day and all night. He made love to her all the next day, until Blue Bird died from exhaustion. The word got around that Onestone meant what he promised he would do. 


Years went by and no one dared call him by his given name until a woman named Yellow Bird returned to the village after being away. Yellow Bird, who was Blue Bird's cousin, was overjoyed when she saw Onestone. 


She hugged him and said, 'Good to see you, Onestone.' 


Onestone grabbed her, took her deep into the forest, then he made love to her all day, made love to her all night, made love to her all the next day, made love to her all the next night, but Yellow Bird wouldn't die! 


Why??? 


Everyone knows... You can't kill Two Birds with OneStone!!!
***
A man walks into a restaurant in Spain...
He sits down and orders his food. As he is waiting for his meal, a waiter walks by carrying a tray of food. The food smells so good that he immediately flags down another waiter and asks what it was that just passed him by. The waiter says, "ah Señor, those were the testicles of the bull that was slain at todays bullfights." The man, being a culinary adventurer, asks if he may also have this dish. "alas, es imposible," exclaims the waiter, "there is only one pair available per day." The man thanks the waiter, eats his food, and leaves.
He comes back the next day, early, and requests the remains of the bullfight. The food comes and the man immediately eats it all. 
"How was it today, señor?" asks the same waiter as before.
"Delicious!" exclaims the man,"I have but one question."
"si?" inquires the waiter.
"Everything was fine, but the portion today was so much smaller than yesterday. Why was that?" the man asks.
The waiter replies, " Sometimes, señor, the bull wins."
***
A new priest at his first mass was so nervous he could hardly speak.
After mass he asked the bishop how he had done.

The bishop replied, 'When I am worried about getting nervous on the pulpit, I put a glass of vodka next to the water glass. If I start to get nervous, I take a sip.'

So next Sunday he took the bishop's advice.

At the beginning of the sermon, he got nervous and took a drink.

He proceeded to talk up a storm.

Upon his return to his office after the mass, he found the following note on the door:

1) Sip the vodka, don't gulp.

2) There are 10 commandments, not 12.

3) There are 12 disciples, not 10.

4) Jesus was consecrated, not constipated.

5) Jacob wagered his donkey, he did not bet his ass.

6) We do not refer to Jesus Christ as the late J.C.

7) The Father, Son, and Holy Ghost are not referred to as Big Daddy, Junior and the spook.

8) David slew Goliath; he did not kick the shit out of him.

9) When David was hit by a rock and was knocked off his donkey, don't say he was stoned off his ass.

10) We do not refer to the cross as the 'Big T.'

11) When Jesus broke the bread at the last supper he said, 'Take this and eat it for it is my body.' He did not say 'Eat me'.

12) The Virgin Mary is not called 'Mary with the Cherry.'

13) The recommended grace before a meal is not: Rub-A-Dub-Dub thanks for the grub, Yeah God.

14) Next Sunday there will be a taffy pulling contest at St. Peter's not a peter pulling contest at St. Taffy's.
***
Harold in the Nursing Home. This is my grandma's favourite joke.
Disclaimer: I just heard this joke today, so I apologize if this is old news for some of you.


Harold is 95 and lives in a Senior Citizen Home. Every night after dinner, Harold goes to a secluded garden behind the Centre to sit and ponder his accomplishments and long life. 

One evening, Mildred, age 87, wanders into the garden. They begin to chat and before they know it, several hours have passed. 

After a short lull in their conversation, Harold turns to Mildred and asks, "Do you know what I miss most of all?" Sex!" 

Mildred exclaims, "Why you old fart! You couldn't get it up if I held a gun to your head!"

"I know," Harold says, "but it would be nice if a woman could just hold it for a while."

"Well, I can oblige," says Mildred, who unzips his trousers, removes his manhood and proceeds to hold it. Afterward, they agree to meet secretly each night in the garden where they would sit and talk and Mildred would hold Harold's manhood.

Then one night, Harold didn't show up at their usual meeting place. Alarmed, Mildred decided to find Harold to make sure that he was okay.

She walked around the Senior Citizen Home. She found him sitting by the pool with Ethel, another female resident, who was holding Harold's manhood.

Furious, Mildred yelled, "You two-timing son of a bitch! What does Ethel have that I don't have?"

Old Harold smiled happily and replied, "Parkinson's."
***
A blind man walks into a restaurant and asks for a used spoon.
The restaurant owner finds it odd but obliges. The man takes a lick and thinks for awhile, and declared "Hmm, lobster linguine in tomato and habanero sauce! I think I'll have one of those!" The restaurant owner was incredulous as that was one of the restaurant's best dishes, and serves him one. 

The next day, the blind man came back and asked for another used spoon. When he takes a lick, he proclaims "Hmm, roast pork knuckle with Dijon mustard and blue cheese sauce! I'll have that!" The restaurant owner was impressed as that was the special of the day that he had never served before. 

The following day, the blind man walks in and asks for another spoon. The owner wants to trick the blind man and asks his wife to rub a clean spoon onto her pussy. Although she is disgusted, she was finally coerced to do so. Sniggering, the owner passes the spoon to the blind man. The blind man took a lick, thinks awhile before shouting "Hey, I didn't know Ellie works here!"
***
A Letter To Jesus
Some workers at the post office are sorting through the mail when they see a letter addressed to Jesus Christ. Baffled, they decide to open the letter, which reads as follows: 

"Dear Jesus, I'm writing because I'm in a bind and I don't know where else to turn. I've talked to all of my so-called friends and nobody will help me out. I need a hundred dollars to take care of some problems, and having exhausted all my other options I turn to You. I know You'll help me in my time of need."

The workers take this letter to their supervisor, and after reading it over, they all decide to help the man out. Everyone at the post office chips in, but after one week they only manage to collect $75. They decide to mail this money to the man anyways as if Jesus himself had sent it, figuring that $75 is better than nothing at all.

Some time later, a second letter arrives at the post office from the same individual, also addressed to Jesus Christ. The workers, excited to learn the result of their generous act, quickly open the letter:

"Dear Jesus, I want to thank you for the money You sent me. I just knew I could count on You. Forgive me for writing again, but I've gotten myself tangled up in another mess, and I need another hundred dollars. I only ask that if You find it in Your heart to help me out again, please don't send me the money through the mail. Last time, I'm pretty sure those assholes at the post office opened Your letter and stole $25."
***
So a chicken walks into a library and says, "bock". Sounding like "book", the librarian hands him a a book. He takes it and goes merrily on his way. Then the next day ...
The chicken says "bock bock", and the librarian hands him two books.  Away he went.  The third day, chicken says "bock bock bock", and the librarian hands him three books.  And so on until the fifth day, when the chicken says "bock bock bock bock bock", the librarian hands him five books and follows him to see what he's doing with all these books.  

There is a frog sitting across the way that the chicken takes the books to.  The librarian, confused but curious, continues to follow the chicken.  The chicken approaches the frog, says "bock bock bock bock bock", places the five books into the frogs hands.  The frog responds by tossing each book aside one by one, "reddit reddit reddit reddit reddit"!

**Honest question:**  Is this jokey enough, or do I need to take my bullshit to dadjokes?
***
A man walks into a bar...
A man walks into a bar and he is completely parched. He sits at the bar, pats his pockets and realises he's left his wallet at home. He calls to the bartender, 

"Hey pal, I've left my wallet at home but hey... tell you what, if I can show you something incredible, will you give me a free beer in return?"

The bartender is a worldly individual. "Listen mate, look around at the stuff on the walls, I've seen all kinds of things, been all kinds of places. I mean, you can give it a shot but I honestly doubt you can show me something that impressive."

So the man reaches into his left jacket pocket and pulls out a small hamster. He places the hamster on the bar and the bartender looks bemused. The man reaches into his other jacket pocket and pulls out a tiny piano, followed by a tiny stool, just the right size for the hamster, who sits down, cracks his knuckles and starts playing a famous piece of music by Rachmaninoff.

The bartender is speechless.

"Tell you what mate... I've seen some things in my time but that is absolutely incredible! Here's your free beer."

The visitor gulps down his drink until the last drop is gone. But he can't help but feel another drink would really hit the spot. He motions to the bartender again.

"Look, I could really use another drink - how about I show you something even more incredible?"

The bartender stares in disbelief. "After that performance, I think you'll struggle to beat it! But go on, try your luck then."

The man reaches into his left jacket pocket again and retrieves a small frog, who is wearing a waist coat. He places the frog on the stool beside the hamster. The hamster counts to four, the frog clears his throat, and over the piano the frog sings a classic opera, bringing several people in the bar to tears.

"Oh my word," says the bartender. "That is absolutely unbelievable. Here's your pint, mate. You've earned it."

In the corner of the room, a shady looking individual has been watching with keen interest from behind his dark sunglasses. He approaches the owner of the performing animals and gets straight to business.

"I'll give you £50,000 right now, in cash, if you'll let me take that frog off your hands this instant."

"Well, sure, why not?" says the man, as he duly hands the frog over to the shady character, who promptly slides back a silver briefcase filled with bank notes before making his exit with the frog.

"Are you MAD!?" the bartender says to the man. "You could have made millions with that frog!"

"Nah," says the man. 

"The hamster's a ventriloquist."
***
My mother is Polish and my father was not, so growing up we heard a lot of Polish jokes from my father. All in good fun of course. Here is my favorite.
Yosh and Stosh decided they were going to take a vacation back to their native land Poland.  So they’re on the plane halfway across the Atlantic and everything is going great when the captain makes an announcement over the intercom.

“Folks, were having a little trouble with on of the engines and it stopped working.  It’s not a big deal but I does mean we are going to be in the air a little longer”.

Yosh and Stosh are a little nervous but it’s ok, they’ll just get there a little late.

After a little while the captain comes on the intercom once again.

“Folks, I have a little more bad news.  Seems we’ve lost another engine so we’re going to be flying a little slower and so we’ll be in the air a little longer.”

Yosh and Stosh are a little nervous but if the captain says they will be ok, they believe him.

A few hours go by and the captain makes another announcement.

“Well folks we’ve lost yet another engine but there’s no need to worry, we have one remaining, however, it does mean we’re going to be in the air longer still."

After hearing this last announcement Stosh is visibly upset.  He turns to Yosh and says “wow this is crazy, if we lose that last engine we’ll never get down”

***
Being Muslim is tough
Since i was a young boy my father has imposed his religion onto me. I was home schooled because we live in the west and my father wanted me in an environment that was free from anything Haram. I couldn't associate with Hindus or Christians, anyone who ate unclean animals, or any girl. As a teenage guy going through puberty this was naturally a living nightmare. After years of begging from me and pressure from his colleagues, i was finally allowed to attend a very nice coed high school. The only rule was that i had to keep avoiding anything Haram. Being free for the first time i started to celebrate. Ate bacon my first day, had Hindu friends in a week, and within the month i had even met a girl. I was shy and awkward as i could possibly be but she liked me and thought i was funny. She was a little too hipster punk for me, listing to music i've never heard and using words like tubular and bae, but i loved it. Within two months we were dating. It was going great until my father heard about it. The Hindus and bacon he could overlook, but the women to him were really wrong. To him this was too much and he even claimed me of having sex with her. As if it couldn't get any weirder he actually demanded i show him my penis to prove i haven't been having sex. I had to ask him twice to make sure i heard him right. It was awkward but living under his roof i had to do as he commands. I started to go out with her on dates and every time i came home i had to whip it out for dad. It might be insane, but i actually am ok with dicks out for haram bae.

***
New hooker in town.
Bill and his wife Julie were going through financial crisis.  Bill suggested Julie to become a hooker.  

Julie was not sure how to start that, so Bill said, "Stand near that pillar and pick up a guy. Tell him your rate is $200. If you got any question, I'll be parked around the corner".  

Within couple of minutes a black guy pulls up and asked, "How much?"   
"$200"    
"Shigh, I have only $120"   
"Hold on"...  wife runs back to Bill.    
"What can he get in $120".   
"A handjob" Bill said.   
  
  
Wife runs back and tells the guys he will get a handjob in $120.  Black guy agrees. She gets in the car, he unzips his pants and here is the biggest schlong ever.   

She stares it for a minute and says, "Hold on, I will be right back".   
 
She runs back to her husband and says, "Bill can you please lend him $80"   


***
10 pints
A Texan walks into a pub in Ireland and clears his voice to the crowd of drinkers. He says, 
"I hear you Irish are a bunch of hard drinkers. I'll give $500 
American dollars to anybody in here who can drink 10 pints of Guinness back-to-back. " 


The room is quiet and no one takes up the 
Texan's offer. One man even leaves. 

Thirty minutes later the same gentleman who left shows back up and taps the Texan on the shoulder. "Is your bet still good? ", asks the Irishman. 


The Texan says yes and asks the bartender to line up 10 pints of 
Guinness. 


Immediately the Irishman tears into all 10 of the pint glasses drinking them all back-to-back. The other pub patrons cheer as the Texan sits in amazement. 


The Texan gives the Irishman the $500 and says, "If ya don't mind me askin', where did you go for that 30 minutes you were gone? ". 


The Irishman replies, "Oh... I had to go to the pub down the street to see if I could do it first ".
***
A Jew and an Arab walk into a bakery.
Once inside the Arab grabs three pastries and swiftly stashes them in his pocket. He then looks at the Jew with a prideful smile and says "See how sly I am?"
The Jew, being determined to crush the Arab's pride, walks up to the baker and says "If you give me a pastry I will show you a magic trick." The baker's curiosity got the best of him and he agreed.
The Jew ate the pastry and then asked for another. The Jew ate the second one and asked for a third. After the Jew ate the third one the baker's patience began to run low. The baker asked "Okay, so where are the pastries?"

The Jew smiled and answered "Look in the Arabs back pocket."
***
First Class Blonde
A plane is on its way to Detroit when a blonde woman in economy class gets up and moves into an open seat in the first class section.

The flight attendant watches her do this, and politely informs the woman that she must sit in economy class because that's the type of ticket she paid for.

The blonde replies, "I'm blonde, I'm beautiful, I'm going to Detroit and I'm staying right here."

After repeated attempts and no success at convincing the woman to move, the flight attendant goes into the cockpit and informs the pilot and co-piolet that there's a blonde bimbo sitting in first class who refuses to go back to her proper seat. The co-pilot goes back to the woman and explains why she needs to move, but once again the woman replies by saying, "I'm blonde, I'm beatiful, I'm going to Detroit and I'm staying right here."

The co-pilot returns to the cockpit and suggests that perhaps they should have the arrival gate call the police and have the woman arrested when they land. The pilot says, "You say she's blonde? I'll handle this. I'm married to a blonde. I speak blonde." He goes back to the woman and whispers quietly in her ear, and she says, "Oh, I'm sorry," then quickly moves back to her seat in economy class.

The flight attendant and co-pilot are amazed and ask him what he said to get her to move back to economy without causing any fuss.

"I told her first class isn't going to Detroit." 
***
Kate Upton & Kate Middleton compete in a popularity contest
Kate Upton goes first, she gets up on stage and undoes her blouse and starts shaking her tits up, down, and in all directions, the audience which consists of mostly men start cheering and going crazy, Kate Middleton then gets up on stage, sets a chair up, takes a seat and starts douching, the audience start looking away in disgust.

When the Announcement of the winner is made, its revealed that Kate Middleton was the winner, shocked Kate Upton asks how in the world did she not win, in which she learned that a Royal Flush beats 2 of a kind
***
It's three days before prom, and Billy realizes he still hasn't gotten his tux yet...
It's three days before prom, and Billy realizes he still hasn't gotten his tux yet. So, he goes all the way downtown to the tux store and when he opens the door there's a huge long tux line. Apparently everyone in town waited until the last possible minute to rent a tux, which shouldn't be that surprising for a 17 year old boy.

So he waits and he waits and he waits and finally he gets his tux when he over hears two boys talking about their dates and he thinks "Shit! I need to get a corsage."

So Billy heads on down to the florist and of course there is a huge long corsage line. This too, of course shouldn't be surprising as flowers will die and you don't want to buy them too early. He waits and waits and finally he has his flowers. When he's leaving the shop he overhears two ladies looking at flowers and talking about wedding transportation and Billy groans and thinks "I need a limo."

Wouldn't you know it, prom season is prime wedding season as well, and when he gets to the rental agency theres a huge long limo line. Billy spends even longer waiting in the limo line than the other shops, it's nearly dark when he finally gets his limo.

Billy is relieved to finally have everything he needs for the prom and phones his girlfriend Penny to tell her the good news. Penny asks "Did you get the prom tickets?" Billy starts to panic when Penny laughs and told him she got them a week ago and scolds him for waiting so long to reserve everything.

The night of the prom arrives and when Billy and Penny get to the prom theres a huge long prom line to get in, because of course in this day and age they need to search the prom goers for drugs and alcohol and weapons. Billy submits to a pat down and goes into the prom.

Penny says lets go dance for a bit, and after some hard core boogying, Penny suggests they eat. Billy agrees and follows her to the buffet table where there's a huge long buffet line. So they wait and they wait getting hungrier and more impatient until they are finally laden with food and make there way to their table.

They had just begun to eat when Penny realizes she forgot drinks, to which Billy insists upon getting for the both of them. He heads over the the drinks table and there is no punch line.


***
The Voodoo Dildo
A businessman is getting ready to go on a long business trip across the country. He knows his wife is always getting horny, so he decides to get her something to keep her occupied while he was gone, because he didn’t much like the idea of her having sex with someone else.

So he went to a store that sold sex toys and started looking around. He thought about a life-sized sex doll, but that was too close to another man for him. He was browsing through the dildos, looking for something special to please his wife, and started talking to the old man behind the counter. He explained his situation to the old man.

“Well, I don’t really know of anything that will do the trick. We have vibrating dildos, special attachments, and so on, but I don’t know of anything that will keep her occupied for so many weeks, except a” said the old man, and then he stopped.

“Except what?” asked the businessman.

“Nothing, it's nothing,” said the old man.

“Please, tell me! I need something!” protested the businessman.“Well, sir, I don’t usually mention this, but there is the ‘Voodoo Dildo,’” the old man said.

“The Voodoo Dildo?” the businessman asked.

The old man reached under the counter, and pulled out a beautifully ornate old wooden box carved with strange symbols. He opened it, and there lay a very ordinary-looking dildo. The businessman laughed, and said, “Big fucking deal. It looks like any other dildo in this shop!”

The old man said, “But you haven’t seen what it’ll do yet.”

He pointed to a door and said “Voodoo Dildo, the door.”

The Voodoo Dildo rose out of its box, darted over to the door, and started screwing the keyhole. The whole door shook with the vibrations, and a crack developed down the middle. Before the door could split, the old man said, “Voodoo Dildo, box!”

The voodoo dildo stopped, floated back to the box and lay there, motionless.

The businessman said, “I’ll take it!”

The guy took it home to his wife, told her it was a special dildo and that to use it, all she had to do was say, “Voodoo dildo, my pussy.”

He left for his trip satisfied things would be fine while he was gone.

After he’d been gone a few days, the wife was unbearably horny. She thought of several people who would willingly satisfy her, but then she remembered the Voodoo Dildo. She lay down, placed the box between her legs, and said “Voodoo dildo, my pussy!” The voodoo dildo shot to her crotch and started pumping. It was great, like nothing she’d ever experienced before.

After four orgasms, she decided she’d had enough, and tried to pull it out, but it was stuck in her, still thrusting. She tried and tried to get it out, but nothing worked. Her husband had forgotten to tell her how to shut it off! So she decided to go to the hospital to see if they could help. She put her clothes on, got in the car and started to drive to the hospital, quivering with every thrust of the dildo. On the way, another orgasm nearly made her swerve off the road, and she was pulled over by a policeman. He asked for her license, and then asked how much she’d had to drink. Gasping and twitching, she hastily cried, "The Voodoo Dildo! stuck in my pussy, can't get it out!! Ahhhhh! Need..To..Get..It..OUT!! H-h-help M-m-me!!!"

The officer looked at her incredulously for a second, and then said, “Yeah, right. Voodoo dildo, my ass!”
***
There were three young priests...
about to take their final vows. The last test they had to pass was a celibacy test. For this, all three had to strip naked and tie a little bell around their penis. A belly dancer entered the room, and started slinking around the first priest. 'Ting-a-ling!'

The chief priest said 'Oh Patrick, I'm disappointed, you've failed. Go and have a shower.'

The belly dancer had stripped as far as her last veil for the second guy when the chief heard 'Ting-a-ling!'

'Joseph, I'm very disappointed. You can't resist the temptation of a woman. Go for a shower,' said the chief priest.

The belly dancer started dancing totally naked around the last priest. She did everything erotic she could think of but no bell rang!

'John, I'm delighted. You've passed! You can resist the temptation of women. Now, go relax and take a shower with Patrick and Joseph.'

'Ting-a-ling!'

Edit: grammer
***
A man boards an airliner
A man boards an airliner, takes his seat, and is surprised to find a large purple parrot in the seat next to him. The aircraft takes off and a pretty flight attendant walks down the aisle past the man and his seat Mate.

"Hey, bitch," says the parrot, "bring me a whiskey and soda, and make it snappy!"

The FA looks annoyed, but walks on. A minute later, she walks back up the aisle, and the parrot Pipes up again, "Goddammit, you lazy whore, where's my whiskey? Hurry it up!"

Visibly flustered, the FA hurries up the aisle and returns quickly with the parrot's drink.

Impressed with the parrot's technique, the man decides to get some quick service for himself.

"Hey, slut," says the man, "get me a dry martini. And don't drag your sorry ass, I want it right Now!"

The FA turns red with anger and runs to the front of the plane. In a moment she returns with the First Officer and two burly male flight attendants. The crewmen seize the passenger and the parrot, jerk open the emergency door and hurl them both out of the airplane at 20,000 feet.

As the two hurtle out the door, the parrot says to the man, "Ya know, for someone who can't fly, you got a lotta balls."
***
Jim and Mary.
Jim and Mary were both patients in a Mental Hospital. One day while they were walking past the hospital swimming pool, Jim suddenly jumped into the deep end. He sank to the bottom and stayed there. Mary promptly jumped in to save him. She swam to the bottom and pulled Jim out.

When the medical director became aware of Mary's heroic act he immediately ordered her to be discharged from the hospital as he now considered her to be mentally stable. When he went to tell Mary the news he said, "Mary, I have good news and bad news. The good news is you're being discharged because since you were able to jump in and save the life of another patient, I think you've regained your senses. The bad news is Jim, the patient you saved, hung himself with his bathrobe belt in the bathroom. I am so sorry, but he's dead."

Mary replied, "He didn't hang himself, I put him there to dry."
***
Irish Viagra
An Irish woman of advanced age visited her physician to ask his help in reviving her husband's libido.

"What about trying Viagra? asks the doctor.
"Not a chance," she said. "He won't even take an aspirin."
"Not a problem," replied the doctor. "Give him an "Irish Viagra. It's when you drop the Viagra tablet into his coffee. He won't even taste it. Give it a try and call me in a week to let me know how things went."

It wasn't a week later that she called the doctor, who directly inquired as to progress. The poor dear exclaimed, "Oh, faith, bejaysus and begorrah! It was terrible! Just terrible, doctor!"

"Really? What happened?" asked the doctor.

"Well, I did as you advised and slipped it into his coffee and the effect was almost immediate. He jumped straight up, with a twinkle in his eye, and with his pants a-bulging fiercely! With one swoop of his arm, he sent the cups and tablecloth flying, ripped me clothes to tatters and took me then and there, took me passionately on the tabletop! It was a nightmare, I tell you, an absolute nightmare!"

"Why so terrible?" asked the doctor. "Do you mean the sex your husband provided wasn't good?"

"'Twas the best sex I've had in 25 years! But as sure as I'm sitting here, I'll never be able to show me face in Starbucks again!"
***
Everybody knows Bubba
Bubba was bragging to his boss one day, "You know, I know everyone there is to know. Just name someone, anyone, and I know them."

Tired of his boasting, his boss called his bluff, "OK, Bubba how about Tom Cruise?"

"Sure, yes, Tom and I are old friends, and I can prove it." So Bubba and his boss fly out to Hollywood and knock on Tom Cruise's door, and sure enough, Tom Cruise, shouts, "Bubba! Great to see you! You and your friend come right in and join me for lunch!"

Although impressed, Bubba's boss is still skeptical. After they leave Cruise's house, he tells Bubba that he thinks Bubba's knowing Cruise was just lucky.

"No, no, just name anyone else," Bubba says.

"President Obama," his boss quickly retorts.

"Yes," Bubba says, "I know him, let's fly out to Washington."
And off they go. At the White House, Obama spots Bubba on the tour and motions him and his boss over, saying, "Bubba, what a surprise, I was just on my way to a meeting, but you and your friend come on in and let's have a cup of coffee first and catch up."

Well, the boss is very shaken by now, but still not totally convinced. After they leave the White house grounds, he expresses his doubts to Bubba, who again implores him to name anyone else.

"The Pope," his boss replies.

"Sure!" says Bubba.

"My folks are from Argentina, and I've known the Pope a long time."

So off they fly to Rome. Bubba and his boss are assembled with the masses in Vatican Square when Bubba says, "This will never work. I can't catch the Pope's eye among all these people. Tell you what, I know all the guards so let me just go upstairs and I'll come out on the balcony with the Pope."

And he disappears into the crowd headed toward the Vatican. Sure enough, half an hour later Bubba emerges with the Pope on the balcony. But by the time Bubba returns, he finds that his boss has had a heart attack and is surrounded by paramedics.

Working his way to his boss' side, Bubba asks him, "What happened?"

His boss looks up and says, "I was doing fine until you and the Pope came out on the balcony and the man next to me said, "Who's that on the balcony with Bubba?"


TL;DR: Bubba proves to his boss that he knows everyone. His boss faints when someone in Vatican City knows the Bubba, but not the Pope.

Edit: Added TL;DR and updated with current President and current Pope
***
An 18 year old Italian girl tells her Mom that she has missed her period for two months.......
 Very worried, the mother goes to the drugstore and buys a pregnancy kit. The test result shows that the girl is pregnant. Shouting, cursing, crying, the mother says, "Who was the pig that did this to you? I want to know!" The girl picks up the phone and makes a call.
Half an hour later, a Ferrari stops in front of their house. A mature and distinguished man with gray hair and impeccably dressed in an Armani suit steps out of the of the Ferrari and enters the house.
He sits in the living room with the father, mother, and the girl and tells them: "Good morning, your daughter has informed me of the problem. I can't marry her because of my personal family situation but I'll take charge. I will pay all costs and provide for your daughter for the rest of her life." "Additionally, if a girl is born, I will bequeath a Ferrari, a beach house, two retail stores, a townhouse, a beachfront villa, and a $2,000,000 bank account. If a boy is born, my legacy will be a couple of factories and a $4,000,000 bank account. If twins, they will receive a factory and $2,000,000 each. However, if there is a miscarriage, what do you suggest I do?"

At this point, the father, who had remained silent, places a hand firmly on the man's shoulder and tells him, "You fuck her again."
***
The clever Doctor
A Doctor can't find a job in any Hospital in USA, so he opens a clinic and puts a sign outside 'GET TREATMENT FOR $20 - IF NOT CURED GET BACK $100.'

A lawyer thinks this is a great opportunity to earn $100 and goes to the clinic...

Lawyer: "I have lost my sense of taste."

Doctor: "Nurse, bring medicine from box No. 22 and put 3 drops in patient's mouth."

Lawyer: "Ugh... this is kerosene."

Doctor: "Congrats, your sense of taste is restored. Give me $20."

The annoyed lawyer goes back after a few days to recover his money...

Lawyer: "I have lost my memory. I cannot remember anything."

Doctor: "Nurse, bring medicine from box no. 22 and put 3 drops in his mouth."

Lawyer (annoyed): "This is kerosene. You gave this to me last time for restoring my taste."

Doctor: "Congrats. You got your memory back. Give me $20."

The fuming lawyer pays him, and then comes back a week later determined to get back $100.

Lawyer: "My eyesight has become very weak I can't see at all."

Doctor: "Well, I don't have any medicine for that, so take this $100."

Lawyer (staring at the note): "But this is $1" not $100!!"

Doctor: "Congrats, your eyesight is restored. Give me $20".
***
What Starts with F and ends with K
A first-grade teacher, Ms Brooks, was having trouble with one of her students.  The teacher asked, "Harry, what's your problem?" 


Harry answered, "I'm too smart for the 1st grade. My sister is in the 3rd grade and I'm smarter than she is!  I think I should be in the 3rd grade too!"


Ms. Brooks had enough.  She took Harry to the principal's office. 


While Harry waited in the outer office, the teacher explained to the principal what the situation was. The principal told Ms. Brooks he would give the boy a test.  If he failed to answer any of his questions he was to go back to the 1st grade and behave.  She agreed. 

Harry was brought in and the conditions were explained to him and he agreed to take the test. 


Principal: "What is 3 x 3?"

Harry: "9."


Principal: "What is 6 x 6?"


Harry: "36."

And so it went with every question the principal thought a 3rd grader should know. 

The principal looks at Ms. Brooks and tells her, "I think Harry can go to the 3rdgrade."


Ms. Brooks says to the principal, "Let me ask him some questions."

The principal and Harry both agreed.


Ms. Brooks asks, "What does a cow have four of that I have only two of?"


Harry, after a moment: "Legs."


Ms Brooks: "What is in your pants that you have but I do not have?"


The principal wondered why would she ask such a question! 


Harry replied: "Pockets."


Ms. Brooks: "What does a dog do that a man steps into?" 


Harry: "Pants."


The principal sat forward with his mouth hanging open. 

Ms. Brooks: "What goes in hard and pink then comes out soft and sticky?"

The principal's eyes opened really wide and before he could stop the answer, Harry replied, "Bubble gum."


Ms. Brooks: "What does a man do standing up, a woman does sitting down and a dog does on three legs?"

Harry: "Shake hands."

The principal was trembling. 


Ms. Brooks: "What word starts with an 'F' and ends in 'K' that means a lot of heat and excitement?"

Harry: "Firetruck."

The principal breathed a sigh of relief and told the 
teacher, "Put Harry in the fifth-grade, I got the last six questions wrong... "
***
"You don't know Jack Schitt!"
Jack is the only son of O. Schitt and Awe Schitt. O. Schitt, the fertilizer magnate, married Awe Schitt, the owner of Kneedeep N. Schitt, Inc.

In turn, Jack Schitt married Noe Schitt, and the deeply religious couple produced six children: Holie Schitt, Fulla Schitt, Giva Schitt, Bull Schitt and the twins, Deep Schitt and Dip Schitt.

Against her parents objections, Deep Schitt married Dump Schitt, a high school drop-out. After being married 15 years, Jack and Noe Schitt divorced. Noe Schitt later married Mr. Scherlock, and because her kids were living with them, she wanted to keep her previous name. She was then known as Noe Schitt-Sherlock.

Dip Schitt married Loada Schitt and they produced a nervous son, Chicken Schitt. Fulla Schitt and Giva Schitt were inseparable throughout childhood and subsequently married the Happens brothers in a dual ceremony. The wedding announcement in the newspapers announced the Schitt-Happens wedding. They created a bumper sticker and made millions. You've probably seen it...

The Schitt-Happens children were Dawg, Byrd and Hoarse. Bull Schitt, the prodigal son, left home to tour the world. He recently returned from Italy with his new bride Pisa Schitt.

So now when someone says, "You don't know Jack Schitt," you can correct them and inform them of your more than deep knowledge of the family tree.
***
The Jewelery Store
A balding, white haired man from Chebacco Lake in Florida, walked into a jewelry store this past Friday evening with a beautiful much younger gal at his side. He told the jeweler he was looking for a special ring for his girlfriend. The jeweler looked through his stock and brought out a $5,000 ring.

The man said, "No, I'd like to see something more special."

At that statement, the jeweler went to his special stock and brought another ring over.

"Here's a stunning ring at only $40,000." the jeweler said. The lady's eyes sparkled and her whole body trembled with excitement.
The old man seeing this said, "We'll take it."

The jeweler asked how payment would be made and the man stated, "By check. I know you need to make sure my check is good, so I'll write it now and you can call the bank Monday to verify the funds and
I'll pick the ring up Monday afternoon."

On Monday morning, the jeweler angrily phoned the old man
and said "There's no money in that account!"

'I know, said the old man, but let me tell you about MY GREAT WEEKEND!' 
***
A police officer stopped a car for speeding
A police officer pulls over a speeding car. The officer says, ‘I clocked you at 120 km/h sir.’ 

The driver says, ‘Christ, officer I had it on cruise control at 100, perhaps your radar gun needs calibrating.’ 

Not looking up from her knitting the wife says, ‘Now don’t be silly dear, you know that this car doesn’t have cruise control.’ 

As the officer writes out the ticket, the driver looks over at his wife and growls, ‘Can’t you please keep your mouth shut for once?’ 

The wife smiles demurely and says, ‘You should be thankful your radar detector went off when it did.’ 

As the officer makes out the second ticket for the illegal radar detector unit. The man glowers at his wife and says through clenched teeth, ‘Fk it woman, can’t you keep your mouth shut?’ 

The officer frowns and says, ‘And I notice that you’re not wearing your seat belt sir. That’s an automatic $75 fine.’ 

The driver says, ‘Yeah well, you see officer, I had it on but took it off when you pulled me over so that I could get my license out of my back pocket.’ 

The wife says, ‘Now dear, you know very well that you didn’t have your seat belt on. You never wear your seat belt when you’re driving.’ 

And as the police officer is writing out the third ticket the driver turns to his wife and barks, ‘WHY DON’T YOU shut the fk up? 

The officer looks over at the woman and asks, ‘Does your husband always talk to you this way Ma’am?’ 

The Wife replies, ‘Only when he’s drunk.’
***
The trump family is flying from New York to DC
Donald looks down on the cities below and says "I think I'll throw a 1000$ bill out of the window and make some american happy. Melanie says "Oh honey why not throw 10 100$ bills and make 10 americans happy?" 
So then Ivanka says "Even better daddy, throw 100 ten dollar bills out of the window and make 100 americans happy?" To that the pilot says " Why dont you all jump out the window and make the whole country happy?" 

EDIT: Thank you for the gold!! 
***
An Irish Lumberjack
A large Canadian lumber camp advertised that they were looking for a good Lumberjack. The very next day, a skinny Irishman showed up at the camp with his axe, and knocked on the Foreman's door. 
       
The Foreman took one look at the small Irishman and told him to leave. "Just give me a chance to show you what I can do," said the Irishman. 
       
"Okay, see that giant redwood over there?" said the Foreman. "Take your axe and go cut it down." 
       
The Irishman headed for the tree, and in five minutes he was back knocking on the Foreman's door. 
       
"I cut the tree down," said the Irishman. 

"*Holy smokes!*" Said the Formean. "Where did you get the skill to chop down trees like that?" 
       
"In the Sahara Forest," replied the Irishman. 
       
Confused, the Forman asked "...don't you mean the Sahara Desert?" 

"Is that what they call it now?"
***
The faithful Christian
Ol’ Fred had been a faithful Christian, and now found himself in the hospital, near death. The family called their pastor to stand with them. As the pastor stood next to the bed, Ol’ Fred’s condition appeared to deteriorate and he motioned frantically for something to write on. The pastor lovingly handed him a pen and a piece of paper, and Ol’ Fred used his last bit of energy to scribble a note, and then he died. The pastor thought it best not to look at the note at that time, so he placed it in his jacket pocket.

At the funeral, as he was finishing the message, he realized that he was wearing the same jacket that he was wearing when Ol’ Fred died. He said, “You know, Ol’ Fred handed me a note just before he died. I haven’t looked at it, but knowing Fred, I’m sure there’s a word of inspiration there for us all.”

He opened the note, and read, “Asshole, you’re standing on my oxygen tube!”
***
"Rabbi, rabbi"
One day, a teenage boy goes to his father- a rabbi at their small town's only synagogue- and says "Father, it pains me to say this, but I've decided to convert to Christianity."

The Rabbi, with no idea what to do, decides to walk ten miles to a much larger city, where he found a synagogue much larger than his own. He says to the rabbi there "Rabbi, rabbi! My son has become a christian! Whatever shall I do?" In reply, the other rabbi tell him "Funny you should ask! My own son has just converted to Christianity! Come with me, the rabbi of the largest synagogue in the state should have some answers for us."

So, both rabbis take a road trip to the largest synagogue in the state. They say to the rabbi: "Rabbi, rabbi! Both of our sons have converted Christianity! Whatever shall we do?" And the rabbi says "Well, funny you should ask! My own son has just converted to Christianity! Come with me, we'll catch a plane to Jerusalem and get this sorted out."

So, all three rabbis fly from the US to Jerusalem. They find the oldest, wisest rabbi they can, and in unison, cry out "Rabbi, rabbi! Our sons have converted to Christianity! Whatever shall we do?" And the old rabbi says "Funny you should ask! My own son has just converted to Christianity! Come, let us go to the Wailing Wall. God will surely have an answer to such a conundrum."

So, all four rabbis run as fast as they can to the Wailing Wall and drop to their knees, shouting to the sky "Holy father! Our sons have left us for Christianity! Whatever shall we do in these times of darkness?"

And God replies: "Funny you should ask!"
***
A high school girl is getting ready for her senior prom...(nsfw, and pretty long!)
Lets call her Tina. Now, Tina has been dreaming if this day for her entire life. She has everything set up perfectly; she's got a hot date, and the *perfect* dress. 

All of a sudden, as Mother Nature is wont to do, Tina gets her period, and it's a particularly heavy flow this month. Tina runs to her bathroom to find some tampons, but she's an idiot and hadnt gone to get any. "FUCK!" Yells Tina. 

As she often does when she really needs help, Tina calls up her fairy godmother. "What is it you need deary?" Asks the fairy godmother. "Look," said Tina, "Im about to go to prom and my period came and I don't have any tampons!! Can you help me out?" "Of course!" Says fairy godmother, "take this magic tampon. It'll soak up even the heaviest flow, but there's on condition. You *MUST* be back by midnight or that tampon will turn into a pumpkin!" 

"Yeah okthxBAI" says Tina, and she heads out for the night.

11:45 comes around and the fairy godmother is up waiting for Tina.
11:55 No sign of Tina, and the fairy godmother is getting worried.
12:00.....no Tina. Fairy godmother is PISSED. "WHAT THE FUCK," she cries out into the night.
1:00...no Tina
2:00....nothing 
3:00 strikes and Tina finally rolls in. "What the fuck happened?" Asked the fairy godmother. "Where have you been? Are you all right?? You worried me to death!"

"No no fairy godmother I'm fine I'm fine!" Said Tina. "I met the most *amaaazing* boy! My night was perfect!"

"Tina that's ridiculous Im much more concerned about your safety! What was this boys name, huh?"

"His name was, uhh... Peter Peter...*something* eater.."

I love that joke but I'm not sure how well it translates to written format. Much easier to tell live
***
Retrieving Sniffer
Police officers Rosa and Mary, had been assigned to walk the beat.

 They had only been out a short while when Mary said, "Damn, I was running late this morning after my workout and after I showered, I forgot to put on my panties! We have to go back to the station to get them."

 Rosa replied, "We don't have to go back, just give the sniffer, Fido, one sniff, and he will go fetch them for you."

 It was a hot day and Mary didn't fell like heading back to the station, so she lifted her skirt for the dog. Fido's nose shoots between her legs, sniffing and snorting.

 After 10 seconds of sniffing, Fido's ears pick up, he sniffs the wind, and he is off in a flash towards the station house.

 Five minutes go by and no sign of Fido.

 Ten minutes pass, and the dog is nowhere to be seen.

 Fifteen minutes pass, and they are starting to worry.

 Twenty minutes pass, and they hear sirens in the distance. The sirens get louder and louder. Suddenly, followed by a dozen police cars, Fido rounds the corner with the Desk Sergeant's balls in his mouth.
***
A woman was about to go into labor...
when the doctor revealed a revolutionary new device that could transfer some of the pain of childbirth to the father. 

The woman's husband, being the nice, loyal guy he is, decided to man up and take some of the pain for his wife. The doctor started at 20%. 
20% of the pain was transferred, but the husband didn't feel anything. He says, "crank it up, doc."
The setting goes up to 40%. The husband still doesn't feel anything. He says, "I'm still okay. Crank it up, I'm sure I can handle it."
The perplexed doctor raises the setting to 60%. The husband, still completely unfazed, says, "Wow. This is 60%? I don't know what she always complains about."
The doctor, now beginning to doubt the device, cranks it up to 100%. The woman delivers her child painlessly, and the husband still doesn't feel anything. 

The happy couple go home, where they are greeted by a neighbor. He says, "You wouldn't believe what happened when you were gone! The mailman suddenly fell to the ground, screamed in increasing agony for 20 minutes, and died!"
***
The Irish Millionaire
Mick, from Dublin , appeared on 'Who Wants To Be A Millionaire' and towards the end of the program had already won 500,000 euros.

"You've done very well so far," said Chris Tarrant, the show's presenter, "but for a million euros you've only got one life-line left, phone a friend. Everything is riding on this question. Will you go for it?"

"Sure," said Mick. "I'll have a go!"

"Which of the following birds does NOT build its own nest?

a) Sparrow



b) Thrush,



c) Magpie,



d) Cuckoo?"



"I haven't got a clue." said Mick, ''So I'll use last lifeline and phone my friend Paddy back home in Dublin .."



Mick called up his mate, and told him the circumstances and repeated the question to him.

"Fookin hell, Mick!" cried Paddy. "Dat's simple it's a cuckoo."

"Are you sure?"

"I'm fookin sure."

Mick hung up the phone and told Chris, "I'll go with cuckoo as my answer."

"Is that your final answer?" asked Chris.

"Dat it is."

There was a long, long pause and then the presenter screamed, "Cuckoo is the correct answer! Mick, you've won 1 million euros!"

The next night, Mick went round to Paddy's to buy him a drink.

"Tell me, Paddy? How in Heaven's name did you know it was da Cuckoo that doesn't build its own nest?"

"Because he lives in a Fookin clock!"

Edit: Sorry, I got this in an Email forward and probably should have edited out the Irishness before posting it here.

***
Little Jonny was 5 years old and born blind
Little Jonny was 5 years old and born blind. One evening as his mother puts him to bed she says to him, "Jonny, tomorrow is a very special day: if you pray extra hard tonight God will grant you the miracle of sight". Super excited, Jonny jumps back out of bed, clasps his hands together and begin to pray, as his mum leaves the room. Just as she is about to close the door Jonny asks, "mum, will God really give me my sight?". "Yes Jonny, but only if you pray extra hard". An hour or so later, the mum pops her head around the door and sees Jonny still praying, "Oh God. Please let me see. I want to see my mummy for the very first time. I am sure that she's the prettiest mummy in the whole wide world."  A few more hours later the mother goes into Jonny's room and sees him slumped over the bed, hands still clasped together. She puts him to bed. 

The following day the mother gets up early and rushes to her sons room where he's still sleeping. She covers his eyes with her hands and gently wakes him. Super excited Jonny says to his mum, "mummy move your hands, I want to see, I want to see". 

"Are you ready Jonny?" The mum replies. 

""Yes, yes mummy. Move your hands". So the mother removes her hands. Jonny blinks and opens his eyes. "Mummy, mummy, I still can't see. Oh, mummy does God hate me?  Mummy I can't see". 

Jonny's mum beams a great big smile and says "April fools". 
***
It's 1957 and Bobby goes to pick up his date,
 Peggy Sue. Peggy Sue's father answers the door and invites him in. He asks Bobby what they're planning to do on the date. Bobby politely responds that they'll probably just go to the malt shop or to a drive-in movie. 
 Peggy Sue's father suggests: "Why don't you kids go out and screw? I hear all of the kids are doing it." 
 Bobby is shocked. 
 "Excuse me, sir?" 
 "Oh yes, Peggy Sue really likes to screw. She'll screw all night if we let her." 
 Peggy Sue comes downstairs and announces that she's ready to go. About 20 minutes later, a thoroughly disheveled Peggy Sue rushes back into the house, slams the door behind her, and screams at her father: "Dad! The Twist! It's called the Twist!" 

***
The Jewish Quarterback
 The coach had put together the perfect team for the Baltimore Ravens. The only thing missing was a good quarterback. He had scouted all the colleges and even the Canadian and European Leagues, but he couldn't find a ringer who could ensure a Super Bowl win. 

Then one night while watching CNN he saw a war-zone scene in the West Bank. In one corner of the background, he spotted a young Israeli soldier with a truly incredible arm. He threw a hand-grenade straight into a 15th story window 100 yards away. KABOOM! He threw another hand-grenade 75 yards away, right into a chimney. KA-BLOOEY! Then he threw another at a passing car going 90 mph. BULLS-EYE! 
I've got to get this guy!" Coach said to himself. "He has the perfect Arm!" 

So, he brings him to the States and teaches him the great game of football. And the Ravens go on to win the Super Bowl. The young man is hailed as the great hero of football, and when the coach asks him what he wants, all the young man wants is to call his Mother. 

"Mom," he says into the phone, "I just won the Super Bowl!" "I don't want to talk to you, the old woman says." You are not my son!" 

"I don't think you understand, Mother," the young man pleads. "I've won the greatest sporting event in the world. I'm here among thousands of my adoring fans." 

"No! Let me tell you!" his mother retorts. "At this very moment, there are gunshots all around us. The neighborhood is a pile of rubble. Your two brothers were beaten within an inch of their lives last week, and I have to keep your sister in the house so she doesn't get raped!" The old lady pauses, and then tearfully says, "I will never forgive you for making us move to Baltimore!!!!
***
An Englishman, a German, and a Frenchman...
An Englishman, a German and a Frenchman are all in Saudi Arabia, sharing a smuggled crate of booze when, all of a sudden, Saudi police rush in and arrest them. The mere possession of alcohol is a severe offence in Saudi Arabia, so for the terrible crime of actually being caught consuming the booze, they are all sentenced to death!
However, after many months and with the help of very good lawyers, they were able to successfully appeal their sentences down to life imprisonment. By a stroke of luck, it was a Saudi national holiday the day their trial finished, and the extremely benevolent Sheikh decided they could be released after receiving just 20 lashes each of the whip.
As they were preparing for their punishment, the Sheikh announced: "It's my first wife's birthday today, and she has asked me to allow each of you one wish before your whipping.
The German was first in line, he thought for a while and then said: "Please tie a pillow to my back. This was done, but the pillow only lasted 10 lashes before the whip went through. When the punishment was done the German had to be carried away bleeding and crying with pain.
The Frenchman was next up. After watching the German in horror he said smugly: "Please fix two pillows to my back." But even two pillows could only take 15 lashes before the whip went through again and the Frenchman was soon led away whimpering loudly.
The Englishman was the last one up, but before he could say anything, the Sheikh turned to him and said: "You are from a most beautiful part of the world and your culture is one of the finest in the world. For this, you may have two wishes!"
"Thank you, your Most Royal and Merciful highness," the Englishman replied. "In recognition of your kindness, my first wish is that you give me not 20, but 100 lashes."
"Not only are you an honorable, handsome and powerful man, you are also very brave," the Sheikh said with an admiring look on his face. "If 100 lashes is what you desire, then so be it. And your second wish, what is it to be?" the Sheikh asked.
The Englishman smiled and said, "Tie the Frenchman to my back."
***
Tax time at the Synagogue...
The Internal Revenue sends their auditor to audit a synagogue. The auditor is doing all the checks, and then turns to the Rabbi and says, "I noticed that you buy a lot of candles."
"Yes," answered the Rabbi.
"Well, Rabbi, what do you do with the candle drippings?" he asked.
"A good question," noted the Rabbi. "We actually save them up when we have enough, we send them back to the candle maker and every now and then, they send us a free box of candles."
"Oh," replied the auditor somewhat disappointed that his question actually had a practical answer. So he thought he'd try another question, in his obnoxious way..."Rabbi, what about all these matzo purchases? What do you do with the crumbs from the matzo?"
"Ah, yes," replied the Rabbi calmly, "we actually collect up the crumbs, we send them in a box back to the manufacturer and every now and then, they send a box of matzo balls."
"Oh," replied the auditor, thinking hard how to fluster the Rabbi."Well, Rabbi," he went on, "what do you do with all the foreskins from the circumcisions?"
"Yes, here too, we do not waste," answered the Rabbi. "What we do is save up all the foreskins, and when we have enough we actually send them to the Internal Revenue."
"Internal Revenue!," questioned the auditor in disbelief.
"Ah, yes," replied the Rabbi, "Internal Revenue. And about once a year, they send us a little prick like you."
***
God's Vacation
God decides he'd like to take a vacation. So he goes to St. Peter at the pearly gates and asks, 

"Pete, I need a vacation, being God is fucking stressful. Where should I go?"

St. Peter says, "well Pluto has good skiing."

God shakes his head fervently and replies, "no way, I broke my leg there once."

Next, St. Peter suggests Jupiter - "there's an eons-long storm that could be fun." 

God says, "no way, I almost got struck by lightning there last time"

So then, St. Peter suggests Earth - "you can do just about anything there."

God fires back, "Fuck that, Pete. I went there 2000 years ago, knocked up some Jewish chick and they're still fucking talking about it!"

***
An old Greek man and an old Italian man are arguing.
The Greek man says "Look, all I'm saying is that the Greeks invented everything the Romans get credit for!"

The Italian says "Yes, may be, but the Romans improved it and made it useful!"

The Greek man says "We invented the Democracy!"

The Italian says "We realized the challenge of direct elections and the benefit of the legislature, and thus created the Republic!"

The Greek man says "Yes, but we created beautiful architecture like the Parthenon!"

The Italian says "And we improved your building techniques, and used them to create aqueducts and structures that stood for centuries longer!"

The Greek man, frustrated, finally says "Ah, of course. But the Greeks, we INVENTED sex!"

The Italian man says "That may be true, but we introduced it to women."
***
Why are there no transvestites in space?
Because there is zero drag.

&nbsp;

&nbsp;

^^I ^^literally ^^came ^^up ^^with ^^this ^^one ^^2 ^^hours ^^ago.

&nbsp;

&nbsp;

&nbsp;

Edit: ***SANITIZED VERSION***

&nbsp;

Q: Why are there no drag queens in space?

A: Because there is very little drag and whatever drag there is in LEO is caused by miniscule amounts of athmospheric gasses and tidal forces! HAHAHAHAHAH!

&nbsp;

&nbsp;

^^I ^^figuratively ^^came ^^up ^^with ^^this ^^one ^^while ^^banging ^^my ^^head ^^aginst ^^a ^^wall.
***
Fridays!!
One day a guy dies and finds himself in hell. As he is wallowingin despair, he has his first meeting with The Devil.
 The Devil: Why so sad?
 Guy: Why do you think? I'm in hell.
 The Devil: Hell's not so bad. We actually have a lot of fun down here... Do you drink?
 Guy: Sure, I love to drink.
 The Devil: Well you're gonna love Mondays. On Mondays that's all we do is drink. Whiskey, brandy, rum, tequila, beer...we drink until we throw up and then we drink some more! It doesn't matter because you're already dead!
 Guy: That sounds great.
 The Devil: Do you smoke?
 Guy: Yes.
 The Devil: You're going to love Tuesdays. We get the finest cigars from all over the world and smoke our lungs out! If you get cancer - who cares! You're already dead!
 Guy: Wow!
 The Devil: Do you gamble?.
 Guy: I do.
 The Devil: Wednesdays you can gamble all youwant...blackjack, roulette, poker, whatever... If you lose yourshirt...who cares!
 Guy: Amazing!
 The Devil: You into drugs?
 Guy: You don't mean... 
The Devil: Yes, Thursdays are drug days. Help yourself toa great all the drugs that your want! Who cares... you're dead!
 Guy: I never realized Hell was such a swinging place!!!
 The Devil: Are you gay?
 Guy: No.
 The Devil: Ooooh - you're gonna hate Fridays..
***
The Kayak Accident
The day after his wife disappeared In a kayaking accident, an Anchorage man answered his door to find two grim-faced Alaska State Troopers.
“We’re sorry Mr. Wilkens, but we have some information about
your wife”, said one of the troopers.
“Tell me! Did you find her?”, Wilkens exclaimed.
The troopers looked at each other.
One said, “We have some bad news, some good news, and some really great news. Which would you like to hear first?”
Fearing the worst, Mr. Wilkens said, “Give me the bad news
first.”
The trooper said, “I’m sorry to tell you, sir, but this morning we
found your wife’s body in Kachemak Bay .”
“Oh my God!”, exclaimed Wilkens.
Swallowing hard, he asked, “What’s the good news?”
The trooper continued, “When we pulled her up, she had 12
twenty-five-pound king crabs and 6 good-sized Dungeness crabs clinging to her, and we feel you are entitled to a share in the catch.”
Stunned, Mr. Wilkens demanded, “If that’s the good news, then
what’s the great news?”


The trooper replied, “We’re gonna pull her up again tomorrow.”
***
A native american hitchhiker was picked up by a slick
city man who was driving past the reservation.

As they were driving along, the indian noticed a brown paper bag on the dashboard and inquired as to its contents. The city man replied: "It's a bottle of wine, I got it for my wife".

The Indian looked forward at the road, nodded his head solemnly, and said: "Good trade".


Edit: WOW! Initial response: http://i.imgur.com/UnpW5R6.gif
Our first joke ever on Reddit and it fucking exploded.... 
***
A woman brought a very limp duck into a veterinary surgeon.
As she lay her pet on the table, the vet pulled out his stethoscope and listened to the bird's chest.

After a moment or two, the vet shook his head sadly and said," I'm so sorry, your pet has passed away. 

"The distressed owner wailed, " Are you sure?"

"Yes, I'm sure. The duck is dead," he replied.

"How can you be so sure", she protested. "I mean, you haven't done any testing on him or anything. He might just be in a coma or something." 

The vet rolled his eyes, turned around and left the room. He returned a few moments later with a black Labrador Retriever. As the duck's owner looked on in amazement, the dog stood on his hind legs, put his front paws on the examination table and sniffed the duck from top to bottom. He then looked at the vet with sad eyes and shook his head. The vet patted the dog and took it out and returned a few moments later with a beautiful cat. The cat jumped up on the table and also sniffed the bird 
from its peak to its tail and back again. The cat sat back on its 
haunches, shook its head, meowed softly, jumped down and strolled out of the room. 

The vet looked at the woman and said, "I'm sorry, but as I said, this is most definitely, 100% certifiably, a dead duck." Then the vet turned to his computer terminal, hit a few keys and produced a bill, which he handed to the woman.

The duck's owner, still in shock, took the bill. "$150!" she cried. "$150 just to tell me my duck is dead?" 

The vet shrugged. "I'm sorry. If you'd taken my word for it, the bill would have been $20. But what with the Lab Report and the Cat Scan, it all adds up."


Was cleaning up the PC and found this joke I had on a txt file, thought I'd share it.
***
Do u speak English.!
U Speaka Da English?A bus stops and two Italian men get on. They sit down and engage in an animated conversation. The lady sitting behind them ignores them at first, but her attention is galvanized when she hears one of the men say the following:"Emma come first. Den I come. Den two asses come together. I come once-a-more. Two asses, they come together again. I come again and pee twice. Then I come one lasta time.""You foul-mouthed sex obsessed swine," retorted the lady indignantly."In this country ... we don't speak aloud in public places about our sex lives ..."Hey, coola down lady," said the man. "Who talkin' abouta sexa? I'm a justa tellin' my frienda how to spella 'Mississippi'."
***
Four former U.S. presidents...
Four former U.S. presidents are caught in a horrible tornado that hits a state funeral they’re all attending in Kansas.

Suddenly, all of them are blown off to Oz.

They finally make it to the Emerald City and come before the Great and Powerful Oz.

“What brings you before the great Wizard of Oz?”

Jimmy Carter steps forward timidly: “I've come for some courage.”

”No problem!” says the Wizard. “Who is next?”

Ronald Reagan steps forward, “Well…I…I think I need a heart.”

”Done,” says the Wizard.

“Who comes next before the great and powerful Oz?”

Up steps George W. Bush, who says, “I’m told by the American people that I need a brain.”

”Not a problem!” says the Wizard. “Consider it done.”

There is a great silence in the hall.

Bill Clinton is just standing there, looking around, but doesn't say a word.

Irritated, the Wizard finally asks, “What do you want?”

”Ummm,” he says quietly, “is Dorothy around?”
***
Little Johnny...
Little Johnny was all set to start grade three. On his first day, Little Johnny's dad insisted on taking him inside to meet with the teacher. 

Once there, Johnny's dad took the teacher aside and said, "Mrs. Velasquez, I'm Johnny's father. I want to warn you in advance that Johnny has a gambling problem. He will try to bet on anything he can whenever he can. I need your help to try and stop him from doing this." Mrs. Velasquez agrees and Johnny's father leaves. 

At lunch time, Johnny goes up to her and says, "Mrs. Velasquez, I'll bet you $50 that I can guess what colour your panties are. They're pink." The teacher is taken aback but figures that since she is wearing a solid black skirt, it's an easy bet to win. She tells Johnny to hang back after school.

Near the end of the school day, the principal comes to the classroom door and Mrs. Velasquez goes to speak to him. After he leaves, she slips into the coat closet and removes her pink panties and returns to the class.  

After the final bell, Johnny is waiting at his desk. Mrs. Velasquez walks over to him and tells Johnny that he owes her $50 because her panties aren't pink. She takes Johnny over to the coat closet and lifts her skirt to show him that she didn't have pink panties - she didn't have anything on at all! Johnny agrees to pay her the $50 tomorrow.

Johnny walks outside to get his ride home and Mrs. Velasquez follows him out. Johnny's father gets out of the car and she asks if she can speak to him.

"Mr. Eldon, I think I've cured Johnny of his gambling problem. Don't be mad, but he bet me $50 that he could guess the colour of my panties and he was wrong. I wasn't wearing any. Now he owes me."

"Damn it!", Johnny's father says.

"What's the matter?"

"That little bastard bet me $100 today that he'd get the teacher to show him her pussy on the first day!"



***
I just summarized the jokes I liked best in a recent Askreddit thread. Have fun!
I hope that's fitting in the Subreddit. If not, leave a downvote please.

-Remains to be seen if glass coffins become popular.

-I have a phobia of over-engineered buildings - its a complex complex complex.

-I have an L shaped couch... Lower case.

-I asked my North Korean friend how it was there, he said he couldn't complain.

-A man walked into his house and was delighted when he discovered that someone had stolen all of his lamps.

-I, for one, like Roman numerals.

-You can never lose a homing pigeon - if your homing pigeon doesn't come back, what you've lost is a pigeon.

-I decided to sell my vacuum cleaner, because it was just collecting dust.

-I stayed up all night wondering where the sun was, and then it dawned on me. 

-Am I the only one who realizes that blackboards are truly remarkable?

-I told a woman that she painted her eyebrows on too high. She looked surprised. 

-so what if I can't spell Armageddon, it's not the end of the world.

-Inspecting mirrors is a job I could easily see myself doing.

-You know, the shovel really was a ground-breaking invention.

-A dyslexic, agnostic, insomniac lays awake all night wondering if there really is a dog. 

-The guy who invented autocorrect has died… restaurant in Piece

-light a fire for a man and he'll be warm for a night, light the man on fire and he'll be warm for the rest of his life.

-Why is it so hard to explain puns to kleptomaniacs? Because they take everything literally.

-Dwarves and midgets have very little in common.
***
List of the most offensive jokes I know.
What are some of the most offensive jokes you guys know?

* Whats better then winning silver at the special olympics?
     Not being retarded

* Whats better then winning silver at the  paralympics?
     Walking

* Have you ever tried Ethiopian food?
     Neither have they

* Why are black people so good at basketball?
     They can run shoot and steal

* What do you call a group of black men running down a hill?
     A prision break

* So Hellen Keller walks into a bar a table and a chair.

* Why was Hitler not invited to the barbecue?
     He always burns the franks

* What do you call a black priest?
     Holy shit

* Whats the last thing to go through the minds of the 9/11 jumpers?
     Their feet

* Why is there no black guy in the game clue?
     Because it would have to be renamed to solved

* What do Jewish people ahte most about the Holocaust?
     The caust

* What do Dale Earnhardt and Pink Floyd have in common?
     Their last big hit was the wall

* Whats the worst part of running 100m in under 10 seconds?
     Being black

* What do you call a flying Jew?
     Smoke

EDIT

* What's the difference between Paul walker any my computer?
     I give a shit when my computer crashes

***
An Englishman and a Frenchman are sitting opposite a beautiful young woman and her mother on a train going through the Alps
The train passes into a tunnel and the carriage is suddenly plunged into darkness. A short while later, everyone hears a loud *slap*, and a cry of *zut alors*! When the train emerges, the angry Frenchman is rubbing his cheek.

The older woman thinks: "That dirty Frenchman must have tried to touch my daughter while she couldn't see who it was!"

Her daughter thinks: "That dirty Frenchman must have a thing for older women, and tried to touch my mother while she couldn't see who it was!"

The Frenchman thinks: "That dirty Englishman must have tried to touch that beautiful young woman while she couldn't see who it was, but she mistook him for me!"

The Englishman thinks: "I can't wait for the next tunnel so I can slap that French twat again."
***
In Soviet Russia, an American spy tries to blend in...
George Keats had trained 20 years for this moment. He had mastered the Russian language in its native accent. He learned all of Russia's customs and social graces. He memorized Moscow streetmaps and knew every back-alley there was. He swore that he could even think like a Russian.

The big day finally came, and he was parachuted to the outskirts of Moscow at night. He emerged by daybreak, and hopped onto a bus going to the city center.

*"Comrade. How much for a ticket to Red square?",* he asked the conductor in authentic Russian.

*"5 Rubles, Comrade American"*, came the reply.

Keats was stunned. Perhaps the conductor was just being a smart-ass. He hopped off the bus and asked a passerby for directions to the closest bar.

*"It's just around the block, Comrade American."*

Keats' doubts grew immensely. Not knowing what to do, he went inside the bar and ordered a glass of Vodka.

*"Want some Borscht to go with it, Comrade American?",* the bartender asked.

Keats threw a fit. *"What's the matter with you people? I dress just like you, I speak just like you, I even THINK just like you! Why does everyone keep calling me American?"*

*"Well Comrade, it's because you're black."*
***
The Pope and The Rabbi
Several centuries ago, the Pope decreed that all the Jews had to
convert to Catholicism or leave Italy.
There was a huge outcry from the Jewish community, so the Pope offered a deal. He'd have a religious debate with the leader of the Jewish community.
If the Jews won, they could stay in Italy; if the Pope won, they'd have
 to convert or leave.

 The Jewish people met and picked an aged and wise Rabbi to represent them in the debate.

However, as the Rabbi spoke no Italian, and the Pope spoke no Hebrew,
they agreed that it would be a 'silent' debate.

On the chosen day, the Pope and the Rabbi sat opposite each other 

 
 The Pope raised his hand and showed three fingers.

 
 The Rabbi looked back and raised one finger.



 Next, the Pope waved his finger around his head.
 The Rabbi pointed to the ground where he sat.

 
 The Pope brought out a communion wafer and a chalice of wine.

 The Rabbi pulled out an apple.

 
With that, the Pope stood up and declared himself beaten and said that
the Rabbi was too clever. The Jews could stay in Italy!

Later the cardinals met with the Pope and asked him what had happened.
The Pope said, 'First I held up three fingers to represent the Trinity.
 He responded by holding up a single finger to remind me there is still
only one God common to both our beliefs.'
'Then, I waved my finger around my head to show him that God was all around us. He responded by pointing to the ground to show that God was
also right here with us.'
'Finally, I pulled out the wine and wafer to show that God absolves us
of all our sins. He pulled out an apple to remind me of the original
sin.'
'He bested me at every move and I could not continue!'

Meanwhile, the Jewish community gathered to ask the Rabbi how he had won.
'I don't have a clue!!!' the Rabbi said. 'First, he told me that we had
three days to get out of Italy, so I gave him the finger.'
Then he tells me that the whole country would be cleared of Jews, so I
told him that we were staying right here.'
And then what?' asked a woman.
Who knows...' said the Rabbi. 'He took out his lunch, so I took out mine!'

***
One Sunday, a priest decides he doesn't want to go to church...
And decides to go golfing instead.

So he calls his deacon to tell him he is sick.  The deacon agrees to preach on his behalf.

So the priest grabs his golf clubs.  He drives for a while, finding a course where he wouldn't be recognized, and starts playing his game.

He tees up on the first whole, squares off, and hits the ball.  To his great surprise, it flies perfectly off the tee, heads downrange, and onto the green.  To his further surprise, when he gets to the green, he finds that the ball had landed in the hole.

The priest it jubilant.  Never, in 20 years of golfing has he been able to hit a hole in one.  He grabs his ball and moves onto the next hole.

There he tees up, takes a few practice swings, and hits the ball.  Again, it flies perfectly down the course, and this time before he even heads down the course he is sure the ball is in the hole.

Hole after hole this continues.  The priest is jubilant.  It's the best golf game he has ever had!

Up in heaven, Jesus is sitting beside God watching the priest.  He looks over and says, "Are you really going to let him get away with this?"

God smiles.  "Who is he going to tell?"  He replies.
***
Getting married in heaven.
On their way to get married, a young Catholic couple is involved in a fatal car accident. The couple find themselves sitting outside the Pearly Gates waiting for St. Peter to process them into Heaven. While waiting, they begin to wonder: Could they possibly get married in Heaven? When St. Peter showed up, they asked him. 

St. Peter said, 'I don't know. This is the first time anyone has asked.  Let me go find out,' and he leaves.

The couple sat and waited, and waited. Two months passed and the couple are still waiting.    While waiting, they began to wonder what would happen if it didn't work out;  could you get a divorce in heaven.  After yet another month, St. Peter finally returns, looking somewhat bedraggled.

'Yes,' he informs the couple, 'you can get married in Heaven.'

'Great!' said the couple, 'But we were just wondering, what if things don't work out? Could we also get a divorce in Heaven?'

St. Peter, red-faced with anger, slammed his clipboard onto the ground. 'What's wrong?' asked the frightened couple. 

'OH, COME ON!', St. Peter shouted, 'It took me three months to find a priest up here! Do you have any idea how long it'll take me to find a lawyer ?
***
Bill Clinton was walking along the beach when he stumbledupon a Genie's lamp.
He picked it up and rubbed it and lo-and-behold, a Genie appeared. Bill was amazed and asked if he got three wishes. 

The Genie said, "Nope...Due to inflation, constant downswing, low wages in third world countries, and fierce global competition, I can only grant you one wish. So...What'll it be?" 

Bill didn't hesitate. He said, "I want to bring peace to the Middle East, See this map?" Bill pulls out a sweat covered map. "These people have been at war for thousands of years. I want these countries to stop fighting with each other."  

The Genie looked at the map of the Middle East and exclaimed, "I'm good, but not THAT good. I don't think it can be done. Make another wish." 

Bill thought for a minute and said, "You know, people really don't like my wife. They call her a carpetbagger. They think she's mean, ugly, and pushes me around. I wish for her to be the most beautiful woman in the world and I want everybody to like her and for her to be elected President of the United States of America. That's what I want." 

The Genie let out a long sigh and said, "Lemme see that map again." 
***
The Golden Toilet
Jim and Jenny just came back from an amazing party and had a really great time. The hosts were relatively wealthy people and had spent quite an amount for the celebration. 

Jim has not even taken off his shoes when Jenny excitedly says, 'Jim, did you notice that the toilet was made of gold? God, those people have so much money.' 

Jim - I don't think there was a golden toilet, they can't be so rich. 
Jenny - I'm sure, oh my God, I was there! 

Jim disagrees, but Jenny is persistent. So they decide to find out the next day. 

The next day, they go back to the party house and the groggy eyed Host welcomes them in. 'did you guys lose something here last night?' 

Jenny - No, actually, I wanted to show Jim the Golden Toilet you have. 

Host, calling out to his wife - 'Honey, there's the lady who shit on your trumpet.' 
 

Source: my flatmate - he heard it somewhere.
***
The Chinese Doctor
A Chinese Doctor can't find a job in a Hospital in the US, so he opens a clinic and puts a sign outside 'GET TREATMENT FOR $20 - IF NOT CURED GET BACK $100.'
An American lawyer thinks this is a great opportunity to earn $100 and goes to the clinic.
Lawyer: "I have lost my sense of taste."
Chinese: "Nurse, bring medicine from box No. 22 and put 3 drops in patient's mouth."
Lawyer: "Ugh. this is kerosene."
Chinese: "Congrats, your sense of taste is restored. Give me $20."
The annoyed lawyer goes back after a few days to recover his money.
Lawyer: "I have lost my memory. I cannot remember anything."
Chinese: "Nurse, bring medicine from box no. 22 and put 3 drops in his mouth."
Lawyer (annoyed): "This is kerosene. You gave this to me last time for restoring my taste."
Chinese: "Congrats. You got your memory back. Give me $20."
The fuming lawyer pays him, and then comes back a week later determined to get back $100.
Lawyer: "My eyesight has become very weak I can't see at all."
Chinese: "Well, I don't have any medicine for that, so take this $100."
Lawyer (staring at the note): "But this is $20, not $100!!"
Chinese: "Congrats, your eyesight is restored. Give me $20"
You can't beat Chinese Doctors
***
A husband leans over
and asks his wife, "Do you remember the first time we had sex together over fifty years ago? We went behind this very tavern where you leaned against the back fence and I made love to you." 

"Yes, she says, "I remember it well." 

"OK," he says, "How about taking a stroll around there again and we can do it for old time's sake?" 

"Oh Charlie, you old devil, that sounds like a crazy, but good idea!" 

A police officer sitting in the next booth heard their conversation and, having a chuckle to himself, he thinks I've got to see these two old-timers having sex against a fence. 

The elderly couple walks haltingly along, leaning on each other for support aided by walking sticks. Finally, they get to the back of the tavern and make their way to the fence. The old lady lifts her skirt and the old man drops his trousers. 

As she leans against the fence, the old man moves in. Then suddenly they erupt into the most furious sex that the policeman has ever seen. This goes on for about ten minutes while both are making loud noises and moaning and screaming. Finally, they both collapse, panting on the ground . 

The policeman is amazed. He thinks he has learned something about life and old age that he didn't know. 

After about half an hour of lying on the ground recovering, the old couple struggle to their feet and put their clothes back on. 
The Policeman, thinks I've got to ask them what their secret is. So, as the couple passes, he says to them, "Excuse me, but that was something else. You must've had a fantastic sex life together. Is there some sort of secret to this?" 

Shaking the old man is barely able to reply, "Fifty years ago that wasn't an electric fence..." 
***
My all time favorite joke. American/Russian dog fight
The Americans and Russians at the height of the arms race realized that if they continued in the usual manner they were going to blow up the whole world. One day they sat down and decided to settle the whole dispute with one dog fight. They would have five years to breed the best fighting dog in the world and whichever side's dog won would be entitled to dominate the world. 

The Russians found the biggest meanest Doberman and Rottweiler female dogs in the world and bred them with the biggest meanest Siberian wolves. They selected only the biggest and strongest puppy from each litter, removed his siblings, which gave him all the milk. After five years they came up with the biggest meanest dog the world had ever seen. 

Its cage needed steel bars that were five inches thick and nobody could get near it. 

When the day came for the dog fight, the Americans showed up with a strange animal. It was a nine foot long Dachshund. Everyone felt sorry for the Americans because they knew there was no way that this dog could possibly last 10 seconds with the Russian dog. 

When the cages were opened up, the Dachshund came out of it's cage and slowly waddled over towards the Russian dog. The Russian dog snarled and leaped out of it's cage and charged the American dachshund. But, when it got close enough to bite the Dachshund's neck, the Dachshund opened it's mouth and consumed the Russian dog in one bite. 

There was nothing left at all of the Russian dog. 

The Russians came up to the Americans shaking their heads in disbelief. "We don't understand how this could have happened. We had our best people working for five years with the meanest Doberman and Rottweiler female dogs in the world and the biggest meanest Siberian wolves." 

"That's nothing", an American replied. "Do you know how hard it is to make an alligator look like a Dachshund
***
A dead duck
A woman brought a very limp duck into a veterinary surgeon. As she laid her pet on the table, the vet pulled out his stethoscope and listened to the bird's chest. 

After a moment or two, the vet shook his head and sadly said, "I'm sorry, your duck, Cuddles, has passed away." 

The distressed woman wailed, "Are you sure?"
 "Yes, I am sure. Your duck is dead," replied the vet.. 

"How can you be so sure?" she protested. "I mean you haven't done any testing on him or anything. He might just be in a coma or something." 

The vet rolled his eyes, turned around and left the room. He returned a few minutes later with a black Labrador Retriever. As the duck's owner looked on in amazement, the dog stood on his hind legs, put his front paws on the examination table and sniffed the duck from top to bottom. He then looked up at the vet with sad eyes and shook his head. The vet patted the dog on the head and took it out Of the room. 

A few minutes later he returned with a cat. The cat jumped on the table and also delicately sniffed the bird from head to foot. The cat sat back on its haunches, shook its head, meowed softly and strolled out of the room. 

The vet looked at the woman and said, "I'm sorry, But as I said, this is most definitely, 100% certifiably, A dead duck." 

The vet turned to his computer terminal, hit a few keys and produced a bill, which he handed to the woman.. The duck's owner, still in shock, took the bill. "$150!" 

She cried, "$150 just to tell me my duck is dead!" 

The vet shrugged, "I'm sorry. If you had just taken my word for it, the bill would have been $20, but with the Lab Report and the Cat Scan, it's now $150." 

***
My Most Favorite
When Albert Einstein was making the rounds of the speaker's circuit, he usually found himself eagerly longing to get back to his laboratory work. One night as they were driving to yet another rubber-chicken dinner, Einstein mentioned to his chauffeur (a man who somewhat resembled Einstein in looks & manner) that he was tired of speechmaking.
"I have an idea, boss," his chauffeur said. "I've heard you give this speech so many times. I'll bet I could give it for you." Einstein laughed loudly and said, "Why not? Let's do it!"
When they arrived at the dinner, Einstein donned the chauffeur's cap and jacket and sat in the back of the room. The chauffeur gave a beautiful rendition of Einstein's speech and even answered a few questions expertly.
Then a supremely pompous professor asked an extremely esoteric question about anti-matter formation, digressing here and there to let everyone in the audience know that he was nobody's fool. Without missing a beat, the chauffeur fixed the professor with a steely stare and said, "Sir, the answer to that question is so simple that I will let my chauffeur, who is sitting in the back, answer it for me."
***
George Bush is with the Queen of England.
George: "Your Majesty, any tips you can give me to stay in power, the way you have been for so long?"

"Well" said the Queen, "The most important thing is to surround yourself with intelligent people."

George frowned and then asked, "But how do I know the people around me
are intelligent?"

The Queen: "Easy, you just ask them to answer an intelligent riddle."

The Queen pushed a button on her intercom. "David Cameron, would you come in here, please?"

David Cameron walked into the room and said, "Yes, ma'am?"

The Queen smiled and said, "Answer me this please, David. Your mother and father have a child. It's not your brother and it's not your sister. Who is it?"

Without pausing for a moment, David Cameron answered, "That would be me, ma'am."

"Very good! Thank you, David!" said the Queen.

Then she turned to George with a smile and said "See?"

Now its George's turn to apply the same logic...

George went back to the USA and asked Jeb..
"Jeb, answer this for me. Your mother and your father have a child. It's not your brother and it's not your sister. Who is it?"

"I'm not sure." said Jeb. "Let me get back to you on that one..."

Jeb went to his advisors and asked every one, but none could give him an answer...

Finally, he ran into Obama and asked, "Hey, can you answer this for me? Your mother and father have a child and it's not your brother or your sister. Who is it?"..

Obama answered, "That's easy, it's me!"

Jeb said, "Thanks!"

Then he went back to George. "I did some thinking and I have the answer to that riddle. It's Barack Obama."

George slapped him.
and shouted..
"No! You dumb idiot! It's David Cameron."
***
The wife came early and found her husband making love with a young attractive woman.
"You are a disrespectful pig!" she cried. "How dare you do this to me - a faithful wife and mother of your children! I am leaving you"

The husband replied "Hang on a minute love, so at least I can tell you what happened"

"Go ahead", she sobbed. " but probably they will be the last words you will say to me"

And the husband began " Well, I was getting in to the car to drive home, this young lady here asked me for a lift. She looked so down and out, and defenseless that I took pity on her and let her into the car. I noticed that she was very thin, not well dressed and very dirty. She told me that she hadn't eaten for three days. So , in my compassion, I brought her home and warmed up the enchiladas I made for you last night, the ones you wouldn't eat  because you're afraid that you'll put on weight. 

The poor thing devoured them in moments. 

Since she needed a good clean-up, I suggested a shower, and while she was doing that, I noticed her clothes were dirty and full of holes, so I threw them away.

Then, as she needed clothes, I gave her the designer jeans that you have had for a few years, but don't wear because you say they are too tight. 

I also gave her the underwear that was your anniversary present, which you don't wear because I don't have a good taste. 

I found the sexy blouse my sister gave you for Christmas that you don't wear just to annoy her, and I also donated those boots you bought at the expensive boutique and don't wear because someone at work has a pair of the same. 

The husband took a quick breath and continued- ' She was so grateful for my understanding and help and that as I walked her to the door, she turned to me with tears in her eyes and said ' Please, do you have anything else that your wife doesn't use?'

That's how we ended up on bed. 
***
Mexican Oysters
A big Texan stopped at a local restaurant following a day roaming around in Mexico.  While sipping his tequila, he noticed a sizzling, scrumptious looking platter being served at the next table.  Not only did it look good, the smell was wonderful. He asked the waiter, “What is that you just served?”

The waiter replied, “Ah Seńor, you have excellent taste!  Those are called Cojones de Toro, bull's testicles from the bull fight this morning.  A delicacy!”

The cowboy said, 'What the heck, bring me an order.'

The waiter replied, “I am so sorry, senor. There is only one serving per day because there is only one bull fight each morning.  IIII   If you come early and place your order, we will be sure to save you this delicacy.”

The next morning, the cowboy returned, placed his order, and that evening was served the one and only special delicacy of the day. After a few bites, inspecting his platter, he called to the waiter and said, “These are delicious, but they are much, much smaller than the ones I saw you serve yesterday.”

The waiter shrugged his shoulders and replied, “Si, Seńor.  Sometimes the bull wins.”

***
The Devil goes to check on his prisoners.
The devil is checking on all of hells prisoners. So he walks by the first cell, this cell has two Americans in it. "Please, please turn down the heat!" They cry as the devil laughs to himself "good, good." The devil then stops at the second cell, this cell holds two Canadians. These Canadians are lounging around relaxing. This surprises the devil "whats wrong? Don't you find it too hot?" The devil asks "oh no, we're from Canada, we never get this kind of heat. This is nice." The Canadian replies. This makes the devil angry, so he decides to crank up the heat even more, he does this and then goes to check on the prisoners again. He passes by the Americans who are on fire and screaming in agony "PLEASE! PLEASE! TURN DOWN THE HEAT, WE CAN'T TAKE IT!!" The devil begins to laugh, happy with himself. He then goes to the Canadian's cell. The Canadians are lying down with their shirts off, still relaxing. "It's still not too hot for you!?!?!" The devil yells. "It's really cold in Canada, this feels like we're on vacation." The devil gets an evil thought and runs to change the temperature in hell. He cranks it down to the coldest it can get and everything began to freeze. The devil thinking that he's finally got those Canadians walks by the cells one more time. He laughs again as he sees that the Americans are frozen solid. He then walks by the Canadian's cell and to his dismay they're celebrating and cheering. "WHAT ARE YOU SO HAPPY ABOUT!?!!?!" The devil yells at the Canadians. They reply with "don't you know mr. Devil, when hell freezes over it means that the Leafs have won the cup"
***
Translation of an old Yiddish Joke...
One day in Czarist Russia, a poor old man and his very young daughter were on their way to town. They put all of their possessions in the back of a donkey driven wagon in hopes of selling some of them to make money. As they were traveling, up the road they saw a small group of Cossaks. They braced themselves expecting the worst. Inevitably, the Cossaks ride up to the wagon and begin harassing the old man his daughter. Eventually, the Cossacks knock the old man and his daughter off the cart and ride off with the Donkey and Wagon.

The old man sits on the side of the road and begins sobbing...

Daughter asks, "Papa, papa, what's the matter?"

To which the old man responds,"Don't you see? They've taken everything we had!"

"Not everything...", The daughter responds, to which she takes out a small rolled up cloth, which she unrolls to reveal some jewelry and gems.

The old man's eyes widen, "How did you manage to hide that?"

She answered, "When I saw them further up the road, I took them, rolled them up in this cloth and hid them in my crotch."

To which the old man starts crying hysterically...

"Papa, what's wrong now?"

"Oh if only your sainted mother were still alive...we could have saved the whole wagon!"
***
A bus full of Nuns falls of a cliff and.....
A bus full of Nuns falls of a cliff and they all die.
They arrive at the gates of heaven and meet St. Peter. St. Peter says to them
"Sisters, welcome to Heaven. In a moment I will let you all though the pearly gates, 
but before I may do that, I must ask each of you a single question. Please form a 
single-file line." And they do so.
St. Peter turns to the first Nun in the line and asks her "Sister, have you ever touched a penis?"
The Sister Responds "Well... there was this one time... that I kinda sorta... touched one with the
tip of my pinky finger..."
St. Peter says "Alright Sister, now dip the tip of your pinky finger in the Holy Water, and you may 
be admitted." and she did so.
St. Peter now turns to the second nun and says "Sister, have you ever touched a penis?" 
"Well.... There was this one time... that I held one for a moment..."
"Alright Sister, now just wash your hands in the Holy Water, and you may be admitted" and she does so.
Now at this, there is a noise, a jostling in the line. It seems that one nun is trying to cut in front
 of another! St. Peter sees this and asks the Nun "Sister Susan, what is this? There is no rush!"
Sister Susan responds "Well if I'm going to have to gargle this stuff, I'd rather do it before 
Sister Mary sticks her ass in it!"

***
give me an example of a tragedy?
Tony Abbott was visiting a Sydney primary school and the class was in
the middle of a discussion related to words and their meanings.
The teacher asked Mr Abbott if he would like to lead the discussion on
the word 'Tragedy'.
So our illustrious leader asked the class for an example of a 'Tragedy'
A little boy stood up and offered: 'If my best friend, who lives on a farm,
is playin' in the field and a tractor runs over him and kills him, that would be a tragedy.'
'Incorrect,' said Abbott. 'That would be an accident.'
A little girl raised her hand: 'If a school bus carrying fifty children
drove over a cliff, killing everybody inside, that would be a tragedy.'
'I'm afraid not explained Abbott, 'that's what we would refer to as a great loss'.
The room went silent. No other children volunteered. Abbott searched the room.
'Isn't there someone here who can give me an example of a tragedy?'
Finally, at the back of the room, little Johnny raised his hand and said:
'If a plane carrying you and Mr Hockey, Mr Pyne and Mrs Bishop was struck 
by a 'friendly fire' missile & blown to smithereens, that would be a tragedy.'
'Fantastic' exclaimed Abbott, 'and can you tell me why that would be a tragedy?'
'Well', said Johnny, 'it has to be a tragedy, because it certainly wouldn't
be a great loss, and it probably wouldn't be a accident either!
***
If you know an Arab, you don't have to steal...
 A Jew and an Arab go into a bakery.

The Arab steals three pastries and puts them in his pocket.
 He says to the Jew, "See how good I am? The owner didn't see anything."

The Jew says to the Arab, "That's typical of you dishonest Arabs. I am going to show you an honest way to get the same result."

He goes to the owner of the bakery and says, "Give me a pastry and I will show you a magic trick."

Intrigued, the owner accepts and gives him a pastry. The Jew swallows it and asks for another one.

The owner gives him another one. Then the Jew asks for a third pastry and eats that, too.

The owner is starting to wonder where the magic trick is and asks, "What did you do with the pastries?"

The Jew replies, "Look in the Arab's pocket....."
***
Best Salesman Ever!
A young guy from North Dakota moves to Florida and goes to a big "everything under one roof" store looking for a job.

The Manager says, "Do you have any sales experience?" 

The young guy says "Yeah. I was a vacuum salesman back in North Dakota."

Well, the boss was unsure, but he liked the kid and figured he'd give him a shot, so he gave him the job.
"You start tomorrow. I'll come down after we close and see how you did."

His first day on the job was rough, but he got through it. After the store was locked up, the boss came down to the sales floor. "How many customers bought something from you today?" 

The kid frowns and looks at the floor and mutters, "One". 

The boss says "Just one? Our sales people average sales to 25 to 30 customers a day. This is gonna have to change very soon if you'd like to continue your employment here. We have very strict standards for our sales force here in Florida. One sale a day might have been acceptable in North Dakota, but you're not on the farm anymore, son."

The kid took his beating, but continued to look at his shoes, so the boss felt kinda bad for chewing him out on his first day. He asked (sarcastically), "So, how much was your one sale for?"

The kid looks up at his boss and says "$124,548.88".

The boss, astonished, says $124,548.88??? What the heck did you sell?"

The kid says, "Well, first, I sold him some new fish hooks. Then I sold him a new fishing rod to go with his new hooks. Then I asked him where he was going fishing and he said down the coast, so I told him he was going to need a boat, so we went down to the boat department and I sold him a twin engine Chris Craft. Then he said he didn't think his Honda Civic would pull it, so I took him down to the automotive department and sold him that 4x4 Chevrolet Suburban."

The boss said "A guy came in here to buy a fish hook and you sold him a boat and a SUV???"

The kid said "No, the guy came in here to buy tampons for his wife, and I said, 'Bro, your weekend's a mess, you should go fishing."

***
Mr. Pott was an average man, with an extraordinary skin condition
One day Mr. Pott (legend says his first name was Arthur) went to the doctor to get his skin checked out. He said "Doctor, I have a very odd skin condition. Multiple times a day, my skin will puff up and get all red almost instantly, with no warning."

The doctor thought this was very odd, and wanted to have Mr. Pott wait with him in one of his rooms for a while to see if he could catch the odd phenomenon. 

They waited...

And waited...

THERE! No, that was just a trick of the light...

Hours went by...

Finally it was time for the doctor's office to close. Mr. Pott left the office, and as soon as he got into his car, his skin got all red and puffy. 

He called the doctor the next day, and said that it happened again as soon as he got into his car, and asked if he could come back into the office. The doctor said sure, since he wasn't busy that day.

Again Mr. Pott and the doctor waited to witness the described symptoms, but again, nothing happened all day. 

That night, as Mr. Pott was getting into his car, he broke out in a rash almost instantly. 

Mr. Pott again called the doctor and asked to come in. 

Every day Mr. Pott would go see the doctor. This went on for days, weeks, and finally months, to no avail. 

In fact, the doctor never did see the odd skin condition, because a watched Pott never boils. 

Edit: A name
***
It was a rainy day in Brisbane..
This story happened a while ago in Brisbane.

John Bradford, a Sydney University student, was on the side of the road hitch hiking on a very dark night and in the midst of a storm. The night was rolling on and no car went by. The storm was so strong he could hardly see a few feet ahead of him. Suddenly he saw a car slowly coming towards him and stopped. John, desperate for shelter and without thinking about it, got in the car and closed the door, just to realize there was nobody behind the wheel and the engine wasn't on!

The car started moving slowly. John looked at the road and saw a curve approaching. Scared, he started to pray, begging for his life. Then, just before he hit the curve, a hand appeared through the window and turned the wheel. John, paralysed with terror, watched how the hand appeared every time they came to a curve. John saw the lights of a pub down the road so, gathering strength, jumped out of the car and ran to it. Wet and out of breath, he rushed inside and asked for two shots of tequila. He then started telling everybody about the horrible experience he went through. A silence enveloped everybody when they realized he was crying and.... wasn't drunk.

About 15 minutes later, two guys walked into the same pub. They were also wet and out of breath. Looking around and seeing John Bradford sobbing at the bar, one said to the other, "Look, Bruce.. there's the fucker that got in the car while we were pushing it.


Edit: wow, this exploded. I didn't know it would be like this. I did not make this joke, its recycled.
***
Jamal and Billy are in Kindergarten.
One day, the class is learning addition.  Billy quickly masters it, but Jamal has difficulty doing 2+2.  Jamal goes home and asks his mom: "Mom, why is Billy so much better at addition than me?"  His mom responds "It's because he's white and you're black."  The next day, the class is learning the alphabet.  Billy is able to recite the whole thing but Jamal can't get past the letter E.  Jamal goes home and asks his mom: "Mom, why is Billy so much better with the alphabet than me?"  His mom responds "It's because he's white and you're black."  The next day, Jamal and Billy are in the bathroom and Jamal notices that Billy's penis is smaller than his.  Jamal goes home and asks his mom "Mom, why is Billy's penis so much smaller than mine?  Is it because he's white and I'm black?"  His mom responds "No, Jamal, it's because he's six and you're eighteen."
***
What Starts with F and ends with K?
A first-grade teacher, Ms Brooks, was having trouble with one of her students.  The teacher asked, "Harry, what's your problem?" 

Harry answered, "I'm too smart for the 1st grade. My sister is in the 3rd grade and I'm smarter than she is!  I think I should be in the 3rd grade too!"

Ms. Brooks had enough.  She took Harry to the principal's office. 

While Harry waited in the outer office, the teacher explained to the principal what the situation was. The principal told Ms. Brooks he would give the boy a test.  If he failed to answer any of his questions he was to go back to the 1st grade and behave.  She agreed. 

Harry was brought in and the conditions were explained to him and he agreed to take the test. 

Principal: "What is 3 x 3?"

Harry: "9."

Principal: "What is 6 x 6?"

Harry: "36."

And so it went with every question the principal thought a 3rd grader should know. 

The principal looks at Ms. Brooks and tells her, "I think Harry can go to the 3rdgrade."

Ms. Brooks says to the principal, "Let me ask him some questions."

The principal and Harry both agreed.

Ms. Brooks asks, "What does a cow have four of that I have only two of?"

Harry, after a moment: "Legs."

Ms Brooks: "What is in your pants that you have but I do not have?"

The principal wondered why would she ask such a question! 

Harry replied: "Pockets."

Ms. Brooks: "What does a dog do that a man steps into?" 

Harry: "Pants."

The principal sat forward with his mouth hanging open. 

Ms. Brooks: "What goes in hard and pink then comes out soft and sticky?"

The principal's eyes opened really wide and before he could stop the answer, Harry replied, "Bubble gum."

Ms. Brooks: "What does a man do standing up, a woman does sitting down and a dog does on three legs?"

Harry: "Shake hands."

The principal was trembling. 

Ms. Brooks: "What word starts with an 'F' and ends in 'K' that means a lot of heat and excitement?"

Harry: "Firetruck."

The principal breathed a sigh of relief and told the 
teacher, "Put Harry in the fifth-grade, I got the last six questions wrong... 
***
Mr. Smith, a very wealthy man...
Mr. Smith, a very wealthy man, is in town on business and towards the end of his trip he decides to take a walk on the docks and take in the ocean view.

As he's walking he comes up on a young boy, maybe 12 years old, crying on the edge of the dock. 

Mr. Smith hesitates but decides to ask what's wrong.

"Excuse me, Son? Why are you crying?" He asks gently.

The boy wipes away his tears and replies, "Oh, there's just a lot of things going wrong in my life right now. I'm sorry if I bothered you."

Mr. Smith takes note of the boy's politeness, "Is there anything I can do to help? Why don't you tell me what's going on..."

With that the boy breaks down and sobs. 

He starts going on and on about his troubles. 

His mother is dying of cancer and can't work. 

They can't afford the medicine to manage her symptoms. 

They haven't eaten in days. 

Not even an hour ago the boy had been caught dumpster diving behind a restaurant for food and was caned by the owner. 

He tried to go home to his mother but when he got there he saw an eviction notice on the door and he just couldn't bring himself to go inside and give her the news. 

Everything was just falling apart and he couldn't take it.

 "So I came here and just cried," he finished.

Mr. Smith was shocked. 

Of all the people he could have encountered he encountered this boy. 

He could solve this boy's problems with a single check. 

But Mr. Smith was a firm believer in earning what you got no matter what it was. 

As the boy continued to cry, Mr. Smith looked out to the water...

"Son," Mr. Smith began, "What's your name?"

"My name is Johnny." The boy said.

"Johnny, you see that ship out there," he said gesturing to a ship about a mile out from the dock, "I'll make you a deal. If you can swim out to that ship, climb up the mast and wave to me I will write you a check for one million dollars."

Johnny was awestruck. "You really mean it?"

"Absolutely." Mr. Smith confirmed.

Johnny dove into the water without a word and swam like a madman. 

Mr. Smith watched with a smile on his face but his smile faded when Johnny turned around and came back. 

When Johnny reached the dock he explained he got too tired too quickly and knew he wouldn't make it.

"Well that's ok, Johnny. Tomorrow let's meet here, same time, and you can try again."

The next day they met and Johnny tried but once again he got fatigued and had to turn back. 

Mr. Smith asked him if he'd eaten anything and Johnny told him he hadn't. 

With that, Mr. Smith gave him some money for a small meal and told him tomorrow was his last day in town so if he was going to succeed it had to be then.

The next day Mr. Smith arrived and Johnny was waiting at the dock with a smile on his face. "You all fed and ready?" Mr. Smith asked.

"Yes, Sir" said Johnny. 

And Johnny dove into the water. 

This time he was swimming a bit slower. 

He seemed to be pacing himself.
Mr. Smith watched Johnny get further and further and his smile grew and grew. 

What a perfect end to a perfect trip. 

He was going to make a difference in this boy's life.

Johnny made it to the ship. 

Mr. Smith watched him climb up the mast. 

Johnny held on with one hand and reached the other out and started to wave victoriously but suddenly he lost his grip! 

Johnny slipped and fell from the top of the mast all the way down to the ship below with a loud thud that echoed in the distance...

But Johnny was ok, know why?

...

...

...

...

...

He was used to hardships...
***
THE WINE TASTER
 
At a winery, the regular taster died and the director started looking for a new one to hire. A drunkard with a ragged, dirty look came in to apply for the position. The director of the winery wondered how to send him away. He gave him a glass to drink.
The drunk tried it and said, “It's a Muscat, three years old, grown on a north slope, matured in steel containers. Low grade, but acceptable.”
"That's correct", said the boss.
Another glass...
“This is a Cabernet, eight years old, a south-western slope, oak barrels, matured at 8 degrees. Requires three more years for finest results.”
"Correct."
A third glass...
"It's a Pinot Blanc Champagne, high grade and exclusive,'' the drunk said calmly.
The director was astonished. He winked at his secretary, secretly suggesting something.
She left the room, and came back in with a glass of urine.
The alcoholic tried it. "It's a blonde, 26 years old, three months pregnant and if I don't get the job I'll name the father."

***
A man wakes up at home with an awful hangover...
He forces himself to open his eyes, and the first thing he sees is a couple of aspirins and a glass of water on the side table.  He sits down and sees his clothing in front of him, all clean and pressed. He looks around the room and sees that it is in perfect order, spotless, clean. So is the rest of the house.  He takes the aspirins and notices a note on the table.  "Honey, breakfast is on the table, I left early to go grocery shopping.  Love You!"   Totally shocked with the note , he goes to the kitchen and sure enough there is a hot breakfast and the morning newspaper.  His son is also at the table, eating. He asks, "Son, what happened last night?"  His son says, "Well, you came home around 3 AM, drunk and delirious.  Broke some crockery, puked in the hall, and gave yourself a black eye when you stumbled into the door". Confused, the man asks, "So, why is everything in order and so clean, and  breakfast is on the table waiting for me?  I should expect a big quarrel with her!"  His son replies, "Oh, that! Mom dragged you to the bedroom, and when she tried to take your clothes n shoes off, you said,  "LADY LEAVE ME ALONE! I'M MARRIED!" 
***
Horses.
An out-of-towner drove his car into a ditch in a desolated area. Luckily, a local farmer came to help with his big strong horse named Buddy.

He hitched Buddy up to the car and yelled, "Pull, Nellie, pull!" Buddy didn't move.

Then the farmer hollered, "Pull, Buster, pull!" Buddy didn't respond.

Once more the farmer commanded, "Pull, Coco, pull!" Nothing.

Then the farmer nonchalantly said, "Pull, Buddy, pull!" And the horse easily dragged the car out of the ditch.

The motorist was most appreciative and very curious. He asked the farmer why he called his horse by the wrong name three times.

"Well...Buddy is blind and if he thought he was the only one pulling, he wouldn't even try!"
***
Clean English jokes, you must laugh!!!
Little Johnny wanted to be an accountant, so he went for an aptitude test:
Tester: If I give you two Rabbits, and two rabbits, and another two rabbits, how many rabbits have you got?
Little Johnny : SEVEN!
Tester : No, listen carefully again. If I give you two Rabbits, and two rabbits, and another two rabbits, how many rabbits have you got?
Little Johnny : SEVEN!
Tester : Let's try this another way. If Igive you two bottles of beer, and twobottles of beer, and another two bottles of beer, how many bottles of beer have you got?
Little Johnny : SIX.
Tester : Good! Now, if I give you two Rabbits, and two rabbits, and another two rabbits, how many rabbits have you got?
Little Johnny : SEVEN!
Tester : How on Earth do you work out that three lots of two rabbits is seven? 
Little Johnny: I've already got one rabbit at home!
***
A Texan is getting drunk in a bar in Alaska...
and he starts to brag about how great Texas is.

An Alaskan hunter comes up to him and says, "Listen, buddy. Here in Alaska, you ain't shit until you've done three things: Drink a fifth of Alaskan whiskey, shoot a polar bear, and make love to an Eskimo woman."

The Texan accepts the challenge and starts by grabbing a bottle of whisky from the counter and painfully chugging it down. He then says that he'll be right back and ambles out the door.

A few hours later he stumbles back into the bar all mangled and bloody and says, "I did it! Now where's that Eskimo woman I'm supposed to shoot?"
***
3 Chinese Tortures :).... Trust me You will love it.
A young man was lost wandering in a forest, when he came upon a small house. He knocked on the door and was greeted by an ancient Chinese man with a long, grey beard. "I'm lost," said the man. "Can you put me up for the night?"

"Certainly," the Chinese man said, "but on one condition. If you so much as lay a finger on my daughter, I will inflict upon you the three worst Chinese tortures known to man."

"Ok," said the man, thinking that the daughter must be pretty old as well, and entered the house.

Before dinner, the daughter came down the stairs. She was young, beautiful, and had a fantastic figure. She was obviously attracted to the young man since she couldn't keep her eyes off him during the meal. Remembering the old man's warning, he ignored her and went up to bed alone. But during he night, he could bear it no longer, and sneaked into her room for a night of passion. He was careful to keep everything quiet so the old man wouldn't hear. Near dawn he crept back to his room, exhausted, but happy.

He woke to feel a pressure on his chest. Opening his eyes he saw a large rock on his chest with a note on it that read, "Chinese Torture 1: Large rock on chest."

"Well, that's pretty crappy," he thought. "If that's the best the old man can do then I don't have much to worry about." He picked the boulder up, walked over to the window and threw the boulder out. As he did so he noticed another note on it that read: "Chinese Torture 2: Rock tied to left testicle."

In a panic he glanced down and saw the rope that was already getting close to the end. Figuring that a few broken bones was better than castration, he jumped out of the window after the boulder.

As he plummeted downward he saw a large sign on the ground that read, "Chinese Torture 3: Right testicle tied to bedpost."
***
A Jew and an Arab go into a bakery...
The Arab immediately steals three pastries and puts them in his pocket.

He says to the Jew, "See how good I am? The owner didn't see a thing."
The Jew says to the Arab, "That's typical of you Arabs. I am going to show you an honest way to get the same result."

He goes to the owner of the bakery and says, "Give me a pastry and I will show you a magic trick."

Intrigued, the owner accepts and gives him a pastry. The Jew swallows it and asks for another one.
The owner gives him another one. Then the Jew swallows that one and asks for a third pastry and eats that, too.

The owner is starting to wonder where the magic trick is and asks, "So what did you do with the pastries?"

The Jew replies, "Look in the Arab's back pocket....."
***
Jesus and Satan are having an argument about who is the better computer programmer.
This goes on for a few hours until they come to an agreement to hold a contest with God as the judge. They set themselves before their computers and begin. They type furiously, lines of code streaming up the screen, for several hours straight.

Seconds before the end of the competition, a bolt of lightning strikes, taking out the electricity. Moments later, the power is restored, and God announces that the contest is over. He asks Satan to show his work. Visibly upset, Satan cries and says, “I have nothing. I lost it all when the power went out.”

“Very well,” says God, “let us see if Jesus has fared any better.”

Jesus presses a key, and the screen comes to life in vivid display, the voices of an angelic choir pour forth from the speakers.

Satan is astonished. He stutters, “B-b-but how?! I lost everything, yet Jesus’ program is intact! How did he do it?”

God chuckles, “Everybody knows… Jesus saves.”

***
First Day of School
It was the first day of school and a new student named Pedro, the son of a Mexican immigrant, entered the fourth grade.

The teacher said, "Let's begin by reviewing some American history. Who said 'Give me Liberty, or give me Death?' "

She saw a sea of blank faces, except for Pedro, who had his hand up.

"Patrick Henry, 1775."

"Very good! Who said "Government of the people, by the people, for the people, shall not perish from the earth" "?

Again, no response except from Pedro:

"Abraham Lincoln, 1863," said Pedro.

The teacher snapped at the class, "Class, you should be ashamed. Pedro, who is new to our country, knows more about its history than you do."

She heard a loud whisper: "Screw the Mexicans."

"Who said that?" she demanded.

Pedro put his hand up. "Jim Bowie, 1836."

At that point, a student in the back said, "I'm gonna puke."

The teacher glared and asked, "All right! Now, who said that?"

Again, Pedro. "George Bush to the Japanese Prime Minister, 1991."

Now furious, another student yelled, "Oh yeah? Suck this!"

Pedro jumped out of his chair waving his hand and shouting to the teacher, "Bill Clinton to Monica Lewinski, 1997!"

Now, with almost a mob hysteria, someone said, "You little shit. If you say anything else, I'll kill you."

Pedro frantically yelled at the top of his voice, "Gary Condit to Chandra Levy, 2001."

The teacher fainted, and as the class gathered around her on the floor, someone said, "Oh shit, we're in BIG trouble now!"

Pedro whispered, "Saddam Hussein, 2003.
***
In celebration of my cake day, here's the worst joke I've ever created.
There are two identical twin brothers that live together.  One happens to be a well-respected dentist, and the other can't seem to keep a job.  Instead of actively looking for work, he likes to sit around at home.  One Saturday, the dentist is hungry, and puts his brother on the spot.  He tells him to get off his lazy behind and go get them some food.  After some protest, the lazy brother takes the car and leaves for the store.  In the meantime, the dentist takes a nap on his day off.  He turns off his phone so he won't be interrupted.  
  
About 30 minutes later, the lazy brother gets into a head-on collision in the intersection by the grocery store.  His vital signs are fading; he's unconscious and barely moving.  An ambulance picks him up and rushes him to the hospital.  He ends up in the Emergency Room under observation, but his condition is critical.  They try calling his dentist brother, but he doesn't pick up because his phone is off.  
  
The dentist wakes to a knock on the door.  Suspecting a solicitor, he ignores it, but the knocking continues.  Eventually, he resolves to get up and yell at the person at the door.  When he does, he reveals--- the grim reaper.  He is just as he appears in movies; a full skeleton underneath a tattered cloak.  
  
The grim reaper swears.  "Oh no!  This always happens with identical twins".  
  
"What do you mean?"  asks the dentist.
  
"Well... if you must know, your brother was in a critical car accident, and I've come to take him to the underworld.  I'm afraid his time on Earth has ended.  I'll take my leave now."  
  
The dentist is noticeably upset.  He says "Wait!  Isn't there some way I can challenge you for my brother's life?  After all, YOU made the mistake.  Certainly there must be a way I can bargain for his life."  
  
The grim reaper asks "What do you have in mind?"  
  
The dentist thinks.  "How about a challenge?  If I beat you, you let my brother go free."  
  
The grim reaper laughs.  "I will beat you in any challenge.  What challenge do you propose?"  
  
The dentist smiles.  "I propose we see who has the cleanest teeth.  5 minute of brushing each, then we decide."  
  
"Very well" says the grim reaper, who makes his way to the bathroom.  
  
Once there, he pulls back his tattered cloak to reveal his skull.  It's glistening.  He takes a toothbrush from the bathroom, loads it with toothpaste, and brushes.  After 5 minutes, the shiniest teeth anyone has ever seen glisten and make the room bright.  The grim reaper grins.  "You are foolish human.  But, you are entitled to your chance."
  
The dentist takes another toothbrush, loads it with toothpaste, and starts brushing like a madman.  When his 5 minutes are up, he spits out the paste.  He smiles.  
  
It's unbelievable.  
  
The shine from the dentist's teeth is so beautiful that he can see the grim reaper's reflection in his perfectly clean teeth.  
  
The winner is obvious.  The grim reaper hangs his head in shame.  "You win, human.  This time.  Your brother will live."  He disappears in a puff of smoke.  At the same instant, the bed-ridden brother wakes up in the hospital.  Not only is he uninjured, he seems perfectly healthy.  Suddenly, the phone by his bed rings.  It's his brother, the dentist.  He picks up.  "Hey bro.  You'll never believe what happened.  Apparently, I went out to the market and got hit by a car.  They say I almost died."  
  
The dentist smiles on the phone and says.  "That's interesting, bro.  Today you might say that I also had a brush with death."  
***
The CEOs of Budweiser, Coors, Killian's, and Guinness walk into a bar....
...and the bartender takes orders. The CEO of Budweiser says "I'll take a Bud Light. It's crisp, refreshing, and doesn't hurt the budget!" 

The bartender moves down the line. The CEO of Coors says "I'll take a Coors light. It's colder, even more refreshing, and won't give you a beer gut!" 

The bartender moves down the line. The CEO of Killian's says "These guys are amateurs, give me a Killian's Irish Red. It's smooth, flavorful, and distinct!" 

The bartender moves down the line. The CEO of Guinness says "I'll have a water." 

The others give a confused look. The bartender says "but... why aren't you ordering a beer?" 

He responds, "well, nobody else did." 
***
Three bulls
Three bulls heard that the rancher was going to bring yet another bull onto the ranch, and the prospect raised a discussion among them. 

First Bull: "Boys, we all know I've been here 5 years. Once we settled our differences, we agreed on which 100 of the cows would be mine. Now, I don't know where this newcomer is going to get his cows, but I aint' givin' him any of mine." 

Second Bull: "That pretty much says it for me, too. I've been here 3 years and have earned my right to the 50 cows we've agreed are mine. I'll fight 'im till I run him off or kill 'im, but I'm keeping all my cows."

Third Bull: "I've only been here a year, and so far you guys have only let me have 10 cows to take care of. I may not be as big as you fellows (yet) but I am young and virile, so I simply must keep all my cows." 

They no sooner finished their big talk when an eighteen-wheeler pulls up in the middle of the pasture with only one animal in it: the biggest baddest bull these guys had ever seen! At 4700 pounds, each step he took toward the ground strained the steel ramp to the breaking point. 

First Bull: "You know, it's actually been some time since I really felt I was doing all my cows justice, anyway. I think I can spare a few for our new friend." 

Second Bull: "I'll have plenty of cows to take care of if I just stay on the opposite end of the pasture from him. I'm certainly not looking for an argument."

They look over at their young friend, the 3rd bull, and find him pawing the dirt, shaking his horns, and snorting. 

First Bull: "Son, let me give you some advice real quick. Let him have some of your cows and live to tell about it." Third Bull: "Hell, he can have ALL MY COWS. I'm just making sure he knows I'm a bull!" 

***
A blonde walks into a bank
A blonde walks into a bank in New York City and asks for the loan officer. She says she's going to Europe on business for two weeks and needs to borrow $5,000. The bank officer says the bank will need some kind of security for the loan, so the blonde hands over the keys to a new Rolls Royce. The car is parked on the street in front of the bank; she has the title, and everything checks out. The bank agrees to accept the car as collateral for the loan. The bank's president and its officers all enjoy a good laugh at the blonde for using a $250,000 Rolls as collateral against a $5,000 loan. An employee of the bank then drives the Rolls into the bank's underground garage and parks it there. Two weeks later, the blonde returns and repays the $5,000 and the interest, which comes to $15.41. The loan officer says, "Miss, we are very happy to have had your business, and this transaction has worked out very nicely; but we are a little puzzled. We checked you out and found out that you are a multimillionaire. What puzzles us is - why would you bother to borrow $5,000?" The blond replies....."Where else in New York City can I park my car for two weeks for only $15.41 and expect it to be there when I return?"
***
A blonde gets on an airplane
 and sits down in the first class section of the plane. The stewardess rushes over to her and tells her she must move to coach because she doesn't have a first class ticket. The blonde replies, "I'm blonde, I'm beautiful and I'm staying in first class until we reach New York."

The stewardess gets the head stewardess who asks the blonde to leave. The blonde yet again repeats "I'm blonde, I'm beautiful and I'm staying in first class until we reach New York." The head stewardesses doesn't even know what to do at this point because they still have to get the rest of the passengers seated to take off; the blode is causing a problem with boarding now, so the stewardess gets the copilot. The copilot said "No problem my wife is blonde I can handle this"

The copilot goes up to the blonde and whispers in her ear. She immediately gets up and goes to her seat in the coach section. The head stewardess asks the copilot in amazement what he said to get her to move to her correct seat. The copilot replies, "I told her the first class wasn't going to New York. "
***
Phrase of the day
An American businessman is in Japan for an important contract. Feeling stressed out, he goes to a brothel and finds a cute, young girl. Although shy at first, soon she starts moaning and panting, and keeps on screaming "Soko janai! Soko janai!". While he couldn't speak or understand Japanese, the man is glad to know that he managed to please her so much.   

The next day, he strikes the deal, and is invited to play golf with his Japanese associates. On the hardest hole of the course, one Japanese businessman manages to score an impressive hole-in-one. His colleagues start cheering him in Japanese, and the man, not wanting to be left out, starts chanting "Soko janai! Soko janai!". Suddenly everyone goes quiet, and one of them turns to him and says "No sir, I'm sure that's the right hole." 
***
After the Beer Festival, all the brewery presidents decided to go out for a beer.
The guy from Corona sits down and says, "Hey Senor, I would like the world's best beer, a Corona." The bartender dusts off a bottle from the shelf and gives it to him.  

The guy from Budweiser says, "I'd like the best beer in the world, give me 'The King Of Beers', a Budweiser." The bartender gives him one.  

The guy from Coors says, "I'd like the only beer made with Rocky Mountain spring water, give me a Coors." He gets it.  

The guy from Guinness sits down and says, "Give me a Coke." The bartender is a little taken aback, but gives him what he ordered.  

The other brewery presidents look over at him and ask "Why aren't you drinking a Guinness?" and the Guinness president replies, "Well, I figured if you guys aren't drinking beer, neither would I."
***
"Tell me about the day you died."
It got crowded in heaven, so, for one day it was decided only to accept people who had really had a bad day on the day they died. St. Peter was standing at the pearly gates and said to the first man, "Tell me about the day you died."

The man said, "Oh, it was awful. I was sure my wife was having an affair, so I came home early to catch her with him. I searched all over the apartment but couldn't find him anywhere. So I went out onto the balcony, we live on the 25th floor, and found this man hanging over the edge by his fingertips. I went inside, got a hammer, and started hitting his hands. He fell, but landed in some bushes. So, I got the refrigerator and pushed it over the balcony and it crushed him. The strain of the act gave me a heart attack, and I died."

St. Peter couldn't deny that this was a pretty bad day, and since it was a crime of passion, he let the man in.

He then asked the next man in line about the day he died. "Well, sir, it was awful," said the second man. "I was doing aerobics on the balcony of my 26th floor apartment when I twisted my ankle and slipped over the edge. I managed to grab the balcony of the apartment below, but some maniac came out and started pounding on my fingers with a hammer. Luckily I landed in some bushes. But, then the guy dropped a refrigerator on me!"

St. Peter chuckled, let him into heaven and decided he could really start to enjoy this job.

"Tell me about the day you died?", he said to the third man in line.

"OK, picture this, I'm naked, hiding inside a refrigerator ..."
***
A rabbi, bishop, and islamic priest...
**Edit**: Changing the title to...

###An orthodox priest, a bishop, and a Rabbi

...are arguing over whose religion is the best.  The bishop says, "We should convert the fiercest bear we can find to our religion, for only the best religion should help be able to convert such a ferocious animal." 

The next day they set out to prove themselves. After a few hours the bishop returns with a bear. The bear is surprisingly tame and is busy reading the bible. Soon afterwards the orthodox priest returns with the bear that he converted. The two of them begin to discuss how they accomplished the feat and who did a better job. 

As time passes they begin to wonder where the rabbi was. At the end of the day they notice the rabbi hobbling towards them. The rabbi's neck is in a brace, his arm in a sling, and his face covered with numerous cuts and bruises. "What happened to you?" The bishop and priest ask.

The rabbi replies in a raspy voice, "I guess circumcising him wasn't a good place to start."
***
A Frenchmen, A Englishman and an American are traveling in the Amazon
When suddenly a cannibal tribe captures them. The cannibal leader steps forward and states "It is nothing against you men. We all have been raised cannibals and need to eat. Every scrap will be used including your skin to make a boat. We will, however, give you the option on how you want to die. Frenchman how do you wish to die?"

The Frenchman mulls it over for a minute and declares "I'll use a gun." The tribe gives him a pistol with one bullet. The Frenchman's last words were "Vive La France" and shoots himself. 

"Englishman how do you wish to die?" The Englishman thinks it over for a few minutes and states "I'll use some poison." The tribe provides the poison. The Englishman says "Long live the Queen" drinks and dies. 

The tribe then turns to the American. Then American demands "I want a fork" without waiting for the question. Confused, the tribe provides him with a fork. The American then begins to stab himself all over. With a horrified look on their faces the American yells "NOW TRY TO BUILD A BOAT BITCH" and dies. 

***
A nun is standing outside a pub...
...and a man comes round the corner, planning to grab an after-work bevy. The nun immediately points at him, and intones:

"Before you enter this den of sin and debauchery, think of your mother and father!"

The man wipes away a tear, and says "They're dead, God bless 'em. They're dead, in heaven."

"Well," says the nun, "Then think of the damage the alcohol will do to your brain!"

"What? What are you talking about?" the man asks. "Have you ever had a drink?" The nun says she has not. "Then how can you talk to me about alcohol? I'll tell you what I'll do," he continues, "I'll buy you a drink, and after you've drunk it, *then* you can talk to me about alcohol. What'll you have?"

"I don't know," says the nun. "What do ladies usually drink?"

"Gin," he replies.

"Oh, alright," she says. "But - but can you put it in a cup, so nobody notices." The man nods and walks into the bar, calling out to the bartender.

"Bartender! I'll have a beer, and a double gin in a cup!"

"It's that bloody nun outside again, isn't it?"
***
Pastor in the KKK
An Alabama pastor said to his congregation, "Someone in this congregation has spread a rumor that I belong to the Ku Klux Klan. This is a horrible lie and one which a Christian community cannot tolerate. I am embarrassed and do not intend to accept this. Now,  I want the party who said this to stand and ask forgiveness from God and this Christian family."
 
No one moved. The preacher continued, "Do you have the nerve to face me and admit this is a falsehood? Remember, you will be forgiven and in your heart you will feel glory. Now stand and confess your transgression." Again, all was quiet.
 
Then, slowly, a drop-dead gorgeous blonde with a body that would stop a runaway train rose from the third pew. Her head was bowed and her voice quivered as she spoke, "Reverend there has been a terrible misunderstanding. I never said you were a member of the  Ku Klux Klan. I simply told a couple of my friends that you were a wizard under the sheets."
 
The preacher fell to his knees, his wife fainted, and the congregation roared.
***
THE salesman story.
A young guy from North Dakota moves to Florida and goes to a big "everything under one roof" department store looking for a job.

The Manager says, "Do you have any sales experience?"

The kid says "Yeah. I was a vacuum salesman back in North Dakota ."

Well, the boss was unsure, but he liked the kid and figured he'd give him a shot, so he gave him the job.  "You start tomorrow. I'll come down after we close and see how you did."

His first day on the job was rough, but he got through it. After the store was locked up, the boss came down to the sales floor.  "How many customers bought something from you today?"
 
The kid frowns and looks at the floor and mutters, "One".
 
The boss says "Just one?!!? Our sales people average sales to 20 to 30 customers a day.  That will have to change, and soon, if you'd like to continue your employment here. We have very strict standards for our sales force here in Florida . One sale a day might have been acceptable in North Dakota , but you're not on the farm anymore, son."

The kid took his beating, but continued to look at his shoes, so the boss felt kinda bad for chewing him out on his first day. He asked (semi-sarcastically), "So, how much was your one sale for?"

The kid looks up at his boss and says "$101,237.65".

The boss, astonished, says $101,237.65?!? What the heck did you sell?"

The kid says, "Well, first, I sold him some new fish hooks. Then I sold him a new fishing rod to go with his new hooks. Then I asked him where he was going fishing and he said down the coast, so I told him he was going to need a boat, so we went down to the boat department and I sold him a twin engine Chris Craft. Then he said he didn't think his Honda Civic would pull it, so I took him down to the automotive department and sold him that 4x4 Expedition." 
 
The boss said "A guy came in here to buy a fish hook and you sold him a boat and a TRUCK!?"
 
The kid said "No, the guy came in here to buy tampons for his wife, and I said, 'Dude, your weekend's shot, you should go fishing.’  

***
A bloke walks into an extremely posh restaurant, sits down and waives the waiter over. "I want to see the cock-sucking, mother-fucking boss now," he says.
 The waiter is naturally a bit taken aback and replies "Excuse me, sir, would you refrain from using that kind of language in here, I will get the manager as soon as I can."

The manager comes over and the bloke says "Are you the chicken fucking manager of this bastard joint?" "Yes sir, I am", replies the manager but I would prefer you not to use that kind of vernacular in this restaurant, there are private parties and clients entertaining in here."

The bloke replies "Fuck you anus features, where's the fucking piano?"

The manager is a bit puzzled and asks the bloke to clarify the situation.

"Where's the fucking piano, are you fucking deaf or what, you smelly stupid cunt?"

"Ah", says the manager, "You've come about the pianist job out of the paper."

"Too fucking right", the bloke replies.

The manager tentatively takes the bloke over to the piano and begs him not to speak into the microphone.

"Can you play any blues?" the manager asks.

The bloke starts to play the most beautiful blues ever heard. "That's superb", gasps the manager, "What is it called?"

"I want to shag your missus on the sofa but the springs keep hurting my cock end", replies the bloke.

The manager is a bit disturbed. "Oh, do you know any jazz?" asks the manager a bit perplexed.

The bloke plays the most melancholy jazz solo the manager has ever heard. "Absolutely magnificent", cries the manager, "What is that called?"

"I wanked over the washing machine but my bollocks got caught in the powder drawer", replies the bloke.

The manager is a tad embarrassed at this one. "Oh I say, do you know any romantic ballads?" asks the manager getting flustered. The bloke plays the most heartbreaking melody ever. "That was fantastic", crooned the manager, "What is that one called?"

"Shagging sheep under the stars with the moonlight shining on my hairy ring piece", replies the bloke.

The manager is highly upset at the bloke's language but is so moved by his music that he offers the bloke a job on the condition that he does not introduce any of the songs. The bloke accepts.

The arrangement goes swimmingly for a couple of weeks when one night the bloke gets desperate for a wank. He leaves the restaurant and goes to the staff toilets. Strangely there is a magazine stuffed behind the bowl. The bloke retrieves the mag and discovers a good old wank mag. He naturally has a swift one off the wrist. As he is coming he hears the manager shouting "Where the fuck is that fucking pianist?"

The bloke whips up his trousers, returns to the restaurant and begins playing some more tunes. After a couple of minutes a woman approaches him and whispers "Do you know your bollocks and knob are hanging out of your trousers dribbling jissum all over your shoes?"

The bloke replies "Know it? I fucking wrote it!


Edit - Woo Gold thank you random stranger! I assume it's from this as it's showing in my trophy cabinet. Can't find the comment that got gilded though.
***
An honest mistake.
A man is showering up in a locker room with his buddy when he notices his friend is very well endowed.

"Damn Bob, you're hung!" Jim exclaims.

"I wasn't always this impressive, I had to work for it."

"What do you mean?" Jim asked.

"Well, every day for the past two years I've spent an hour each night rubbing it with butter. I know it sounds crazy but it actually made it grow 4 inches! You should try it."

Jim agrees and the two say good bye.

A few months later the two are in the same locker room and Bob asks Jim how his situation was.

Jim replied, "I did what you said, Bob, but I've actually gotten smaller! I lost two inches already!"

"Did you do everything I told you? An hour each day with butter?"

"Well, I was out of butter, so I've been using Crisco."

"Crisco?!?" Bob exclaimed.


"Dammit Jim, Crisco's shortening!!!!"
***
An English man, a french man, a Spaniard and a German...
An English man, a french man, a Spaniard and a German are all standing watching a street performer do some excellent juggling. The juggler notices that the four gentleman have a very poor view, so he stands on a wooden box and calls out, "Can you all see me, now?"

"Yes."
"Oui."
"Si."
"Ja."
***
When God created Adam and Eve, he had two gifts...
When God created Adam and Eve, he spoke and said, "I have two gifts to give to each of you. First! One of you can have the ability to pee wherever ye shall please!"

Right away, Adam jumped up and said, "Oh! Me! I want that one!"

And God said, "But you haven't heard what the other gift is!"

And Adam said, "I don't care! I want that one!"

So, God sighed, "Fine. It shall be yours!"

God made it so, and Adam started jumping up and down and running all over the place and peeing wherever he wanted.

Then God looked at Eve and sighed, "I guess you're stuck with multiple orgasms."


**Side note**: I had posted this as comment on /r/askreddit, so while I *am* ^^sorta ^^kinda ^^not ^^really karmawhoring, I feel like it would be appreciated more here. :D
***
A British man, a French man and a Spanish man are caught stealing in a foreign country.
They are prosecuted and the judge sentences them all to 100 lashes each. However he wants to look lenient in the eyes of their respective countries so he reduces the lashes to twenty and allows them to have two requests each before being lashed. 

The Spanish is first to be lashed and requests a bottle of tequila and a pillow strapped to his back. They let him drink the tequila and strap the pillow to his back and then commence the lashes. After 5 lashes the pillow breaks and they keep lashing him. After the 20 lashes he's bawling and his back is horribly scared. They haul him away to be sent back to Spain.

The French man is next and he requests two pillows (one per request). After 10 lashes the pillows break and they continue with the next 10. By the end he's also horribly scarred and bawling, but not as bad as the Spanish guy.

While they are hauling off the French guy the judge turns to the Brit and says "Well it's your turn now. What do you request?"

The British man responds "First I want the original punishment of 100 lashes. I don't believe I should get off easy."

The Judge yells "You're crazy! why would you do that?"

The Brit responds "Because my next request is to have the French man strapped to my back."
 
***
I walked into my local community center.
I was visiting a local community center because I was interested in learning a new hobby.


On my way to the office, I passed a group of guys in a beat boxing class.


I walked in and decided to try and fit in with my beatboxing skills, "bootssskts bootsskts uhh uhh my name is Chris, Yall mutha fuckas aint ready for this. Wickawickabtssssss" I leaned back in the first chair I saw, confident I gained their respect.

One of the boys walks up to me and spat one back at me

"Th-Th-Th-This is a speech therapy class."

***
What starts with "F" and ends with "K"?
A first-grade teacher, Ms Brooks, was having trouble with one of her students.  The teacher asked, "Harry, what's your problem?" 


Harry answered, "I'm too smart for the 1st grade. My sister is in the 3rd grade and I'm smarter than she is!  I think I should be in the 3rd grade too!"


Ms. Brooks had enough.  She took Harry to the principal's office. 


While Harry waited in the outer office, the teacher explained to the principal what the situation was. The principal told Ms. Brooks he would give the boy a test.  If he failed to answer any of his questions he was to go back to the 1st grade and behave.  She agreed. 

Harry was brought in and the conditions were explained to him and he agreed to take the test. 


Principal: "What is 3 x 3?"

Harry: "9."


Principal: "What is 6 x 6?"


Harry: "36."

And so it went with every question the principal thought a 3rd grader should know. 

The principal looks at Ms. Brooks and tells her, "I think Harry can go to the 3rdgrade."


Ms. Brooks says to the principal, "Let me ask him some questions."

The principal and Harry both agreed.


Ms. Brooks asks, "What does a cow have four of that I have only two of?"


Harry, after a moment: "Legs."


Ms Brooks: "What is in your pants that you have but I do not have?"


The principal wondered why would she ask such a question! 


Harry replied: "Pockets."


Ms. Brooks: "What does a dog do that a man steps into?" 


Harry: "Pants."


The principal sat forward with his mouth hanging open. 

Ms. Brooks: "What goes in hard and pink then comes out soft and sticky?"

The principal's eyes opened really wide and before he could stop the answer, Harry replied, "Bubble gum."


Ms. Brooks: "What does a man do standing up, a woman does sitting down and a dog does on three legs?"

Harry: "Shake hands."

The principal was trembling. 


Ms. Brooks: "What word starts with an 'F' and ends in 'K' that means a lot of heat and excitement?"

Harry: "Firetruck."

The principal breathed a sigh of relief and told the 
teacher, "Put Harry in the fifth-grade, I got the last six questions wrong... "
***
Three men are standing at the pearly gates...
St. Peter tells them, "As you all know God has a sense of humor and his latest idea is to put the Kingdom of Heaven several hundred miles from the Pearly Gates."
"How is that supposed to be funny?" one guy asks. 
"Well, God had the novel idea of allowing those admitted into Heaven a vehicle to travel that distance, but the quality of your vehicle is based upon how faithful you were to your spouse." 
Knowing they can't argue and that God obviously knows all, the men begin confessing their infidelity. 

"I admit I screwed around behind my wife's back, but I broke it off with the girl before my wife found out." One man admits.
"Very well," St. Peter responds and gives him a standard bicycle. The guy shrugs and feels a little better confessing.
The second man says with a grin, "I've never actually cheated on my wife." 
St. Peter raises a skeptical brow. 
"Okay... There was one time, but it was technically before we were married! I was drunk and I didn't know what I was doing but I've never been unfaithful after that!"
With a heavy sigh St. Peter grants the second man a car--but in terrible condition. 
The third man says proudly, "I've never been unfaithful. Never." 
The other two stare at the third in disbelief. 
"No, he's right." St. Peter confirms. "He's been faithful the whole time. In fact he lost his virginity to his wife." 
The other two men gape in jealous amazement as the third man is granted a brand new sports car. 

The third man obviously can make it down the long, glittering highway toward the Kingdom of Heaven faster than the other two. However, the first man on the bicycle finds the third man pulled over not too far down the road. Perplexed, he rides to the sports car and finds the man sobbing into his steering wheel. 
"What's wrong, wise-guy, is this Italian muscle too much for you?" he gloats. 
"No..." the third man tries to gain composure. "It's not that... The car is beautiful!" 
"Then what's your problem?"
"I just passed my wife and she was on rollerskates!"
***
The Pope decides to go around Rome incognito
He steps into his limousine. All the windows are tinted obviously, so no one can see who's inside. The Pope tells the driver to go around Rome at once. However, the driver is really nervous, because it's the first time he takes the Pope around all alone; usually, His Holiness is surrounded by a dozen bodyguards at the very least. So the driver is really stressed out, and to make sure nothing bad happens he drives really slowly.

After a while, the Pope tells him to drive faster, but the driver isn't willing to go above 30 km/h. After another while, the Pope says:

'Okay, let's switch. I'll show you how to freaking drive, my son!'

They switch and the Pope immediatly accelerates. Of course, a police car pursues them when they see a limo going around Rome wildly, well above the speed limit, and they ask them to pull over. A policeman approaches the driver's side where the window is being lowered. When the policeman sees the Pope, he turns completely pale, mutters some apologies and runs back to the police car. His partner inquires:

'Why the hell didn't you give him a ticket, you moron?'

'Man, I didn't dare... that's an extremely important person sitting there in that limo...'

'Who? The Mayor? Should've given him a ticket, that bastard deserves it!'

'No, no, someone much more important...'

'Who then? One of our corrupt ministers perhaps?'

'No, no, much more important than that...'

'The Prime Minister?'

'No, no...'

'Oh for fuck's sake, just tell me who it is already!'

'Well actually, I don't know... But it's the Pope himself who serves as their driver!'
***
A woman must walk 5 paces behind...
Barbara Walters did a story on gender roles in Kabul, Afghanistan, several years before the Afghan conflict.

She noted that women customarily walked five paces behind their husbands.

She recently returned to Kabul and observed that women still walked behind their husbands, despite the overthrow of the oppressive Taliban regime and women seemed happy to maintain the old custom.

Ms. Walters approached one of the Afghani women and asked, "Why do you still abide by an old custom, that you once tried so desperately to change?"

The woman looked Ms. Walters straight in the eyes, and without hesitation said, "Land mines."
***
An engineer, a physicist, and a mathematician are all attending a conference.
By chance they wind up staying on the same floor of a certain hotel. 

Late that evening, the engineer is awoken by the smell of smoke. He steps into the hallway and sees a small fire. Thinking quick, he dumps out his wastepaper basket, fills it with water, and douses the flames. Satisfied, he goes back to bed.

Later still, the physicist is also awoken by the smell of smoke. When he investigates, he finds a second fire raging in the hallway. He dashes to the end of the hall and grabs a fire extinguisher. In the time it takes him to do this, the fire grows in size, but he's able to do some quick mental calculations and find the optimal place to aim the fire extinguisher's nozzle. He succeeds in putting out the fire, and returns the extinguisher to its holder. Satisfied, he goes back to bed.

Finally, near dawn, the mathematician wakes up to the smell of smoke. He saunters into the hallway and -- you guessed it -- finds a fire. Glancing up and down the hallway, he spies the fire extinguisher sitting in its holder. "Aha!" he says triumphantly, "a solution exists!" Satisfied, he goes back to bed.  
***
Joke translated to English
Once upon a time, there was a young Indian man named Ram who fell in love with a beautiful white woman. Although his parents did not approve, he stubbornly married the woman and brought her to live in the home he shared with his parents. 

The next day, Ram's mother, named Sita, made breakfast for the whole family. She lovingly made lunch for her husband and son to take to work. The white woman, however, stayed in bed long after the two men went off to work. When she finally came out of her room, Sita was shocked to see the white woman completely naked!

"Why aren't you wearing clothes?!" asked Sita. 

"This is my birthday suit. I was born in this suit, and this is the suit that I shall wear at home."

Sita tried to explain that the woman couldn't just walk around the house naked. What would Ram's father think?! The white woman ignored her requests.

Later that evening, Sita spoke imploringly to her son. "Ram, your wife is walking around in her birthday suit... These white people...!"

"I don't mind," said Ram, laughing. "I like it."

Shocked, Sita went to her own husband and explained the problem to him. "Sita, she is making her husband happy. She should try to keep him pleased with her," said Ram's father. 

Over the next few days, Sita watched as her daughter in law walked around the house in comfort, and suddenly her own sari seemed like a burden to wear. She also noticed that her son couldn't keep his hands off his wife. Despite doing no housework at all, this white woman's birthday suit was keeping her husband very happy. 

Sita decided to embrace her daughter in law's ways. The next day, her husband found her reclining peacefully on the couch, absolutely naked. 

"What do you think? I'm in my birthday suit," she said, smiling. 

"Sita, at least you should have ironed it!!"
***
A bunch of people walk into a restaurant...
A Scotsman, an Irishman, a Welshman, a Latvian, a Turk, a German, an Indian, several Americans (including a Hawaiian and an Alaskan), an Argentinian, a Dane, an Australian, a Slovak, an Egyptian, a Japanese, a Moroccan, a Frenchman, a New Zealander, a Spaniard, a Russian, a Guatemalan, a Colombian, a Pakistani, a Malaysian, a Croatian, a Uzbek, a Cypriot, a Pole, a Lithuanian, a Chinese, a Sri Lankan, a Lebanese, a Cayman Islander, a Ugandan, a Vietnamese, a Korean, a Uruguayan, a Czech, an Icelander, a Mexican, a Finn, a Honduran, a Panamanian, an Andorran, an Israeli, a Venezuelan, an Iranian, a Fijian, a Peruvian, an Estonian, a Syrian, a Brazilian, a Portuguese, a Liechtensteiner, a Mongolian, a Hungarian, a Canadian, a Moldovan, a Haitian, a Norfolk Islander, a Macedonian, a Bolivian, a Cook Islander, a Tajikistani, a Samoan, an Armenian, an Aruban, an Albanian, a Greenlander, a Micronesian, a Virgin Islander, a Georgian, a Bahamian, a Belarusian, a Cuban, a Tongan, a Cambodian, a Canadian, a Qatari, an Azerbaijani, a Romanian, a Chilean, a Jamaican, a Filipino, a Ukrainian, a Dutchman, a Ecuadorian, a Costa Rican, a Swede, a Bulgarian, a Serb, a Swiss, a Greek, a Belgian, a Singaporean, an Italian, a Norwegian, a New Zealander, and a South African .... all walk into a very fine restaurant.




After carefully scrutinizing the group, the Maître D says:
"I'm sorry...You can't come in here without a Thai."

***
Have you ever.....?
With a very seductive voice a wife asked her husband "Have you ever seen $20 all crumpled up?" "No", said her husband. She gave him a sexy little smile, unbuttoned the top three buttons of her blouse and slowly reached down in her cleavage created by a soft, silky push-up bra and pulled out a crumpled twenty dollar bill. He took the crumpled twenty dollar bill from her and smiled approvingly. She then asked "Have you ever seen $50 all crumpled up?""No I haven't" he said with an anxious tone in his voice. She gave him another sexy little smile pulled up her skirt, seductively reached into her tight sheer panties and pulled out a crumpled fifty dollar bill. He took the crumpled fifty dollar bill and started breathing a little quicker with anticipation. "Now" she said "Have you ever seen $50,000 all crumpled up?" "No way" he said becoming even more aroused and excited, to which she replied:"Good go look in the garage."
***
The Most Famous Man Who Ever Lived
One day at primary school, the teacher said to the class of 5-year-olds, "I'll give 50 cents to the child who can tell me who was the most famous man who ever lived."

An Irish lad put his hand up and said, "It's Bono!"

The teacher said, "Sorry, Sean, that's not correct."

Then a Scottish boy put up his hand and said, "It's Sean Connery!"

The teacher replied, "I'm sorry, Harry, that's not right either."

Finally, a little Jewish girl raised her hand and said, "It was Jesus Christ."

The teacher said, "That's absolutely right, Esther. Come up here and I'll give you your 50 cents.

As the teacher was giving Esther her money, she said, "You know Esther, you being Jewish, I was very surprised you said Jesus Christ."

Esther replied, "I know- in my heart it's Moses, but business is business."
***
Dave goes to the doctor for some sex advice
He goes to the doctor and says, "Look, I just can't bring my wife to orgasm in bed, it's a real problem."

The doctor says, "Well, is it too warm?"

"Yes, it's absolutely sweltering"

"Then get some air-con"

"I can't afford air-con, I'm too poor"

"Well, Dave, do you have a good mate?"

"Yeah, I've got a mate Mick"

"Well, ask your mate Mick to stand over you and the mrs with a towel, wafting you both to cool you down, that might help."

So, Dave asks Mick for this favour, who then agrees to help him. That night, Dave is in bed with his wife, pounding away with Mick fanning them with the towel but it's doing nothing for her.

Dave says, "Well this isn't working, let's swap." So Dave takes the towel and starts wafting Mick, who is now shagging Dave's mrs. Not long after, Dave's wife goes "Oooh... oh that's it, I'm about to cum, I'm going to cum!"

Dave shouts, triumphantly, "You see, Mick?! That's how you waft a fucking towel!"
***
The Vet
One Sunday, in counting the money in the weekly offering, the Pastor of a small church found a pink envelope containing $1,000. It happened again the
next week! 

The following Sunday, he watched as the offering was collected and saw an elderly woman put the distinctive pink envelope on the plate. This went on for weeks until the pastor, overcome by curiosity, approached her. 



"Ma'am, I couldn't help but notice that you put $1,000 a week in the collection plate," he stated.

"Why yes," she replied, "every week my son sends me money and I give some of it to the church." 

The pastor replied, "That's wonderful. But $1000 is a lot, are you sure you can afford this? How much does he send you?" 

The elderly woman answered, "$10,000 a week."

The pastor was amazed. "Your son is very
successful; what does he do for a living?" 

"He is a veterinarian," she answered.

"That's an honorable profession, but I had no idea they made that much money," the pastor said. "Where does he practice?" 

The woman answered proudly,
"In Nevada... He has two cat houses, one in Las Vegas and one in Reno." 
***
Jesus, Moses, and a bearded guy are all playing golf together
They get to the first hole and it's a long one with a big deep water hazard in the middle. Par 4

Jesus takes a shot. It lands on this tiny patch of dirt on the right edge of the hazard. Jesus doesn't want to take a penalty for a drop and he stinks at shooting left handed so he decides to just walk out on the water and make his shot. It lands on the green and he puts it in. Birdie.

Moses steps up. He takes a shot. This one is going right into the center of the hazard. Moses raises his hands and parts the waters. The ball lands. Moses walks out and takes his shot. It lands on the green and he puts it in. Birdie.

The bearded guy steps up to the tee. He takes his shot. It too is going straight into the water hazard. It heads straight for a lily pad with a frog on it. The frog sees the ball and thinks that it is a fly. It shoots out its tongue and swallows the ball. Right at that moment a hawk flies over and snatches the frog in it's talons and flies away. As it flies over the green the hawk squeezes tightly and the frog gasps dropping the ball out of its mouth. The ball falls from the sky straight into the hole. Hole-in-one.

Moses turns to Jesus and says "I hate playing with your dad."
***
Jesus is bored in heaven and decides to take a vacation to Earth
He thinks hitchhiking could be fun, so he disguises himself as an average looking American and flies down from heaven onto a highway in Nebraska.  He sticks his thumb out and after a little while, an 18-wheeler pulls over to offer a ride.  He climbs in the cab, tells the driver he's headed west and off they go.  They're driving along chatting and having an enjoyable ride when the trucker asks the hitchhiker if he's hungry.  He is, so the trucker graciously splits his tuna sandwich and gives half to his passenger.  A little while later the driver asks him if he's thirsty and offers to split his can of Coke with the hitchhiker.  They're riding along enjoying each others' company and after another twenty miles or so, the trucker says "Now that we've had lunch, how about dessert?"  He pulls a big fat joint from the glove box and gives it to his passenger, but warns him that it is especially strong weed.  Disguised Jesus thinks to himself "Fuck it..  I'm on vacation" and lights it up and takes a big toke.  Jesus is enjoying the buzz and is reflecting on how nice this trucker has been to him when it occurs to him that he hasn't even introduced himself.  He turns to the trucker and says "You've been so kind to me, offering me a ride, offering me food and drink, and sharing this joint with me, and I haven't even introduced myself."

The trucker replies "Shit man, me either...  I'm Larry." 

Jesus turns to him and says "Thank you for your hospitality Larry.  I am Jesus, the only son of God, and you are living like a true Christian."

Larry hears this, turns to Jesus and with a big grin on his face says "See!  I told you that weed was some good shit!"
***
After a Beer Festival in London, all the brewery presidents decided to go out for a beer.
Corona's president sits down and says, "Señor, I would like the world's best beer, a Corona."
 
The bartender takes a bottle from the shelf and gives it to him. 

Then Budweiser's president says, "I'd like the best beer in the world, give me 'The King Of Beers', a Budweiser." 

The bartender gives him one. 

Coors' president says, "I'd like the best beer in the world, the only one made with Rocky Mountain spring water, give me a Coors." 

He gets it. 

The guy from Guinness sits down and says, "Give me a Coke." 

The other brewery presidents look over at him and ask, "Why aren't you drinking a Guinness?"

The Guinness president replies, "Well, if you guys aren't drinking beer, neither will I."
***
Donald Trump answers the question: What is 2+2?
"I have to say a lot of people have been asking this question. No, really. A lot of people come up to me and they ask me. They say, 'What's 2+2?' And I tell them look, we know what 2+2 is. We've had almost eight years of the worst kind of math you can imagine. Oh my god, I can't believe it. Addition and subtraction of the 1s the 2s and the 3s. Its terrible. Its just terrible. Look, if you want to know what 2+2 is, do you want to know what 2+2 is? I'll tell you. 

First of all the number 2, by the way I love the number 2. It's probably my favorite number, no it is my favorite number. You know what, I mean, you know. So, we have all these numbers and we can add them and subtract them and add them. TIMES them even. Did you know that? We can times them OR divide them, they don't tell you that, and I'll tell you, no one is better at the order of operations than me. You wouldn't believe it. That I can tell you. So, we're gonna be the best on 2+2, believe me. OK? Alright. Thank you."
***
A State Trooper was patrolling late at night off the main highway.
At nearly midnight, he sees a couple in a car, in lovers' lane, with the
interior light brightly glowing.  

He carefully approaches the car to get a closer look. Then he sees a young man

behind the wheel, reading a computer magazine. 

He immediately notices a young woman in the rear seat, filing her fingernails. 

Puzzled by this surprising situation, the trooper walks to the car and gently
raps on the driver's window. 

The young man lowers his window. 'Uh, yes, Officer'? 

The trooper asks: 'What are you doing?' 

The young man says: 'Well, Officer, I'm reading a magazine.' 

Pointing towards the young woman in the back seat the trooper says: 'And, her,
what is she doing?' 

The young man shrugs: 'Sir, I believe she's filing her fingernails.' 

Now, the trooper is totally confused. A young couple, alone, in a car, at night
in a lover's lane and nothing obscene is happening! 

The trooper asks: 'What's your age, young man?' 

The young man says: 'I'm 22, sir.' 

The trooper asks: 'And her, what's her age?' 

The young man looks at his watch and replies:' She'll be 18 in 11 minutes.'
***
In the Navy.
The crusty Navy Master Chief noticed a new face and barked at him, "Get over here! What's your name, sailor?"

"John," the new seaman replied.

"Look, I don't know what kind of bleeding-heart pansy crap they're teaching sailors in boot camp these days, but I don't call anyone by his first name," the chief scowled.

"It breeds familiarity, and that leads to a breakdown in authority. I refer to my sailors by their last names only; Smith, Jones, Baker, Jackson, whatever.

And you are to refer to me as 'Chief.’ Do I make myself clear?"

"Aye, Aye, Chief!"

"Now that we've got that straight, what's your last name?"

The seaman sighed. "Darling, My name is John Darling, Chief."

"Okay, John, here's what I want you to do ...."
***
A man gets audited by the IRS...
and the auditor is not surprised when he arrives with his lawyer.  As the men sit down the lawyer says, "Look, the reason my client is in this situation is because he is a terrible gambler."


"I am not a terrible gambler," the man replies. "I will make a bet right now. I bet you $1,000 that I can bite my own eye." he says to the auditor.


"You can't bite your own eye," the auditor replies. "I'll take your bet."


The man reaches up, removes his glass eye and bites it.  The auditor is in shock, he just bet this man $1,000 in front of a lawyer.  The man however is generous.


"Ok, that wasn't really fair.  You didn't know that I had a glass eye.  So, for double or nothing I bet you I can bite my other eye."


The auditor is skeptical, but after careful examination determines that there is no way he has two glass eyes. "Fine, double or nothing, you cannot bite your other eye."


The man reaches into his mouth and pulls out his false teeth and carefully makes them bite down on his other eye.


The auditor is completely taken aback.  How could he possibly be so dumb as to take that bet.


"Ok," the man says again. "You didn't know I had dentures, so I will give you one last chance.  Double or nothing, I bet you I can stand on this side of your desk and piss over your desk and into that wastebasket without getting a single drop on your desk."


The auditor backs up and looks at the distance. There is no way the man could physically maintain a stream that could reach that distance.  It had to be impossible.


"I have no choice," the auditor says. "I'll take the bet."


The man stands up, walks to the side of the desk and proceeds to piss all over the auditors desk, not a single drop reaching the wastebasket.


The auditor leaps from his seat and cheers his victory.  The lawyer however, has his face in his hands, audibly groaning.


"Wait," the auditor says. "Why are you so upset?"


"Before we came in, he bet me $20,000 he could walk in here, piss all over your desk and you would be happy about it."

edit: Spelling
***
A father tucks his son in
A father goes upstairs to tuck his son into bed. As he reaches his son's door, he hears his son praying "Dear God please look after mum, dad, grandma and byebye grandad. The father thought the prayer was a little strange but nothing more. The next morning the family gets a phonecall that grandad had dies of a heartattack. The father remember his sons pray and was a little worried but he shrugged it off. A couple of weeks and the father goes to tuck his son in, sure enough he hears his son praying " Please God look after mum, dad and byebye grandma. The next morning the family gets a phonecall that grandma had of a stroke. The father is worried about this but still shrugs it off. A couple more weeks pass and the father goes to tuck his son in. He hears his son praying "Dear God please look after mum, byebye daddy. Now the father freaks out about his, he doesnt sleep at all that night and when he goes to work he cant do anything becaise of his worrying. Whem he gets home he says to his wife "you wouldnt know how much of a i've had a terrible day i had today". Too which his wife replies "you think you had a bad day? I found the bloody postman dead on our doorstep!!"
***
Probably old, but I got it in email and it made me chuckle.
An Irish daughter had not been home for over 5 years. Upon her return, her father cursed her heavily. "Where have ye been all this time, child? Why did ye not write to us, not even a line? Why didn't ye call? Can ye not understand what ye put yer old Mother through?""
The girl, crying, replied, 'Sniff, sniff... Dad...I became...a prostitute."
"Ye what!!? Get outta here, ye shameless harlot! Sinner! You're a disgrace to this Catholic family."
"OK, Dad, as ye wish. I just came back to give Mum this luxurious fur coat, title deed to a ten bedroom mansion plus a $2 million savings certificate.
For me little brother, this gold Rolex, And for ye, Daddy, the sparkling new Mercedes Limited Edition convertible that's parked outside, plus a membership to the country club... (takes a breath)... and an invitation for ye all to spend New Year's Eve on board my new yacht in the Riviera."
"Now what was it ye said ye had become?" asks Dad.
The girl, crying again answered, "Sniff, sniff...a prostitute, Daddy! Sniff, sniff."
"Ye scared me half to death, girl! I thought ye said a Protestant. Come here and give yer old Dad a hug!!!"
***
Hitler walks into a bar...
The bartender does a double take but doesn't say anything at first. "This cant be!" the bartender thinks to himself. Finally he decides to bring it up.

"Hey man, I don't want to bother you," says the bartender, "but you look *just* like Hitler."

"I am Hitler," says the fuhrer. "I'm back. And this time, I'm gonna kill eight million Jews **and** three rodeo clowns."

"Three rodeo clowns?" asks the puzzled bartender.

Hitler says "see? No one gives a fuck about the Jews."
***
A man, an ostrich and a cat walk into a restaurant...
The man and his companions sit down at a table and a waitress walks over to them to take their order.

"I'll have a 16oz Steak with all the trimmings and a bottle of champagne." The man says.

The waitress nods and turns towards the ostrich, who seems confused.

"Oh! Uh, I'll, um... I want, uh, I dunno, uuuuuuhhhhhhhhh, I'll just have what he had." 

Writing down the order again she looks to the cat.

"Yeah I'll have the same. But I'm not paying for it! I won't pay a single penny." He said as he turned his nose up at her.

The waitress smiles and walks off to the kitchen. She appears again later with three huge meals and 3 bottles of champagne.

After the man and his companions finish their meals the waitress returns to the table to ask him if there was anything else. The man said no and she went to fetch the bill.

"That'll be £166.95 please."

The man reaches into his pocket and pulls out £166.95 exactly in cash and places it in the waitress's hand.

Her eyes widen as she looks down at the pile of cash and change in her hands. She looks up at him in amazement.

"How could you possibly have the exact money ready for me?"

"Oh thats a funny story actually, I found an old lamp the other day. After I rubbed it a Genie promptly popped out and proclaimed he could grant me three wishes." Explained the man.

"And?" Urged the waitress.

"My first wish was to always have the exact money in cash readily in my pocket whenever I needed it." Said the man, triumphantly.

"And the second and third wishes?" Inquired the waitress.

The man pauses briefly and looks to his companions.

"I wished for a dumb bird with long legs and a tight pussy."
***
A Chinese Doctor...
A Chinese Doctor can't find a job in a Hospital in the US, so he opens a clinic and puts a sign outside 'GET TREATMENT FOR $20 - IF NOT CURED GET BACK $100.'
An American lawyer thinks this is a great opportunity to earn $100 and goes to the clinic.
Lawyer: "I have lost my sense of taste."
Chinese: "Nurse, bring medicine from box No. 22 and put 3 drops in patient's mouth."
Lawyer: "Ugh. this is kerosene."
Chinese: "Congrats, your sense of taste is restored. Give me $20."
The annoyed lawyer goes back after a few days to recover his money.
Lawyer: "I have lost my memory. I cannot remember anything."
Chinese: "Nurse, bring medicine from box no. 22 and put 3 drops in his mouth."
Lawyer (annoyed): "This is kerosene. You gave this to me last time for restoring my taste."
Chinese: "Congrats. You got your memory back. Give me $20."
The fuming lawyer pays him, and then comes back a week later determined to get back $100.
Lawyer: "My eyesight has become very weak I can't see at all."
Chinese: "Well, I don't have any medicine for that, so take this $100."
Lawyer (staring at the note): "But this is $20, not $100!!"
Chinese: "Congrats, your eyesight is restored. Give me $20"
You can't beat Chinese Doctors
***
An American tourist stopped at a local restaurant while wandering around Madrid...
While sipping his wine, he noticed a sizzling, scrumptious
looking platter being served at the next table. Not only did it look 
good, the smell was wonderful.  He asked the waiter, "What is that you just served?"

The waiter replied, "Si, Señor, you have excellent taste! Those are called Cojones de Toro, bull's testicles from the bull fight this morning. A delicacy!" 

The American said, "I will have the same please." 

The waiter replied, "I am so sorry, Señor. There is only one serving per day because there is only one bull fight each morning. If you come early tomorrow morning and place your order, we will be sure to save you this delicacy."

The following day the American returned, placed his order, and that evening was served the one and only special delicacy of the day.  After a few bites, inspecting his platter, he called to the waiter and said, "These are delicious, but they are much, much smaller than the ones I saw you serve yesterday."

The waiter shrugged his shoulders and replied, "Si, Señor. Sometimes the bull wins."

***
A guy brings a tub of Vaseline to meet his girlfriend's parents for the first time...
A guy and his girlfriend have plans to go to her parents' house for dinner so he can meet them for the first time.

&nbsp;

The same week, he buys his first motorcycle. He asks the seller for any tips to maintain the motorcycle and is told "When it rains, put a thin layer of Vaseline on the outside of the bike - that'll help prevent it from rusting", and he's handed a small tub of Vaseline which he puts in his pocket.

&nbsp;

On Friday, he and his girlfriend head to her parents' place on his new motorcycle. Before getting inside, she says "By the way, my family has a weird tradition but it's an important one - whoever is the first to talk during dinner has to wash all of the dishes. It'll impress my Dad if you don't talk first."


&nbsp;

They all sit down for dinner. Mother, father, guy, girlfriend, and girlfriend's sister. It's a massive dinner with a ton of dishes. No one says a word. Guy feels his girlfriend sliding her hand up his leg... so he reciprocates. He begins feeling her up, eventually fondling her breasts. The father looks on, horrified, but still says nothing. Guy reaches over and begins fondling girlfriend's sister's breasts with his free hand; the father looks on, red with anger, but still says nothing. Guy stands up, lays the mother on the table, and starts shagging her six ways from Sunday. Certain that this would drive the father into a rage, he locks eyes with him. Still, not a word. Just then, guy hears the sound of rain hitting the kitchen window and remembers his motorcycle is outside, so he reflexively reaches into his pocket and pulls out the tub of Vaseline, at which point the father jumps up and shouts "OH FINE, I'LL DO THE FUCKING DISHES!"
***
A shipwreck, only Scarlett Johansson and some random dude survived on an deserted island...
They didnt know each other before the shipwreck, but he did know who she was...

At the beginning it was hard, but as time passed, this guy learnt how to provide food and shelter, he started taking care of her, and eventually she started caring about him... after all, there wasnt anybody else in the island...

He eventually built a cabin, had a functioning automatic potable water supply, and all sorts of little clever commodities, all done to make her life easier... it was the most effort any man had ever done for her, and all the hard work made him fit, she noticed this...

One night after some wildlife attacked and he defended her succesfully, getting a few cuts in the process, she threw herself at him and they made love, after that, they where for all intents and purposes a couple with an above regular sex life.

But for some reason he started drifting away, something was bothering him. And she noticed... "Whats wrong?" Scarlett Johansson asked, "Nothing..." the guy would say...

She pestered him for a while eventually saying she would do ANYTHING he needed or wanted to make him feel good again, just because she really cared for him a lot, and even if he wasnt asking, she felt it was the least she owed it to him...

    "Really?, youll do anything id like?"

    "yes" she said "anything!"

    "ok, first i want you to take off you toga and get into this pair of work jeans that somehow washed on the shore"

    "ok..."

    "now put this shirt on please, but first, "tape" your boobs so they are flat"

    "wha... ok, id say id do anything" she said lovingly.

    "ok, now, take this hat and wear it, but tuck your hair under it"

she was kinda confused, but non the less, she wanted to make him happy, so she tuck her hair under the hat.

    "Now id like for you to grab this piece of soot and paint yourself a beard and a mustache"

    "ok... if this is what you want..." she muttered.

    "now, please, put on these sunglasses, and start walking down the beach ill catch up to you in a bit" he said a bit excited...

She started walking... wondering... doubting herself... just confused about what had just happened, maybe it wasnt her, maybe it was h... suddenly the guy grabs her by her shoulder turns her around and says: "DUDE!!! you wont believe who ive been fucking for the past 6 months!"

***
The CIA, The Mossad and The KGB.
A mummy was found in Egypt, and to determine its age and whatnot, three best forensic teams of the world decided to start a competition.

The CIA went first. They studied the mummy for a year, and then came up with a result: the person lived around 1000 years BC, plus or minus 200 years.

The Mossad goes next. They study the mummy for a month, and conclude: it was a pharaoh who ruled 1000 years BC, give or take 100 years.

The KGB team goes next. They hold the mummy for a week, and then come up with this: it was Pharaoh Ramenhotep the Second, born 1022 BC, became king after murdering his uncle, ruled for five years, on the third year of his reign the Nile flooded Luxor, on the fourth year the hittites attacked.

Everyone is perplexed: "How did you find all this out?"

"He confessed"
***
Dave cannot make his wife cum, so he goes to the doctor for some advice...
He goes to the doctor and says, "Look, I just can't bring my wife to orgasm in bed, it's a real problem."

The doctor says, "Well, is it too warm?"

"Yes, it's absolutely sweltering"

"Then get some air-con"

"I can't afford air-con, I'm too poor"

"Well, Dave, do you have a good mate?"

"Yeah, I've got a mate Mick"

"Well, ask your mate Mick to stand over you and the mrs with a towel, wafting you both to cool you down, that might help."

So, Dave asks Mick for this favour, who then agrees to help him. That night, Dave is in bed with his wife, pounding away with Mick fanning them with the towel but it's doing nothing for her.

Dave says, "Well this isn't working, let's swap." So Dave takes the towel and starts wafting Mick, who is now shagging Dave's mrs. Not long after, Dave's wife goes "Oooh... oh that's it, I'm about to cum, I'm going to cum!"

Dave shouts, triumphantly, "You see, Mick?! *That's* how you waft a fucking towel!"
***
You have three wishes...but there's a catch
A business man briskly weaves in and out of the morning rush to make it to his building. He breaks right to take a shortcut down a less-traveled alleyway. He kicks a pile of crumpled newspaper out of his path, but his shoe hits a hard and heavy object. Suddenly a gust of wind and a flash of light exposes a beautiful golden lamp as a powerful genie erupts from it.

"You have three wishes. Choose wisely."

"Oh wow this is great! Ok um--"

The genie interupts, "For everything you wish, your mother-in-law receives twice."

A little disappointed, the greedy business man takes another moment to rethink his first wish. But, there was simply no way around it.

"Okay genie, I wish that I was the CEO of my company."

The man's wish is granted, but alas, his already narcissistic mother-in-law is now the CEO of **two** big companies.

Behind a devilish grin the man in the nice suit says, "I wish to have the most beautiful woman as my girlfriend."

Somewhere in another part of the United States, a confused mother-in-law shoos two beautiful lesbians from off her front porch.

Preparing for his last wish, the man takes a few minutes to think things through.

"I've got it, Genie. I want you to beat me half to death." *



 \* "I would like to be beaten such that if my mother-in-law were to receive the exact same beating twice, she would die, immediately, from her injuries, but also such that I could easily survive just one of these beatings." /u/Brawldud


***
Military joke
A British General had sent some of his men off to fight for their country in the Falkland Island Crisis. Upon returning to England from the South American island, three soldiers that had distinguished themselves in battle were summoned to the General’s office. “Since we weren’t actually at war,” the General began, “I can’t give out any medals. We did, however, want to let each of you know your efforts were appreciated. What we’ve decided to do is to let each of you choose two points on your body. You will be given two pounds sterling for each inch of distance between those parts. We’ll start on the left, boys, so what’ll it be?” Soldier 1: “The tip of me head to me toes, sahr!” General: “Very good son, that’s 70 inches which comes to 140 pounds” Soldier 2: “The tip of the finger on one outstretched hand to the tip of the other, sir!” General: “Even better son, that’s 72 inches which comes to 144 pounds” Soldier 3: “The palm of me hand to the tip of me left pinky, sahr!” General: “That’s a strange but fair request, son! As the general begins the measurement: “What! Son, where is your left pinky?” Soldier 3: “Falkland Island, sahr!”
***
The first person to talk at the table has to clean the dishes.
A guy buys a vintage motorcycle he saw for sale in an ad in the paper. When he goes to pick the bike up, the dude who sells him the bike says, "

"Now remember....that's all original leather. You can't let it get too wet. If it starts raining and you don't have anywhere to shelter it, make sure you keep a tub of vaseline with you. Rub it all over the seat so the water will just bead off."

The guy takes his new bike and goes to pick up his girlfriend. The girlfriend invites the guy over to her parents house for dinner. This will be the first time he's ever eaten with her family.

"I should let you know the rule of the table" she said. "There is no talking allowed. The first person to talk at the table has to clean the dishes."

The guy doesn't think this is that big of a deal until he arrives at the family's house and looks in the kitchen. There must be at least three months worth of dishes inside. They are stacked up to the ceiling, stinking and rotting of mold and old bits of food everywhere. The guy almost throws up at the smell and sight of such a disgusting state of affairs.

Dinner begins, and no one is saying a word. The tension is starting to get to the boyfriend, so he concocts a plan to make someone else speak first.

The guy drops his fork, goes over to his girlfriend at the table, throws her up on top and just starts fucking her in front of everyone. The father and mother are obviously mortified. But even with their jaws on the floor, no one says a word.

The guy stops and thinks to himself "This is going to be harder than I thought...." then he gets another idea.....

Without hesitation, he runs over to the mother throws her up on the table and fucks the shit out of her, right in front of the father.

The dad is staring daggers through the boyfriend and turning bright red in anger. But still says nothing. The girlfriend is becoming teary eyed and covering her mouth with her hands, but doesn't make a peep.

The boyfriend stops fucking the mother and sits back down at his seat, completely flustered. He takes a gander out the window, and notices a sudden heavy rain has settled in. He then realizes that his vintage motorbike is parked on the street, uncovered.

The boyfriend pops out of his seat and grabs his tub of vaseline.
The dad jumps out of his chair and yells out, "ALRIGHT, I'LL DO THE GODDAMNED DISHES!"
***
The Misunderstanding
Hi John,

This is Alan next door.  I am sorry buddy, but I have a confession to make to you.  I've been riddled with guilt these past few months and have been trying to pluck up the courage to tell you to your face, but I am at least now telling in text as I can’t live with myself a moment longer without you knowing.  The truth is, I have been sharing your wife, day and night when you're not around.  In fact, probably more than you. 

 I haven’t been getting it at home recently, but that's no excuse I know. The temptation was just too much. I can no longer live with the guilt and I hope you will accept my sincerest apologies and forgive me.  I promise that it won't happen again.  Please come up with a fee for usage, and I'll pay you.

 Regards, Alan.

 

The Actions:

 John, feeling insulted and betrayed, grabbed his gun, stomped next door and shot his neighbor dead.  He returned home where he poured himself a stiff drink and sat down on the sofa.  He took out his phone where he saw he had a subsequent message from his neighbor.

 

The Second Message:

 Hi John, 

This is Alan next door again.  Sorry about the slight typo on my last text.  I expect you worked it out anyway, but as I’m sure you noticed that my smart phone’s Autocorrect feature changed “Wi-Fi” to "Wife”.  Technology eh??  Hope you got a chuckle from that.

 Regards, Alan.

***
A young man walks into a bar
And sees a horse.

Young man: 'Why the long face?'

Horse: 'Women. The ones I like anyways.

Young man: 'Why? What's the problem? What kind of women do you like?'

Horse: 'I like my women like I like my coffee.'

Young Man: 'Ground up and in the freezer?'

Horse: 'N..What? No! Sweet and strong you freak.'

Two scientists walk in...

Horse: 'Hey guys, first one's on me. What'll it be?'

Scientist 2: 'We'll both have water thanks.'

Scientist 1 to Young Man: 'What's eating you?'

Young Man: 'I just found out my girlfriend's dad is a pharmacist.'

A dentist walks in. 

Dentist: 'Drinks all round. I'm just back from a great safari holiday.'

Horse: 'I hope you were just shooting with a camera.'

Dentist: 'Don't be Cecilly. Sorry, so silly. Bagged myself some real trophies. Check my facebook."

Just then a chicken pops its head round the door.

Chicken: 'Sorry. Has anyone seen a tomato family walking around here? Sorry to bother you. Sorry.'

Scientist 1: 'Sure. They were across the street about ten minutes ago heading north. If you hurry you'll ketchup.'

Chicken: 'Sorry. Thanks. Sorry again. I have to go now. Sorry.'

Scientist 2: 'What's his deal?'

Horse: 'He's Canadian. Good guy.'

A screeching sound comes from outside followed by the unmistakable sound of a bus hitting a chicken.

*In heaven

St Peter: 'Look chicken, it's been a busy century, I've been whizzing round trying to find priests and lawyers for some young couple, some idiot just got in, the devil nabbed our only engineer, and to top it off some nuns have just been washing various body parts in the holy bowl. Do you mind waiting?'

Chicken: 'Yeah, no. Super sorry about all that. I'll just head down these stairs and go to hell so you can have a better morning. Sorry again. B-bye.'

St.Peter : 'Thanks man.'

The chicken heads for the stairs...

St.Peter: 'Next. Name and manner of death.'

Next in line: 'Harambe. I dunno what happened man. I was trying hug this kid who tried to jump me and the next thing I know I'm stood behind that chicken and that guy who died in the refridgerator.'

St. Peter: 'Ok, let me just check your lie clock.....'


Edit: Wow! 5k upvotes and a gold! Inbox battered. Thanks.

A time traveller walks into a bar.
***
The Three Paddies Meet a Wizard
Paddy Englishman, Paddy Scotsman and Paddy Irishman are walking in the woods when they stumble across an old sex wizard down on his luck. "Wishes for a tenner!" shouts the wizard. "I'll give you anything you like, but I'm sick and tired of making knobs bigger, so don't ask!"

Without wasting a second, Paddy Englishman hands the wizard a ten pound note. "I want my wife to be ten times more adventurous in bed."

The sex wizard nods. "Uxor non inhibitoris! An easy one! It is done!"

Paddy Scotsman counts out nine pound coins and two 50 pence pieces. "My wife and I are happy enough, but I'm terrified of becoming a grandfather before I'm 50. I'd be obliged if you could fix it so my teenage daughters can't get pregnant before they're 25."

The sex wizard nods. "Filiae non fertilismus! Very wise! It is done!"

The sex wizard turns to Paddy Irishman, who has his hands planted firmly in his pockets and looks ready to move on. "No wish for you?"

"I'll save my tenner," says Paddy Irishman, with a grin. "These boys have me covered!"
***
No one believes seniors . . .
An elderly couple was celebrating their sixtieth anniversary. The couple had married as childhood sweethearts and had moved back to their old neighborhood after they retired. Holding hands, they walked back to their old school. It was not locked, so they entered, and found the old desk they'd shared, where Jerry had carved I love you, Sally.
 
On their way back home, a bag of money fell out of an armored car, practically landing at their feet. Sally quickly picked it up and, not sure what to do with it, they took it home. There, she counted the money - fifty thousand dollars!
 
Jerry said, “We've got to give it back.”
 
Sally said, “Finders keepers.” She put the money back in the bag and hid it in their attic.
 
The next day, two police officers were canvassing the neighborhood looking for the money, and knocked on their door. Pardon me, did either of you find a bag that fell out of an armored car yesterday?
 
Sally said, “No.”
 
Jerry said, “She’s lying. She hid it up in the attic.”
 
Sally said, “Don't believe him, he’s getting senile.”
 
The agents turned to Jerry and began to question him.  
 
One police officer asked Jerry to tell him the story from the beginning.
 
Jerry said, "Well, when Sally and I were walking home from school yesterday..."

The first police officer turned to his partner and said, “We’re outta here!”
***
A man is at the supermarket with his 7 year old son when they walk past the condoms
The boy asks: 'Daddy, what are those?', to which the man replies 'Those are condoms son'. 'What are they for?', asks the boy. His dad replies 'To, ehhm ah eh, protect you from diseases'. 
'Why do they sell them in packs of 3, 6 and 12?'. 
'Well, the packs of 3 are for 16 year olds. One for friday, one for saturday, and one for sunday.' 
'And the packs of 6?' 
'Those are for 21 year olds. 2 for friday, 2 for saturday and 2 for sunday.'
'And what are the packs of 12 for?'
'The packs of 12, my son, are for married men like me. One for January, one for February, one for March...'
***
Once upon a time, there were three kingdoms, all bordering on the same lake.
For centuries, these kingdoms had fought over an island in the middle of that lake. One day, they decided to have it out, once and for all.
The first kingdom was quite rich, and sent an army of 25 knights, each with three squires. The night before the battle, the knights jousted and cavorted as their squires polished armor, cooked food, and sharpened weapons. The second kingdom was not so wealthy, and sent only 10 knights, each with 2 squires. The night before the battle, the knights cavorted and sharpened their weapons as the squires polished armor and prepared dinner. The third kingdom was very poor, and only sent one elderly knight with his sole squire. The night before the battle, the knight sharpened his weapon, while the squire, using a looped rope, slung a pot high over the fire to cook while he prepared the knight's armor.
The next day, the battle began. All the knights of the first two kingdoms had cavorted a bit too much (one should never cavort while sharpening weapons and jousting) and could not fight. The squire of the third kingdom could not rouse the elderly knight in time for combat. So, in the absence of the knights, the squires fought.
The battle raged well into the late hours, but when the dust finally settled, a solitary figure limped from the carnage. The lone squire from the third kingdom dragged himself away, beaten, bloodied, but victorious.
And it just goes to prove, the squire of the high pot and noose is equal to the sum of the squires of the other two sides.


Credit goes to a friend who found it on tumblr
***
Hi Alan – It’s John from next door. I need to talk to you about
something I am very ashamed of and know you will probably be quite angry about. The last 3 months we have been sharing your wife. Not every day, but at least 3 times a week and my girlfriend found out yesterday and is making me tell you. I didn’t want to tell you face to face so decide to message you. Sorry buddy.

“Damn Straight it wont happen again” says Alan as he stares at the screen of his phone. With this, he goes to the bedroom, takes his gun and goes into the kitchen where his other half is preparing dinner. Without a word he shoots her twice in the head. 

As her lifeless body drops to the floor, Alan's phone receives another message: “John again from next door – stupid autocorrect, sure you saw the typo. Anyway we have our own router and broadband now, it wont happen again.

***
A man who had just died is delivered to a local mortuary....
 and he's wearing an expensive, expertly tailored black suit.
The mortician asks the deceased's wife how she would like the body dressed, pointing out that the man does look good in the black suit he is already wearing.
The widow, however, says that she always thought her husband looked his best in blue, and that she wants him in a blue suit. She gives the mortician a blank check and says, 'I don't care what it costs, but please have my husband in a blue suit for the viewing.'
The woman returns the next day and to her delight, she finds her husband dressed in a gorgeous blue suit with a subtle chalk stripe; the suit fits him perfectly.
She says to the mortician, 'Whatever this cost, I'm very satisfied.. You did an excellent job and I'm very grateful. How much did you spend?'
To her astonishment, the mortician presents her with the blank check, 'There's no charge.'
'No, really, I must compensate you for the cost of that exquisite blue suit,' she says.
'Honestly, ma'am,' the mortician says, 'it cost nothing. You see, a deceased gentleman of about your husband's size was brought in shortly after you left yesterday, and he was wearing an attractive blue suit. I asked his wife if she minded him going to his grave wearing a black suit instead, and she said it made no difference as long as he looked nice.'
'So I just switched the heads.'
***
A first-grade teacher, Ms. Brooks, was having trouble with one of her students...
A first-grade teacher, Ms. Brooks, was having trouble with one of her students. The teacher asked, "Harry, what's your problem?"
Harry answered, "I'm too smart for the 1st grade. My sister is in the 3rd grade and I'm smarter than she is! I think I should be in the 3rd grade too!"

Ms. Brooks had had enough. She took Harry to the principal's office.

While Harry waited in the outer office, the teacher explained to the principal what the situation was. The principal told Ms. Brooks he would give the boy a test. If he failed to answer any of his questions he was to go back to the 1st grade and behave. She agreed.

Harry was brought in and the conditions were explained to him and he agreed to take the test.

Principal: "What is 3 x 3?"
Harry: "9."

Principal: "What is 6 x 6?"

Harry: "36."

And so it went with every question the principal thought a 3rd grader should know.

The principal looks at Ms. Brooks and tells her, "I think Harry can go to the 3rd grade"

Ms. Brooks says to the principal, "Let me ask him some questions."
The principal and Harry both agreed.

Ms. Brooks asks, "What does a cow have four of that I have only two of?"

Harry, after a moment: "Legs."

Ms. Brooks: "What is in your pants that you have but I do not have?"

The principal wondered why would she ask such a question!

Harry replied: "Pockets."

Ms. Brooks: "What does a dog do that a man steps into?"

Harry: "Pants."

Ms. Brooks: What starts with a C, ends with a T, is hairy, oval, delicious and contains thin, whitish liquid?"

Harry: "Coconut."

The principal sat forward with his mouth hanging open.

Ms. Brooks: "What goes in hard and pink then comes out soft and sticky?"

The principal's eyes opened really wide and before he could stop the answer, Harry replied, "Bubble gum."

Ms. Brooks: "What does a man do standing up, a woman does sitting down and a dog does on three legs?"

Harry: "Shake hands."

The principal was trembling.

Ms. Brooks: "What word starts with an 'F' and ends in 'K' that means a lot of heat and excitement?"

Harry: "Firetruck."

The principal breathed a sigh of relief and told the teacher, "Put Harry in the fifth-grade, I got the last seven questions wrong.
***
Medical Miracles
A flat-chested young lady read an article in a magazine that stated Dr. Bumbutu in Africa could enlarge your breasts without surgery. So she decided to contact Dr. Bumbutu to see if he could help her.
 
Dr. Bumbutu advised her, 'Every day after your shower, rub your chest and say, 'Scooby doobie doobies, I want bigger boobies!'  She did this faithfully for several months, and to her utter amazement she grew a terrific D-cup rack!
 
One morning she was running late, got on the bus, and in a panic realized she had forgotten her morning ritual. Frightened she might lose her lovely boobs if she didn't recite the little rhyme, she stood right there in the middle aisle of the bus, closed her eyes, and said, 'Scooby doobie doobies, I want bigger boobies.'
 
A guy sitting nearby looked at her and asked ' Are you a patient of Dr Bumbutu's?'
 
Yes I am.  How did you know?'
 
He winked and whispered, 'Hickory dickory dock...'


***
The Fart
Dr. Epstein was a renowned physician who earned his medical degree in his hometown and then left for Manhattan. Soon he was invited to give a speech in his hometown. As he placed his papers on the lectern they slid off onto the floor and when he bent over to retrieve them, at precisely the wrong instant, he farted, and the microphone amplified it throughout the room. He was embarrassed but regained his composure to deliver his paper. As he concluded, he raced out the stage door, never to be seen in his hometown again. 

Decades later when his elderly mother was ill, he returned to visit her. He reserved a hotel room under a false name, Solomon Levy, and arrived under cover of darkness. The desk clerk asked him, "Is this your first visit to our city, Mr. Levy?"

Dr. Epstein replied, "Well, young man, no, it isn't. I grew up here but then I moved away." 

"Why haven't you visited?" asked the desk clerk.

"I did visit once, many years ago, but an embarrassing thing happened and since then I've been too ashamed to return."

The clerk consoled him. "Sir, while I don't have your life experience, one thing I have learned is that often what seems embarrassing to me isn't even remembered by others. I bet that's true of your incident too."

Dr. Epstein replied, "Son , I doubt that's the case with my incident." 

"Was it a long time ago?"

"Yes, many years."

The clerk asked, ‘Was it before or after the Epstein Fart?"

***
The priest and half a lemon
There was once a priest who went to see the world after taking his oath. After many years of wandering, he finally arrived in a small village in the middle of nowhere. The people there believed in the same religion as he did, but they had no church; they had to go to the nearest one which was in a small town 25 km's from there. The priest took the initiative, asked the Church for support, and with the help of the local men they built their own temple. From there on, he was celebrating the Sunday masses, joining together men and women in Holy Matrimony, and saying prayers at the funerals.

Many years passed by like that.

At the end of an ordinary mass, in early spring, on a chilly Sunday morning he was just guiding the people out of the church, was about to close the gates when an unknown man stepped into the churchyard.

With his dirty and torn clothes, he stood before the priest and said:

\- Priest, please be good and give me half a lemon! - the priest was a good man, and even though he thought the request was a bit strange, he went back to the rectory, took out a lemon, cut it in half, took it back to the man and gave it to him, who looked back to the priest with gratitude. However, the priest was curious. He asked:

\- Son, why do you need this half of a lemon? - with a fright on his face, and before the priest could have said a thing, he rushed out of the churchyard gate and took off.

A week later, around the same time, when the priest was leaving the church, he found himself in front of the same man in the churchyard. The man said:

\- Priest, please be good and give me half a lemon! - the priest was surprised by the appearance of the man and his strange request. Of course he was good, went back to the rectory, and brought the half lemon. Placed it in the stranger's hand and immediately he asked:

\- Here it is, my dear son, but please tell me why do you need this half a lemon? - the man was obviously frightened and immediately ran away but the priest was not sluggish either and ran after him. He wasn't in a very good condition, he has never run so much and so fast before so he was out of breath by the end of the village, almost fainted. He thought the strange man might appear again next week, and it would be nice if he could keep up with him, so he spent his week working on his cardio. It turned out to be a good idea, because as he thought, the stranger entered the churchyard on Sunday. The priest didn't even wait for the request, he was good, and brought the half lemon. He received these words from the man:

\- Thank you priest for being so good and giving me half a lemon.

\- Don't mention it son, -said the priest- but please tell me, what do you need it for?! - by the time he finished his sentence the man was already running, but the priest was close behind. They were running for a while and the priest was starting to feel exhausted when they arrived at a wide and swift river. The stranger without thinking threw himself into the river and swam across the river and disappeared on the other side. The priest didn't follow because he couldn't swim. He was annoyed when he got home. He spent the next week learning to swim at the swimming pool in the small town 25 km's away. He was anxiously waiting for the next Sunday; now he was sure that the weird fellow would visit again. On Sunday, as he was closing the church, the gate creaked, and entered the man:

\- Priest, please be good and give me half a lemon! - the priest was good, went back, put on his swimming trunks, his running shoes, grabbed half of the lemon and took it to the stranger:

\- Here it is, my son, but please tell me already, why do you need it? - the guy was terrified, rushed out the gate with the priest following. Reached the river, swam across, the priest right behind him. He kept running on the other side of the river and the priest was still on his tail. They kept running until they got to a tall tree on the verge of a deep ravine. The man climbed the tree with the agility of a cat, the priest not knowing how to climb a tree, stood on the ground. He was cursing everything as he walked back home. The following week the villagers watched as the priest in the garden of the church climbs trees, jumping back and forth, and generally behaving very strangely. The priest didn't care, he was exercising obsessively, preparing himself for the meeting. On Sunday before the mass, he put on his trunks and running shoes under his cassock. In fact, he was good and put half a lemon in his pocket in advance. The mass finished much earlier than usually, and he emptied the church as soon as possible so he could warm up. In the same exact time the mass should have ended, the strange man entered the churchyard.

\- Priest, please be good... - the priest was already handing him half of a lemon, and asked:

\- Son, why do you need it for God's sake? - the man ran away terrified, the priest followed him. They ran to the river, swam across, ran to the tree, climbed up. The priest almost catched the stranger when he grabbed a vine and swung to the other side of the ravine. The priest was about to have a stroke, but then he saw another vine. Whoop, he grabbed it and swung across. There, however, he encountered an unexpected obstacle: it was a plane graveyard and the man closed himself in one of the wreckages. The priest was raging as he walked around the wreckage several times, but he found no entrance except for the sealed door on the side of the plane; he had to open it somehow. He was furious but he went home. He spent every day at the village's locksmith and learned every possible way of opening a lock. On Sunday he held the mass in his swimming trunks, running shoes, on his back in a waterproof backpack was a crowbar, a cutting torch, a wrench and a drill, then he stood in front of the church and waited for the man. He was there on time.

\- Priest, please be good and give me half a lemon!

\- There you go, son - handing him the lemon, because he was good, but in the same time he grabbed the stranger's arm, pulled him close, and with obsession in his eyes, asked:

\- But what do you need it for?! - panic came over the man as he made his escape from the priest's hands and ran away, but the priest was very close behind. Racing to the river they quickly got across, running up the tree almost breaking their necks, one after the other swung across the ravine, the man barely managed to close the door of the wreckege in the priest's face. Little did he know that the priest would not stop there, because he grabbed his backpack and started working on the lock with his tools. In less than an hour the heavy door creaked open. Inside, the stranger was shivering in horror, he was afraid of the priest's fierce and triumphant look. The priest slowly strode up to the man, crouched down, and very quietly, with a friendly smile on his face, gently asked:

\- Son. You have been asking for half a lemon for the last few weeks. I'm very happy to give it to you, even in the future, I am only asking in return that you tell me: why do you need it?

\- All right, priest ... - came the answer in a trembling tone - I will answer your question, but please, be good, and do not tell anyone.

The priest was good, and never told anyone.
***
I Forget the Name
Two elderly men are conversing and drinking wine while their wives prepare dinner in the kitchen. As the discussion begins to dwindle, Tom and Norman decide to delve into their limited pop culture knowledge. 

"Well now, Tom," says Norman, "me and Carolyn tuned into one of those nightly talk shows the other day. Boy, was it a hoot!
But I can't seem to remember for the life of me what it was called."

'Here, describe it to me. Lets see if I can help," offers Tom.

"Well, he was a big ol' middle aged man," Norman starts, "and he had a whole lotta' cars. Ah! I got it now! His name was.. well, shoot. What was his name? It was a bird of some sort."

"A bird? Like a robin?"

"No no, a blue bird. What are those small blue birds, Tom?"

"A bluejay?" suggests Tom.

"Yeah! Jay was his name. Jay Leno. Y'all should try him out sometime." 

"Well, you know what Norm. We went and saw ourselves a movie the other night, but darned if I've already forgot the name."

"Come now, Tom, why don't you run it past me? Maybe I'll do some good."

"Yeah, sure," says Tom. "Well... shit, let me see... Okay. What's the name of that flower, a common flower."

"A dandelion?" suggests Norman.

"No no. No it's a red one."

"You mean a tulip?"

"Naw come now, Norm. It's red and gots thorns all over it."

"That'd be a rose, then."

"A rose! Yeah, that's what it was, a rose!" exclaims Tom.

He turns over his shoulder and cries "HEY ROSE, WHAT WAS THE NAME OF THAT MOVIE WE SAW THE OTHER NIGHT??"
***
A black guy dies & finds himself at the Pearly Gates with St. Peter....
SP: Before I allow you to enter Heaven, you must tell me something truly extraordinary about your life.

BG: Sheeet, no problem. I was a star NFL QB for 15 years!

SP: One of many. What else?

BG: I have 2 Super Bowl rings & 3 MVP trophys!

SP: These things do not impress me. Uniqueness!

BG: Damn....uh....well, I once made love to a white woman on a park bench during a Ku Klux Klan rally. 

SP: WOW! Really? Now THAT is extraordinary! When did this happen?

BG: About 15 minutes ago.
***
Brewery managers go to a bar
In Münchens Oktoberfest, there was a meeting with international brewery  managers.  After the meeting they decided to go to have a drink at a local Bierstube, well known for their international selection of beers.  Coronas head manager sat first on the bar and said:
- Por favor, Senor, could i have a bottle of Corona, the best beer in the world.
The bartender got a bottle, opened it and poured it to a glass.
Next up was Budweisers head manager, who ordered:
- A can of the king of American beers, Budweiser, Thank you.
The bartender gave him a can and a glass.
Then it was Guinness' head managers turn. He ordered:
- Could i get a large coke with ice, please.
The bartender gave him the coke while the two other brewery managers watched stunned.  They had to ask:
- Why didn't you order Guinness?
The Guinness' head manager answered:
- I thought that if you fellows don't want to drink beer, I won't drink it either.  
***
There were two buddies out walking their dogs...
   One with a Doberman pinscher and the other with a Chihuahua, when they smelled something delicious coming from a nearby restaurant.   
  
   The guy with the Doberman says to his friend, "Let's go over to that restaurant and get something to eat." The guy with the Chihuahua says, "We can't go in there. We've got dogs with us."  
  
   The buddy with the Doberman says, "Just follow my lead." He puts on a pair of dark glasses and walks into the restaurant, when the restaurant owner comes up and says, "Sorry pal, no pets allowed."  
  
  The man with the Doberman replies, "You don't understand. This is my Seeing Eye dog."  
  
   The owner , skeptical, "A Doberman pinscher?"  
  
   The Dobermans master says, "Yes, they're using them now- they're very good and they protect me from robbers, too." The owner says, "Come on in."  
  
   When the man with the Chihuahua sees this, he puts on a pair of dark glasses and starts to walk in. Once again the restaurant owner says , " Sorry, pal, no pets allowed."  
  
   The guy with the Chihuahua says, "You don't understand. This is my Seeing Eye dog."  
  
   "A Chihuahua?" Says the owner.  
  
   The man with the dog replies,  
  
   "A Chihuahua? They gave me a fucking Chihuahua?!
***
2 Guys At A Urinal NSFW
Bob goes into the public restroom and sees this guy standing next to the urinal. The guy has no arms. As Bob's standing there, taking care of business, he wonders to himself how the poor wretch is going to take a leak.

Bob finishes and starts to leave when the man asks Bob to help him out. Being a kind soul, Bob says, "Ah, OK, sure, I'll help you." The man asks, "Can you unzip my zipper?" Bob says, "OK." 

Then the man says, "Can you pull it out for me?" Bob replies, "Uh, yeah, OK."

Bob pulls it out and it has all kinds of mold and red bumps, with hair clumps, rashes, moles, scabs, scars, and reeks something awful. Then the guy asks Bob to point it for him, and Bob points for him. Bob then shakes it, puts it back in and zips it up. The guy tells Bob, "Thanks, man, I really appreciate it." Bob says, "No problem, but what the hell's wrong with your penis?" The guy pulls his arms out of his shirt and says, "I don't know, but I ain't touching it."
***
Guys night out
The  other  night  I  was  invited out  for a  night  with  the 'guys.'

I  told  my  wife  that  I would  be  home  by  midnight, 'I promise!' 

Well,  the  hours  passed  and the  beers went  down way too  easily.

Around 3 a.m., a  bit  loaded,  I headed  for  home.
 
Just  as I  got  in  the  door,  the cuckoo  clock  in  the  hallway started  up  and  cuckooed 3 times. 

Quickly,  realizing the  wife would  probably  wake  up,  I  cuckooed  another  9  times. 

I  was  really  proud of  myself for  coming  up  with  such  a quick-witted  solution,  in order to  escape a  possible  conflict with  her. 

(Even when drunk as a skunk.... 3 cuckoos plus 9 cuckoos totals = 12 cuckoos = MIDNIGHT!) 


The  next  morning my  wife asked  me what  time  I  got  in, I told  her 'MIDNIGHT'.

She didn't  seem  pissed  off in the  least. 

Whew,  I got  away  with  that one!  Then she  said 'We  need  a new  cuckoo  clock.'
 
When I  asked  her  why, she said, 'Well,  last  night  our clock cuckooed  three  times,  then said  'oh  shit,'  Cuckooed  4 more  times,  cleared  its  throat, cuckooed  another  three  times, giggled,  cuckooed  twice  more, and  then  tripped  over  the coffee  table  and  farted.😝😜
***
An Englishman, Irishman and Scotsman...
An Englishman, Irishman and Scotsman were sitting in a bar in Sydney, Australia.

"The view is fantastic, the beer excellent and the food exceptional," said the Scotsman, "but I still prefer the pubs back home. Why in Glasgow, there's a little bar called McTavish's. The landlord there goes out of his way for the locals so much that when you buy four drinks, he'll buy the fifth drink for you."

"Well," said the Englishman, "at my local, the Red Lion, the barman there will buy you your third drink after you buy the first two."

"Ahhh, that's nothin'," said the Irishman. "Back home in Dublin there's Ryan's Bar. Now, the moment you set foot in the place they'll buy you a drink, then another, all the drinks you'd like. Then, when you've had enough drink, they'll take you upstairs and see that you get laid - ALL on the house!"

The Englishman and Scotsman immediately pour scorn on the Irishman's claims, but he swears every word is true.
"Well," said the Englishman, "did this actually happen to you?"
"Not myself personally, no," said the Irishman, "but it did happen to me sister."
***
When Trump visited the White House before his presidency...
He asked then president Obama how he managed to run two successful terms.

"Simple", Obama replied, "Just get an intelligent wife"

"How do I know my wife is intelligent?" Trump asked.

"Just ask her intelligent questions and if she answers correctly, then you know she is intelligent".  Obama then called Michelle and asked "Darling, your parents have a child, the child is neither your sister nor your brother, who is the child?"

"The child is certainly me", Michelle replied. 

"You see!", Obama told Trump, "that is how I know my wife is intelligent."

On return to his home, Trump called Melania and asked her, "Darling, your parents have a child, the child is neither your sister nor your brother, who is the child?". After serious thinking and scratching her head, Melania is unable to get the answer, she tells Trump to give her some time to think. She goes around asking all her friends but she is unable to get the answer. At the washrooms, she meets a cleaner and asks her "Your parents have a child, the child is neither your sister nor your brother, who is the child? "Simple, the cleaner replies, the child is me".

Amused with herself, Melania walks  to the husband and says, "I now know the answer, the child is our cleaner!"

"WRONG!" Trump yells at Melania, "the child is not our cleaner, the child is Michelle Obama!"
***
A woman brought a very limp duck into a veterinary surgeon....
.....As she laid her pet on the table, the vet pulled out his
stethoscope and listened to the bird's chest.

After a moment or two, the vet
shook his head and sadly said, "I'm sorry, your duck, Cuddles,
has passed away."

The distressed woman wailed,
"Are you sure?"
"Yes, I am sure. Your duck is dead," replied
the vet..

"How can you be so sure?" she
protested. "I mean you haven't done any testing on him or anything. He might just be in a coma or
something."

The vet rolled his eyes, turned
around and left the room. He returned a few minutes later
with a black Labrador Retriever. As the duck's owner looked on
in amazement, the dog stood on his hind legs, put his
front paws on the examination table and sniffed the duck from
top to bottom. He then looked up at the vet with sad eyes and
shook his head.

The vet patted the dog on the
head and took it out of the room. A few minutes later he
returned with a cat. The cat jumped on the table and also
delicately sniffed the bird from head to foot. The cat sat
back on its haunches, shook its head, meowed softly and
strolled out of the room.

The vet looked at the
woman and said, "I'm sorry, but as I said, this is most
definitely, 100% certifiably, a dead duck."

The vet turned to his computer terminal, hit a few keys and
produced a bill, which he handed to the woman..

The duck's owner, still in shock, took the bill. "$150!" she
cried, "$150 just to tell me my duck is dead!"

The vet shrugged, "I'm sorry. If you had just taken my word for it,
the bill would have been $20, but with the Lab Report and the
Cat Scan, it's now $150."
***
My Biology Professor told me this one
When Gandhi was studying law at the University College of London, a white professor, whose last name was Peters, disliked him intensely and always displayed prejudice and animosity towards him.
Also, because Gandhi never lowered his head when addressing him , as he expected.... there were always "arguments" and confrontations.

 

One day, Mr. Peters was having lunch at the dining room of the University, and Gandhi came along with his tray and sat next to the professor.  The professor said, "Mr Gandhi, you do not understand.  A pig and a bird do not sit together to eat." 
Gandhi looked at him as a parent would a rude child and calmly replied, "You do not worry professor.  I'll fly away," and he went and sat at another table. 
 
Mr. Peters, reddened with rage, decided to take revenge on the next test paper, but Gandhi responded brilliantly to all questions.  Mr. Peters, unhappy and frustrated, asked him the following question. "Mr Gandhi, if you were walking down the street and found a package, and within was a bag of wisdom and another bag with a lot of money, which one would you take?"

 

Without hesitating, Gandhi responded, "The one with the money, of course."

 

Mr. Peters , smiling sarcastically said, "I, in your place, would have taken the wisdom, don't you think?" 
 
Gandhi shrugged  indifferently and responded, "Each one takes what he doesn't have."
 
Mr. Peters, by this time was fit to be tied.  So great was his anger that he wrote on Gandhi's exam sheet the word "idiot" and gave it to Gandhi.    Gandhi took the exam sheet and sat down at his desk trying very hard to remain calm while he contemplated his next move.

 

A few minutes later, Gandhi got up, went to the professor and said to him in a dignified but sarcastically polite tone, "Mr. Peters, you signed the sheet, but you did not give me the grade."

***
A day before his 15th birthday
the son of a wealthy family was asked by his father, "Well my son, what would you like for your birthday?"

The son hesitated a moment and his father's thoughts leapt ahead to a new computer and similar things. However, his son had had a new computer only recently and could have a new one any time he wished.

Finally, the son said, "Father, I have everything a boy could wish for, but there is one thing I would really like. I would love to have a pink ping pong ball."

The father was rather astonished at this wish, but said, "If it is a pink ping pong ball that you want, a pink ping pong ball you shall have."

And so, the next day, the son was given as his bithday present a pink ping pong ball.

The boy took the ball to his room and the next morning the pink ping pong ball was gone. The father was mildly surprised but decided not to say anything. The pink ping pong ball, however, was never seen again.

The next year, a day before his 16th birthday, the father asked his son what he would like for his birthday.

"Father," replied the son, "I have everything a boy could possibly wish for, but there is one thing I would really, really like. I would love to have a tenpack of pink ping pong balls."

The father was more surprised than the year before, but kept his curiosity at bay, for he knew that his son had a right for privacy. he said therefore, "If it is a tenpack of pink ping pong balls that you want, a tenpack of pink ping pong balls you shall have."

And so, the next day, the son was given as his birthday present a tenpack of pink ping pong balls.

The boy took the tenpack of balls to his room and the next morning, not a single ball remained, merely the empty husk of the tenpack. The father wondered where ten pink ping pong balls might disappear to, but decided not to say anything. The pink ping pong balls, however, were never seen again.

The next year, a day before his 17th birthday, the son was asked by his father what he would like for his birthday.

"Father," said the son to this, "I have everything a boy could wish for, but one thing would make my happiness complete. I would dearly want a carton of pink ping pong balls."

The father was beyond surprise, but decided to make sure he had not misheard. "A carton of pink ping pong balls?"

"A carton of pink ping pong balls," the boy confirmed.

"I can't understand your fascination with pink ping pong balls," said the father, "but if it is a carton of pink ping pong balls that you want, it is a carton of pink ping pong balls that you shall have." And so, the next day, the boy was given as his birthday present a carton of pink ping pong balls.

The boy was delighted and took the carton to his room. The next day, miraculously (as if by magic, even) the pink ping pong balls had all disappeared.

"Dear son," said the father, "I must ask now, what do you do with all those pink ping pong balls?"

The son, however, was reluctant to tell him. "Please humour me, dear father."

The carton of pink ping pong balls, however, was never seen again. The next year, it was clear that the son would get a car, but the father felt that, perhaps, his son also had some other wish apart from the obvious. So, one day before the son's 18th birthday, the father asked him whether he had a special wish for his birthday. "Dearest father," the son started, "I have everything a young man could possibly want, but there is one craving in me. I would, more than anything, want a warehouse full of pink ping pong balls." One of these years, his father thought, I should get to the bottom of this. However, he decided to humour his son's wish. At least he had been wise enough to buy shares in a pink ping pong ball factory. The next day, the son was given the address of a warehouse where all his new pink ping pong balls were stored. The son was delighted and decided to spend the next night in the warehouse rather than at home.

The following morning, the son stepped out of the warehouse, but it seemed to be empty otherwise. The father had a closer look and indeed, apart from empty cardboard boxes, nothing was left inside the warehouse. No pink ping pong balls were left.

The following year, one day before the son's 19th birthday, the father braced himself for another warehouse of pink ping pong balls. He asked his son what his deepest desire was and he had not been entirely wrong.

"Father, you have made me very happy these last years and this year I ask of you a shipload of pink ping pong balls if at all possible." It was possible, if only because the father had by now bought each and every factory of pink ping pong balls in the country. The next day, the father took his son to the harbour and showed him a huge tanker and told his son that there were millions, billions, trillions of pink ping pong balls in there.

"Father," the son said, "You've made me very happy yet again." That night, the son spent on board the tanker.

The next morning, not a single of the pink ping pong balls could be found, but the son was happy.

A few days before his 20th birthday, however, the son had a terrible road accident and was taken to the hospital.

His father visited the young man in hospital. "My dear son! Can I bring you anything to make you feel better?"

Weakly, the son sat up in bed. "Father, dearest father, grant me this wish; just one tenpack of pink ping pong balls."

The father held his son's hand tightly. "Whatever you wish my son, but I have to give you one condition. Even if it may be embarrassing, I must know what you did with all those pink ping pong balls."

"Very well, father, but please indulge me first. I will tell you whatever you wish to know after you have given me the ten pink ping pong balls."

The father thought that was fair enough and the next day brought his son the ten asked for pink ping pong balls. The son smiled weakly but seemed too weak to talk.

"Son, I leave these pink ping pong balls with you and shall come back tomorrow to ask of you what you have done with all those pink ping pong balls."

The son nodded weakly.

The next day, less than surprisingly, no pink ping pong balls could be found in the son's hospital room.

"Now, my dearest son, apple of my eye, treasure of my life, please tell me what you did with all those pink ping pong balls," the father requested.

The son nodded and the father gripped his hand tighter.

"I-" the son started and sat up a bit, swallowing with a dry mouth.

"I- I-"

Then he died.
***
Nun Shall Pass
The waiting line to get into heaven is managed by St. Peter. 
A busload of Nuns die and are in line. 

The first nun goes to St. Peter and he says 
“OK I have to ask, have you ever seen a penis?” 

The nun replies, “I saw one once.” 

St. Peter said, “Well, it’s OK, just wash your eyes with this 
holy water.”So she did and POOF she went to Heaven.

The second nun came up and was asked the same thing. 
She replied, “Well I touched one once...” 

St. Peter told her “ Well, it’s OK, just wash your hands in this
 holy water.” So she did and POOF she too went to Heaven. 

Suddenly, a nun near the back of the line pushed her way to 
the front of the line. St. Peter asked, “What are you doing?!” 

The nun who cut in line responded, “I just wanted to wash my 
mouth before Sister Anna put her ass in it.” 
***
You're just like Brian...
A man walked out to the street and caught a taxi just going by. He got into the taxi, and the cabbie said, "Perfect timing. You're just like Brian"
Passenger: "Who?"
Cabbie: "Brian Sullivan. He's a guy who did everything right all the time. Like my coming along when you needed a cab, things happen like that to Brian Sullivan, every single time."
Passenger: "There are always a few clouds over everybody."
Cabbie: "Not Brian Sullivan.. He was a terrific athlete. He could have won the Grand Slam at tennis. He could golf with the pros. He sang like an opera baritone and danced like a Broadway star and you should have heard him play the piano. He was an amazing guy."
Passenger: "Sounds like he was something really special."
Cabbie: "There's more. He had a memory like a computer. He remembered everybody's birthday. He knew all about wine, which foods to order and which fork to eat them with. He could fix anything. Not like me. I change a fuse, and the whole street blacks out. But Brian Sullivan, he could do everything right."
Passenger: "Wow. Some guy then."
Cabbie: "He always knew the quickest way to go in traffic and avoid traffic jams. Not like me, I always seem to get stuck in them. But Brian, he never made a mistake, and he really knew how to treat a woman and make her feel good. He would never answer her back even if she was in the wrong; and his clothing was always immaculate, shoes highly polished too. He was the perfect man! He never made a mistake. No one could ever measure up to Brian Sullivan."
Passenger: "An amazing fellow. How did you meet him?"
Cabbie: "Well, I never actually met Brian. He died. I'm married to his widow."
***
The best situation set-up I've ever heard in real life..
My army platoon was training a decade ago when this happened, I still laugh about it today.  I'll not use names, just ranks.

We had just finished a mission and field maintenance and had about an hour of down-time before our next briefing, so the whole platoon was in a tent sitting on cots in a circle just bullshitting. One of the sergeants, a particularly vulgar guy, starts telling some nasty and offensive jokes which starts the whole platoon off on a spree of similar jokes.  We had a Lieutenant, my LT,  who was not a fan of these kinds of jokes and was getting aggravated as each joke began to get more and more vulgar.  Every joke we knew from blonde to women to racist to dead baby jokes and he would openly display his dislike for these jokes with comments like, "that's not funny," or, "that's just wrong."  Eventually, he had hit his limit right after a PFC told a holocaust joke, saying, "why did Hitler really kill himself?"  One of the other sergeants asked, "why?"  The private responded with, "because of the gas bill."  At this point, the LT was very disturbed and stated, "do you know how horrible that is?  Millions of people died in camps and you are laughing about being gassed?"  One of the other privates who hadn't done much talking immediately says to the LT, "yeah sir, my grandfather died in a concentration camp."  Everyone kind of gets quiet because we weren't sure really what to say, the LT looks at him and puts a hand on his shoulder and says, "I'm so terribly sorry for how insensitive everyone was being towards you, I sincerely apologize for the whole platoon."  Without missing a beat in an amazingly deadpan poker face, the private looks at my LT and says, "the drunk bastard fell out of a guardtower."  The entire platoon was falling out of cots, rolling on the floor laughing to the point of crying at that magnificent set-up.  The LT just stands up, says "watch my cot," and walks out of the tent.  The laughter must have continued for about 5 minutes.

The LT eventually came around and understood, he's going to be around soldiers and these jokes will be told.  I'm sure the "drunk bastard" line for that joke has been used, but in that situation, it was absolutely hilarious.
***
The Gorilla and the Redneck
A small zoo in Georgia obtained a very rare species of gorilla. Within a few weeks the gorilla, a female, became impossible to handle. Upon examination, the veterinarian determined the gorilla was in heat, and her aggressive behavior could only be relieved with sexual interaction with a male counterpart. To make matters worse, there was no male gorilla available. 

After considering nearly all possible options, the Zoo Keeper thought of Bobby Lee Walton, a redneck part-time worker responsible for cleaning the animal cages.  Bobby Lee, a very strong physical man, had little sense but was always bragging about his honky tonk women. The Zoo Keeper thought they might have a solution. Bobby Lee was approached with a proposition. Would he be willing to mate with the gorilla for $500.00? 

Bobby Lee showed some interest, but said he would have to think the matter over carefully. The following day, he announced that he would accept their offer, but only under four conditions: 

"First", Bobby Lee said, "I ain't gonna kiss her on the lips." The Keeper quickly agreed to this condition. 

"Second", he said, "you can't never tell no one about this, and I mean no one." The keeper again readily agreed to this condition. 

"Third", Bobby Lee said, "In the event that there are offspring, I want all the children raised Southern Baptist." Once again it was agreed. 

And last," Bobby Lee said, "I'm gonna need another week to come up with the $500.00." 
***
One day, a priest decides to take a walk to the pier near his church...
He looks around and finally stops to watch a fisherman load his boat. The fisherman notices, and asks the priest if he would like to join him for a couple of hours. The priest agrees. The fisherman asks if the priest has ever fished before; the priest says no. He baits the hook for him and says, "Give it a shot, father."

After a few minutes, the priest hooks a big fish and struggles to get it in the boat. The fisherman says, "Whoa, what a big sonofabitch!"

The priest says, "Ah, please sir, can you mind your language?"

The fisherman responds (thinking quickly), "I'm sorry father, but that's what this fish is called---a sonofabitch!"

"Oh, I'm sorry," says the priest. "I didn't know."

After the trip, the priest brings the fish to the church and spots the bishop. "Eminence, look at this big sonofabitch!"

"Please father," says the bishop. "Mind your language, this is a house of God."

"No, you don't understand," says the priest. "That's what this fish is called, and I caught it. I caught this sonofabitch!"

"Hmmm," says the bishop. "You know, I could clean this sonofabitch and we could have it for dinner."

So the bishop takes the fish and cleans it, and brings it to Mother Superior at the convent.

"Mother Superior, could you cook this sonofabitch for our dinner tonight with the Pope?"

"My lord, what language!" says the mother.

"No, sister," says the bishop. "That's what the fish is called---a sonofabitch! Father caught it, I cleaned it, and we'd like you to cook it"

"Hmmm," replies Mother Superior. "Yes, I'll cook that sonofabitch tonight."

While the Pope is over for dinner that evening he remarks that the fish is superb. He asks where they got it.

"I caught the sonofabitch!" says the priest.

"And I cleaned the sonofabitch!" says the bishop.

"And I cooked the sonofabitch!" says Mother Superior.

The Pope stares at them for a minute with a steely gaze, but then takes off his hat, puts his feet up on the table, and says, "You know, you fuckers are all right."
***
A farmer named Clyde had a car accident.
In court, the trucking company's lawyer was questioning Clyde. "Didn't you say, at the moment of the accident, 'I'm fine.'" asked the lawyer?

Clyde responded, "Well, I'll tell you what happened. I had just loaded my favorite mule, Bessie, into the..."

"I did not ask you for any details", the lawyer interrupted. "Just answer the question. Did you not say, at the scene of the accident, 'I'm fine?'"

Clyde said, "Well, I had  just got Bessie into the trailer and I was driving  down the road." 

The lawyer interrupted again and said "Judge, I'm trying to establish the fact that, at the scene of the accident, this man told the highway patrolman on the scene that he was just fine. Now several weeks after the accident he is trying to sue my client. I believe he is a fraud. Please tell him to simply answer the question."

By this time the judge was fairly interested in Clyde's answer and said to the lawyer "I'd like to hear what he has to say about his favorite mule, Bessie."

Clyde thanked the judge and proceeded.

"Well as I was saying, I had just loaded Bessie, my favorite mule, into the trailer and was driving down the highway when this huge semi-truck and trailer ran the stop sign and smacked my truck right in the side.  I was thrown into one ditch and Bessie was thrown into the other. I was hurting real bad and didn't want to move. However, I could hear old Bessie moaning and groaning. I knew she was in terrible shape just by her groans.

When the highway patrolman came on the scene he could hear Bessie moaning and groaning so he went over to her. After he looked at her and saw her near fatal condition, he took out his gun and shot her between the eyes.

Then the patrolman came across the road, gun still in hand, looked at me and said, 'how are you feeling?'

Now what the fuck would you say?"

Edit: wow not only is this my first post over 100 but it's front page and some kind hearted financier hath gilded this lowly pleb. Thank you all for being such an awesome community! Now move along. Back to your dickbutts and spaghetti. Nothing to see here. 
***
One Marine is better than...
A large group of Isis fighters in Iraq are moving down a road when they hear a voice call from behind a sand dune: 
"One Marine is better than ten Isis fighters". 

The Isis commander quickly orders 10 of best men over the dune where a gun battle breaks out and continues for a few minutes, then silence. 

The voice once again calls out: "One Marine is better than one hundred Isis 'S.O.B.'s'". 

Furious, the Isis commander sends his next best 100 troops over the dune and instantly a huge gun fight commences. 
After 10 minutes of battle, again silence. 

The voice calls out again: "One Marine is better than a thousand Isis fighters." The enraged Isis commander musters 1,000 fighters and sends them to the other side of the dune. Rifle fire, machine guns, grenades, rockets and cannon fire ring out as a terrible fight is fought  ...  then silence. 

Eventually, one badly wounded Isis fighter crawls back over the dune and with his dying words tells his commander, "Don't send any more men ... it's a trap. There's two of them." 
***
Two Italian men get on a bus...
They sit down and engage in an animated conversation. The lady sitting behind them ignores them at first, but her attention is galvanized when she hears one of the men say the following:

 "Emma come first. Den I come. Den two asses come together. I come once-a-more.  Two asses, they come together again. I come again and pee twice. Then I come one lasta time." 

"You foul-mouthed swine," retorted the lady indignantly. "In this country we don't talk about our sex lives in public!" 

"Hey, coola down lady," said the man. "Who talkin' abouta sexa? I'm a justa tellin' my frienda how to spella 
'Mississippi'." 




***
A Calculus joke
Verbatim from what my professor just showed in one of my engineering classes: 

e^x and a constant are walking down the street together when the constant sees a differential operator coming their way. He starts to run away, and e^x asks "Why are you running away?" The constant answers, "That's a differential operator. If it acts on me, I'll disappear." e^x says "I'm e^x, I don't have anything to worry about," and keeps walking. When he reaches the differential operator, he says "Hi, I'm e^x."

The differential operator responds, "Hi, I'm d/dy."
***
Heaven or Hell ....
While walking down the street one day a corrupt Senator (that may be redundant) was tragically hit by a car and died.

His soul arrives in heaven and is met by St. Peter at the entrance.

"Welcome to heaven," says St.. Peter. "Before you settle in, it seems there is a problem. We seldom see a high official around these parts, you see, so we're not sure what to do with you."

"No problem, just let me in," says the Senator.

"Well, I'd like to, but I have orders from the higher ups. What we'll do is have you spend one day in hell and one in heaven. Then you can choose where to spend eternity."

"Really? I've made up my mind. I want to be in heaven," says the Senator.

"I'm sorry, but we have our rules."

And with that, St. Peter escorts him to the elevator and he goes down, down, down to hell.

The doors open and he finds himself in the middle of a green golf course.

In the distance is a clubhouse and standing in front of it are all his friends and other politicians who had worked with him.

Everyone is very happy and in evening dress. They run to greet him, shake his hand, and reminisce about the good times they had while getting rich at the expense of the people.

They played a friendly game of golf and then dine on lobster, caviar and the finest champagne.

Also present is the devil, who really is a very friendly guy who is having a good time dancing and telling jokes.

They are all having such a good time that before the Senator realizes it, it is time to go.

Everyone gives him a hearty farewell and waves while the elevator rises.

The elevator goes up, up, up and the door reopens in heaven where St. Peter is waiting for him, "Now it's time to visit heaven.”

So, 24 hours passed with the Senator joining a group of contented souls moving from cloud to cloud, playing the harp and singing. They have a good time and before he realizes it, the 24 hours have gone by and St. Peter returns.

"Well, then, you've spent a day in hell and another in heaven. Now choose your eternity."

The Senator reflects for a minute, then he answers: "Well, I would never have said it before, I mean heaven has been delightful, but I think I would be better off in hell."

So St. Peter escorts him to the elevator and he goes down, down, down to hell...

Now the doors of the elevator open and he's in the middle of a barren land covered with waste and garbage. He sees all his friends, dressed in rags, picking up the trash and putting it in black bags as more trash falls to the ground.

The devil comes over to him and puts his arm around his shoulders.

"I don't understand," stammers the Senator. "Yesterday I was here and there was a golf course and clubhouse, and we ate lobster and caviar, drank champagne, and danced and had a great time. Now there's just a wasteland full of garbage and my friends look miserable. What happened?"

The devil smiles at him and says,

"Yesterday we were campaigning,

Today, you voted.."

***
A frog goes into a bank...
A frog goes into a bank and approaches the teller. He can see from her nameplate that her name is Patricia Whack.

"Miss Whack, I'd like to get a $10000 loan to take a holiday."

Patty looks at the frog in disbelief and asks his name. The frog says his name is Kermit Jagger, his dad is Mick Jagger, and that it's OK, he knows the bank manager. Patty explains that he will need to secure the loan with some collateral.

The frog says, "Sure. I have this," and produces a tiny porcelain elephant, about half an inch tall - bright pink and perfectly formed.

Very confused, Patty explains that she'll have to consult with the bank manager and disappears into a back office. She finds the manager and says, "There's a frog called Kermit Jagger out there who claims to know you and wants to borrow $10000, and he wants to use this as collateral."

She holds up the tiny pink elephant.

"I mean, what in the world is this?"

The bank manager looks back at her and says, "It's a knick-knack, Patty Whack, give the frog a loan. His old man's a Rolling Stone."
***
A politician dies...
And ends up standing in front of the pearly gates. Saint Peter looks at him for a second, flicks through his book, and finds his name.

"So, you're a politician..." "Well, yes, is that a problem?" "Oh no, no problem. But we've recently adopted a new system for people in your line of work, and unfortunately you will have to spend a day in Hell. After that however, you're free to choose where you want to spend eternity!"

"Wait, I have to spend a day in Hell??" says the politician. "Them's the rules" Says St Peter, clicks his fingers, and WOOMPH, the guy dissapears...
And awakes, curled up with his hands over his eyes, knowing he's in Hell. Cautiously, he listens for the screams, sniffs the air for brimstone, and finds... Nothing. Just the smell of, is that fabric softener? And cut grass, this can't be right?

"Open your eyes!" says a voice. "C'mon, wakey wakey, we've only got 24 hours!". Nervously, he uncovers his eyes, looks around, and sees he's in a hotel room. A nice one too. Wait, this is a penthouse suite... And there's a smiling man in a suit, holding a martini. "Who are you??" The politician asks. "Well, I'm Satan!" says the man, handing him the drink and helping him to his feet. "Welcome to Hell!" "Wait, this is Hell? But... Where's all the pain and suffering?" he asks. Satan throws him a wink. "Oh, we've been a bit mis-represented over the years, it's a long story. Anyway, this is your room! The minibar is of course free, as is the room service, there's extra towels next to the hot-tub, and if you need anything, just call reception. But enough of this! It's a beautiful day, and if you'd care to look outside..." Slightly stunned by the opulent surroundings, the man wanders over to the floor-to-ceiling windows through which the sun is glowing, looks far down, and sees a group of people cheering and waving at him from a golf course. "It's one of 5 pro-level courses on site, and there's another 6 just a few minutes drive out past the beach and harbour!" says Satan, answering his unasked question. So they head down in the lift, walk out through the glittering lobby where everyone waves and welcomes the man, as Satan signs autographs and cherrily talks shop with the laughing staff. And as he walks out, he sees the group on the golf course are made up of every one of his old friends, people he's admired for years but never met or worked with, and people whose work he's admired but died long before his career started. And out of the middle of this group walks his wife, with a massive smile and the body she had when she was 20, who throws her arms around him and plants a delicate kiss on his cheek. Everyone cheers and applauds, and as they slap him on the back and trade jokes, his worst enemy arrives, as a 2 foot tall goblin-esque caddy. He spends the day in the bright sunshine on the course, having the time of his life laughing at jokes and carrying important discussions, putting the world to rights with his friends while holding his delighted wife next to him as she gazes lovingly at him. Later, they return to the hotel for dinner and have an enormous meal, perfectly cooked, which descends into a food-fight when someone accidentally throws a bread roll at the next table (where Ghandi is having a game of truth-or-dare with Marylin Monroe). As everyone is falling about laughing and flinging breadsticks at each other, his wife whispers in his ear... And they return to their penthouse suite, and spend the rest of the night making love like they did on their honeymoon. After 6 hours of intense passion, the man falls deep into the 100% Egyptian cotton pillows, and falls into a deep and happy sleep...
And is woken up by St Peter. "So, that was Hell. Wasn't what you were expecting, I bet?" "No sir!" says the man. "So then" says St Peter "you can make your choice. It's Hell, which you saw, or Heaven, which has choral singing, talking to God, white robes, and so on". "Well... I know this sounds strange, but on balance, I think I'd prefer Hell" says the politician. "Not a problem, we totally understand! Enjoy!" Says St Peter, and clicks his fingers again.

The man wakes up in total darkness, the stench of ammonia filling the air and distant screams the only noise. As he adjusts, he can see the only light is from belches of flame far away, illuminating the ragged remains of people being tortured or burning in a sulphurous ocean. A sudden bolt of lightning reveals Satan next to him, wearing the same suit as before and grinning, holding a soldering iron in one hand and a coil of razor-wire in the other. "What's this??" He cries. "Where's the hotel?? Where's my wife??? Where's the minibar, the golf-courses, the pool, the restaurant, the free drinks and the sunshine???"

"Ah", says Satan. "You see, yesterday, we were campaigning. But today, you voted..."
***
Little Johnny and the neighbor
Little Johnny is in his room when his mother enters.

"Johnny," she said, "Tonight we're going to the neighbor's house for dinner. They've just had a baby and we're going to have dinner and then see the newborn."

"Okay, mommy," Little Johnny replied.

"Now listen," said his mother, "The baby was born without ears. I don't want you making and jokes about ears or missing ears or not hearing things. If you do, you'll be grounded for a month!"

"Okay, mommy," Little Johnny said with a note of disappointment in his voice.

So they went over and had a lovely, 3-course meal. Little Johnny was extremely well-behaved and his mother was very proud of him.

After finishing supper, they made their way into the nursery to see the baby. He was sleeping soundly in his crib.

Little Johnny stood on his tiptoes, his fingers curled around the bars of the crib, eyeing the baby with intense curiosity. The baby's mother noticed Johnny's interest and smiled.

"What do you think of the baby, Johnny?" she asked.

"Oh miss! Your baby is just lovely."

"Why thank you!" the new mother beamed.

"No, no. I mean it," Johnny said, "He's got lovely hands, lovely feet, lovely eyes. Does he see okay?"

"Why yes," the mother smiled, "The doctor says he'll be blessed with perfect 20/20 vision."

"That's a relief," said Johnny, "Because if he needed glasses, he'd be fucked."
***
A man wakes up in the hospital bandaged from head to foot.

The doctor comes in and says, "Ah, I see you've regained consciousness. Now, you probably won't remember, but you were in a huge pile-up on the freeway. You're going to be okay, you'll walk again and everything, however, your penis was severed in the accident and we couldn't find it."

The man groans, but the doctor goes on, "You have $9000 in insurance compensation coming and we now have the technology to build a new penis. They work great but they don't come cheap. It's roughly $1000 an inch."

The man perks up. So, the doctor says, "You must decide how many inches you want. But understand that you have been married for over thirty years and this is something you should discuss with your wife. If you had a five incher before and get a nine incher now she might be a bit put out. If you had a nine incher before and you decide to only invest in a five incher now, she might be disappointed. It's important that she plays a role in helping you make a decision."

The man agrees to talk it over with his wife.

The doctor comes back the next day, "So, have you spoken with your wife?" "Yes I have," says the man.

"And has she helped you make a decision?"

"Yes" says the man.

"What is your decision?" asks the doctor.

"We're getting granite counter tops."
***
Paddy dies a terrible death...
Paddy died in a fire and was burnt pretty badly. So the morgue needed someone to identify the body. His two best friends, Seamus and Sean, were sent for. Seamus went in and the mortician pulled back the sheet.

Seamus said "Yup, he's burnt pretty bad. Roll him over".

So the mortician rolled him over. Seamus looked and said "Nope, it ain't Paddy."

The mortician thought that was rather strange and then he brought Sean in to identify the body.

Sean took a look at him and said, "Yup, he's burnt real bad, roll him over."

The mortician rolled him over and Sean looked down and said, "No, it ain't Paddy."

The mortician asked, "How can you tell?"

Sean said, "Well, Paddy had two arseholes."

"What? He had two arseholes?" asked the mortician.

"Yup, everyone knew he had two arseholes. Every time we went into town, folks would say, 'Here comes Paddy with them two arseholes... "
***
A Blonde and a Lawyer are Seated Next To Each Other
A blonde and a lawyer are seated next to each other on a flight from LA to NY.
The lawyer asks if she would like to play a fun game? The blonde, tired, just wants to take a nap, politely declines and rolls over to the window to catch a few winks. The lawyer persists and explains that the game is easy and a lot of fun.
He explains, “I ask you a question, and if you don’t know the answer, you pay me $5.00, and vice versa.”
Again, she declines and tries to get some sleep. The lawyer, now agitated, says, “Okay, if you don’t know the answer you pay me $5.00, and if I don’t know the answer, I will pay you $500.00.”
This catches the blonde’s attention and, figuring there will be no end to this torment unless she plays, agrees to the game. The lawyer asks the first question. “What’s the distance from the earth to the moon?” 
The blonde doesn’t say a word, reaches into her purse, pulls out a $5.00 bill and hands it to the lawyer. “Okay” says the lawyer, “your turn.” 
She asks the lawyer, “What goes up a hill with three legs and comes down with four legs?” The lawyer, puzzled, takes out his laptop computer and searches all his references, no answer. He taps into the air phone with his modem and searches the net and the library of congress, no answer. Frustrated, he sends e-mails to all his friends and coworkers, to no avail.
After an hour, he wakes the blonde, and hands her $500.00. The blonde says, “Thank you,” and turns back to get some more sleep. The lawyer, who is more than a little miffed, wakes the blonde and asks, “Well, what’s the answer?” Without a word, the blonde reaches into her purse, hands the lawyer $5.00, and goes back to sleep. 
***
Grandma's Tattoo(x-post credit to /u/pantyraid7036)
I was waiting on a table of a big family. 7 of them, three kids, mom and dad, and grandma and grandpa. Grandma was your typical OLD OLD OLD grandma. In a wheelchair with a blanket over her legs, looked like one of those apple dolls, spoke in a whisper.

She sees my tattoos, grabs me with her bony hand, and says "you know dear..... I have a tattoo too......" and her husband says "Grace, leave her alone, she's working" I'm curious, I'm nosy, so I say "Oh really, of what?" Grandpa rolls his eyes and goes "here we go...".

Grandma says "It's ... a tiny ... little ... mouse" using the best of her ancient breath to get the words out. "would you like to see it?". Um hell yeah I wanna see a 90 year old's tattoo! She goes "it's on my hip, hold on" and pulls her blanket off and then starts trying to pull her skirt down. Her old lady flesh is totally exposed to the sun (we were on a patio) and I'm using menus to try to shield her, I was that worried it would just burst to flames or something. She keeps pulling at her clothes going "hmmm now where is it, where is it..." getting dangerously close to seeing old lady pubes now.

Finally she looks up at me and say "Well, you know what... It's gone! I bet my pussy ate it."

Source: http://www.reddit.com/r/AskReddit/comments/1zyn3x/waiters_of_reddit_what_fucked_up_shit_have_you/cfy7uaa
***
A Blonde Woman Asks For A $5000 Loan
A blonde woman walks into a bank in NYC before going on vacation and asks for a $5,000 loan.
The banker asks, "Okay, miss, is there anything you would like to use as collateral?"
The woman says, "Yes, of course. I'll use my Rolls Royce."
The banker, stunned, asks, "A $250,000 Rolls Royce? Really?"
The woman is completely positive. She hands over the keys, as the bankers and loan officers laugh at her. They check her credentials, make sure she is the title owner. Everything checks out. They park it in their underground garage for two weeks.
When she comes back, she pays off the $5,000 loan as well as the $15.41 interest.
The loan officer says, "Miss, we are very appreciative of your business with us, but I have one question. We looked you up and found out that you are a multi-millionaire. Why would you want to borrow $5,000?"
The woman replies, "Where else in New York City can I park my car for two weeks for only $15.41 and expect it to be there when I return?"
***
A man and a woman are having sex, when her husband comes home early...
"Quick, hide!" she says, so the man grabs his clothes and jumps into the closet. The man hears the hushed voice of a young boy.

"Sure is dark in here."

"Indeed it is," the man responds.

"I have a baseball," says the boy.

"That's nice," he says.

"I'll sell it to you for $50."

"$50? That's a little steep for a baseball, son."

"Well, my dad has a shotgun. Wanna see that?"

"Tell you what, you have yourself a deal," says the man, and he pays the kid $50.

A week later, the man and the woman are having sex, when once again the woman's husband comes home early. Grabbing his clothes, the man jumps into the closet.

"Sure is dark in here," says the boy.

"Oh, it's you again."

"I have a baseball glove."

"Alright, how much do you want for it?"

"$700."

"$700? That's absurd!"

"Well, my dad has a shotgun. Would you rather see that?"

"Alright, alright, $700," so he pays the kid.

That Sunday, the father says to his son, "Go get your mitt, let's throw the ball around."

The boy says, "I can't, Dad. I sold my ball and glove."

"For how much?" he asks.

"$750."

"$750? Son, it's wrong to rip off your friends. I'm taking you to church for confession."

They drive to church and the boy kneels in the confession booth.

"Sure is dark in here," he says.

The priest says, "Don't start that shit again."
***
Donald Trump visits an elementary school
Donald Trump is visiting a elementary school and he visits one of the classes. They are in the middle of a discussion related to words and their meanings. The teacher asks Mr Trump if he would like to lead the discussion of the word "tragedy." So he asks the class for an example of a tragedy. One little boy stands up and offers: "If my best friend who lives on a farm, is playing in the field and a runaway tractor comes along and knocks him dead, that would be a tragedy." "No," says Mr Trump, "that would be an accident." A little girl raises her hand: "If a school bus carrying 50 children drove over a cliff, killing everyone inside, that would be a tragedy." "I'm afraid not," explains the exalted businessman. "That's what we would call a great loss." The room goes silent. No other children volunteer. Mr Trump searches the room. "Isn't there someone here who can give me an example of a tragedy?" Finally at the back of the room, little Johnny raises his hand. In a quiet voice he says: "If a private jet carrying you was struck by a missile and blown to smithereens, that would be a tragedy." "Fantastic!" exclaims Mr Trump, "That's right. And can you tell me why that would be a tragedy?" "Well," says the boy, "because it sure as hell wouldn't be a great loss and it probably wouldn't be an accident either."
***
Italian father with son in prison
An old Italian gentleman lived alone in New Jersey.  He wanted to plant his annual tomato garden, but it was very difficult work, as the ground was hard.  His only son, Vincent, who used to help him, was in prison.  The old man wrote a letter to his son and described his predicament.  

"Dear Vincent, I am pretty sad because it looks like I won't be able to plant my tomato garden this year.  I'm just getting too old to be digging up a garden plot.  I know if you were here my troubles would be over.  I know you would be happy to dig the plot for me, like in the old days.  Love, Papa."

A few days later, he received a letter from his son.

"Dear Papa,  Don't dig up that garden.  That's where the bodies are buried.  Love, Vinnie"

At 4 am next morning, FBI agents and local police arrived and dug up the entire area without finding any bodies.  They apologized to the old man and left.  That same day, the old man received another letter from this son.

"Dear Papa,  Go ahead and plant the tomatoes now.  That's the best I could do under the circumstances.  Love you, Vinnie"

***
Keeping with the spirit of all the international jokes, I present one of my favorite Ukrainian ones.
A Ukrainian man and a Russian man are out fishing when suddenly the Russian reels in a golden fish.  
The fish looks at the men and says "Congratulations! You have caught me and know I shall grant you both three wishes."  
The fish turns to the Russian man and says "Since you are the one who reeled me in, you get to go first."  
"Alright," says the Russian, "I wish that all of the foreigners in Russia were gone."  
"It is done."  
"Now, I want a massive concrete wall surrounding all of Russia so that they cannot get back in."  
"It is done."  
"Finally, I wish that all Russians from around the world returned to their glorious motherland."  
"It is done."  And with that, the Russian disappeared.  
The fish turns to the Ukrainian and says "Now for your wishes."  
The Ukrainian asks "Are all of the Russians in Russia?"  
"Yes."  
"Only Russians?"  
"Yes."  
"And there is a large wall surrounding all of Russia?"  
"Yes."  
"Then I wish for you to fill it with water."
***
A programmer and a software engineer are sitting next to each other on a long flight...
The programmer leans over to the software engineer and asks if he would like to play a game. The software engineer just wants to take a nap, so he politely declines and rolls over to the window to catch a few winks.

The programmer persists and explains that the game is real easy and great fun. He explains "I ask you a question, and if you don't know the answer, you pay me $10. Then you ask me a question, and if I don't know the answer, I'll pay you $10.". Again, the software engineer politely declines and tries to get to sleep. The programmer, now some what agitated, says, "OK, if you don't know the answer you pay me $10, and if I don't know the answer, I'll pay you $100!" This catches the software engineer's attention, and he sees no end to this torment unless he plays, so he agrees to the game. The programmer asks the first question. "What's the distance from the earth to the moon?" The software engineer doesn't say a word, but reaches into his wallet, pulls out a ten dollar bill and hands it to the programmer. Now, it's the software engineer's turn. He asks the programmer "What goes up a hill with three legs, and comes down on four?"

The programmer looks up at him with a puzzled look. He takes out his laptop computer and searches all of his references. He taps into the air phone with his modem and searches the net and the Library of Congress. Frustrated, he sends e-mail to his co-workers all to no avail. After about an hour, he wakes the software engineer and hands him $100. The software engineer politely takes the $100 and turns away to try to get back to sleep. The programmer, more than a little miffed, shakes the software engineer and asks "Well, so what's the answer?"

Without a word, the software engineer reaches into his wallet, hands the programmer $10, and turns away to get back to sleep.
***
An Englishman, Irishman, Welshman and Scotsman get captured fighting abroad
And the leader of the captors announces 'We're going to line you up in front of a firing squad and shoot you all in turn, the Englishman first, then the Irishman, the Welshman and lastly the Scotsman. But first, you each can make a final request, seeing as you all hail from honourable nations.'



The Englishman responds with a hand on his chest, 'I'd like to hear "God Save The Queen" just one last time to remind me of the old country, played by the London Symphony Choir. With Morris Dancers Dancing to the tune.'



The Irishman replies, kissing his clover picked from County Cork, 'I'd like to hear "The Soldiers' Song" just one last time to remind me of the old country, sung by a strapping Irish Girl, with Irish dancers skipping gaily to the tune.'



The Welshman answers, clasping his daffodil pinned to his jacket, 'I'd like to hear "Men Of Harlech" just one more time to remind me of the old country, sung as if by the Tom Jones.'



Moving lastly to the Scot, the captor asks his last request as well.



The Scotsman says quickly, 


'I'd like to be shot first.'


***
An Englishman, a Frenchman, a ravishing blonde and a homely brunette...
...are sharing a compartment on a train as it winds its way through the Alps. Every now and then the train passes through a tunnel, during which time the compartment is plunged into complete darkness. On one such occasion, a ringing slap is heard and as the train passes back into daylight, the Frenchman is rubbing his sore, red cheek.

The brunette thinks 'I bet that dirty Frenchman fondled the blonde and she struck the pervert.'

The blonde thinks 'I bet that filthy Frenchman was looking to grope me in the dark, mistook the dowdy brunette for me and she slapped the beast.'

The Frenchman thinks 'I bet that perfidious Englishman touched up the blonde in the dark and she slapped me by mistake.'

The Englishman thinks 'I can't wait for another tunnel so I can slap that French twat again.'

***
A Fijian man was having coffee and croissants with butter and jam in a cafe, when a New Zealand tourist, chewing gum, sat next to him...
The Fijian politely ignored the New Zealander, who, never the less started up a conversation. 

The New Zealander snapped his gum and said, "You Fijian folks eat the whole bread?" 

The Fijian frowned, annoyed with being bothered during his breakfast, and replied, "Of course." 

The New Zealander blew a huge bubble. 

"We don't. In New Zealand, we only eat what's inside. The crusts we collect, recycle them, and transform them into croissants and sell them to Fiji." 

The New Zealander had a smirk on his face. 

The Fijian listened in silence. 

The New Zealander persisted.
 
"D'ya eat jam with the bread?" 

Sighing the Fijian replied, "Of course."

Cracking his gum between his teeth, the Kiwi said, "We don't. In New Zealand, we eat fresh fruit for breakfast, then we put all the peels, seeds and leftovers in containers, recycle them, transform them into jam and sell them to Fiji." 

The Fijian then asked, "Do you have sex in New Zealand?" 

The New Zealander smiled and said, "Why of course we do." 

The Fijian leaned closer to him and asked, "And what do you do with the condoms once you've used them?" 

"We throw them away, of course." says the New Zealander.
 
Now it was the Fijian's turn to smile. 

"We don't. In Fiji, we recycle them, we put them in a container, melt them down into chewing gum and sell them to New Zealand. Why do you think it's called Wrigleys?"
***
A DEA officer walks on to ranch in Texas...
A DEA officer stopped at a ranch in Texas, and talked with an old rancher. He told the rancher, "I need to inspect your ranch for illegally grown drugs." The rancher said, "Okay , but don't go in that field over there.....", as he pointed out the location.
The DEA officer verbally exploded saying, " Mister, I have the authority of the Federal Government with me!" Reaching into his rear pants pocket, the arrogant officer removed his badge and proudly displayed it to the rancher. "See this fucking badge?! This badge means I am allowed to go wherever I wish.... On any land !! No questions asked or answers given!! Have I made myself clear?.... do you understand?!!"
The rancher nodded politely, apologized, and went about his chores. A short time later, the old rancher heard loud screams, looked up, and saw the DEA officer running for his life, being chased by the rancher's big Santa Gertrudis bull...... With every step the bull was gaining ground on the officer, and it seemed likely that he'd sure enough get gored before he reached safety. The officer was clearly terrified. The rancher threw down his tools, ran to the fence and yelled at the top of his lungs.....

"Your badge, show him your fucking BADGE!!"
***
A bloke walks into a bar in New Zealand...
A bloke walks into a bar in New Zealand and orders a shandy. All the Kiwis sitting around the bar look up,   expecting to see another Australian visitor.  
The barman says, "You aren't from around here, are ya?"  
The guy says, "No, I'm from Canada."  
The bartender says, "What do you do in Canada?"  
The guy says, "I'm a taxidermist."  
The bartender says, "A tixidermist? What the hick is a tixidermist? Do you drive a tixi?' "No, a taxidermist doesn't drive a taxi. I mount animals."  
The bartender grins and yells, "He's okay, boys. He's one of us!"  
***
Corniest joke I know.
Two friars decide to open up a business selling flowers in LA. They settup a booth right outside of Hugh Hefners playboy mansion. After about a week, their business wasnt going so well and it was also driving away people from the playboy mansion seeing two friars outside.

Eventually Hugh Hefner himself came out and put a stop to all of this.

The point of the story is: Only Hugh can prevent florist friars.

Badum psh
***
Speechmaking
When Albert Einstein was making the rounds of the speaker's circuit, he usually found himself eagerly longing to get back to his laboratory work. One night as they were driving to yet another rubber-chicken dinner, Einstein mentioned to his chauffeur (a man who somewhat resembled Einstein in looks & manner) that he was tired of speechmaking.

"I have an idea, boss," his chauffeur said. "I've heard you give this speech so many times. I'll bet I could give it for you."

Einstein laughed loudly and said, "Why not? Let's do it!"

When they arrive at the dinner, Einstein donned the chauffeur's cap and jacket and sat in the back of the room. The chauffeur gave a beautiful rendition of Einstein's speech and even answered a few questions expertly.

Then a supremely pompous professor asked an extremely esoteric question about anti-matter formation, digressing here and there to let everyone in the audience know that he was nobody's fool.

Without missing a beat, the chauffeur fixed the professor with a steely stare and said, "Sir, the answer to that question is so simple that I will let my chauffeur, who is sitting in the back, answer it for me."

edit=correct word(s)
***
The 2016 Presidential Race is ending...
It's the end of the 2016 presidential race and the people of the United States hated all the candidates so much that nobody voted. The government is in a panic trying to figure out what to do to decide who the next president will be. Finally, Barack Obama comes up with an idea: a literal presidential race. The three candidates would run a lap around the White House and the person with the best time would become president. Bernie Sanders goes first, but being as old as he is, he takes about 24 minutes. Trump goes next and arrives with a time of 14:26. Hillary Clinton goes last, running as fast as she can, trampling the flowers and shrubs in her way in an effort to beat Trump's time. She finally crosses the finish line at just under ten minutes. 

"Aha!" She exclaims, "That must be some kind of record!"

"I don't think so," says Obama, "Bush did 9:11"
***
A man walks into a drug store with his 8-year old son
They happen to walk by the condom display, and the boy asks "What's are these, dad?" To which the man matter-of-factly replies "Those are called condoms, son. Men use them to have safe sex". "Oh I see" replied the boys pensively. "Yes, I've heard of that in health class at school".

He looks over the display and picks up a package of 3 and asks "Why are there 3 in this package?" The dad replies "Those are for high-school boys. One for Friday, one for Saturday, and one for Sunday". "Cool!" says the boy.

He notices a 6-pack and asks "Then who are these for?" "Those are for college men" The dad answers "TWO for Friday, TWO for Saturday, and TWO for Sunday". "WOW!" exclaimed the boy.

"Then who uses THESE?" he asks, picking up a 12-pack. With a sigh, the dad replied "Those are for married men. One for January, one for February, one for March..."
***
Lawyers -- Be wary of Grandma . . .
Lawyers should never ask a Georgia grandma a question if they aren't prepared for the answer.
 
In a trial, a Southern small-town prosecuting attorney called his first witness, a grandmotherly, elderly woman to the stand. He approached her and asked, 'Mrs. Jones, do you know me?' She responded, “Why, yes, I do know you, Mr. Williams. I've known you since you were a boy, and frankly, you've been a big disappointment to me. You lie, you cheat on your wife, and you manipulate people and talk about them behind their backs. You think you're a big shot when you haven't the brains to realize you'll never amount to anything more than a two-bit paper pusher. Yes, I know you.”
 
The lawyer was stunned. Not knowing what else to do, he pointed across the room and asked, “Mrs. Jones, do you know the defense attorney?”
 
She again replied, “Why yes, I do. I've known Mr. Bradley since he was a youngster, too. He's lazy, bigoted, and he has a drinking problem. He can't build a normal relationship with anyone, and his law practice is one of the worst in the entire state. Not to mention he cheated on his wife with three different women. One of them was your wife. Yes, I know him.”
 
The defense attorney nearly died.
 
The judge asked both counselors to approach the bench and, in a very quiet voice, said, “If either of you idiots asks her if she knows me, I'll send you both to the electric chair.”
***
Little Johnny is goofing off in math class and Ms. McHeiney calls on him.
"Johnny, three birds are sitting on a fence, you shoot one of them how many are left."  Johnny sits up straight and says "none, the bang would make the others fly away."  Ms. McHeiney says, "well, the answer is two, but I like the way you're thinking."

Little Johnny says "OK, I have one for you, three women are eating ice cream cones, one is biting it, one is licking it, one is sucking on it, which one is married?"  Stumped Ms. McHeiney says "uhhhh, the one sucking on it?" Johnny puffs out his chest and says "well, the answer is the one with the wedding band, but I like the way you're thinking."
***
The genie and the russian
A Russian is strolling down the street in Moscow and kicks a bottle laying in the street. Suddenly out of the bottle comes a genie. The Russian is stunned and the Genie says, "Hello Master, I will grant you one wish, anything that you want." The Russian begins thinking, "Well I really like drinking vodka." 



Finally the Russian says, "I wish to drink vodka whenever I want, so make me piss vodka." The Genie grants him his wish. When the Russian gets home he gets a glass out of the cupboard and pisses into it. He looks at the glass and it's clear. Looks like vodka. Then he smells the liquid. Smells like vodka. So he takes a test and it is the best vodka that he has ever tasted. 



The Russian yells to his wife, "Natasha, Natasha, come quickly." She comes running down the hall and the Russian takes another glass out of the cupboard and pisses into it. He tells her to drink, that it is vodka. Natasha is reluctant but goes ahead and takes a sip. It is the best vodka that she has ever tasted. The two drink and party all night. 



The next night the Russian comes home from work and tells his wife to get two glasses out of the cupboard. He proceeds to piss in the two glasses. The result is the same, the vodka is excellent and the couple drink until the sun comes up. 



Finally, Friday night comes and the Russian tells his wife to grab one glass from the cupboard and we will drink vodka. She gets the glass but asks him "Boris, why do we only need one glass?" Boris raises the glass and says, "Because tonight my love, you drink from the bottle."

***
A pastor, a doctor and an engineer ...
...were waiting one morning for a particularly slow group of golfers.

The engineer fumed, "What's with these guys? We must have been waiting for 15 minutes!"

The doctor chimed in, "I don't know, but I've never seen such ineptitude!"

The pastor said, "Hey, here comes the greenskeeper. Let's have a word with him."

"Hey George. Say, what's with that group ahead of us? They're rather slow, aren't they?"

The greenskeeper replied, "Oh, yes, that's a group of blind firefighters. They lost their sight saving our clubhouse from a fire last year, so we always let them play for free anytime."

The group was silent for a moment.

The pastor said, "That's so sad. I think I will say a special prayer for them tonight."

The doctor said, "Good idea. And I'm going to contact my ophthalmologist buddy and see if there's anything he can do for them."

The engineer said, "Why can't these guys play at night?" 
***
A man boarded an aircraft at London 's Heathrow Airport for New York...
... and taking his seat as he settled in, he noticed a very beautiful woman boarding the plane.

He realised she was heading straight toward his seat and bingo - she took the seat right beside him.

"Hello", he blurted out, "Business trip or vacation?"

She turned, smiled enchantingly and said, "Business. I'm going to the annual Nymphomaniac convention in the United States ."

He swallowed hard. Here was the most gorgeous woman he had ever seen sitting next to him, and she was going to a meeting for nymphomaniacs!

Struggling to maintain his composure, he calmly asked, "What's your business role at this convention?"

"Lecturer," she responded,” I use my experience to disprove some of the popular myths about sexuality.."

"Really", he smiled, "what myths are those?"

"Well," she explained, "one popular myth is that African-American men are the most well-endowed when, in fact, it's the Native American Indian who is most likely to possess that trait.


Another popular myth is that French men are the best lovers, when actually it is the men of Greek descent.


We have also found that the best potential lovers in all categories are the Irish."

Suddenly the woman became uncomfortable and blushed. "I'm sorry," she said. "I really shouldn't be discussing this with you, I don't even know your name!"

"Tonto," the man said. "Tonto Papadopoulos, but my friends call me Paddy."
***
The bus driver
One fine day, a bus driver went to the bus garage, started his bus, and drove off along the route.

No problems for the first few stops, a few people got on, a few got off, and things went generally well.

At the next stop, however, a big hulk of a guy got on. Six foot eight, built like a wrestler, arms hanging down to the ground.

He glared at the driver and said, "Big John doesn't pay!" and sat down at the back. Did I mention that the driver was five feet three, thin, and basically meek? Well, he was.

Naturally, he didn't argue with Big John, but he wasn't happy about it.

The next day the same thing happened-Big John got on again, made a show of refusing to pay, and sat down. And the next day, and the one after that, and so forth.

This grated on the bus driver, who started losing sleep over the way Big John was taking advantage of him. Finally he could stand it no longer.

He signed up for body building courses, karate, judo, and all that good stuff. By the end of the summer, he had become quite strong; what's more, he felt really good about himself.

So on the next Monday, when Big John once again got on the bus and said, "Big John doesn't pay!," the driver stood up, glared back at the passenger, and screamed, "And why not?"

With a surprised look on his face, Big John replied, "Big John has a bus pass."
***
Adam is a little lonely...
About a month or so after Adam was introduced to Eden, God and Adam are meeting for dinner. Adam expresses his admiration for the plants and the animals and the joy and beauty of it all, but admits that there is one little thing that he feels sad about: he feels a tiny bit lonely....

God quickly points out that he is already working on a solution: it is called a "woman," and is stunning to behold, beautiful and slim, would make company for Adam, would care for him when he's sick, attend to cooking and cleaning, make love to him whenever he wanted, and basically be a joy to be around.

Adam is suitably impressed, and expresses his eagerness for this "woman" thing to be created. He is practically beside himself.

"There is a catch, though," says God, "to create the woman I described I need both of your legs, and at least one arm."

Adam hems and haws for a while, and then asks: "what can I get for one rib?"
***
I just love a good twist...
A paperboy is doing his monthly round of collecting money from customers. One door is opened by a fairly sexy buxom woman who is wearing a transparent lace negligee.

"Hi, Missus, I've come for the paper money. It's $5 please," says our boy, with his hand held out.
"I'm afraid I've no money in the house," the woman replies in a breathy voice, "but if you come in I'm sure I can think of something..."

So our lad goes in and the woman throws herself back on the fireside rug, pulling off the negligee, moaning, " You can have ME instead. . . "

The kid sighs, takes off his bag, and then produces a dick that wouldn't look out of place on a stud bull. The woman is agog. Our lad then produces a load of big rubber rings from his bag, which he proceeds to stack around his giant knob.

What are they for?" asks the woman.
"Oh, they're just to make sure I don't go all the way in when I fuck you," replies the boy.
"To hell with them!" implores the woman. "I'll take all of you!"

Our lad replies... "Not for five fucking dollars you won't! "
***
So there was this Gorilla in a cage...
at Bobs local Gas Station. On the cage there is a large sign stating, "DO NOT TOUCH UNDER ANY CIRCUMSTANCES."
Bob always found it to be rather peculiar that there was a Gorilla left in a cage at his local Gas Station, but hey ho.
For months he went about his commute to work, each day stopping at the Gas Station to top up. Each day his curiosity grew and grew. Monday, Tuesday, Wednesday, Thursday, Friday, Saturday and Sunday. Bob arrived at the Gas Station to top up and continue his usual mundane journey to work. He was a successful business man you see, pretty good at his job too. 

One cold December morning, Bob, couldn't take it anymore. Instead of taking his Visa debit card from the reader and getting straight back into his car, he turned around. He turned around and caught the eyes of the large, hairy, dangerous- looking, and extremely angry beast. 
With extreme caution, Bob, began to walk toward the Gorilla. Each step watched on by the angry mammal. 
Bob stood no more than a foot away from the cage. He could feel the warm breath of the Gorilla on his face. 

"I have waited too long for this," Bob uttered to himself. 

The Gorilla, at this point had clasped the metal bars that separate them both. 
Bob raised his clenched hand, barely an inch between the Gorillas hand and his. The sign seemed bolder than ever before, but Bob had had enough. He lifted his index finger and poked the Gorillas Right hand clasped on the bars.

The beast erupted. Bob fell to the floor and began to drag himself back to the car as the Gorilla began to tear the cage apart. There was a shower of debris falling around Bob as the Gorilla aggressively become more and more enraged as the cage began to disintegrate. 
Bob stumbled to his feet and headed straight for his car, opened the door, locked it and started the engine. The wheels screeched and the beast yelled. It was free. Bob began to accelerate with the beast hot on his trail. Never before has anyone set eyes upon something so enraged and angry. The blood had drained from poor Bobs face and a heavy feeling of nausea set in as he sped away from the Gorilla.

Slowly, the enraged beast became a spec in the rear view mirror. A sigh of relief was issued and the blood returned to Bobs face. Finally, it was over. He did it! He went against the signs instruction after so many months and he finally did it! 

Back to his commute, the memory of the Gorilla still fresh in his mind, but no longer of concern. Slowly the car halted as Bob abides to the traffic lights. 
Bob reached into his pocket and pulled out a pack of Marlboro cigarettes and lit one. Window down, arm out into the bitter cold and the cigarette in hand. Bob turned his head to the vehicle also halted next to his. Fear struck the eyes of Bob. His hands went limp as the cigarette fell landing on the asphalt. The blood had left his face once again as he realised that the Gorilla was sat in the car right next to him. 

There it was, those large hands that clasped the cage now clasped the wheel of the car it was in. The beast had its gaze directed at Bob. It was soul tearing. Bob could feel his eyes burning from the intensity and anger from the Gorillas gaze. 

The wheels screeched. This time not four, but eight wheels as the two began to accelerate. Bob began to ram the side of the Gorillas vehicle to try for an escape as did the Gorilla to Bob for another purpose. Still Bob could feel the burning gaze of the extremely infuriated Gorilla. The lanes began to merge and ahead was a large Truck heading straight down the opposite lane. Bob and the Gorilla began to accelerate for the dominance of the lane. Bob forced his foot deep into his accelerator, forcing his eyes shut and edging ever so slightly past the Gorillas car. 
A large blow from the truck horn then suddenly, CRASH. Bobs eyes began to open. He, had won the lane. The pesky, angry Gorilla was gone, maybe even dead! Finally Bob relaxed again and pulled up to work. 

After a quick discussion with his Boss as to why he was late, he headed to his office. He sat down and once again, breathed a sigh of relief. Four wheels for four walls. He pushed back into his chair and raised his feet onto his desk.
"What a day!" He exclaimed as he laughed to himself, realising it was barely 10am.

A few hours pass by and Bob gets a call from management to go down to one of the conference rooms to discuss business. He tells them that he'll be down in 5 minutes. Bob gets out of his chair and leaves his office through the door that overlooks all the cubicles on his floor. He takes a quick look around and begins to feel that burn again. That burn he felt a few hours ago at the traffic lights. He scans the top of the cubicles once again, only this time meeting the eyes of a smartly dressed, large, pissed off Gorilla. 

The Gorilla screams a loud and mighty roar and begins to tear down all the cubicles separating him from Bob. Quickly, Bob heads for the elevator and smacks at the button witnessing the destruction left by the Gorilla in a cloud of paper and computer keyboards.

DING!

The elevator door opens and Bob clambers inside once again frantically hitting the button to close the door. Each and every hit of the button the Gorilla locks in. 
The doors begin to close, it felt like a lifetime, but eventually they seal. 

A sigh of relief, all to familiar today. 

BANG

"THE GODDAMN GORILLA IS ON THE BLOODY ROOF OF THIS ELEVATOR!"

Quick to think, life or death, Bob clicks the highest floor he can go to, the roof, in hope the elevator crushes the Gorilla. The elevator begins to rise with the Gorilla pounding down with its fists. 

DING!

Bob runs out onto the roof, the highest floor. Outside and cold with no escape but to jump. All he can do now is hope his plan worked. 
Then one last punch. 

Bob sees the Gorillas' fist punch through the elevator, covered in blood and metal. Bob falls to his knees with tears in his eyes.
"This is it..." he thought as the Gorilla eventually got out. The Gorilla panting heavily, each breath exaggerated with anger began to walk towards the wailing, crying businessman. Step by step, beg by beg.

"Please... Please don't kill me, Gorilla!"
The beasts eyes, blood red, forcing into the begging mans eyes and with that, the beast lifted its hands into the air. Clenched and ready to strike. 
"Please... I'm sorry." 
As quickly as the man begged, the Gorillas right hand began to fall with such speed and force. The man froze, clenching every muscle in his body, ready to be killed, only to open one eye to notice that the Gorillas hand was poised above his shoulder. As his did at the Gas station, the Gorilla extended its index finger and poked hard into the Bobs shoulder. With one last look into the Mans eyes, the Gorilla opened its mouth. The world had froze for Bob. This was it... 

"You're it." 

And off the Gorilla ran. 
***
An Unlikely Friendship
John is driving north on a highway after a sporting event when he comes to a single lane bridge. He checks the road and begins to cross the river, only to be hit head-on from the oncoming direction. The two cars are completely mangled, but the two drivers are completely fine. John notices that the man who hit him is wearing a jersey from a rival sports team.

The man who caused the accident said, "Hey man, sorry about your car... And even though we represent different teams, I think this is a sign that we should put our differences beside us."

John replies, "I think you're right." He goes and checks his trunk and remarkably pulls out an undamaged bottle of Jack Daniels. "Amazing! How about a drink to celebrate our new friendship?"

The driver agrees and takes a few swigs of the whiskey. He passes the bottle back to John who promptly throws the bottle over the bridge and into the river below. "Oi! What did you do that for? Weren't you going to have some for yourself? What about our new friendship?"

John smirks. "Tell that to the cops when they show up."
***
The European Commission has just announced an agreement whereby English will be the official language of the European Union rather than German, which was the other possibility.
As part of the negotiations, the British Government conceded that English spelling had some room for improvement and has accepted a 5- year phase-in plan that would become known as "Euro-English". 

In the first year, "s" will replace the soft "c". Sertainly, this will make the sivil servants jump with joy. The hard "c" will be dropped in favour of "k". This should klear up konfusion, and keyboards kan have one less letter.

There will be growing publik enthusiasm in the sekond year when the troublesome "ph" will be replaced with "f". This will make words like fotograf 20% shorter. 

In the 3rd year, publik akseptanse of the new spelling kan be expekted to reach the stage where more komplikated changes are possible. 

Governments will enkourage the removal of double letters which have always ben a deterent to akurate speling. 

Also, al wil agre that the horibl mes of the silent "e" in the languag is disgrasful and it should go away. 

By the 4th yer people wil be reseptiv to steps such as replasing "th" with "z" and "w" with "v". 

During ze fifz yer, ze unesesary "o" kan be dropd from vords kontaining "ou" and after ziz fifz yer, ve vil hav a reil sensi bl riten styl. 

Zer vil be no mor trubl or difikultis and evrivun vil find it ezi TU understand ech oza. Ze drem of a united urop vil finali kum tru.
***
Two couples were playing cards. John accidentally dropped some cards on the floor. When he bent down under the table to pick them up, he noticed....
Two couples were playing cards. John accidentally dropped some cards on the floor. When he bent down under the table to pick them up, he noticed .... Bill's wife was not wearing any panties! Shocked by this, John hit his head on the table and emerged red-faced.

Later, John went to the kitchen to get some refreshments. Bill's wife followed him and asked, "Did you see anything that you liked under there?"

John admitted that, well, yes he did.

She said "You can have it, but it will cost you $100."

After a minute or two, John indicates that he is interested. She tells him that since Bill works Friday afternoons and John doesn't, John should come to her house around 2:00 p.m. on Friday.

Friday came and John went to her house at 2:00 p.m. After paying her $100 they went to the bedroom, had sex, and then John left.

Bill came home about 6:00 P.M. He asked his wife, "Did John come by this afternoon?"

Reluctantly, she replied, "Yes, he did stop by for a few minutes."

Next Bill asked, "Did John give you $100?"

She thinks 'Oh hell, he knows!' Finally she says, "Yes, he did give me $100."

"Good," Bill says. "John came by the office this morning and borrowed $100 from me. He said that he would stop by our house on his way home and pay me back.
***
Three men die and are sent to Hell.
Satan punishes them based on their sins, they must all spend 80 years locked in a room with their guilty pleasures in life. The alchohalic will have all the booze he can drink. The sex addict will have countless beautiful, horny women. And the pot head will have all the weed he can smoke. The three men face their punishments happily. 80 years later, Satan opens their doors. The alchohalic had drank all the booze and was incredibly sick from a hangover that never cured. He pleaded for repentance, swearing to never drink again. The sex addict had not aged, and was being chased by several unattactive, horny old ladies. He begged Satan to let him go as he had learned his lesson. Finally, Satan openes the door to the pot head's room. To his surprise, non of the weed had been smoked. The pot head was sitting on the floor crying. He said to Satan, "Do you have a lighter man?!"
***
One day a guy dies and finds himself in hell.
One day a guy dies and finds himself in hell. 

As he is wallowing in despair, he has his first meeting with the devil...

Satan: "Why so glum?"

Guy: "What do you think? I'm in hell!"

Satan: "Hell's not so bad. We actually have a lot of fun down here. You a drinking man?"

Guy: "Sure, I love to drink."

Satan: "Well, you're gonna love Mondays then. On Mondays, that's all we do, drink. Whiskey, tequila, Guinness, wine coolers, Tab, and Fresca. We drink 'til we throw up, and then we drink some more! And you don't have to worry about getting a hangover, because you're dead anyway."

Guy: "Gee that sounds great!"

Satan: "You a smoker?"

Guy: "You better believe it!"

Satan: "All right! You're gonna love Tuesdays. We get the finest cigars from all over the world, and smoke our lungs out. If you get cancer - no biggie, you're already dead, remember?"

Guy: "Wow...that's awesome!"

Satan: "I bet you like to gamble."

Guy: "Why, yes, as a matter of fact I do."

Satan: "Good, 'cause Wednesdays you can gamble all you want. Craps,blackjack, roulette, poker, slots, whatever. If you go bankrupt, it doesn't matter, you're dead anyhow."

Guy: "Cool!"

Satan: "What about Drugs?"

Guy: "Are you kidding? Love drugs! You don't mean...?"

Satan: "That's right! Thursday is drug day. Help yourself to a great bigbowl of crack or smack. Smoke a doobie the size of a submarine.You can do all the drugs you want. You're dead so who cares."

Guy: "Wow! I never realized Hell was such a cool place!"

Satan: "You gay?"

Guy: "No..."

Satan: "Ooooh, Fridays are gonna be tough..."
***
A custodian fills in for a priest
A custodian is cleaning at the church where he works, suddenly a priest frantically approaches him 
        
"son, i need you to do me a favor!  I have a golf game I must go to but there's a woman who just came in for confession.  I need you to go into the confession booth, listen to this woman's sins and tell her how many hail marys she must do.  It's very easy, here's a list of sins and how many hail mary's each sin warrents.  Thanks and good luck!"

The custodian reluctantly agrees  and he goes into the confession booth as the priest sneaks away to go play golf.  

The woman starts confessing her sings "forgive me father for I have sinned, I lied to someone"  The Custodian looks at the list, see's 'lying - 10 hail mary's' and says "my child, do 10 hail mary's and you're absolved from this sin".  This goes on for a while and suddenly the woman says "forgive me father for I have sinned, I gave a man a blowjob"  The custodian is looking all up and down the list but doesn't see 'blowjob' anywhere.  Panicked, he asks the woman to excuse him for a minute.  As he walks out of the confession booth he see's an alter boy "Hey, what does father usually give for a blowjob"?  he whispers.  The alter boy replys "usually a snickers bar"
***
Three Guys With Heavy Brooklyn Accents Get Invited To A Costume Party.
The theme for this party is "Dress Like an Emotion." The first guy is wearing a pear costume. The second guy is wearing a dress. And the third guy is butt-naked except for a custard pie around his pecker.

They ring the doorbell. The host opens the door, sizes them up, and says "You guys aren't in theme, so I can't let you in."

The first guy argues, "What are you talkin' about? I'm in despair!"

The host shrugs and lets him in.

The second guy argues, "What are you talkin' about? I'm in distress!"

The host shrugs again and lets him in, too. But, he stops the third guy, who's butt-naked except for the custard pie around his pecker and says, "There's no way you're in theme, so don't even try."

The third guy retorts, "What are you talkin' about? I'm fucking disgusted!"
***
So a moth goes into a podiatrist's office..
A moth goes into a podiatrist’s office, and the podiatrist’s office says, “What seems to be the problem, moth?”

The moth says “What’s the problem? Where do I begin, man? I go to work for Gregory Illinivich, and all day long I work. Honestly doc, I don’t even know what I’m doing anymore. I don’t even know if Gregory Illinivich knows. He only knows that he has power over me, and that seems to bring him happiness. But I don’t know, I wake up in a malaise, and I walk here and there… at night I…I sometimes wake up and I turn to some old lady in my bed that’s on my arm. A lady that I once loved, doc. I don’t know where to turn to. My youngest, Alexendria, she fell in the…in the cold of last year. The cold took her down, as it did many of us. And my other boy, and this is the hardest pill to swallow, doc. My other boy, Gregarro Ivinalititavitch… I no longer love him. As much as it pains me to say, when I look in his eyes, all I see is the same cowardice that I… that I catch when I take a glimpse of my own face in the mirror. If only I wasn’t such a  coward, then perhaps…perhaps I could bring myself to reach over to that cocked and loaded gun that lays on the bedside behind me and end this hellish facade once and for all…Doc, sometimes I feel like a spider, even though I’m a moth, just barely hanging on to my web with an everlasting fire underneath me. I’m not feeling good.
And so the doctor says, “Moth, man, you’re troubled. But you should be seeing a psychiatrist. Why on earth did you come here?”

And the moth says, “‘Cause the light was on.”


*-Norm MacDonald*
***
The inventor of the Harley-Davidson motorcycle, Arthur Davidson, died and went to heaven.

At the gates, St. Peter told Arthur "Since you've been such a good man and your motorcycles have changed the world, your reward is, you can hang out with anyone you want to in heaven"...

Arthur thought about it for a minute and then said, "I want to hang out with God."
St. Peter took Arthur to the Throne Room, and introduced him to God. God recognized Arthur and commented, "Okay, so you were the one who invented the Harley-Davidson motorcycle?" 
Arthur said, "Yeah, that's me..."

God continued "Well, what's the big deal in inventing something that's pretty unstable, makes noise and pollution and can't run without a road?"

Arthur was a bit embarrassed, but finally spoke, "Excuse me, but aren't you the inventor of Woman?"
God said, "Yes, that would be me."
"Well," said Arthur , "Professional to professional, you have some major design flaws in your invention!...

1. There's too much inconsistency in the front-end suspension
2. It chatters constantly at high speeds
3. Most rear ends are too soft and wobble about too much
4. The intake is placed way too close to the exhaust
5. The maintenance costs are outrageous!!!!"

"Hmmmmm, you may have some good points there", replied God, "Hold on."
God went to his Celestial supercomputer, typed in a few words and waited for the results. The computer printed out a slip of paper and God read it.
"Well, it may be true that my invention is flawed", God said to Arthur, "But according to these numbers, more men are riding my invention than yours." 
***
Four Jewish brothers
Four Jewish brothers left home for college: one became a lawyer, one a doctor, one a hedge find operator, and one a retailer. They all prospered. 
Some years later, chatting after a Chanukah dinner, they discussed the gifts that they were able to give to their elderly mother.
The first said, "I had a big house built for Mama." 
The second said, "I had a hundred thousand dollar theater built in the house." 
The third said, "I had my Mercedes dealer deliver her a 600SL with a chauffeur." 
The fourth said, "Listen to this. You know how Mama loves reading the Torah and you know she can't see very well. I sent her a parrot that can recite the entire Torah. It took twenty rabbis 12 years to teach him." 
"I had to pledge to contribute $100,000 a year for twenty years but it was worth it. Mama just has to name the chapter and verse and the parrot will recite it." 
Soon thereafter, Mom sent out her Thank You notes. She wrote:
"Milton, the house you built is so huge. I only live in one room, but I have to clean the whole house. Thanks so much."
"Marvin, I am too old to travel. I stay home. I have my groceries delivered, so I never use the Mercedes... And the driver is a Nazi. A million thanks."
"Menachem, you give me a theater with Dolby sound, it could hold 50 people, but all my friends are dead, I've lost my hearing and I'm nearly blind. Thanks anyway."
"Dearest Melvin, you were the only son to have good sense to give a little thought to your gift." 
"The chicken was delicious."

***
The American businessman and the Mexican fisherman.
An American businessman was at the pier of a small coastal Mexican village when a small boat with just one fisherman docked. Inside the small boat were several large yellowfin tuna. 

The American complimented the fisherman on the quality of his fish and asked how long it took to catch them. The fisherman replied that it only took a little while. The American then asked why didn't he stay out longer and catch more fish. The fisherman said he had enough to support his family's immediate needs.

The American then asked, "But what do you do with the rest of your time?"

The fisherman said, "I sleep late, fish a little, play with my children,
take siesta with my wife, Maria, stroll into the village each evening where I sip wine and play guitar with my amigos. I have a full and busy life, señor."

The American scoffed. "I am a Wharton MBA and could help you. You should spend more time fishing and with the proceeds, buy a bigger boat. With the proceeds from the bigger boat you could buy several boats. Eventually you would have a fleet of fishing boats. Instead of selling your catch to a middleman you would sell directly to the processor, eventually opening your own cannery. You would control the product, processing and distribution.

You would need to leave this small coastal fishing village and move to
Mexico City, then L.A., and eventually New York City, where you will run your expanding enterprise."

The fisherman asked, "But how long will this all take?"

To which the American replied, "Fifteen or 20 years."

"But what then?"

The American laughed and said, "That's the best part. When the time is right you would announce an IPO and sell your company stock to the public and become very rich. You would make millions."

"Millions? Then what?"

The American said, "Then you would retire. Move to a small coastal fishing village where you would sleep late, fish a little, play with your kids, take siesta with your wife, stroll to the village in the evenings where you could sip wine and play your guitar with your friends."
***
A good one for those of you finishing up finals.
4 buddies are seniors in college and all 4 of them have 4.0 GPAs and are majoring in biology. Even though their last final is on Monday, they decide they wanted to go to the all girls college across town and party until Saturday night, come back Sunday, study all day, and take the exam on Monday. When they got to the party at the other college they were having so much fun that they decided to stay the whole weekend, skip that test, and ask the professor if they could retake it on Tuesday. When they finally get back to school on Monday, they all go into the professors office together and explain to him why they were unable to make the test. "we went to a party across town and we were coming back last night so we would have enough time to study for the test, but we got a flat tire and had no cell service and no spare, and had to wait for someone to drive by. We waited all day until someone finally came by and helped us. We were so tired that when we finally got home at 2am we all cashed and slept through your test. Is there anyway we can take it tomorrow." After thinking about it for a little bit the professor replied "of course, come in tomorrow morning." The excited 4 friends study the rest of the day Monday and come in for the test on Tuesday morning. The professor puts them each in a different room and hands them each a test. They open to the first page and read the first question worth 5 points, "what is photosynthesis?" Overjoyed at how easy this first question is, they answer it and move on to the second question worth 95 points, "which tire?"
***
A woman brought a very limp duck into a veterinary surgeon.
As
she laid her pet on the table, the vet pulled out his
stethoscope and listened to the bird's chest.

After a moment or two, the vet
shook his head and sadly said, "I'm sorry, your duck, Cuddles,
has passed away."

The distressed woman wailed,
"Are you sure?"
"Yes, I am sure. Your duck is dead," replied
the vet..

"How can you be so sure?" she
protested. "I mean you haven't done any testing on him or anything. He might just be in a coma or
something."

The vet rolled his eyes, turned
around and left the room. He returned a few minutes later
with a black Labrador Retriever. As the duck's owner looked on
in amazement, the dog stood on his hind legs, put his
front paws on the examination table and sniffed the duck from
top to bottom. He then looked up at the vet with sad eyes and
shook his head.

The vet patted the dog on the
head and took it out of the room. A few minutes later he
returned with a cat. The cat jumped on the table and also
delicately sniffed the bird from head to foot. The cat sat
back on its haunches, shook its head, meowed softly and
strolled out of the room.

The vet looked at the
woman and said, "I'm sorry, but as I said, this is most
definitely, 100% certifiably, a dead duck."

The vet turned to his computer terminal, hit a few keys and
produced a bill, which he handed to the woman..

The duck's owner, still in shock, took the bill. "$150!" she
cried, "$150 just to tell me my duck is dead!"

The vet shrugged, "I'm sorry. If you had just taken my word for it,
the bill would have been $20, but with the Lab Report and the
Cat Scan, it's now $150."
***
A Jewish man is walking down the street...
And he sees a Chinese man in front of him. He then runs up behind the Chinese man and kicks him hard in the back of the leg. The Chinese man falls to the floor and yells, "What was that for?"  
  
"That was for Pearl Harbour!" The Jewish man replies.  
  
"But that was the Japanese, I'm from China!" Answers the Chinese man.  
  
"Chinese, Japanese, Vietnamese, whatever! You're all the fucking same!" The Jewish man says, and walks off.  
  
A couple of months later the Chinese man sees the same Jewish man walking ahead of him in the street. He runs up behind the Jewish man and punches him in the back of the head. The Jew falls on the floor and cries out, "What was that for?"  
  
"That was for the Titanic!" The Chinese man says, sniggering.  
  
"But that was an iceberg!" The Jew replies.  
  
"Iceberg, Goldberg, Spielberg, whatever! You're all the fucking same!"
***
Little Johnny
Little Johnny was on the bus headed to school one day and sitting by his best lady friend, Janey. 

Being curious children, Janey couldn't handle her curiosity any more and finally asked Johnny, "Johnny, what's a penis?" 

Johnny, being young and just as innocent, replied, "I don't know Janey. I'll ask my dad when I get home today." 

So later that day after school, Johnny went to his dad and asked him. "Dad, what's a penis", he said. His dad laughed a little bit and didn't really know what to do. Finally his dad said, "You know what Johnny, I could tell you, but instead, I'll show you." 

So his dad took him to the bathroom, pulled down his pants, and revealed himself to his son. "This is a penis Johnny", he said. "Not only is it a penis, but it is the perfect penis", he boasted proudly. 

Johnny was happy because he finally knew what a penis was and could share the news with Janey. 

The next day on the bus, Johnny told Janey, "I asked my dad and finally found out what a penis is". Janey was equally excited to find out. "Tell me!", she said. 

Johnny smiled and said, "Well Janey, I could tell you, but instead, I'll show you". So Johnny pulled down his pants and revealed himself to Janey. 

"This is a penis, Janey", he continued, "Not only that, but if it were a little smaller, it would be the perfect penis". 
***
Harley and Vaseline (I know...old as dirt, but...)
Joe wanted to buy a motorcycle.
He doesn't have much luck, until one  day, he comes across a Harley with a  'for sale' sign on it.

The bike looks better than a new one,  although it is 10 years old.  It's shiny and in mint condition.

He buys it and asks the seller how he  kept it in such great condition for 10  years.

'Well, it's quite simple,' says the  seller, 'whenever the bike is  outside and it's gonna rain, rub  Vaseline on the chrome.
It protects it from the rain, and he  hands Joe a jar of Vaseline.
  
That night, his girlfriend, Sandra,   invites him over to meet her parents.   Naturally, they take the bike there.
  
Just before they enter the house,   Sandra stops him and says, 'I have to   tell you something about my family.
  
'When we eat dinner, we don't talk.
  
In fact, the FIRST person who says   anything during dinner has to do the   dishes.'
  
'No problem,' he says.. And in they go.   Joe is shocked.  
Right in the middle of the living room   is a huge stack of dirty dishes.
  
In the kitchen is another huge stack of   dishes. Piled up on the stairs, in the   corridor, everywhere he looks.

Dirty dishes.
  
They sit down to dinner, and sure   enough, no one says a word.
  
As dinner progresses, Joe decides to   take advantage of the situation.
  
He leans over and kisses Sandra.
  
No one says a word.
  
He reaches over and fondles her  breasts. Nobody says a word.

So he stands up, grabs her, rips her   clothes off, throws her on the table and screws her, right there in front of   her parents.

His girlfriend is a little flustered, her  dad is obviously livid and her mom   horrified when he sits back down, but no one says a word.

He looks at her mom. She's got a great body too. 

Joe grabs mom, bends her over the   table, pulls down her panties, and   screws her every which way but loose 
right there on the dinner table.
  
She has a huge orgasm, & Joe sits   down.

His girlfriend is furious, her dad is   boiling, & Mom is beaming from ear to   ear. But still....Total silence.
  
All of a sudden there is a loud clap of   thunder, and it starts to rain.
  
Joe remembers his bike, so he pulls   the Large jar of Vaseline from his pocket.
  
Suddenly the father shouts,

I'll DO the bloody dishes!!

***
Four nuns die and appear at the pearly gates.
Four nuns are in a car on a road trip but die in a car accident on the way. 

They arrive at the pearly gates in heaven, where St. Peter says "I'm sure you ladies were all good since you're nuns, but you still gotta confess your sins and come clean before I can let you in" as he takes out a bucket of water. 

St. Peter asks the first nun "what are you sins?" And the nun confesses that she gave a someone handjob once. 

"Which hand?"
"My left hand"
"Place your left hand in this bucket of water and you shall be absolved of your sins"

Then St. Peter asks the 2nd nun the same question. 
"I too gave a man a handjob once. With my right hand"
"Place your right hand in this bucket of water and you too shall be absolved of all your sins"

St Peter then asks the 3rd nun about her sins, but the 4th nun cuts him off...

"If you think I'm gargling the water in that bucket after she sticks her ass in it, you're crazy!"

***
So the Bears were looking for a new quarterback.
The coach had put together the perfect team for the Chicago Bears. The only thing that was missing was a good quarterback. He had scouted all the colleges and even the Canadian and European Leagues, but he couldn't find a ringer who could ensure a Super Bowl win.

Then one night while watching CNN he saw a war-zone scene in Afghanistan . In one corner of the background, he spotted a young Afghan Muslim soldier with a truly incredible arm. He threw a hand-grenade straight into a 15th story window 100 yards away.

KABOOM!

He threw another hand-grenade 75 yards away, right into a chimney.

KA-BLOOEY!

Then he threw another at a passing car going 90 mph.

BULLS-EYE!

"I've got to get this guy!" Coach said to himself. "He has the perfect arm!"

So, he brings him to the States and teaches him the great game of football. And the Bears go on to win the Super Bowl.

The young Afghan is hailed as the great hero of football, and when the coach asks him what he wants, all the young man wants is to call his mother.

"Mom," he says into the phone, "I just won the Super Bowl!"

"I don't want to talk to you", the old Muslim woman says."You are not my son!"

"I don't think you understand, Mother," the young man pleads. "I've won the greatest sporting event in the world. I'm here among thousands of my adoring fans."

"No! Let me tell you!" his mother retorts. "At this very moment, there are gunshots all around us. The neighborhood is a pile of rubble. Your two brothers were beaten within an inch of their lives last week, and I have to keep your sister in the house so she doesn't get raped!" The old lady pauses, and then tearfully says, "I will never forgive you for making us move to Chicago !!!!
***
An American spy goes to Soviet Russia.
An American spy is in Soviet Russia. He is digging up information on a powerful Russian politician, and is pretending to be a Russian.

He finds the politician in a bar, and walks in, dressed in Russian attire. Everybody in the bar looks at him, but he keeps his cool. He orders a drink, and walks to the politician.

"Greetings, comrade", says the spy, but before he could finish his sentence, the Russian says, "I think you are American spy".

The spy is alarmed, but being a skilled, trained spy, he says, "that is not true, I am the proudest Soviet there is! I can sing the anthem more beautifully than any other man in the country!"

He then proceeds to sing the Soviet anthem, so melodically and beautifully. Everybody in the bar cheers.

"Very good, very good!", says the politician. "But I still think you are spy."

The man continues to keep his cool. "I am a historian! I can tell you everything about this glorious country!". He then spends about two hours recounting the Revolution, the Great Patriotic War, about how superior to the Russia is in terms of technology compared to America, and makes a great argument about how communism is beneficial to society.

"Amazing! You are skilled!", says the politician. The spy smirks. "But I still think you American spy."
The spy is getting frustrated, but still unfazed. He replies, "I am good drinker, a true Russian! Let us drink, and see who can come out top!"

The bar turns its attention to the politician and the spy, who are now in a drinking contest. The bartender serves drink after drink of vodka. After about an hour of drinking, the politician nearly passes out, unable to hold as much liquor as the spy, to a resounding cheer amongst the bar.

In the midst of the cheering, the Russian politician gets up, smiling, and in a slurred speech, repeats "You are good, you are good... but I still think you are spy."

The American spy, piss drunk, loses his skill and gives up. "Okay, you got me. I am an American. But what made you think that way, after all this time?"

The Russian politician replies, "there aren't many black people in Russia."
***
A Conductor on a train...
There once was this guy who worked for the Railroad as a conductor. Let's say his name was Joe. Well, Joe was walking through the train, en route, collecting tickets from the passengers. He comes to car 12, booth 3. In it was a man.

So, he asked him for his ticket: "Excuse me sir, do have your ticket?"

"Oh, I am soooo sorry, I dropped it out the window by accident," he replied.

"Sorry sir, can't have any passengers without tickets." He grabbed him by the scruff of the neck and threw him out of the train. Well, he landed on the tracks and was run over by the train. Naturally, the conductor was arrested and thrown in jail. He was convicted of murder before a jury of his peers, and sentenced to death by electrocution.

The day of his execution came up, and he was asked what he would like for his last meal. He asks for a banana. They gave it to him, he ate it, received his last rites, and was escorted to the chair. The executioner strapped him in, hooked everything up. Last, he threw the big switch once, and nothing happened. So, he did it again, and nothing happened. Well, by law the guy was legally dead, so they had to release him.

Oddly enough, the guy got a job on another railroad, as a conductor! One day, he was gathering tickets, and came to a booth with a little boy.

"Young man, do you have your ticket?", asked the conductor.

"A-a-a, I'm sorry, I ate it by mistake..", said the little boy.

And.. the same thing happened -- the boy was thrown off the train and killed. The guy was arrested, sentenced to death by electrocution. It came to him last day. The death row guard asked him what he would like for his meal. He asked for banana again. He ate it, and a priest gave him last rites.

He was escorted to the death chamber. This time, though, they were smart.

They washed his hands to get rid of any banana slime, they washed up the chair. Next, they placed him the chair, and hooked him up. The switch-puller pulled the switch once, and nothing happened. The switch-puller pulled the switch twice, and nothing happened, not even a single hair raising on the guy's chest.

Well, as the law says, they had to let him go...

Even more amazingly, he got a job on yet another railroad.

This time it was a rabbi. Same old stuff. Rabbi had no ticket (he forgot to buy it). Guy threw him off the train, rabbi died. Guy was arrested, convicted, sentenced to death by electrocution.

When the guard asked him what he would like for a last meal, he asked for a banana. He ate it, received last rites, and was escorted to the chamber.

However, this time the officials where going to get it right! They scrubbed his body with a brillo pad. They scrubbed the chair with steel wool. They tried the chair on a few other prisoners...

Okay, they strapped him in, and threw the switch once, nothing happened. Threw the switch a second time, nothing happened. At this point the guy was legally dead, etc, etc.

But, before the guy could leave, the executioner, extremely frustrated (he'd seen this same guy three times already). asked, "What is it with the banana!"

The guy replied, "I just like bananas."

So, the executioner screamed, "THEN HOW COME YOU DON'T DIE!!!!!"

"I dunno," replied the guy, "I guess I'm just not a very good conductor."






***
Taliban meets a Jew
A fleeing Taliban fighter desperate for water was trudging through the Afghan desert when he saw something far off in the distance.  Hoping to find water he hurried towards it only to find a little old Jewish man at a small stand selling ties.

The Taliban asked, “Do you have water?”

The Jewish man replied, “I have no water. Would you like to buy a tie? They are only $5.”

The Taliban shouted, “Infidel! I do not need an over-priced tie! I need water! I should kill you, but I must find water first!”

“OK, OK” said the old Jewish man, “It does not matter that you do not want to buy a tie and that you hate me. I will show you that I am bigger than that. If you continue over that hill to the east for about two miles, you will find a lovely restaurant. It has all the ice cold water you need. Shalom.”
Muttering, the Taliban fighter staggered away over the hill. Several hours later he staggered back, almost dead… “Your fucking brother won’t let me in without a tie!”

***
Paddy had been drinking
Paddy had been drinking at his local Dublin pub all day and most of the night celebrating Ireland's football victory. Mick, the bartender, says "You'll not be drinking any more tonight, Paddy"
Paddy replies "OK Mick, I'll be on me way then."
Paddy spins around on his stool and steps off. He falls flat on his face.
"Shoite" he says and pulls himself up by the stool and dusts himself off. He takes a step towards the door and falls flat on his face. "Shoite, Shoite!" He looks to the doorway and thinks to himself that if he can just get to the door and some fresh air he'll be fine. He belly crawls to the door and shimmies up to the door frame. He sticks his head outside and takes a deep breath of fresh air, feels much better and takes a step out onto the sidewalk. He falls flat on his face.
"Bi'Jesus... I'm tanked," he says. He can see his house just a few doors down, and crawls to the door and shimmies up the door frame, opens the door and shimmies inside. He takes a look up the stairs and says "No way!"
He crawls up the stairs to his bedroom door and says "If i can just make it to me bed." He takes a step into the room and falls flat on his face. He says "to hell with it" and falls into bed.
The next morning, his wife, Jess, comes into the room carrying a cup of coffee and says, "Get up Paddy. Did you have a bit to drink last night?".
Paddy says, "I did Jess. I was tanked' pissed. But how'd you know?"
"Mick called. You left y'wheelchair at the pub."
***
Two old friends were just about to tee off at the first hole of their local golf course when a guy carrying a golf bag called out to them.
"Do you mind if I join you? My partner didn't turn up".

Sure, they said, you’re welcome.

So they started playing and enjoyed the game and the company of the newcomer. Part way around the course, one of the friends asked the newcomer,

"What do you do for a living?"

I’m a hit man," was the reply.

"You're joking!” was the response.

"No, I'm not," he said, reaching into his golf bag, and pulling out a beautiful Martini sniper's rifle with a large telescopic sight. "Here are my tools."

That's a beautiful telescopic sight,” said the other friend, "Can I take a look? I think I might be able to see my house from here".

So he picked up the rifle and looked through the sight in the direction of his house.

"Yeah, I can see my house all right. "This sight is fantastic. I can see right in the window. Wow, I can see my wife in the bedroom".

"Ha Ha, I can see she's naked!! Wait a minute, that's my neighbor in there with her......He's naked, too!!! The bitch!"

He turned to the hit man. “How much do you charge for a hit?"

"I'll do a flat rate, for you: One thousand dollars every time I pull the trigger."

"Can you do two for me now?"

“Sure, what do you want?”

"First, shoot my wife; she's always been mouthy, so shoot her in the mouth. Then the neighbor, he's supposed to be a friend of mine, so just shoot his dick off to teach him a lesson."

The hit man took the rifle and took aim, standing perfectly still for a few minutes.

“Are you gonna do it or not?" asked the friend impatiently.

"Just be patient," said the hit man calmly . . . . . 
"I think I can save ya a grand here."


EDIT: Thank you kind stranger for the gold. It's my first and I really appreciate it!
***
An American company and Japanese company decided to have a boat race
Both teams practiced hard and long to reach their peak performance levels. On the big day they felt ready. The Japanese won by a mile. The American team was discouraged by the loss and corporate management decided that the reason for the crushing defeat had to be found, so a consulting firm was hired to investigate the problem and recommend corrective action.

The consultant's finding: The Japanese team had eight people rowing and one person steering; the American team had one person rowing and eight people steering.

After a year of study and millions spent analyzing the problem, the consultant firm concluded that the American team had too many people steering and not enough rowing.

As race day neared again the following year, the American team's management structure was completely reorganized.

The new structure: four steering managers, three area steering managers, and a new performance review system for the person rowing the boat to provide a work incentive.

The next year, the Japanese won by two miles. Humiliated, the American corporation laid off the rower for poor performance and gave the managers a bonus for discovering the problem.

EDIT: They outsourced the rowing to China and gave the money they saved to the Clinton Campaign.
 
***
Girl's night out
Two women friends had gone for a girl’s night out. Both were very faithful and loving wives, but they had gotten over-enthusiastic on the wine.

Incredibly drunk and walking home they needed to pee, so they stopped in the cemetery.

One of them had nothing to wipe with so she thought she would take off her panties and use them.

Her friend however was wearing a rather expensive pair of panties and did not want to ruin them.

She was lucky enough to squat down next to a grave that had a wreath with a ribbon on it, so she proceeded to wipe with that.

After the girls did their business, they proceeded to go home.

The next day one of the women’s husbands was concerned that his normally sweet and innocent wife was still in bed hung over, so he phoned the other husband and said, ‘These girl nights out have got to stop!  I’m starting to suspect the worst… My wife came home with no panties!!’

‘That’s nothing,’ said the other husband,  ’Mine came back with a card stuck to her arse that said……

‘From all of us at the Fire Station. We’ll never forget you!’
***
A young couple's house gets burgled, so they decide to get a guard dog...
The wife goes to a pet shop and tells the owner "I'd like to see the toughest guard dog you've got!"

The owner answers "I've got just the dog for you!". He presents to her to a tiny chihuahua called Roxy.

"Sure he's cute, but can he really guard a home?" she asks skeptically.

"Lady, this isn't just any dog, he is in fact a master of karate!". 

"Prove it!" she demands .
 
"Roxy, karate my chair!" he commands of the dog.

Roxy immediately attacks the chair in a blur of chops, kicks and uppercuts, leaving nothing but tinder.

"Roxy, karate my desk!"  he commands. Roxy sweeps the desk off its legs and breaks it apart in mid-air before it hits the ground.

"Do you accept checks?" she says bewildered. 


She brings Roxy home to her husband, who looks at the two of them aghast. 

"Why did you bring that little toy? We're looking for a guard dog!"

"Honey this isn't just any dog off the street, he happens to be a master of karate" she beams.

"Pffft" replies the husband. "Karate my ass!"


***
An American dude, a French dude, and a Japanese dude barely survive a shipwreck...
While clinging to floating debris and paddling towards shore they discuss what they will do to survive.

The American dude says:  *Well, I am a carpenter by trade, so I'll build us a shelter.*

The French dude says: *Ho-hoh!  Yers trulee eez the greatest chef ever!  I shall make grand meals to feed us!*

It gets decided that the Japanese dude would be in charge of supplies.

After kicking for hours they finally reach the shoreline, completely exhausted.  The Japanese dude gets up and sprints with deer-like speed into the jungle.  The American and French dudes look at each other and shrug, then get to work.

By the following evening, the American and French dudes have a reasonable shelter, a reliable firepit, and have enjoyed a few good meals.  They decide to go on a search for their friend.

Hours go by as they trek the thick jungle, no sign of their friend anywhere.  Just as they are about to give up, the Japanese guy jumps down from a tree, throws his arms up and yells out: *SUPPLIES!!!*

EDIT:  Thank you kind stranger for the gold!  I was not expecting this. I definitely was not expecting this. Having said that, I am really excited that my first gilded post was something that I tried to make entertaining and not some horrid /r/tifu about crapping myself at work.
***
An Irishman's Confession...
A married Irishman went into the confessional and said to his priest, "I almost had an affair with another woman."

The priest said, "What do you mean, almost?"

The Irishman said, "Well, we got undressed and rubbed together, but then I stopped."

The priest said, "Rubbing together is the same as putting it in. You're not to see that woman again. For your penance, say five Hail Marys and put £50 in the poor box."

The Irishman left the confessional, said his prayers and then walked over to the poor box. He paused for a moment and then started to leave. The priest, who was watching, quickly ran over to him saying, 

"I saw that you didn't put any money in the poor box!"

The Irishman replied, "Yeah, but I rubbed the £50 on the box and, according to you, that's the same as putting it in!"

***
A bus full of catholic school girls gets in a horrible accident.
Sadly all on the bus perished and are waiting in line at the pearly gates.  St Peter approaches the first girl in line.

"Mary Margaret, I have one question for you, and it is of the utmost importance that you answer truthfully.  Have you ever touched a penis?"

Mary blushed a little bit.  "Well, yes, I have.  I once reached into a boys pants and touched his penis with the tip of my finger.  But that was all."

"Very well Mary.  Dip your finger into this holy water and then you may enter Heaven."

St Peter then approaches the next girl in line.

"Anne Beth, have you ever touched a penis?"

"Yes, I once reached in a boys pants and grabbed his penis."

"Very well," said St Peter "Dip your hand in holy water and enter the Kingdom of Heaven.

At this point in time there is a commotion in the back of the line, as one of the girls is pushing her way up the line.

"Katherine Anne, you need to wait till it's your turn."  St Peter strictly informed the girl.

"No, I'm not staying in the back of the line.  There's no way I'm rinsing my mouth out with that holy water if Karen has to wash her ass out with it first!"
***
The story of John, the betting salior.
John was a young military salior with an unusual ability. He could make very off-the-wall predictions, and he had a knack for making money off them.

One day, a shipmate finds him making a small X on the deck with tape, and asks what he's doing. John stands up. "I'll bet you fifty bucks, in exactly an hour a seagull will fly over, and shit exactly on this spot." The other man laughs, says "You're on!", and they shake on it.

They both come back to the deck close to an hour later. After a few minutes, sure enough, they hear the calls of a gull, followed by a faint splat. The salior looks down in disbelief at the pile of bird shit on the center of the tape. He pays up.

A couple of days pass. It's a beautiful day, not a cloud in the sky. Back on the deck, another salior finds John walking around in his rain coat, and asks why he's wearing such odd attire on such a pretty day. "I'll bet you 100 dollars that you're gonna regret not wearing yours too in just a minute." The second man looks at him, and takes the bet. He begins to walk away, but before he can take a dozen steps, a single dark cloud forms in the sky and begins to soak the entire ship. 

These strange bets continue, and before long, news reaches the captain of the ship. He wants this madman off his boat. He calls some friends in high places, and gets John transfered to another vessel. A few days later, he receives a phone call from the commander of the destroyer John was placed on.

"You know," says the commander, "I don't see why you wanted him gone so bad. I've already won five thousand from him. He's not as good as you said."

"What? How'd you pull that off?"

The commander laughs. "The idiot bet me that I had hemorrhoids! I've never had them in my life, easy money! It was a little awkward proving it, but worth it."

"How'd you prove it?"

"Simple. I pulled down my pants, and showed him my asshole. He still didn't believe me, so he grabbed a broom and poked at me, and finally was convinced. Easiest five grand I've ever made."

There was a silence, and the captain finally said, "Throw that son of a bitch overboard right now."

"What? Why?" asked the commander.

"Because on his last day before the transfer, he bet me twenty thousand that he'd willingly have a broomstick up your ass by the end of the first week."
***
A man comes home very drunk late at night...
So this guy has been drinking with his buddies all night and he's as drunk as a skunk, gets home, falls up the stairs, undresses and goes to bed next to his wife. He falls asleep and next thing he knows, *bang*, he dies and finds himself waiting at the pearly gates.

The guy refuses to believe this is happening, he says to St. Peter: "This can't be possible, I'm a healthy man! This is not the way I die. You have to let me return down there!"  
The guy can see St. Peter looks like he's feeling sorry for him, but he tells him that unfortunately, there's no policy for allowing people back on Earth. The guy insists: "But come on, there's got to be something you can do! I'll put up with anything, really, as long as you let me go back down."  
So St. Peters tells him: "Well really, there's just this one possibility: you can go back, but only as a hen. That's the only thing we can allow." The guy guesses that this really is his only chance, so he agrees reluctantly.  
So he's back on Earth in this beautiful chicken coop, the sun is shining, there's green grass everywhere, this is hen paradise. The other hens greet him with delight and he tells them his story, everything goes nicely. But then he feels kind of unwell, there's something wrong with his stomach. He asks this old hen: "Tell me, I've got this weird feeling in my belly, I'm not too well. What is happening to me?"

The old hen: "Well dearie, we hens lay eggs, you know. I bet you've never laid a nice egg before... You need to push it out now, and you'll feel much better after!"  
So the guy pushes and pushes, and *wham*, out pops his first egg. The old hen congratulates him and he feels much better. But not 5 minutes later, his pain comes back. He returns to the old hen for advice.

"Well dearie, it's quite special but it happens that you need to lay TWO eggs, so go back there and keep pushing!"   
So he goes back to his nest and pushes, and nothing comes, and he pushes harder, and *wham*, out comes his second egg! He feels much better, but not 2 minutes later, you guessed it, he's back in terrible pain and goes to see the old hen.

"What's this bullshit here, and don't tell me I've got a third egg to lay!" The old hen can't make head or tail of it and just tells him that when in doubt, he should be pushing. So the guy goes back to work and then, *wham*, his wife wakes him up with this smashing slap in the face and yells: "*Aren't you fucking done shitting the bed, you son of a bitch?*"
***
A man asked a waiter to take a bottle of Merlot to an unusually attractive woman sitting alone at a table in a cozy little restaurant.
The waiter took the Merlot to the woman and said, 'This is from the gentleman who is seated over there'. . . and indicated the sender with a nod of his head. She stared at the wine coolly for a few seconds, not looking at the man, then decided to send a reply to him by a note. The waiter, who was lingering nearby for a response, took the note from her and conveyed it to the gentleman. The note read:'For me to accept this bottle, you need to have a Mercedes in your garage, a million dollars in the bank and 7 inches in your pants'.. After reading the note, the man decided to compose one of his own in return. He folded the note, handed it to the waiter and instructed him to deliver it to the lady. It read: 'Just to let you know things aren't always what they appear to be, I have a Ferrari Maranello, BMW Z8, Mercedes CL600, and a Porsche Turbo in my several garages; I have beautiful homes in Aspen and Miami , and a 10,000 acre ranch in Louisiana .There is over twenty million dollars in my bank account. But, not even for a woman as beautiful as you, would I cut off
three inches.  Just send the wine back.'
***
REPUTATION
There was a man who worked for the Post Office whose job was to process all the mail that had illegible addresses.
One day, a letter came addressed in a shaky handwriting to God with no actual address. He thought he should open it to see what it was about.
The letter read:
Dear God,
I am an 83 year old widow, living on a very small pension.
Yesterday someone stole my purse. It had $100 in it, which was all the money I had until my next pension payment.
Next Sunday is Christmas, and I had invited two of my friends over for dinner. Without that money, I have nothing to buy food with, have no family to turn
to, and you are my only hope. Can you please help me?
Sincerely, Edna
The postal worker was touched. He showed the letter to all the other workers. Each one dug into his or her wallet and came up with a few dollars.
By the time he made the rounds, he had collected $96, which they put into an envelope and sent to the woman.
The rest of the day, all the workers felt a warm glow thinking of Edna and the dinner she would be able to share with her friends.
Christmas came and went.
A few days later, another letter came from the same old lady to God.
All the workers gathered around while the letter was opened.
It read:
Dear God,
How can I ever thank you enough for what you did for me?
Because of your gift of love, I was able to fix a glorious dinner for my friends. We had a very nice day and I told my friends of your wonderful gift.
By the way, there was $4 missing.
I think it might have been those bastards at the post office.
Sincerely, Edna
***
the most famous person in the history of the world
The teacher addressed his class,"I'll give five dollars to anybody who can name the most famous person in the history of the world."
An Irish boy raised his hand and said,"St. Patrick."
"Sorry Seamus, that's not correct."
Then a French boy raised his hand and said,"Napoleon."
The teacher replied,"I'm sorry, Jean, that's not right either."
Finally, a Jewish boy raised his hand and answered,"Jesus Christ."
"That's right, David! You win the five dollars. Congratulations!" As the teacher was handing over the cash he said,"You know David, I'm surprised you said Jesus Christ."
"Yeah, in my heart I knew it was Moses. But business is business."
***
Tom, a notorious womanizer...
...dies and goes to hell.  

The devil is walking him down the brimstone corridors, showing him around the place.  "You know, Tom," he says, "just because you're in hell doesn't mean you have to stay here.  You can go to heaven if you'd like... and sit on a cloud all day, playing the harp... if that's your idea of a good time."

Tom shrugs.  "That sounds pleasant enough, I guess."

"But if you DO stay here," says the Devil, "let me show you what your fate will be."

He pulls back a curtain.  Tom finds himself staring through a bedroom window at the most beautiful woman he's ever seen.  She's stretched out on the bed, naked, and absolutely perfect from head to toe.  Tom had been with hundreds of women, but none of them could compare to her.

A fat, ugly, sweaty, pimply ogre is making violent love to the woman, but Tom scarcely notices him, so captivated by her is he.

He turns to the devil.  "Are you saying I'll get to do that... for eternity?"

"That's right."

"Then my mind's made up!  No heaven for me.  I'm staying right here!"

"Wonderful!" says the devil.  He raps on the window.  "Hey, Bruno!  Get that chick out of there!  I got a new playmate for you!"


***
Pentagon Contract
A contractor arrives home from Washington, D.C. and proudly tells his wife that he’s gotten the contract to fix a cracked walkway into the Pentagon.

“Two other contractors showed up to bid on the job,” he explained to her. “One was from Minnesota, the other from Tennessee. All three of us went to the Pentagon with an official to examine the cracked walkway.

“The Minnesota contractor took out a tape measure, did some measuring, then worked some figures with a pencil.

“’Well,’ he said, ‘I can do the job for about $9,000: $4,000 for materials, $4,000 for my crew, and $1,000 for me.’

 “The Pentagon official told him to write up his bid and send it in for consideration.

“The Tennessee contractor then did the same, measuring and figuring, and then he said, ‘I can do this job for $7,000. $3,000 for materials, $3,000 for my crew, and $1,000 for me.’

 “The Pentagon official told him to write up his bid and send it in for consideration.

“I didn’t measure anything. I just pulled the Pentagon official aside and whispered, I can do the job for $27,000.”

 “The official was incredulous and said, ‘You didn’t even measure like the other guys! How did you come up with such an incredibly high figure?’

 “I whispered, ‘$10,000 for you, $10, 000 for me, and we hire the guy from Tennessee to fix the walkway.”
***
Husband and wife accidentally discover a genie
A Husband takes his wife to play her first game of golf. Of course, the wife promptly hacked her first shot right through the window of the biggest house adjacent to the course.


The husband cringed, 'I warned you to be careful! Now we'll have to go up there, find the owner, apologize and see how much your lousy drive is going to cost us.'

So the couple walked up to the house and knocked on the door. A warm voice said, 'Come on in.'

When they opened the door they saw the damage that was done: glass was all over the place, and a broken antique bottle was lying on its side near the pieces of window glass.

A man reclining on the couch asked, 'Are you the people that broke my window?'

'Uh...yeah! , sir. We're sure sorry about that,' the husband replied.

'Oh, no apology is necessary. Actually I want to thank you.. You see, I'm a genie, and I've been trapped in that bottle for a thousand years. Now that you've released me, I'm allowed to grant three wishes. I'll give you each one wish, but if you don't mind, I'll keep the last one for my self.'

Wow, that's great!' the husband said. He pondered a moment and blurted out, 'I'd like a million dollars a year for the rest of my life.'

'No problem,' said the genie 'You've got it, it's the least I can do.. And I'll guarantee you a long, healthy life!'

'And now you, young lady, what do you want?' the genie asked.

'I'd like to own a gorgeous home in every country in the world complete with servants,' she said.

'Consider it done,' the genie said. 'And your homes will always be safe from fire, burglary and natural disasters!'


'And now,' the couple asked in unison, 'what's your wish, genie?'

'Well, since I've been trapped in that bottle, and haven't been with a woman in more than a thousand years, my wish is to have sex with your wife.'

The husband looked at his wife and said, 'Gee, honey, you know we both now have a fortune, and all those houses. What do you think?'

She mulled it over for a few moments and said, 'You know, you're right. Considering our good fortune, I guess I wouldn't mind, but what about you, honey?'

You know I love you sweetheart,' said the husband. I'd do the same for you!'


So the genie and the woman went upstairs where they spent the rest of the afternoon enjoying each other.


The genie was insatiable. After about three hours of non-stop sex, the genie rolled over and looked directly into her eyes and asked, How old are you and your husband?'

'Why, we're both 35,' she responded breathlessly.

'No Kidding,' he said.


'Thirty-five years old and you both still believe in genies?'

EDIT - Obligatory first time to front page recognition. Thanks to everyone! I had not seen this in jokes before, and am glad you all liked it. 
***
Biker goes to Hell

One day a Biker dies and finds himself in hell. As he is wallowing in despair, he has his first meeting with the devil…

Satan: “Why so glum?”

Biker: “What do you think? I’m in hell!”


 Satan: “Hell’s not so bad. We actually have a lot of fun down here. You a drinking man?”

Biker: “Sure, I love to drink.”

Satan: “Well, you’re gonna love Mondays then. On Mondays, that’s all we do is drink. tequila, Guinness, red wine, single malt scotch. We drink ’til we throw up and then we drink some more! And you don’t have to worry about getting a hangover, because you’re dead anyway.”

Biker: “Gee that sounds great!”

Satan: “You a smoker?”

Biker: “You better believe it.”

Satan: “All right! You’re gonna love Tuesdays. We get the finest cigars from all over the world, and smoke our lungs out. If you get cancer, no biggie, you’re already dead, remember?”

Biker: “Wow…that’s awesome!”

Satan: “I bet you like to gamble.”

Biker: “Why, yes, as a matter of fact I do.”

Satan: “Good,’ cause Wednesdays you can gamble all you want. Craps, blackjack, roulette, poker, slots, whatever. If you go bankrupt, it doesn’t matter, you’re dead anyhow.”

Biker: “Cool!”

Satan: “What about Drugs?”

Biker: “Are you kidding? Love drugs! You don’t mean…?”

Satan: “That’s right! Thursday is drug day.. Help yourself to a great big bowl of crack or smack. Smoke a doobie the size of a submarine. You can do all the drugs you want. You’re dead so who cares.”

Biker: “Wow! I never realized Hell was such a cool place!”

Satan: “You gay?”

Biker: “No……”

Satan: “Ooooh, Fridays are gonna be tough…

***
Seamus and Murphy wanted to go out drinking like respectable Irishman, but they didn't have alot of money...
Between them, they could only raise the staggering sum of one Euro.

Murphy said to Seamus ‘Hang on my friend, I have an idea.’

He went next door to the butcher’s shop and came out with one large sausage.

Seamus said ‘Are you crazy Murph? Now we don’t have any money left at all!’

Murphy replied, ‘Don’t worry – just follow me.’

He went into the pub where he immediately ordered two pints of Guinness and two glasses of Jameson Whisky.

Seamus said ‘Now you’ve lost it. Do you know how much trouble we will be in? We haven’t got any money!!’

Murphy replied, with a smile. ‘Don't worry, I have a plan, Cheers!’

They downed their drinks. Murphy said, ‘OK, I’ll stick the sausage through my zipper and you go on your knees and put it in your mouth.’

The barman noticed them, went berserk, and threw them out.

They continued this, pub after pub, getting more and more drunk, all for free.

At the tenth pub Seamus said ‘Murphy – I don’t think I can do any more of this. I’m drunk and me knees are killin’ me!’

Murphy said, ‘Well how do you think I feel? I don't even remember which bar I lost the sausage in!"

Edit: Spelling. I suck lol
***
Paybacktime

A man left for work one Friday afternoon. But, being payday, instead of going home, he stayed out the entire weekend partying with the boys and spending his entire paycheck.

When he finally appeared at home, Sunday night, he was confronted by a very angry wife and was barraged for nearly two hours with a tirade befitting his actions. Finally his wife stopped the nagging and simply said to him.

"How would you like it if you didn't see me for two or three days?"

To which he replied. "That would be fine with me."

Monday went by and he didn't see his wife. Tuesday and Wednesday came and went with the same results. But on Thursday, the swelling went down just enough where he could see her a little out of the corner of his left eye
***
A Frenchman, an Englishman, and an Italian have all been captured by the KGB
The KGB grab the Frenchman and take him away to be tortured. He holds out for a few hours, but eventually he cracks and tells them everything. 

Next they grab the Englishman. He too manages to hold out for a few hours, but then he can't take the pain any more and tells them what they want to know.

The KGB finally comes for the Italian. The Englishman and the Frenchman wait for hours, wondering what has become of their friend. Finally, 12 hours later, the KGB dump a badly beaten Italian back in the cell. The Frenchman and Englishman both help him up, and ask him, "Why didn't you tell them, how did you hold out so long?"

The Italian replies, "I tried to tell them, I really did, but they wouldn't untie my hands!" 
***
A married couple is driving...
down the interstate doing 55 mph. The husband is behind the wheel. His wife looks over at him. "Honey, I know we've been married for 15 years, but I want a divorce." The husband says nothing, but slowly turns up to speed to 60 mph.

"I don't want you to talk me out of it, because I've been having an affair with your best friend, and he's a better lover than you."

70 mph.

"I want the house as well."

75 mph.

"I want the kids."

80 mph.

"And I want the bank account and all the credit cards."

85 mph.

"You're taking this incredibly calmly," she said. "Isn't there anything you want?"

"I've got all I need."

"What's that?"

"The airbag."
***
Socrates the philosopher . . .
Keep this in mind the next time you are about to repeat a rumor or spread gossip. 

In ancient Greece (469 - 399 BC), Socrates was widely lauded for his wisdom. One day an acquaintance ran up to him excitedly and said, "Socrates, do you know what I just heard about Diogenes?"

"Wait a moment," Socrates replied, "Before you tell me I'd like you to pass a little test. It's called the Triple Filter Test."

"Triple filter?" asked the acquaintance.

"That's right," Socrates continued, "Before you talk to me about Diogenes let's take a moment to filter what you're going to say. The first filter is Truth. Have you made absolutely sure that what you are about to tell me is true?"

"No," the man said, "Actually I just heard about it."

"All right," said Socrates, "So you don't really know if it's true or not. Now let's try the second filter, the filter of Goodness. Is what you are about to tell me about Diogenes something good?"

"No, on the contrary..."

"So," Socrates continued, "You want to tell me something about Diogenes that may be bad, even though you're not certain it's true?"

The man shrugged, a little embarrassed. Socrates continued, "You may still pass the test though, because there is a third filter, the filter of Usefulness. Is what you want to tell me about Diogenes going to be useful to me?"

"No, not really."

"Well," concluded Socrates, "If what you want to tell me is neither True nor Good nor even Useful, why tell it to me or anyone at all?"

The man was bewildered and ashamed. This is an example of why Socrates was a great philosopher and held in such high esteem.

It also explains why Socrates never found out that Diogenes was banging his wife.
***
A teacher gave her class an assignment.....
She asked all the kids to come back to school the next day with a story, and what the story teaches you.  

The next day she asked who wants to share their story.  Little Johnny goes first and says "I live on a farm, and we had 12 chicken eggs, but only 10 of them hatched.  That teaches you to not count your chicks before they hatch"

Little Susie went next and said "I live on a farm as well, and we were taking eggs to the market one day, but the basket fell out of the back of the truck and all the eggs broke.  That teaches you to not put all your eggs in one basket."

Nobody else would volunteer, so the teacher called on little Billy and said "Billy why don't you share your story."  Billy got a dark look on his face and said, "Well my mom did tell me a story about my uncle Bob once.  He was a gunner on a helicopter during Vietnam.  One day his chopper got shot down and Bob fell to the earth.  While he was falling he had three things on him.  A bottle of whiskey, a machine gun, and a knife.  As he was falling he decided to drink the bottle of whiskey so that it wouldn't break when he hit the ground.  When he hit the ground, he was surrounded by 100 Viet Cong.  He used his machine gun and killed 50 of them before he ran out of ammo.  Then he used the knife to kill another 40 of them before the blade broke.  Then he killed the last 10 with hand to hand combat."  Johnny finished his story and the teacher said "That's amazing! But what does it teach you?"  Johnny told her "It teaches you not to fuck with Uncle Bob after he's had a few drinks." 
***
HARLEY DAVIDSON MEETS GOD
The inventor of the Harley Davidson Motorcycle Corporation, Arthur Davidson, died and went to heaven. At the gates, St. Peter told Arthur, "Since you've been such a good man and your motorcycles have changed the world, your reward is you can hang out with anyone you want in Heaven."
Arthur thought about it for a minute and then said, "I want to hang out with God." St. Peter took Arthur to the Throne Room, and introduced him to God.

Arthur then asked God, "Hey, aren't you the inventor of woman?"

God said, "Ah, yes."

"Well," said Arthur, "professional to professional, you have some major design flaws in your invention:

1. There's too much inconsistency in the front-end protrusion.
2. It chatters constantly at high speeds.
3. Most of the rear ends are too soft and wobble too much.
4. The intake is placed ! way too close to the exhaust.
5. And the maintenance costs are outrageous."

"Hmmmm, you may have some good points there," replied God, "hold on." God went to his Celestial super computer, typed in a few words and waited for the results. The computer printed out a slip of paper and God read it.

"Well, it may be true that my invention is flawed," God said to Arthur, "but according to these numbers, more men are riding my invention than yours."
***
An old tramp goes on a deluxe cruise...
There was this tramp. One cold winter's morning he was walking along a country road, when he heard a cry for help from a nearby lake.

Without a moment's hesitation he ran out onto the ice and slipped and slided over to a little girl. He managed to pull her out without breaking the ice further and carried her back to the road. He took off his coat and wrapped her in it then began looking for a car to flag down.

Coincidentally the father drives up. "How can I ever thank you sir?" he says after putting his daughter into the warmth of the limo. "Just name your price - I'm a wealthy man."

"Ah, well..." stammers the tramp, "... uh, I'm a little short of cash, perhaps you could help me out."

"Oh dear," says the father, "I don't carry much cash with me, I only have ten pounds - but come home with me and I'll get more from the safe."

"No! No!" says the tramp, "Why ten pounds is more money than I've seen in my whole life - that'll be plenty."

"Ten pounds," thinks the tramp, "I'm rich! I'm rich!" and off he goes to the town to buy himself a holiday.

He finds a travel agent, walks in - much to the disgust of the staff - and goes up to the desk. "I'll have one holiday please!"

"Ahem, which holiday would sir like?" asked the girl at the desk, forcing a smile.

"Oh, any holiday I don't mind, anything up to ten pounds," replies the tramp.

"TEN POUNDS! You'll NEVER get a holiday for ten pounds," says the girl incredulously.

She goes into the back of the shop, and searches in the deepest, dustiest filing drawers she can find. There - to her amazement - she finds an old file.

"Well you'll never believe it," she says to the tramp, back in the shop. "I've got you a holiday - its a super-duper, ultra-hyper, mega-economy class round the world cruise - and it costs ten pounds."

"Yippee!" exclaims the tramp, "I'll take it!"

A few days later he arrives at the port, and there in the dock is the most beautiful, most elaborately decorated, most expensive looking ocean-going liner he has ever seen.

"Get off my ship ye dirty bum!" shouts a voice, and an irate captain storms down the gangplank and kicks the tramp down onto the dockside.

"But I've got my ticket!", responds the tramp, "super-duper, ultra-hyper, mega-economy class, and I want on!"

"Well okay," says the captain, "but you can't come on just now, I don't want my first-class passengers seeing you. Come back at midnight when it's dark and I'll let you on then."

So the tramp finds himself a quiet spot among some cargo cases on the dockside, and he falls asleep.

"Psst," says a voice, waking him with a start. It was the captain.

"Hurry up, it's midnight, let's get you to your cabin."

The tramp toddles after the captain, along the dockside, up the gangway, and onto the ship - and what a ship!

First they went down through the first class level: Oriental carpets - 6" pile. A genuine Rembrandt on every wall. Leave your shoes outside for cleaning, and the steward brings a new pair. 24 ct gold trim everywhere.

Then the second class: As above, but perhaps the carpets were only 3" deep, and so on...

3rd, 4th, 5th class, down past the casinos, and the ballrooms, down through the crew's quarters, down through the galleys, and the engine rooms, until finally, at the lowest point in the ship, against the very hull, the captain opens a watertight door into a tiny 7' x 4' cabin, with a hammock, a bedside table, and an alarm clock.

"Sheer luxury!" exclaimed the tramp, "A room of my very own."

"I'm glad you like it," replies the captain, "but there is one more thing... Your class of ticket only allows you to use the facilities of the ship, at night - when all the other passengers are asleep. So that's what the alarm clock is for. Enjoy your cruise."

Well the cruise began, and the tramp had a whale of a time. Sleeping by day, and up on deck at night - he loved it. One-man-tennis, clay pigeon shooting, more food than he'd ever seen...

Then one morning, a week or so into the cruise, the tramp decided he'd have a go on the diving board of the pool. He had just enough time for one dive before he had to go below.

He climbed up the ladder, stepped onto the board tip, bounced, and dived...

... and what a dive...!

Perfectly poised in the air, he hit the water without so much as a ripple.

Now unknown to him, the captain - who'd grown rather fond of the poor old tramp - was standing watching this.

"That was amazing!" exclaimed the captain, "Where did you learn to dive like that?"

"Um, well I've never actually dived before," replied the tramp.

"Well that's incredible!" says the captain, "I've never seen..." He broke off. "Hey, I've got an idea", he started again. "How would you like to train a bit, and we'll put on a show for the other passengers. I'll pay you, and you can then afford to go first class!"

"It's a deal!" says our man. For the next 3 weeks the tramp practices like he's never practiced before. Back-flips, front-flips, triple-back sideways axled dives, you name it he tried it.

Then one morning the captain comes to talk. "Okay, I'd like you to stay in your cabin for the next 2 days. We're going to erect a high diving board for you."

"Okay," agreed the tramp.

Two days passed, and the big day arrived. The ship was humming with excitement. Everyone wanted to see the mystery diver. The captain had provided the tramp with a new pair of swimming trunks and he wore these as he stepped out onto the sun-beaten deck. Gasps of astonishment from the crowd, and a hushed awe. Higher than the eye could see, towering up and up, rose a slender column of metal.

"Well, tramp," said the captain, shaking his hand, "Let's see what you can do." And with that the Captain handed him a walkie talkie. And the tramp began to climb...

up and up...

below him the ship grew smaller...

on and on...

past a solitary albatross...

and still higher...

till the ship was but a speck on the ocean below...

and on still further...

till the ocean grew dim...

and the earth itself...

began to shrink...

past our moon...

and on...

and Mars...

and on...

higher, and higher...

through the asteroid belt...

and on and on towards the diving board...

past the outer planets, until...

on the outermost reaches of the Solar System...

he reached the board.

He climbed on top and radioed the captain...

and then...
he jumped.
Slowly at first, but speeding up, faster, and faster, speeding past Pluto, and the other outer planets, through the asteroid belt, past Mars, and the moon, faster, and faster, faster - ever faster, and by now the earth was growing large in the distance, the oceans and land masses grew clear, faster, and faster, past the albatross, double-back somersault, and he could see the ship, tiny in the distance. hurtling down now, he posed, ready for the final 500 feet. Down on the ship the crew strained their necks,

"I CAN SEE HIM!" yelled a passenger, "LOOK!!!"

The tramp streaked down towards the pool on the deck, did a last triple flip, and landed...

NOT A RIPPLE ON THE SURFACE!

DOWN THROUGH THE WATER!

SMASHED THROUGH THE POOL BOTTOM!

DOWN THROUGH THE FIRST DECK!

SMASHING THROUGH THE SECOND!

DOWN!

DOWN!

THROUGH THE CREW'S QUARTERS!

THROUGH THE ENGINE ROOMS!

SMASHING THROUGH HIS OWN LITTLE CABIN!

AND DOWN THROUGH THE DOUBLE-STRENGTH STEEL HULL OF THE SHIP!

STILL DOWN...!

DEEPER,

DEEPER INTO THE MURKY DEPTHS,

TILL.........

SMASH!

Into the sea bed, sinking a 37' shaft in the process.

Desperate for air he struggle out of the shaft, his lungs bursting he swam frantically for the surface.

Up and up, desperate, gasping...

Out of the water, up the ladder onto the deck of the ship, into a throng wild with acclaim.

"HERO!" "WONDERFUL!" "AMAZING!" "GOOD SHOW THAT!"

And handing him a heated towel the captain spoke, as a hush fell over the crowd.

"Well tramp, I have NEVER seen anything like that, EVER. That was the most *STUPENDOUS* piece of diving I have ever seen."

The tramp blushed.

The captain went on, "but tell me, most amazing of all is how you survived smashing through this boat after you dived - how did you do it?"

And the tramp looked at the captain, and the crowd and replied modestly: "Well you see, I'm a just poor tramp so you must understand... I've been through many a hard ship in my life."
***
A lawyer and a priest die and go to heaven.
"Welcome!", says St. Peter. "Follow me and I'll show you your new homes!"

First, he shows the lawyer a humongous mansion with a huge garden and several large fountains. "This is where you'll be living", St. Peter says. The lawyer starts jumping around due to excitement and rushes inside. 

The priest becomes excited. He's served God his whole life, so he knows that he will get an amazing house that'll be even better than the magnificent house that the lawyer got.

However, St. Peter takes him to a shabby old apartment with several cars in the parking lot. There are numerous identical apartments surrounding this shabby apartment.

"This is where you'll be living.", St. Peter says.

The priests goes ballistic. "ARE YOU FUCKING KIDDING ME?! I'VE SERVED GOD MY ENTIRE GODDAMN LIFE! WHY THE FUCK DO I GET SUCH A SHITTY PLACE TO LIVE?!", he says.

St. Peter sighs and says, "Well, we've got thousands upon thousands of priests here, but that's the first lawyer we've ever gotten!".
***
Stalin & the sneezer
Stalin is giving a long speech at an event, naturally in front of a huge audience. While he's in full flow, somebody near the front of the hall sneezes. Stalin stops and surveys the crowd.

"Who sneezed?" he asks.

Deathly silence. 

"I repeat," says Stalin, "who sneezed?"

Not a peep.

"Very well," says Stalin. "First row, stand up!" Everyone in the first row stands up. "Guards! Open fire!"

A few seconds later, the entire first row of the audience is lying in bloody heaps on the ground.

"Now, who sneezed?" Still not a whimper. "Second row, stand up! Guards! Open fire!" The second row writhes and breathes its last.

"Now, comrades: who sneezed?" Absolute silence. "Third row! Stand up! Guards! Op...."

"Wait! Wait!" From the sixth row a man rises, shaking so hard with fear that he can barely stay on his legs. "Please! Comrade Stalin! It was me. I sneezed."

Stalin fixes his eye on the wretch. The entire audience watches, paralysed. 

"You sneezed?"

"Yes, Comrade Stalin, yes. It was me."

"Bless you, comrade!"
  
***
Joe walks into a bar...
...when he comes inside he sees Billy sitting by the bar wearing a huge watch, which is way to big to be comfortable. 

Joe walks up to him and says "hey Billy, where the hell did you get that watch?"

Billy points into the corner and says "do you see the old man sitting in the corner there?"

"Yeah" says Joe

"well, he can grant wishes" Billy

Joe gets all excited "like real wishes?"

Billy says "yes, but..."

but Joe is exited and doesn't let Billy finish, runs to the old man sitting in the corner and asks him "do you grant wishes?"

"yes, one wish per person" says the old man

"all right, I wish that my pockets were always full of money" and suddenly Joe's pockets start bulging out.

Joe runs to the bar and says the bartender "bartender, get me 2 beers, 2 shots of tequila and a bottle of whiskey"

Joe then reaches into his pockets for his money, but it isn't money, it's all gooey "this is honey, but I asked for money"

then Billy says "Do you think I asked for a 12" inch long clock?"
***
When I was about 17 or 18 I first noticed that my sister was a hottie.
First of all, - just for some background: My Mum died right when I was born, (she was actually really, really hot- but this isn't about her. I guess that's fucked up to say, but whatever.) I actually grew up with my dad's family, because my dad has all sorts of emotional issues and he bailed before I was born. So you can see, my childhood was really kind of messed up.

Anyways, growing up I feel like there was always a lot of distance between me and my sister. When I was about 17 or 18 I first noticed that my sister was a hottie.

I don't want to go into too many details about it, but basically what happened is that I accidentally found a video that she made of herself. I knew she didn't make it for me- but I thought she was so fucking beautiful that I watched it twice. I probably would have watched it a hell of a lot more, except that like right around the time I found the video, all this crazy shit went down and I had to leave home. (My dad's family who I was staying with got in bad trouble with the law. I never talk about it).

Sooo... I was totally lusting after my sister at that point. She was also having bad trouble with the law. She was actually in custody when I left home.

My friend and I went to go pick her up. When I saw her that day, after seeing the video, I have to be honest, I just wanted to fuck her brains out. Looking back on it now, it's pretty messed up- but I think she had feelings for me too. She actually kissed me right after we came to get her... and it wasn't a sisterly kiss, you know? I mean, it wasn't like ridiculously sexual or anything, but it definitely wasn't sisterly.

After we left, we all went to crash with my Sister's friends. On the trip there, my friend sort of implied that he wanted to get with my Sister, and I got a little jealous. He's a good looking guy- and even though she was my sister- I just felt like he was competition. Not much else happened between us for a while except some maybe-sexy hugging.
Pretty much everyone in my life at that point was wanted by the government, so we all moved around a lot. I'm not saying that I'm proud of it or anything, but it was kind of an awesome time.

My friend and my sister never hooked up I don't think- but I thought there was some serious sexual tension going on between them. It was around that time that I got really badly hurt in an accident. It was fucked up. I almost died. But when I was in recovery my sister came to see me, and out of the clear blue sky she started gives me this awesome, slow, passionate kiss on the lips.

Sadly (although, I guess for the best) nothing ever came of it. We spent some time apart... and I started to get really religious, so I tried not to think of her that way. It was actually going well for a long time- like I was totally over her.

But I have to say, like a year or so after all that stuff went down, we were out sailing (not like a date or anything romantic like that), and she was wearing like the hottest bikini I've ever fucking seen and it brought back all the old feelings. Sigh.

A little while later she actually wound up with my friend from before (the sexual tension guy). I can't say I was surprised.
But even after she was shacking up with my friend, there was one time we were at a party... my friend was inside, and my sister and I were outside alone.

It was a really intimate moment. I think something might have happened, except that I killed the mood when I told her that Darth Vader was our father and that I had to go face him.
***
Full list of Latvia Jokes.
Joke:

Three men are in ship. One Latvian, one Russian, one Lithuanian. Lithuanian take out one bottle wodka. Russian kill Lithuanian, then drink wodka. Then Latvian wait until Russian drink self to sleep, then kill. Is end.

Joke:

Latvian: Is so cold.
All: How cold is?
Latvian: Very. Also dark.

Joke:

A fishmonger says to a bootblack, "Are there any more potato left?" Bootblack says, "Yes, one. But it has gone bad." The fishmonger says, "I am very hungry. I have not eaten for three days. I shall eat it, even if it makes me very ill." And bootblack says, "I did not speak truth. In reality, there is no food left. You shall go hungry yet another day, my friend."

Joke:

Man is hungry. He steal bread to feed family. Get home, find all family have sent Siberia! “More bread for me,” man think. But bread have worm.

Joke:

Janis: I hope my son does not die during night.
Guntis: What is "hope"?
Janis: Yes. I know what you say.
Guntis: No. I am serious. What is hope?
Janis: In truth, I do not know. 

Joke:

Questioning: Why did chicken cross road?
Answering: I have not seen chicken since I was very young, on my parents' farm. This is before the Cossacks slaughtered them. I can still hear screams of sister as soldiers rape her. But back to question, where did you see chicken? I am very, very hungry.

Joke:

Man car break down near house of farmer. Take shelter in barn. Find farmer daughter in barn. Oh! Hot stuff! But TOO LATE! Is already rape by soldier.

Joke:

Knock knock
Who’s there?
Latvian.
Latvian who?
Please open door. Is cold.

Joke:

Latvian walk into bar with poodle under one arm and salami under other. Eat salami first.

Joke:

How many Latvian is take screw in light bulb?
Only one. Obtain light bulb is hard part. You have potato?

Joke:

How is get one-arm Latvian out of tree?
Is no one-arm Latvian! Why you silly? All go Center for Great Peaceful Physical Reassignment. You no ask.

Joke:

Why six is afraid seven? Because seven have many friend politburo.

Joke:

Latvian walk into bar with pig on shoulder. Bartender say, “That look delicious!” But pig say, “No. Is Latvian. Taste is similar to dog.”

Joke:

Latvian walk into bar with mule. Bartender say, “Why so long face?” Latvian say, “I was thinking of my daughter. She has been lie with soldier for potato feed baby. “

Joke:

Is dead dog in road. Is dead Latvian in road. What difference?
Dog have fur keep warm. Also, freedom. And dog try eat poop for pleasure not just survive. So many thing!

Joke:

Latvian is rub lamp find genii. Genii say, “What is three wishes?” Latvian say, “I wish potato!” Then, POOF! Potato! Latvian so happy! “Oh! Is potato! Is potato!” say Latvian. Genii ask, “What is next wish?” Latvian is say, “I wish you go away so can enjoy potato!” POOF! Too bad. Also, was only lamp.

Joke:

Little boy Janis Dipers is get trouble, school. After teacher is beat, make also stay detention all alone. While detention, teacher is get horny! Teacher and Janis is make sex. “Janis Dipers!” teacher shout! “But teacher,” Janis say, “I too hungry for energy do that.”

Joke:

Three Latvian are brag about sons. “My son is soldier. He have rape as many women as want,” say first Latvian. “Zo?” second say, “My son is farmer. He have all potato he want!” Third Latvian wait long time, then say, “My son is die at birth. For him, struggle is over.” “Wow! You are win us,” say others. But all are feel sad.

Joke:

Boy: But mother, I no are like grandma.
Mother: Eat anyway. Is no potato.

Joke:

Latvian walk into bar and say, “I have not eaten for many days. One full beer will be too much for me. How much just maybe one shot beer?” Bartender say, “This is can do for you. Is two centimes.” Latvian say, “Oh. I was hoping it would be less. I do not have that much.”

Joke:

Is Latvian couple have been marry 60 years! But for long times, is no making sex. For 60th wedding anniversary, wife is buy for husband hooker for the have sex! Hooker is arrive at door one fine day and is say to husband, “Hello! I here give you super sex!” Man is say, “Oh! I will have the soup.” Then hooker is say, “What? You have soup? Why you no told this?”

Joke:

What are one potato say other potato?
Premise ridiculous. Who have two potato?

Joke:

How many Latvian is take screw in light bulb?
25. One screw in, 24 ride bicycle generator for 1-hour shift. But time probably better spend search food.

Joke:

Three Latvian girl are walk down street. One have knife, one have gun, one have window. They are meet soldier. Soldier is ask first girl, “Why you are have knife?” “If you try rape me, I stab!” she say. Okay! Second girl, “Why you are have gun?” “If you try rape me, I shoot!” she say. Okay! Third girl, “Why you are have window?!?” “If you try rape me, I jump out!”

Joke:

Latvian is capture by cannibals. Cannibals say, “We are kill you and eat you and use skin for canoe. But you may choose means of your death.” Latvian say, “Okay! You are give me fork, please!” But oops! Is forgot how use!

Joke:

Why is Latvian throw clock out window? Will be no appointments anymore, only endure til death.

Joke:

Man walk in bar with twelve-inch pianist. Is deformed by malnutrition.

Joke:

What is have four wheels and flies? Is body-disposal truck! Many have suicide this week.

Joke:

Two Latvians are argue over wodka. One say, "For wodka, I give you daughter." Friend is say OK. Deal is struck. But he is surprise! She deformed by malnutrition.

Joke:

Man is have something on his mind. Is hat! And is crust of bread under hat, for to hide from family.

Joke:

Man is wait bread line. Wait until starve. Is very funny, yes!

Joke:

Potato walk into bar. All in bar have surprise at potato. One man jump potato and eat. Realize is actually dog. All realize was illusion from hunger. Is sad time for all.

Joke: 

Questioning:What Latvian Dream?

Answering: Only group of rebels know. But was execute. Now no Latvian Dream.

Joke:

Latvian chase by politburo military off cliff. He hang by branch and see potato grow on branch. He reach for potato, but fall of cliff. Such is life.

Joke:

One day, Latvian scientist claim to make growing of potato faster and easier. Next day is hanged for insanity.

Joke:

Two Latvian look at clouds. One see potato. Other see impossible dream. 

Is same cloud.
***
Erectile dysfunction
Tom had erectile dysfunction from years had gone to different doctors to resolve his problem but hadn't been able to. The words spread over the village that a doctor had brought a miraculous medicine from overseas and could solve his problem. So he went to see the doctor and he prescribed him a teaspoon of the miraculous medicine  before having sex.Happy about the fact that he could have sex with his wife after many year Tom drank the whole bottle before entering his house. He enters his house with a huge boner takes his wife from behind and start making love to her once, twice over the night and the following morning but he wanted more and more. His wife left the house in terror as she couldn't go on.Tom proceeded masturbating but still wanted more and more so long story short armed with a gun he f*cked everyone in the village including children,man,nuns,priests and even cows,goats so pretty much everything that could move without being able to stop.Knowing his problem Tom went to the same doctor that prescribed the medicine to him asking for a solution. In the meantime the village  gathered to discuss the big problem they had with Tom.So the doctor revealed Tom tha there was only one solution for his problem and he should take a car battery and connect the opposing poles to his penis. So Tom went out of the doctors office took the JumpStart cable and connected it to the tip and balls.As in the Frankenstein's movie the people went to kill him with everything they could find. As the man got closer to Tom they heard a horrible screaming followed by the words "RUN FOR YOUR LIVES HE IS RECHARGING IT". Sorry for the bad English not my native language.
***
While in the playground with his friend, Little Johnny noticed that Jimmy was wearing a brand new, shiny watch. . .
"Did you get that for your birthday?" asked Little Johnny. 

"Nope." replied Jimmy. 

"Well, did you get it for Christmas then?". 

Again Jimmy says "Nope." 

"You didn't steal it, did you?" asks Little Johnny. 

"No," said Jimmy. "I went into Mom and Dad's bedroom the other night when they were 'doing the nasty'. Dad gave me his watch to get rid of me. 

Little Johnny was extremely impressed with this idea, and extremely jealous of Jimmy's new watch. He vowed to get one for himself. That night, he waited outside his parents' bedroom until he heard the unmistakable noises of lovemaking. Just then, he swung the door wide open and boldly strode into the bedroom. His father, caught in mid stroke, turned and said angrily. "What do you want now?" 

"I wanna watch," Johnny replied. 

Without missing a stroke, his father said, "Fine. Stand in the corner and watch, but keep quiet."
***
An Irishman, a Mexican and a Blonde guy..
...were doing construction work on scaffolding at the 20th floor of a building.
They were eating lunch and the Irishman said: "Corned beef and cabbage! If I get corned beef and cabbage one more time for lunch, I'm going to jump off this building."

The Mexican opened his lunch and exclaimed, Burritos again!"

If I get burritos one more time in my lunch, I'm ging to jump off, too."

The blonde opened his lunch and said, "Bologna again!
If I get a bologna sandwich one more time, I'm jumping, too."

The next day the Irishman opened his lunch box, saw the corned beef and cabbage and jumped to his death.  
The Mexican opened his lunch, saw a burrito and jumped, too.  
The blonde opened his lunch bucket, saw the bologna sandwich and jumped to his death as well.

At the funeral the Irishman's wife was weeping. She said, "If I'd known how really tired he was of corned beef and cabbage.
I never would have given it to him again!"

The Mexican's wife also wept and said, "I could have given him tacos or enchiladas! I didn't realize he hated burritos so much."

Everyone turned and stared at the blonde's wife.
"Hey, don't look at me," she said. "He makes his own lunch."
***
I was sitting at a stoplight yesterday, minding my own business...
...when a carload of gun toting, young and very loud tea partiers, shouting anti-Obama, anti-Muslim slogans, with a Gadsden flag duct taped on the trunk and a confederate flag taped to the hood, "All I need to know about Islam, I learned on 9/11" spray painted to the side, pulled up and stopped next to me.

Suddenly, they all yelled "YEEHAW" and took off before the light changed. Out of nowhere, and 18 wheeler came speeding through the intersection and ran directly over their car, crushing it completely, and killing everybody in it instantly.

For several long moments, I sat in shock. I thought "Damn, that could have been me".

So today, I woke up bright and early. I went out, and applied for a job as a truck driver.
***
A Russian captain and an American captain debate which country builds the best submarines...
They are standing at a harbor and they've been arguing for hours. The American says "Our subs have such efficient air filter systems that they can stay underwater for months at a time". 

The Russian replies:"A few months? Laughsble. Our Russian subs have such advanced air filters that they can stay submerged for up to a year"

As the American opens his mouth to voice his reply, he's suddenly interrupted as a massive submarine surfaces right in front of them.A man steps out, looks at them and screams: "Heil Hitler, have we won ze war?"
***
Bacon Tree
Two Mexicans are stuck in the desert after crossing into the United States, wandering aimlessly and starving. They are about to just lie down and wait for death, when all of a sudden Luis says...: 

  

"Hey Pepe, do you smell what I smell. Ees bacon, I theenk."

  

"Si, Luis, eet sure smells like bacon."

  

With renewed hope they struggle up the next sand dune, &there, in the distance, is a tree loaded with bacon. 

  

There's raw bacon, there's fried bacon, back bacon, double smoked bacon ... every imaginable kind of cured pork.

  

"Pepe, Pepe, we ees saved. Ees a bacon tree!" 

  

"Luis, maybe ees a meerage? We ees in the dessert, don't forget." 

  

"Pepe, since when deed you ever hear of a meerage that smell like bacon... ees no meerage, ees a bacon tree."

  

And with that, Luis staggers towards the tree. He gets to within 5 metres, Pepe crawling close behind, when suddenly a machine gun opens up, and Luis drops like a wet sock. Mortally wounded, he warns Pepe with his dying breath: 

  

"Pepe... go back man, you was right, ees not a bacon tree!" 

  

"Luis, Luis mi amigo... what ees it?" 

  

"Pepe ... ees not a bacon tree ... Ees 

  


Ees 

  


Ees 

  


Ees 

  

  

Ees a ham bush...!" 
***
Ralph and the IRS Auditor
The IRS decided to audit Ralph, and summoned him to the local IRS office. The IRS auditor was not surprised when Ralph showed up with his attorney.

The auditor began with, “Well, sir, you have an extravagant lifestyle and no full-time employment, which you explain by saying that you win all of your money by gambling. I’m not sure the IRS finds that believable.”

“I’m a great gambler, and I can prove it,” replied Ralph. “How about a little demonstration?”

The auditor thought for a moment then said, “Okay. Go ahead.”

Ralph said, “I’ll bet you a thousand dollars that I can bite my own eye.”

The auditor thought a moment and replied, “No way! It’s a bet.”

So Ralph removed his glass eye and bit it.

The auditor’s jaw dropped.

Next, Ralph said, “Now, I’ll bet you two thousand dollars that I can bite my other eye.”

The auditor could see it was obvious Ralph wasn’t blind, so he took the bet. Where upon, Ralph removed his dentures and “bit” his good eye.

The stunned auditor realized he had just wagered and lost three grand with Ralph’s attorney as a witness, and he began to get a little nervous.

“Want to go for double or nothing?” Ralph asked. “I’ll bet you six thousand dollars that I can stand on one side of your desk, and pee into that wastebasket on the other side, and never get a drop anywhere in between.”

The auditor, twice burned, was really cautious now, but he looked carefully at the situation and decided that there was no way this guy could manage a stunt like that, so he agreed to the wager.

Ralph stood beside the desk and unzipped his pants, but although he strained mightily, he just couldn’t make the stream reach the wastebasket on the other side of the desk, which meant he pretty much urinated all over the IRS official’s desk. The auditor leaped with joy, realizing that he had just turned a major loss into a huge win.

Meanwhile, Ralph’s attorney moaned and put his head between his hands.

“Are you okay?” the auditor asked.

“Not really,” answered the attorney. “This morning, when Ralph told me he’d been summoned for an audit, he bet me twenty thousand dollars that he could come in here and pee all over an IRS official’s desk and that you’d be real happy about it.”
***
Q&A Time w/Hillary Clinton
Hillary Clinton goes to a gifted-student primary school in New York to talk about the world. After her talk she offers to answer questions from the kids.

One little boy puts up his hand. Hillary asks him what his name is.

"Kenny," he says.

"And what is your question, Kenny?" she asks. 

"I have three questions," he says.
"First -- what happened in Benghazi?
"Second -- why would you run for president if you are not capable of handling two e-mail accounts?
"Third -- what happened to that six billion dollars that went missing while you were Secretary of State?”

Just then the bell rings for recess.

Hillary tells the students that they will continue after recess.  When they resume Hillary says,

"Okay, where were we? Oh, that's right, question time. Who has a question?”

A different boy -- little Johnny -- puts his hand up.

Hillary points to him and asks him what his name is.

"Johnny," he says.

"What is your question, Johnny?" she asks.

"I have five questions," he says.
"First -- what happened in Benghazi?
"Second -- why would you run for president if you are not capable of handling two e-mail accounts?
"Third -- whatever happened to that six billion dollars that went missing while you were Secretary of State?
"Fourth -- why did the recess bell go off 20 minutes early?
"And, fifth -- where's Kenny?”
***
The Logical Redneck
Two rednecks decided that they weren't going anywhere in life and thought they should go to college to get ahead. The first goes in to see the counselor, who tells him to take Math, History, and Logic.

"What's Logic?" the first redneck asks.

The professor answers by saying, "Let me give you an example."

"Do you own a weedeater?"

"I sure do."

"Then I can assume, using logic, that you have a yard," replied the professor.

"That's real good!" says the redneck.

The professor continues, "Logic will also tell me that since you have a yard, you also own a house."

Impressed, the redneck says, "Amazin!"

"And since you own a house, logic dictates that you have a wife."

"That's Betty Mae! This is incredible!" The redneck is obviously catching on.

"Finally, since you have a wife, logically I can assume that you are heterosexual," said the professor.

"You're absolutely right! Why that's the most fascinatin' thing I ever heard! I can't wait to take that logic class!!"

The redneck, proud of the new world opening up to him, walks back into the hallway, where his friend is still waiting.

"So what classes are ya takin'?" asks the friend.

"Math, History, and Logic!" replies the first redneck.

"What in tarnation is logic???" asked his friend.

"Let me give you an example. Do ya own a weedeater?" asked the first redneck.

"No," his friend replied.

"Fag."
***
An Arab and a Jew
There was an Arab oil Sheikh that was in a coma and needed a blood transfusion to survive. Being AB+ it was hard for him to get a donor with the same rare blood type. Finally they found an old Jewish farmer that was listed as a blood donor with the same blood type. However he was very reluctant to give his blood to save an Arab guy. Finally after lots of discussions and pestering by doctors he agreed to donate only enough blood to help make sure the Arab guy was stabilized. After the blood transfusion and when the Arab guy is healthier, he sends the Jewish farmer a brand new John Deere tractor and a Cartier watch and $100000 as a token of appreciation. After a year, the Arab is requires another transfusion. The old Jewish farmer is contacted and this time is willing to give more blood. After the transfusion the Arab send the Jewish guy a box of chocolates and a bouquet of flowers. When the Jewish guy gets this he is furious as he is expecting much more since he gave more of his rare blood type. He contacts the Arab sheikh and asks him why he only gave him such a paltry gift? The Arab says, ya Akhie (brother) I have Jewish blood in me now….
***
Natalie
A guy hails a cab at the airport and tells the driver to go to a certain address. When he gets there he sees a beautiful three story townhouse in a upper-class part of town. He knocks and an attractive woman opens the door.

"I wanna see Natalie"

The lady looks the man up and down, he clearly doesn't have a lot of money.

"Sir, to see Natalie you will have to pay $1,000 for half an hour"

"No problem, I have money"

Just then a gorgeous brunette in a black evening gown comes down the stairs and the guy looks at her

"Natalie?"

"Yes?"

"I want to spend a little time with you"

She smirks at the man's appearance

"It will cost you $1,000"

The guy takes out a roll of cash and hands it to her, they go upstairs, do the dirty and he leaves half an hour later. The next day the guy is back, he knocks, the madame opens and is quite surprised that the guy is back

"I wanna see Natalie"

"Well it's still $1,000"

"O.K., I have the money"

He shows her the money, he goes upstairs, hands the money to Natalie, spend half an hour poking her clam and leaves.

So it continues for three more days, after the fifth day Natalie turns to him while he's dressing and says

"You know it's the first time that somebody came back so many times; where are you from?"

"I am from Michigan"

Natalie sits up. "Really? I have a sister in Michigan"

The guy grins and replies "I know, she gave me $5,000 to give you"
***
One day a guy dies and finds himself in hell
As he is wallowing in despair, he has his first meeting with the devil.

Satan: Why so glum? 

Guy: What do you think? I'm in hell! 

Satan: Hell's not so bad. We actually have a lot of fun down here. Are you a drinking man? 

Guy: Sure, I love to drink. 

Satan: Well you're gonna love Mondays then. On Mondays that's all we do is drink. Whiskey, tequila, Guinness, wine coolers, diet tab and colas. We drink till we throw up and then we drink some more! And we don't worry about getting a hangover because you're dead anyway. 

Guy: Gee, that sounds great! 

Satan: You a smoker? 

Guy: You better believe it! 

Satan: All right! You're gonna love Tuesdays. We get the finest cigars from all over the world and smoke our lungs out. If you get cancer no biggie, you're already dead, remember? 

Guy: Wow... that's awesome! 

Satan: I bet you like to gamble. 

Guy: Why yes, as a matter of fact I do. 

Satan: Well on Wednesdays you can gamble all you want. Craps,  Blackjack, Roulette, Poker, Slots. If you go bankrupt... you're dead anyhow. Do you do drugs?? 

Guy: Are you kidding? Love drugs! You don't mean... 

Satan: That's right! Thursday is drug day. Help yourself to a great big bowl of crack, or smack. Smoke a doobie the size of a submarine. You can do all the drugs you want, you're dead, who cares. 

Guy: WOW! I never realized Hell was such a cool place! 

Satan: You gay? 

Guy: No... 

Satan: Ooooh You're gonna hate Fridays.
***
The Bacon Tree
Two Mexicans are stuck in the desert after crossing into the United States, wandering aimlessly and starving.

They are about to just lie down and wait for death, when all of a sudden, Luis says...

"Hey Pepe, do you smell what I smell!? Ees bacon, I theenk."

"Is, Luis, eet sure smell like bacon."

With renewed hope they struggle up the next sand dune and there, in the distance, is a tree loaded with bacon.

There's raw bacon, there's fried bacon, back bacon, double smoked bacon! 

Every imaginable kind of cured pork!

"Pepe, Pepe, we ees saved! Ees a bacon tree!"

"Luis, maybe ees a meerage? We ees in the desert don't forget."

"Pepe, since when deed you ever hear of a meerage that smell like bacon...ees no meerage, ees a bacon tree!"

And with that, Luis staggers towards the tree.

He gets to within 5 feet, Pepe crawling close behind, when suddenly a machine gun opens up, and Luis drops like a wet sock.

Mortally wounded, he warns Pepe with his dying breath...

"Pepe... Go back man! You was right, ees not a bacon tree!"

"Luis, Luis mi amigo... what ees it?!"

"Pepe..ees not a bacon tree. Ees..."

Ees...

Ees...

Ees...

Ees...

Ees...a ham bush...!!"
***
A Brit, American and South African Joke
After having dug to a depth of 10 feet last year, British scientists found traces of copper wire dating back 200 years
They came to the conclusion that their ancestors already had a telephone network more than 150 years ago.
Not to be outdone by the Brit’s, in the weeks that followed, an American archaeologist dug to a depth of 20 feet, and shortly after, a story published in the New York bulletin: “American archaeologists, finding traces of 250-year-old copper wire, have concluded that their ancestors already had an advanced high-tech communications network 50 years earlier than the British”
One week later, the Cape bulletin, in South Africa , reported the following: “After digging as deep as 30 feet in his backyard in Thabazimbi , South Africa , Lucky Simelane, a self-taught archaeologist, reported that he found absolutely nothing (azikolo, fokol (f*** all). Lucky has therefore concluded that 250 years ago, Africa had already gone wireless.
***
Don't fart in the bed... (favorite joke)
This is a story about a couple who had been happily married for
years. The only friction in their marriage was the husband's habit of farting loudly every morning when he awoke.

The noise would wake his wife and the smell would make her eyes water and make her gasp for air.

Every morning she would plead with him to stop ripping them off because it was making her sick. He told her he couldn't stop
and that it was perfectly natural. She told him to see a
doctor. She was concerned that one day he would blow his guts out.

The years went by and he continued to rip them out! Then one Thanksgiving morning as she was preparing the turkey for dinner and he was upstairs sound asleep, she looked at the bowl where she had put the turkey innards and neck, gizzard, liver and all the spare parts and a malicious thought came to her.

She took the bowl and went upstairs where her husband was sound asleep and, gently pulling back the bed covers, she pulled
back the elastic waistband of his underpants and emptied the bowl of turkey guts into his shorts.

Some time later she heard her husband waken with his usual trumpeting which was followed by a blood curdling scream and
the sound of frantic footsteps as he ran into the bathroom.

The wife could hardly control herself as she rolled on the floor
laughing, tears in her eyes! After years of torture she reckoned she had got him back pretty good.

About twenty minutes later, her husband came downstairs in his
bloodstained underpants with a look of horror on his face.

She bit her lip as she asked him what was the matter. He said, "Honey, you were right. All these years you have warned me
and I didn't listen to you.

"What do you mean?" asked his wife.

"Well, you always told me that one day I would end up farting my guts out, and today it finally happened. But by the grace of God, some Vaseline, and these two fingers, I think I got them all back in.
***
Bob knows a lot of people
Bob's a factory worker, and one day, the boss is showing a bunch of Japanese investors around the factory. One of them sees Bob, and they promptly exchange handshakes and start talking like long lost friends. Afterwards, Bobs boss asks him what that was about. Bob just replies 'oh, I know him from a few years back, I actually know a lot of important people.' 


His boss is sceptic, but Bob replies: 'Tell you what, name anyone you can think off, I bet you that they know me.' 'Fine,' says his boss, and he's determined to have Bob be embarressed, so he decides to put the bar high: 'President Obama.' 'Cool, no problem,' says Bob. 

A week later they're both standing outside the White House, and Obama comes out, spots Bob and goes "Bob? What are you doing here? Come in, bring your friend, lets have a drink together." Bobs boss has no clue how, but somehow Bob and the president are friends. Once they leave his boss goes 'Fine, you know the president, but I bet you dont know the pope'.


Bob accepts the challenge, and the next week they're standing in Saint Peters square. 'This isnt gonna work, he's never going to see me here when theres this much people. You stay here, I'll go talk to him and you'll see me on the balcony, the guards know me too.' Half an hour later, Bob and the pope appear side by side on the balcony. Bobs boss gets a heart attack, and Bob goes to visit him in the hospital. 

'What happened? Did you not expect me to actually know the pope?' 'No, it wasnt that, I sortof expected that to happen. But there was a tourist next to me that asked 'Who's the guy in his pyjamas standing next to Bob there?'.
***
A New Yorker, a Nebraskan, a Georgian, and a Floridian were driving to Vegas...
After a few hours in the car, the Nebraskan suddenly rolls down his window, opens his bag, and starts chucking corn out the window.

"What are you doing that for?", the others exclaim.

"Back in Nebraska, everywhere I look I see corn. I'm going on vacation and I don't want to see any corn for a couple weeks."

The Georgian replies, "you know what? You're right; I'm sick of seeing peaches all over Georgia. I don't know why I brought them with me." He opens his window and dumps his bag of peaches out.

The Floridian, feeling inspired, opens the door and kicks the New Yorker out.
***
A teacher calls her first grade class
from recess. She goes up to little Sally and asked, "Sally, what did you do at recess?" "I played in the sand box." "Good. Now, if you can spell the word 'sand' on the black board, I'll give you a fresh baked cookie." So she spells the word right and gets a cookie. Then comes in little Billy. "Billy, what did you do at recess?" "I played in the sand box with Sally." "Good. Now, if you can spell the word 'box' on the black board, I'll give you a fresh baked cookie." So he spells it right and gets a cookie. Then comes in little Mohammed from recess. "Mohammed, what did you do at recess?" "Billy and Sally threw rocks at me!" "Hmm, that sounds like blatant racial discrimination. If you can spell 'blatant racial discrimination', I'll give you a fresh baked cookie."
***
A small collection of my favorite science jokes
A neutron walks into a bar and asks the bartender, “How much for a drink?”

“For you, sir, no charge!”

&nbsp;

What's 2 times 2?

Physicist: “After some measurements I am fairly sure it is somewhere between 3.81 and 4.13!”

Mathematician: “After some consideration I can now prove that the solution exists!”

Engineer: “4, obviously, but lets make it 5, just to be on the safe side.”

&nbsp;

Three logicians walk into a bar. “You all want a beer?” the bartender asks.

“I don’t know,” says the first logician.

“I don’t know either,” says the second logician.

Says the third logician, “If that’s the case, then we all want a beer.”

&nbsp;

Atom 1: “I think I lost one of my electrons somewhere.”

Atom 2: “Are you sure?”

Atom 1: ”Yes, I’m positive!”

&nbsp;

A neutrino walks through a bar.

&nbsp;

A photon checks into a hotel. “Do you need help with your luggage?” the clerk asks.

“No thanks, I’m travelling light.”

&nbsp;

A mathematician walks into a bar. “I’ll have a pint, and then half a pint and then a quarter of a pint and then an eighth of a pint-”

The bartender, who is also a mathematician, interrupts him, “Two pints, coming right up!”

&nbsp;

A biologist, a physicist and a mathematician travel together by train. Right after entering Scotland they see a black sheep standing on top of a hill.

“Look at that,” says the biologist. “Apparently the sheep in Scotland are black.”

“Nonsense!” says the physicist. “All we can say for sure is that there is one sheep in Scotland that’s black.”

“I am afraid you are both wrong,” the mathematician explains. “The only thing that is certain is that there is a sheep in Scotland, which is black on at least one side.”

&nbsp;

There are two types of people in the world.

Those who can extrapolate from from incomplete data.

&nbsp;

What is the value of the contour integral around Western Europe?

Zero, all the Poles are in Eastern Europe.

&nbsp;

Why were the Romans so bad at algebra?

They always ended up with X equals 10.

&nbsp;

“I never get any good data. Sometimes I think the particle accelerator hates me.”

“Never anthropomorphize machines. They hate that.”
***
The difference between before/after getting hired
When Timmy went in for an interview at ABC company, he was hired after a very brief interview. A little skeptical at first, Timmy asked the company representative a few questions.

It went like this:

ABC: Trust me, this company could really use someone new

Timmy: If there is too much work, I'm going to quit...

ABC: We'd NEVER let something like that happen

Timmy: Do employees get every Saturday and Sunday off?

ABC: That's a granted.

Timmy: Are employees required to work overtime without pay?

ABC: No way. Where did you even come up with such a ridiculous idea?

Timmy: Are meals subsidized?

ABC: You BET.

Timmy: Do the new employees usually end up doing ALL the work?

ABC: That's impossible. There are so many other experienced people in our company.

Timmy: If I did well, would I ever become a manager?

ABC: Yes. Absolutely.

Timmy: Wow. Is this for real?

After working there for several months, Timmy noticed that the job wasn't panning out the way he had been promised. Quite upset, he went to file a complaint to the HR dept. The next day, Timmy was summoned into the management's office, where they threatened to fire him for voicing out.

To see his conversation with the management, read the conversation above again.... from the bottom to the top.

edit:Thank you stranger for the gold :).
***
Nick the Dragon slayer...
Once upon a time, and far, far away lived a beautiful Queen with voluptuous breasts.
Nick the Dragon slayer knew that the penalty for his desire would be death should he try to touch them.

One day Nick revealed his secret desire to his colleague, Horatio the Physician, who was the King's chief doctor.
Horatio the Physician, exclaimed that he could arrange for Nick the Dragon Slayer to satisfy his desire, but it would cost him 1, 000 gold coins to arrange it.

Without pause, Nick the Dragon Slayer readily agreed to the scheme. The next day, Horatio the Physician made a batch of itching powder and poured a little bit into the Queen's brassiere while she bathed. Soon after she dressed, the itching commenced and grew intense.

Upon being summoned to the Royal Chambers to address this incident, Horatio the Physician informed the King and Queen that only a special saliva, if applied for four hours, would cure this type of itch, and that tests had shown that only the saliva of Nick the Dragon Slayer would work as the antidote to cure the itch.

The King quickly summoned Nick the Dragon Slayer. Horatio the Physician then slipped Nick the Dragon Slayer the antidote for the itching powder, which he quickly put into his mouth, and for the next four hours, Nick worked passionately on the Queen's voluptuous and magnificent breasts.

The Queen's itching was eventually relieved, and Nick the Dragon Slayer left satisfied and touted as a hero.
Upon returning to his chamber, Nick the Dragon Slayer found Horatio the Physician demanding his payment of thousand gold coins.

With his obsession now satisfied, Nick the Dragon Slayer couldn't have cared less and, knowing that Horatio the Physician could never report this matter to the King, with a laugh just told him to get lost.
The next day, Horatio the Physician slipped a massive dose of the same itching powder into the King's underwear. The King immediately summoned Nick the Dragon Slayer...

Continued......
***
The taxation office suspected a fishing boat owner wasn't paying proper wages to his deckhand
The taxation office suspected a fishing boat owner wasn't paying proper wages to his deckhand and sent an auditor to investigate him.

Auditor: "I need a list of your employees and how much you pay them."

Boat Owner: "Well, there's Clarence, my deckhand, he's been with me for 3 years. I pay him $1,000 a week plus free room and board. Then there's the mentally challenged guy. He works about 18 hours every day and does about 90% of the work around here. He makes about $10 per week, pays his own room and board, and I buy him a bottle of Bundaberg rum and a dozen Crown Lagers every Saturday night so he can cope with life. He also gets to sleep with my wife occasionally."

Auditor: "That's the guy I want to talk to - the mentally challenged one."

Boat Owner: "That'll be me. What'd you want to know?"
***
Greek vs Italian Culture
One day , two men, a Greek and an Italian were sitting in a coffee shop discussing who had the superior culture. 

Over triple lattes the Greek says, "Well, we have the Parthenon." 

Arching his eyebrows, the Italian replies, "We have the Coliseum." 

The Greek retorts, "We Greeks gave birth to advanced mathematics" 

The Italian, nodding agreement, says, "But we built the Roman Empire." 

And so on and so on until the Greek comes up with what he thinks will end the discussion. 

With a flourish of finality he says, "We invented sex!" 

The Italian thinks for a moment and then replies, "Ah, yes, that is true, but it was the Italians who introduced it to women."

***
The hells angels are riding....
On January 13th, a group of HELLS ANGELS, California bikers were riding along Colorado Street in Pasadena when they saw a girl about to jump off Pasadena's Suicide Bridge. So they stopped.
John, their leader, a big burly man of 53, gets off his Harley, walks through a group of gawkers, past the State Trooper who was trying to talk her down off the railing, and says, "Hey Baby . . . whatcha doin' up there on that railin'?"
She says tearfully, "I'm going to kill myself!!"
While he didn't want to appear "sensitive," John also didn't want to miss this "be-a-legend" opportunity either so he asked, "Well, before you jump, Honey-Babe . . . why don't you give ol' John here your best last kiss?"
So, with no hesitation at all, she leaned back over the railing and did just that . . . and it was a long, deep, lingering kiss followed immediately by another even better one.
After they breathlessly finished, John gets a big thumbs-up approval from his biker-buddies, the onlookers, and even the State Trooper, and then says, "Wow! That was the best kiss I have ever had! That's a real talent you're wasting there, Sugar Shorts. You could be famous if you rode with me. Why are you committing suicide?"
She explained, "My parents don't like me dressing up like a girl."
It's still unclear whether she jumped or was pushed.

Wow front page cool...a lot of you need to chill out tho
***
GEEKS NOT ALLOWED-ENTER AT YOUR OWN RISK
This truck driver hauling a tractor-trailer load of computers
 stops for a beer.  As he approaches the bar he sees a big sign on the
 door saying "GEEKS NOT ALLOWED-ENTER AT YOUR OWN RISK!"
 He goes in and sits down.

 The bartender comes over to him, sniffs, says he smells kind of
 geeky, asks him what he does for a living.  The truck driver says he
 drives a truck, and the smell is just from the computers he is hauling.
 The bartender says OK, truck drivers are not geeks, and serves him a beer.

 As he is sipping his beer, a skinny guy walks in with tape
 around his glasses, a pocket protector with twelve kinds of pens and
 pencils, and a belt at least a foot too long.  The bartender, without
 saying a word, pulls out a shotgun and blows the guy away.  The truck
 driver asks him why he did that.  The bartender said not to worry, the
 geeks are overpopulating the Silicon Valley, and are in season now.
 You don't even need a license, he said.
 So the truck driver finishes his beer, gets back in his truck,
 and heads back onto the freeway.

 Suddenly he veers to avoid an accident, and the load shifts.
 The back door breaks open and computers spill out all over the freeway.
 He jumps out and sees a crowd already forming, grabbing up the
 computers. They are all engineers, accountants and programmers
 wearing the geekiest clothes he has ever seen.  He can't let them steal
 his whole load.  So remembering what happened in the bar, he pulls
 out his gun and starts blasting away, felling several of them instantly.

 A highway patrol officer comes zooming up and jumps out of the car
 screaming at him to stop.

 The truck driver said "What's wrong? I thought geeks were in season."

 "Well, sure," said the patrolman, "But you can't bait 'em."

***
an irish daughter
had not been home for over 5 years. Upon her return, her father cursed her. 



Where have ye been all this time? Why did ye not write to us, not even a line? Why didn't ye call? Can ye not understand what ye put yer old mum thru? 



The girl, crying, replied, "Sniff, sniff....dad....I became a prostitute...." 



"Ye what!!? Out of here, ye shameless harlot! Sinner! You're a disgrace to this family." 



"OK, dad-- as ye wish. I just came back to give mum this luxurious fur coat, title deed to a ten bedroom mansion plus a savings certificate for £5 million." 



"For me little brother, this gold Rolex and for ye daddy, the sparkling new Mercedes limited edition convertible that's parked outside plus a membership to the country club....(takes a breath)....and an invitation for ye all to spend New Years' Eve on board my new yacht in the Riviera, and...." 



Now what was it ye said ye had become?" says dad. 



Girl, crying again, "Sniff, sniff....a prostitute dad! Sniff, sniff. 



"Oh! Be Jesus! Ye scared me half to death, girl! I thought ye said a Protestant. Come here and give yer old man a hug!"
***
A Chinese guy decides to retire and move to USA
...after 50 years of living in Shanghai.

He bought a home on a small piece of land. A few days after moving in. The friendly American neighbor decides to go across and welcome the new guy to the region. He goes next door but on his way up the drive-way he sees the Chinese guy running around his front yard chasing about 10 hens. Not wanting to interrupt these 'Chinese customs', he decides to put the welcome on hold for the day.

The next day, he decides to try again, but just as he is about to knock on the front door, he looks through the window and sees the Chinese urinate into a glass and then drink it. Not wanting to interrupt another 'Chinese custom', he decides to put the welcome on hold for yet another day.

A day later he decides to give it one last go, but on his way next door, he sees the Chinese leading a bull down the drive-way, ...pause...., and then put his left ear next to the bull's butt.

The American can't handle this, so he goes up to the Chinese guy and says, "Dude - what the hell is it with your Chinese customs? I come over to welcome you to the neighborhood and see you running around the yard after hens. The next day you are pissing in a glass and drinking it, and then today you have your head so close to that bull's ass, it could just about shit on you."

The Chinaman is very taken back and says, "Sorry sir, you no understand, these no ... Chinese customs I doing, these American Customs."

"What do you mean," says the neighbor, "Those aren't American customs."

"Yes they are, man at travel agent tell me," replied the Chinese, "He say to become true American, I must learn to .... chase chicks, .... get piss drunk, and ....listen to bull-shit." 

EDIT: Americanization of vocabulary.
***
A first grade teacher was having trouble...
A first-grade teacher, Ms. Brooks, was having trouble with one of her students. The teacher asked, 'Harry, what's your problem?'
Harry answered, 'I'm too smart for the 1st grade. My sister is in the 3rd grade and I'm smarter than she is! I think I should be in the 3rd grade too!'
Ms. Brooks had had enough. She took Harry to the principal's office.
While Harry waited in the outer office, the teacher explained to the principal what the situation was. The principal told Ms. Brooks he would give the boy a test. If he failed to answer any of his questions he was to go back to the 1st grade and behave. She agreed.
Harry was brought in and the conditions were explained to him and he agreed to take the test.
Principal: 'What is 3 x 3?'
Harry: '9.'
Principal: 'What is 6 x 6?'
Harry: '36.'
And so it went with every question the principal thought a 3rd grader should know.
The principal looks at Ms. Brooks and tells her, 'I think Harry can go to the 3rd grade.'
Ms. Brooks says to the principal, 'Let me ask him some questions.'
The principal and Harry both agreed.
Ms. Brooks asks, 'What does a cow have four of that I have only two of?'
Harry, after a moment: 'Legs.'
Ms Brooks: 'What is in your pants that you have but I do not have?'
The principal wondered why would she ask such a question!
Harry replied: 'Pockets.'
Ms. Brooks: 'What does a dog do that a man steps into?'
Harry: 'Pants.'
Ms. Brooks: What starts with a C, ends with a T, is hairy, oval, delicious and contains thin, whitish liquid?'
Harry: 'Coconut.'
The principal sat forward with his mouth hanging open.
Ms. Brooks: 'What goes in hard and pink then comes out soft and sticky?'
The principal's eyes opened really wide and before he could stop the answer, Harry replied, 'Bubble gum.'
Ms. Brooks: 'What does a man do standing up, a woman does sitting down and a dog does on three legs?'
Harry: 'Shake hands.'
The principal was trembling.
Ms. Brooks: 'What word starts with an 'F' and ends in 'K' that means a lot of heat and excitement?'
Harry: 'Firetruck.'
The principal breathed a sigh of relief and told the teacher,
'Put Harry in the fifth-grade, I got the last seven questions wong...'
***
This is how bad the economy is:
* My neighbour got a pre-declined credit card in the mail.  
* Wives are having sex with their husbands because they can’t afford batteries.  
* CEO’s are now playing miniature golf.  
* Exxon-Mobil laid off 25 Congressmen.  
* A stripper was killed when her audience showered her with rolls of pennies while she danced.  
* If the bank returns your check marked “Insufficient Funds,” you call them and ask if they meant you or them.  
* McDonald’s is selling the 1/4 ouncer.  
* Angelina Jolie adopted a child from America.  
* Parents in Beverly Hills fired their nannies and learned their children’s names.  
* A truckload of Americans was caught sneaking into Mexico.  
* A picture is now only worth 200 words.  
* When Bill and Hillary travel together, they now have to share a room.  
* The Treasure Island casino in Las Vegas is now managed by Somali pirates.  

And, finally….  
* I was so depressed last night thinking about the economy, wars, jobs, my savings, Social Security, retirement funds, etc., I called the Suicide Hotline. I got a call centre in Pakistan, and when I told them I was suicidal, they got all excited, and asked if I could drive a truck.
***
Vote wisely in November
HEAVEN AND HELL
 
While walking down the street one day a Corrupt Senator was tragically hit by a car and died.  


His soul arrives in heaven and is met by St. Peter at the entrance.  



 
"Welcome to heaven," says St. Peter. "Before you settle in, it seems there is a problem. We seldom see a high official around these parts, you see, so we're not sure what to do with you."  
 
"No problem, just let me in," says the Senator.
 
"Well, I'd like to, but I have orders from the higher ups. What we'll do is have you spend one day in hell and one in heaven. Then you can choose where to spend eternity."
 
"Really?, I've made up my mind. I want to be in heaven," says the Senator.
 
"I'm sorry, but we have our rules."
 
And with that, St. Peter escorts him to the elevator and he goes down, down, down to hell.
 
The doors open and he finds himself in the middle of a green golf course. In the distance is a clubhouse and standing in front of it are all his friends and other politicians who had worked with him.
 
Everyone is very happy and in evening dress. They run to greet him, shake his hand, and reminisce about the good times they had while getting rich at the expense of the people. They played a friendly game of golf and then dine on lobster, caviar and the finest champagne.
 
Also present is the devil, who really is a very friendly guy who is having a good time dancing and telling jokes. They are all having such a good time that before the Senator realizes it, it is time to go.
 
Everyone gives him a hearty farewell and waves while the elevator rises.
 
The elevator goes up, up, up and the door reopens in heaven where St. Peter is waiting for him, "Now it's time to visit heaven...” 
 
So, 24 hours passed with the Senator joining a group of contented souls moving from cloud to cloud, playing the harp and singing. They have a good time and, before he realizes it, the 24 hours have gone by and St. Peter returns.
 
"Well, then, you've spent a day in hell and another in heaven. Now choose your eternity."

The Senator reflects for a minute, then he answers: "Well, I would never have said it before, I mean heaven has been delightful, but I think I would be better off in hell."
 
So St. Peter escorts him to the elevator and he goes down, down, down to hell...
 
Now the doors of the elevator open and he's in the middle of a barren land covered with waste and garbage. He sees all his friends, dressed in rags, picking up the trash and putting it in black bags as more trash falls from above
 
The devil comes over to him and puts his arm around his shoulders.
 
"I don't understand," stammers the Senator. "Yesterday I was here and there was a golf course and clubhouse, and we ate lobster and caviar, drank champagne, and danced and had a great time. Now there's just a wasteland full of garbage and my friends look miserable. What happened?"
 
The devil smiles at him and says, "Yesterday we were campaigning, Today, you voted.."  
 
Vote wisely in November

***
Books Never Written
Hey guys, don't know if you're familiar with these kind of jokes, but they were my favorite growing up, so I thought I'd post a bunch of the here. They're pretty corny, but I hope you enjoy!

*Take A Breather* by Justin Hale

*How to Become Famous* by Anonymous

*Living Long* by Diane Perish

*How to Get Rich* by Robin A. Bank

*I'm So Greedy* by Jenna Russ

*How to Drive a Manual Transmission* by Otto Matic

*How to be a Great Pilot* by Mae Day

*Where to Find Wildebeests* By Sara N. Getti

*Raising Kids* by Bill E. Goat

*Warriors of Feudal Japan* by Sam A. Rye

*Woodwind Instruments* by Clara Net

*Tragedy at the Grand Canyon* by Eileen Dover

*The Human Brain* by Sir E. Brum and Sara Bellum

*Deep in Debt* by Owen A. Lott

*The World is a Big Place* by Mike Robe

*Confessions of a Mental Patient* by Justin Sane
***
Why Indian students are disliked abroad
It was the first day of a school in USA and a new Indian student named Chandrasekhar Subramanian entered the fourth grade.

The teacher said, "Let's begin by reviewing some
American History. 
Teacher :- Who said 'Give me Liberty, or give me Death'?"


She saw a sea of blank faces except for Chandrasekhar, who had his hand up: Chandrasekhar :- 'Patrick Henry, 1775,' he said.

'Very good! 
Teacher :- Who said 'Government of the People, by the People, for the People, shall not perish from the Earth?''


Again, no response except from 
Chandrasekhar:- . 'Abraham
Lincoln, 1863' said Chandrasekhar.

The teacher snapped at the class, 'Class, you should be
ashamed. Chandrasekhar, who is new to our country, knows
more about our history than you do.'

She heard a loud whisper: 'F ___ the Indians'

'Who said that?' she demanded. Chandrasekhar put his hand up. 'General Custer, 1862.'

At that point, a student in the back said, 'I'm gonna puke.'

The teacher glares around and asks 'All right! Now, who
said that?' Again, Chandrasekhar says, 'George Bush
to the Japanese Prime Minister, 1991.'

Now furious, another student yells, 'Oh yeah? Suck
this!'
Chandrasekhar jumps out of his chair waving his hand and
shouts to the teacher, 'Bill Clinton, to Monica
Lewinsky, 1997.'

Now with almost mob hysteria someone said
 'You little shit. If you say anything else, I'll kill you.'
Chandrasekhar frantically yells at the top of his voice,
'Michael Jackson to the child witnesses testifying
against him, 2004.'

The teacher fainted. And as the class gathered around the teacher on the floor, someone said, 
'Oh shit, we're screwed!' And Chandrasekhar said quietly, 
'I think it was Lehmann Brothers, November 4th,
2008'.
***
Multi-level Meta Joke
A guy walks into a bar and asks the bartender for a free drink. The bartender says "I'll give you a free drink if you can tell me a multi-level meta joke." So the guy says "A guy walks into a bar and asks the bartender for a free drink. The bartender says "I'll give you a free drink if you can tell me a meta joke." So the guy says "A guy walks into a bar and asks the bartender for a free drink. The bartender says "I'll give you a free drink if you can tell me a good joke." So the guy says "What do you do when you see a spaceman? You park, man." So the bartender gives him a free beer." So the bartender gives him a free beer." So the bartender gives him a free beer.
***
A young Swedish woman, old Dutch woman, an Englishman, and an Irishman are riding a train.
A young Swedish woman, **an** old Dutch woman, an Englishman, and an Irishman are riding **on** a train.

The train goes through a tunnel, it becomes pitch black in the car, and then a loud SMACK is heard.

The train emerges from the tunnel and the Englishman is rubbing his cheek.

The old Dutch woman thinks: "He must have groped the young Swedish woman, and she slapped him."

The young Swedish woman thinks: "He must have tried to grope me, and accidentally got the old woman, and she slapped him."

The Englishman thinks: "The Irishman must have groped the Swedish girl, and she accidentally slapped me."

The Irishman thinks: "I can't wait for another tunnel so I can smack that English guy again."
***
Giving the devil his due
One day in the future, Barack Obama has a heart-attack and dies. 
He immediately goes to hell, where    the devil is waiting for him 

"I don't know what to do here," says the devil. "You are on my list, but I have no room for you. You definitely have to stay here, so I'll tell you what I'm going to do. I've got a couple of folks here who weren't quite as bad as you. I'll let one of them go, but you have to take their place. I'll even let YOU decide who leaves."
 
Obama thought that sounded pretty good, so the devil opened the door to the first room.
In it was Ted Kennedy and a large pool of water. Ted kept diving in, and surfacing, empty handed. Over, and over, and over he dived in and surfaced with nothing. Such was his fate in hell.
 
"No," Obama said. "I don't think so. I'm not a good swimmer, and I don't think I could do that all day long."
 
The devil led him to the door of the next room.
 
In it was Al Gore with a sledge-hammer and a room full of rocks. All he did was swing that hammer, time after time after time.
 
"No, this is no good; I've got this problem with my shoulder. I would be in constant agony if all I could do was break rocks all day," commented Obama.
 
The devil opened a third door. Through it, Obama saw Bill Clinton, lying on the bed, his arms tied over his head, and his legs restrained in a spread-eagle pose. Bent over him was Monica Lewinsky, doing what she does best.
 
Obama looked at this in shocked disbelief, and finally said, "Yeah man, I can handle this."
 
The devil smiled and says...........                               
                                                                                                                                                                 
"OK, Monica, you're free to go."

    
***
A mortician was working late one night...
A mortician was working late one night. It was his job to examine the dead bodies before they were sent off to be buried or cremated. As he examined the body of Mr. Sam, who was about to be cremated, he made an amazing discovery: Sam had the longest private part he had ever seen!

“I’m sorry Mr. Sam,” said the mortician, “but I can’t send you off to be cremated with a tremendously huge private part like this. It has to be saved for posterity.”

And with that the coroner used his tools to remove the dead man’s distinguishing member. The coroner stuffed his prize into a briefcase and took it home. The first person he showed was his wife.

“I have something to show you that you won’t believe,” he said, and opened his briefcase.

“Oh, my God!” she screamed, “Sam is dead!” 
***
Randy the Rooster
A farmer has 200 chickens and no rooster, and he wants chicks. So, he goes down the road to the next farmer and asks if he has a rooster. The other farmer says, "yeah, I've got this great rooster, named randy; he'll service every chicken you've got. No problem"

Well, Randy the rooster is a lot of money, but the farmer decides he'd be worth it, so, he buys Randy. The farmer takes Randy home and sets him down in the barnyard, giving the rooster a pep talk, "Randy, I want you to pace yourself now. You've got a lot of chickens to service here and you cost me a lot of money, and I'll need you to do a good job. So, take your time and have some fun," the farmer said with a chuckle.

Randy seemed to understand, so the farmer points towards the hen house and Randy took off like a shot ~WHAM~ He nails every hen in there THREE or FOUR times and the farmer is just shocked. Randy runs out of the hen house and sees a flock of geese down by the lake ~WHAM~ he gets all the geese. Randy's up in the pigpen. He's in with the cows. Randy is jumping on every animal the farmer owns.

The farmer is distraught, worried that his expensive rooster won't even last the day. Sure enough, when the farmer wakes up the next day he finds Randy dead as a doorknob in the middle of the yard. Buzzards are circling overhead.

The farmer makes his way out to Randy, saddened by the loss of such a colorful animal, he shakes his head and says, "Oh, Randy, I told you to pace yourself. I tried to get you to slow down, now look what you've done to yourself." Randy opens one eye, nods towards the sky and say's, "Shhh. They're getting closer..."
***
Newfie Logic
Two Newfies, Larry and Doug, are sitting at their favourite bar drinking beer.

Larry turns to Doug and says, 'You know, I'm tired of going through life without an education. Tomorrow I think I'll go to the Community College and sign up for some classes.'

Doug thinks it's a good idea and the two leave.

The next day, Larry goes down to the college and meets Dean of Admissions, who signs him up for the four basic classes: Math, English, history, and Logic.

'Logic?' Larry says. 'What's that?'

The dean says, 'I'll give you an example. Do you own a weed eater?'

'Yeah.'

'Then logically speaking, because you own a weed eater, I think that you would have a yard.'

'That's true, I do have a yard.'

'I'm not done,' the dean says. 'Because you have a yard, I think logically that you would have a house.'

'Yes, I do have a house.'

'And because you have a house, I think that you might logically have a family.'

'Yes, I have a family.

'I'm not done yet. Because you have a family, then logically you must have a wife. And because you have a wife, then logic tells me you must be a heterosexual.'

'I am a heterosexual. That's amazing, you were able to find out all of that because I have a weed eater.'

Excited to take the class now, Larry shakes the Dean's hand and leaves to go meet Doug at the bar. He tells Doug about his classes, how he is signed up for Math, English, History, and Logic.

'Logic? ' Doug says, 'What's that?'

Larry says, 'I'll give you an example. Do you have a weed eater?'

'No.'

'Then you're a fag'
***
The deaf Italian Bookkeeper
A Mafia Godfather finds out that his bookkeeper of 20 years, Guido, has cheated him out of $10 million. Guido is deaf which is why he got the job in the first place.

The Godfather assumed that since Guido could not hear anything, he could never testify in court.When the Godfather goes to confront Guido about his missing $10 million,

he takes along his personal lawyer because he knows sign language. The Godfather tells the lawyer, "Ask him where the money is!"

The lawyer, using sign language, asks Guido, "Where's the money?"

Guido signs back, "I don't know what you are talking about." The lawyer tells the Godfather, "He says he doesn't know what you are talking about."

The Godfather pulls out a pistol, puts it to Guido's head and says, "Ask him again or I'll kill him!"

The lawyer signs to Guido, "He'll kill you if you don't tell him."

Guido trembles and signs back, "OK! You win! The money is in a brown briefcase, buried behind the shed at my cousin Bruno's house."

The Godfather asks the lawyer, "What did he say?"

The lawyer replies, "He says you don't have the balls to pull the trigger."
***
It's Christmas time at the Pearly Gates..
Three men died on Christmas Eve and were met by Saint Peter at the pearly gates.

'In honour of this holy season' Saint Peter said, 'You must each possess something that symbolizes Christmas to get into heaven.'

The Englishman fumbled through his pockets and pulled out a lighter.
He flicked it on.  'It's a candle', he said.

'You may pass through the pearly gates'
Saint Peter said. 

The Scotsman reached into his pocket and pulled out a set of keys.
He shook them and said, 'They're bells.'

Saint Peter said
'You may pass through the pearly gates'.

The Irishman started searching desperately through his pockets and finally
pulled out a pair of women's panties.

St. Peter looked at the man
with a raised eyebrow and asked,
'And just what do those symbolize?'

The paddy replied, 'These are Carols.' 
***
An Engineer Goes to Hell
One day a civil engineer dies and goes before St Peter. St Peter gravely tells him that he must go to Hell.

So the engineer goes to Hell, looks around and thinks: 'What a shithole. Who designed this place?' So he says 'Hey! Satan...'

A few years later, God discovers that the engineer was on the wrong list and should have been allowed entrance to Heaven. So God goes down to Satan and explains the situation to him, and demands the engineer back.

Satan laughs at God and says 'You want HIM back? No fucking way. Look at this place: since he arrived, we've got R/C Aircon, elevators and escalators so we don't have to climb the mountains, we've got water filtration, comfortable accommodation, 24-hour electricity, we've got a new hotel with a pool that has a bar in the middle of it, the lighting's great, the beer's on tap in public fountains. Why the heck would I give this guy back to you?

God says: 'Give him back, or I'll sue you.'

Satan just laughs and asks 'And where are YOU going to get a lawyer?'
***
Two Syrian refugees compete to see who can become the most American in three weeks.
After three weeks the Syrians meet again at a McDonalds. The first Syrian makes his case for him being more American by saying: "Every day I have taken my son to softball practice and my daughter to ballet. I just purchased my first car and it is a Chevy El Camino. I've recently started listening to Toby Keith and Lynyrd Skynyrd and my favorite football team is the Dallas Cowboys. Beat that!"

The other Syrian simply replies with: "Get out of my country, you fucking towelhead."
***
A parole officer makes a house visit...
He walks sternly and silently into the house then to the upstairs hallway. He stops, reaches up and pulls a chord which releases a smaller set of stairs. He trudges up them and at the top he stands with a scowl as he examines the unfortunate scene. He yells, "What the hell, are you ever going to get clean?" With arms crossed, he waits for an answer, then finally gets it,

"What can I say, I'm an attic."







(Jesus christ, what am I doing with my life. 28 years old, stoned like a philistine and taking far, far too long to come up with this fucking joke and for what? A few upvotes that slowly plummet like a certain interim CEO's career. End with zero upvotes and three comments telling me that this non joke made them want to physically strangle the last remaining animal of an endangered species. I am not a man.)
***
The Italians are fighting Americans in the trenches
An American gets the idea to yell the name Luigi, and being a common Italian name when someone hears their name and looks up, they shoot him.

"Hey, Luigi!"

An Italian looks up and says

"Yeah?"

BANG

After the Americans do this a few times, the Italians try it for themselves. They decide to yell the name John, being a common American name.

"Hey-a, John!"

An American shouts back

"Hey! Is that you Luigi?"

The Italian looks up

"Yeah, itsa me!"

BANG

***
Bill Clinton, George W.Bush and George Washington are on a sinking ship.
Bill Clinton, George W. Bush and George Washington are on a sinking ship.

As the boat sinks, George Washington shouts, "Save the women!"

George W. Bush hollers, "Screw the women!"

Bill Clinton asks excitedly, "Do we have time?"
***
Hillary Clinton speaks to the schoolchildren
Teacher: Class please welcome Hillary Clinton today. She will answer your questions.

Hillary: Hello class. Who has the first question?

*Johnny raises hand*

Johnny: My name is Johnny. I have 3 questions.

- Why did you lie about Benghazi?
- What was in those emails you deleted?
- And does your pattern of corruption mean we can never trust you?

*The recess bell rings and the children return 40 minutes later.*

Hillary: Ok. Where were we? Who has a question?

*Kid raises hand*

George: My name is George and I have 5 questions. 

- Why did you lie about Benghazi?
- What was in those emails you deleted?
- Does your pattern of corruption mean we can never trust you?
- Why did the bell ring 10 minutes early?
- And... uh... oh yeah. Where's Johnny?
***
An old lady dies and goes to heaven. She's chatting it up with St.Peter at the Pearly Gates when all of a sudden she hears the most awful bloodcurdling screams.
"Don't worry about that," says St. Peter, "it's only someone having the 
holes put into her shoulder blades for wings." 

The old lady looks a 
little uncomfortable but carries on with the conversation.

Ten minutes later, there are more blood curdling screams "Oh my God," 
says the old lady, "now what is happening?" 

"Not to worry," says St. Peter, "She's just having her head drilled 
to fit the halo." 

"I can't do this," says the old lady, "I'm going to hell." 

"You can't go there," says St. Peter. "You'll be raped and sodomized." 

"Maybe so," says the old lady, "but I've already got the holes for that.
***
Why I fired my secretary today.

 
Last week was my birthday and I didn't feel very well waking up that morning. I went downstairs for breakfast hoping my wife would be pleasant and say, "Happy birthday!", and possibly have a present for me.

As it turned out, she barely said good morning, let alone "Happy birthday".

I thought... well, that's marriage for you, but the kids will remember. My kids ate breakfast and didn't say a word.

So when I left for the office, I was feeling pretty low and somewhat despondent. 

As I walked into my office, my secretary, Jane said, "Good morning boss, happy birthday!" It felt a little better that at least someone had remembered.

I worked until one o'clock and then Jane knocked on my door and said, "You know,it's such a beautiful day outside, and it's your birthday, let's go out to lunch, just you and me".

I said, "Thanks Jane, that's the greatest thing I've heard all day. Let's go!

"We went to lunch. But we didn't go where we normally would go. We dined instead at a little place with a private table. We had two martinis each and I enjoyed the meal tremendously.

On the way back to the office, Jane said, "You know, it's such a beautiful day...We don't need to go back to the office, do we?"

I responded, "I guess not. What do you have in mind?"

She said, "Let's go to my apartment".

After arriving at her apartment Jane turned to me and said, "Boss, if you don't mind, I'm going to step into the bedroom for a moment. I'll be right back".

"OK", I nervously replied.

She went into the bedroom and, after a couple of minutes, she came out carrying a huge birthday cake... followed by my wife, kids, and dozens of my friends and co-workers, all singing "Happy Birthday".

And I just sat there...

On the couch...


Naked...

***
A large group of Hells Angels were riding down the highway . . . .
A friend of mine posted this on his fb page.  I'm not sure who to properly attribute it to, but I thought it should go here.  My hat's off to the author.

Last week, a group of Hells Angels bikers were riding South on I-85 in North Carolina country when they saw a girl about to jump off the Catawba River Bridge.

They stopped.

George, the top biker was a big burly man of 53, gets off his Harley, walks through a group of gawkers, past the State Troopers and he says, "Hey Baby, whatcha doin' up there on that there railin'?"

She says "I'm going to commit suicide!"

George says "Well, before you jump, Honey-Babe, how about you give ol' George here your best goodbye kiss?"

Without hesitation, she leaned back over the rail and did just that. And it was a long, deep, lingering kiss plus a few more real wet ones. George gets cheers of approval from his biker-buddies, onlookers, and even the State Troopers.

"Wow! That was the best kiss I have ever had, Honey! That's a real talent you got there, Sugar Shorts. You could be famous if you rode with me.
Why the hell are you committing suicide?"

"My parents don't like me dressing up like a girl."
***
Nescafe and the Pope
Nescafe manages to arrange a meeting with the Pope at the Vatican.

After receiving the Papal blessing, the Nescafe official whispers,
"Your Eminence, we have an offer for you. Nescafe is prepared to
donate $100 million to the church if you change the Lord's Prayer from
'give us this day our daily bread' to 'give us this day our daily
coffee."

The Pope responds, "That is impossible. The prayer is the word of the
Lord. It must not be changed."

"Well," said the Nescafe man, "we anticipated your reluctance. For
this reason we will increase our offer to $300 million."

"My son, it is impossible, for the prayer is the word of the Lord and
it must not be changed."

The Nescafe guy says, "Your Holiness, we at Nescafe respect your
adherence to the faith, but we do have one final offer.... We will
donate $500 million - that's half a billion dollars - to the great
Catholic Church if you would only change the Lord's Prayer from 'give
us this day our daily bread' to 'give us this day our daily coffee.'
Please consider it."

And he leaves.

The next day the Pope convenes the College of Cardinals.
"There is some good news," he announces, "and some bad news.The good
news is that the Church will come into $500 million.'"

"And the bad news, your Holiness?" asks a Cardinal.

"We're losing the Wonder-Bread account." 
***
Saw a guy about to jump off a bridge
I was walking across a bridge one day, and I saw a man standing on the edge, about to jump. I ran over and said: "Stop. Don't do it."

"Why shouldn't I?" he asked.

"Well, there's so much to live for!"

"Like what?"

"Are you religious?"

He said: "Yes."

I said: "Me too. Are you Christian or Buddhist?"

"Christian."

"Me too. Are you Catholic or Protestant?"

"Protestant."

"Me too. Are you Episcopalian or Baptist?"

"Baptist."

"Wow. Me too. Are you Baptist Church of God or Baptist Church of the Lord?"

"Baptist Church of God."

"Me too. Are you original Baptist Church of God, or are you Reformed Baptist Church of God?"

"Reformed Baptist Church of God."

"Me too. Are you Reformed Baptist Church of God, Reformation of 1879, or Reformed Baptist Church of God, Reformation of 1915?"

He said: "Reformed Baptist Church of God, Reformation of 1915."

I said: "Die, heretic scum," and pushed him off.
***
A giant moth walks into a psychiatrist's office...
and the doctor, taken slightly aback, wonders what this monstrous creature is doing in his establishment. Nevertheless, being a good doctor, he asks the moth to sit down and tell him about his problems.

The moth sighs a long sigh, one that shows a deep disgust for life.

"Well, Doctor, I'm in a sort of existential slump, I've lost my zest for life. Things that used to fill me with joy now leave me with an aching absence in my chest, a yawning cavity that holds nothing and says nothing, just an incredible sense of the insignificance of life in general and me as an example of it.

I look at my wife across the table every day at dinner and no longer recognize the woman I fell in love with. She has become vapid, shallow, the sort of superficial bimbo that I always despised when I was growing up. Maybe it simply proves that I was never as significant as I imagined, that I am on the same level as those I formerly looked down on. That my sense of being special and unique is just a biological ruse, something that forces me to cling to life.

And the most shattering is that I look at my son and realize that I despise him as well. He holds this mirror up to me, shows me as the mediocre shell I am, spinning my wheels and waiting for the release that only oblivion can bring."

The doctor looked deep into the moth's tortured eyes and was clenched by a mixed feeling of pity and revulsion, knowing that there were aspects of the moth's soliloquy that touched the very core of his own being. He cleared his throat.

"Well, I'd love to prescribe you some antidepressants, but they're designed to work on humans. Why did you even come in here?"

"Well, the door was open and your lamp was on."
***
Once upon a time.....
.......there lived a beautiful Queen with large, beautiful, queenly breasts. Gerald the Dragon Slayer obsessed over the Queen for this reason. He knew that the penalty for his desire would be death should he try to touch them, but he had to try.

One day Gerald revealed his secret desire to his colleague, Harold the Physician, the King's chief doctor. Harold thought about this and said that he could arrange for Gerald to satisfy his desire, but it would cost him 1000 gold coins to arrange it. Gerald readily agreed to the scheme.

The next day, Harold made a batch of itching powder and poured a little bit into the Queen's bra while she bathed. Soon after she dressed, the itching commenced and grew intense. Upon being summoned to the Royal Chambers to address this incident, Harold informed the King and Queen that only a special saliva, if applied for four hours, would cure this type of itch, and that tests had shown that, among all of the citizens of the kingdom, only the saliva of Gerald would work as the antidote to cure the itch.

The King, eager to help his Queen, quickly summoned Gerald to their chambers. Harold then slipped Gerald the antidote for the itching powder, which he put into his mouth, and for the next four hours he worked with verve and elan to remove the itching on the Queen's magnificent breasts.

The itching was eventually relieved, and Gerald left satisfied. He was haled by both the King and Queen as a hero.

Upon returning to his chamber, Gerald found Harold demanding his payment of 1000 gold coins. With his hunger now satisfied, Gerald didn't care, since he knew that Harold could never report this matter to the King. With a laugh, he told Harold to get lost.

The next day, Harold slipped a massive dose of the same itching powder into the King's underwear. The King immediately summoned Gerald.
The moral of this story is: Pay your medical bills. 
***
Two men camping in the mountains....
had spent four days together, and they were getting a little testy. One morning, the first friend says, "You know, we're starting to get on each other's nerves. Why don't we split up today.

I'll hike north and spend the day looking around, you hike south and spend the day. Then tonight, we'll have dinner and share our experiences over the campfire."

The second friend agrees and hikes south. The first man hikes north.

That night over dinner, the first man tells his story.

"Today I hiked into a beautiful valley. I followed a stream up into a canyon and ate lunch. Then I swam in a crystal clear mountain lake. As I sat out and dried, I watched deer come and drink from the stream. The wildflowers were filled with butterflies and hawks floated all day overhead. How was your day?"

The second friend says, "I went south and ran across a set of railroad tracks. I followed them until I came across a young woman tied to the tracks. I cut the ropes off, gently lifted her off the tracks and I had sex with her in every imaginable way all afternoon. Finally, when I was so tired I could barely move, I came back to camp."

"Wow!!" the first guy exclaimed, "Your day was MUCH better than mine. Did you get a blow job, too?"

"Nah," says the second friend over his meal, "I couldn't find her head."
***
A joke for married golfers
Many years ago during my married days, I accidentally overturned my golf cart. 

Elizabeth, a very attractive and keen golfer, who lived in a villa on the golf course, heard the noise and called out: "Are you okay? What's your name?" 

"It's John, and I'm okay, thanks," I replied as I pulled myself out of the twisted cart. 

"John," she said, (firm loose breasts undulating beneath her white silky robe) "forget your troubles. Come to my villa, rest a while and I'll help you get the cart up later." 

"That's mighty nice of you," I answered, "but I don't think my wife would like it." 

"Oh, come on now," Elizabeth insisted.  

She was so very pretty, very very sexy and very persuasive ... I was weak. "Well okay," I finally agreed but thought to myself, "my wife won't like it." 

After a couple of restorative Scotch and waters, I thanked Elizabeth. "I feel a lot better now, but I know my wife is going to be really upset. So I'd best go now." 

"Don't be silly!" Elizabeth said with a smile, letting her robe fall open slightly. "She won't know anything. By the way, where is she?" 

"Still under the cart, I guess." 
***
A Jewish businessman in Brooklyn
A Jewish businessman in Brooklyn decided to send his son to Israel to absorb some of the culture of the homeland. 
When the son returned, the father asked him to tell him about his trip. 
The son said, "Pop, I had a great time in Israel. Oh, and by the way, I converted to Christianity."
"Oh, my," said the father. What have I done?" 
He decided to go ask his old friend Jacob what to do. 
Jake said, "Funny you should ask. I too sent my son to Israel, and he also came back a Christian. Perhaps we should go see the rabbi and ask him what we should do." 
So they went to see the rabbi. 
The rabbi said, "Funny you should ask. I too sent my son to Israel. He also came back a Christian. What is happening to our young people? 
The three of them prayed and explained what had happened to their sons and asked God what to do. 
Suddenly a voice came loud and clear from Heaven. 
The Voice said, "Funny you should ask. I, too, sent my Son to Israel...

Edit: Wow, I didn't expect these many upvotes. Also my first gold. Thank you stranger.
***
Pope gets a lesson
 Two beggars are sitting side by side on a street in Rome, Italy.
 
One has a Cross in front of him; the other one is holding the Star of David.
Many people go by, look at both beggars, but only put money into the hat of the beggar sitting behind the Cross.
 
The Pope comes by. He stops to watch the throngs of people giving money to the beggar who holds the Cross while none give to the beggar holding the Star of David.
 
Finally, the Pope approaches the beggar with the Star of David and says: "My poor fellow, don't you understand? This is a Catholic country; this city is the seat of Catholicism. People aren't going to give you money if you sit there with a Star of David in front of you, especially when you're sitting beside a beggar who is holding a Cross. In fact, they would probably give more money to him just out of spite!"
 
The beggar with the Star of David listened to the Pope, smiled, and turned to the beggar with the Cross and said: "Moishe, would you look who's trying to teach the Goldstein brothers about marketing!"
***
Religion and squirrels
There were four churches and a synagogue in a small town: a Presbyterian church, a Baptist church, a Methodist church, a Catholic church and a Jewish synagogue. Each church and the synagogue had a problem with squirrels.The Presbyterian church called a meeting to decide what to do about their squirrels. After much prayer and consideration they determined the squirrels were predestined to be there and they shouldn't interfere with God's divine will.

At the Baptist church the squirrels had taken an interest in the baptistery. The deacons met and decided to put a water slide on the baptistery and let the squirrels drown themselves. The squirrels liked the slide and, unfortunately, knew instinctively how to swim so twice as many squirrels showed up the following week.

The Methodist church decided that they were not in a position to harm any of God's creatures. So, they humanely trapped their squirrels and set them free near the Baptist Church. Two weeks later the squirrels were back when the Baptists took down the water slide.

But the Catholic Church came up with a very creative strategy. They baptized all the squirrels and consecrated them as members of the church. Now they only see them on Christmas and Easter.

Not much was heard from the Jewish synagogue, but it's rumored that they took one squirrel and circumcised him. They haven't seen a squirrel on their property since.
***
A man on a plane
A man boarded an airplane and took his seat. As he settled in, he glanced Up and saw the most beautiful woman boarding the plane. He soon realized She was heading straight towards his seat. As fate would have it, she took The seat right beside his. Eager to strike up a conversation he blurted out, “Business trip or pleasure?”
She turned, smiled and said, “Business. I’m going to the Annual Nymphomaniacs of America Convention in Boston."
He swallowed hard. Here was the most gorgeous woman he had ever seen Sitting next to him, and she was going to a meeting of nymphomaniacs!
Struggling to maintain his composure, he calmly asked, “What’s your Business at this convention?”
“Lecturer,” she responded. “I use information that I have learned from my Personal experiences to debunk some of the popular myths about sexuality.”
“Really?” he said. “And what kind of myths are there?”
“Well,” she explained, “one popular myth is that African-American men are The most well-endowed of all men, when in fact it is the Native American Indian who is most likely to possess that trait. Another popular myth is That Frenchmen are the best lovers, when actually it is men of Mexican Descent who are the best. I have also discovered that the lover with Absolutely the best stamina is the Southern Redneck.”
Suddenly the woman became a little uncomfortable and blushed.. “I’m Sorry,” she said, “I shouldn't really be discussing all of this with you. I don’t Even know your name.”
“Tonto,” the man said, “Tonto Gonzales, but my friends call me Bubba".
***
A woman goes into a shoe store...
she goes to a clerk and says "i want that pair, and that pair, and that pair." and the clerk says "whoa, mam, calm down. I'll go to the back, i'll get you a few pairs, and you can try them on."The woman agrees and the clerk goes to the back to get her some shoes. He returns to the front, and tells the woman to lift her leg up so he can put the shoe on.The woman is wearing a skirt, so when she lifts her leg the clerk gets a peek up her skirt. He notices the woman isn't wearing any panties. When she lifts her other leg, he gets another peek, but the woman notices this time."what're you looking at?" she asks. "well to be honest mam, i was looking at your pussy. I would like too fill it up with ice cream, and eat it all out."The woman is incredibly offended, and rushes home to tell her husband what happened. The husband responds "there are 3 reasons why i'm not going to go kick that guys ass. 1: you have enough shoes, stop buying so many. 2: You shouldn't be walking around without wearing any panties. 3: I couldn't beat up a guy who can eat that much ice cream."
***
Vladimir Putin was practicing a eulogy speech for an assassinated Russian politician in front of a mirror...
(ahem) "He was a dear patriot and credit to the Motherland, whom I personally adored as a friend and colleague.  I vow, as leader of Russia, to find the culprits responsible for this vicious murder..."

Putin then stopped and turned to his aide.  "Are you sure this strikes the right tone, Yuri?  I mean, in terms of timing?  I've been a bit preoccupied, so remind me, when was he killed?"

After a few moments consulting his ipad, the aide replies, "Next week, sir."
***
The Midget With a Lisp
A dwarf with a speech impediment goes into a stud farm, 'I'd like to buy a horth' he says to the owner of the farm.
'What sort of horse?' said the owner.
'A female horth' the dwarf replies. So the owner shows him a mare.
'Nithe horth.' says the dwarf, 'Can I thee her eyeth?'
So the owner picks up the dwarf to show him the horses eyes.
'Nithe eyeth.', says the dwarf, 'Can I thee her teeth?'
Again the owner picks up the dwarf to show him the horses teeth.
Nithe teeth.... Can I see her eerth?' the dwarf says.
The owner is getting fed up but again picks up the dwarf to show him the horses ears.
'Nithe eerth.' He says, 'Now...can I see her twot?'
The owner, not sure if he heard correctly, replies 'Her what?'
'Twot, can I see her twot,' the dwarf says.
The owner losing his patience picks the dwarf up by the scruff of his neck and shoves his head deep inside the horse's vagina. He holds him there for a couple of seconds before pulling him out and putting him down.

The dwarf shakes his head and says:
'Perhaps I should weefwaze that. Can I see her wun awound?'

Edit:  There ya go you pedantic geniuses of the internet!  It's no longer "lisp"
***
A priest and a rabbi were sitting in adjacent seats on an airplane.


After a while the priest turned to the rabbi and asked, “Is it still a requirement of your faith that you not eat pork?”

The rabbi responded, “Yes, that is still one of our laws.”

The priest then asked, “Have you ever eaten pork?”

“Yes, on one occasion I did succumb to temptation and ate a bacon sandwich.”

The priest nodded in understanding and went on with his reading.

A while later the rabbi spoke up and asked, “Father, is it still a requirement of your church that you remain celibate?”

The priest replied, “Yes, that is still very much a part of our faith.”

The rabbi then asked him, “Father, have you ever fallen to the temptations of the flesh?”

The priest replied, “Yes, Rabbi, on one occasion I was weak and broke the pledge of my faith.”

The rabbi nodded understandingly and remained silent for several minutes.

Finally the rabbi quietly observed, “Beats the shit out of a bacon sandwich doesn’t it?”
***
A Jewish guy and a Chinese guy are sitting on a bus
The Jewish guy turns to the Chinese guy and says "man I really hate Chinese people." The Chinese guy goes "why?" And the Jewish guy goes "because you guys bombed Pearl Harbor!" The Chinese guy says "that wasn't us that was the Japanese!" The Jewish guy replies "Japanese, Chinese, Vietnamese you're all the same!"

So the Chinese guy thinks about this and then says "well you know what? I really hate Jewish people!" And the Jewish guy goes "why?" And the Chinese guy goes "because you guys sunk the titanic!" The Jewish guy says "that wasn't us! That was an iceberg!" The Chinese guy replies "iceberg, Weinberg, Steinberg you're all the same!"
***
Bush, Trump, Sanders, and Clinton are all on a plane about to crash.
A plane with Jeb Bush, Donald Trump, Hillary Clinton & Bernie Sanders is about to crash, but has only 3 parachutes.
The first passenger yells, "I'm Jeb Bush, let the big dog eat! I can't 
afford to die." he took the first parachute and jumped.
The 2nd passenger, Donald Trump runs screaming, "I'm the smartest man in the world & the next President of America. He grabbed the second parachute and jumped.
The 3rd passenger, Hillary Clinton, says to Bernie Sanders "Take the last parachute."
Bernie says, "It's ok Hillary, there is a parachute for both of us. The 
world's smartest man just took my backpack."
***
Another lady goes to a pet shop...
And lands her eyes on a beautiful parrot. Lovely plumage and everything. She goes to the store owner and says, "I want this parrot. How much is it for?"

The shop owner says, "2000 dollars"

The lady says, "I understand the parrot is beautiful, but isn't the price a bit too high?"

Shop owner says, "Lady, this parrot is called Mickey and it talks. A lot. Go ahead ask it something."

The lady asks the parrot - "Hello Mickey, what do you think of me?"

The parrot says - "I think you're a cum-hungry whore, bitch!"

The lady is offended and says, "No way am I taking such a potty-mouth parrot."

The shop owner intervenes with "Lady, please give me 10 minutes and I will ensure Mickey behaves."

The shop owner then takes the parrot to the back of the store, brings out a pale of water, dunks Mickey in and asks "Are you going to fucking swear again?"

Mickey says, "Sure as fuck I will, you piece of shit!"

The shop owner then gets another bucket full of ice water, dunks Mickey in for 15 seconds and says, "How about now, fuckwit?"

Mickey goes, "I have learned my lesson, master. Please don't ever do that to me again. I shall be civil for the rest of my days."

The shop owner then brings Mickey back out and tells the lady, "I have cured him. You can test."

The lady then says, "Mickey, what will you say if I come home with a man?"

Mickey says, "That you have come home with your husband."

The lady asks again, "And what if I come home with two men?"

Mickey says, "That you are having a family dinner with your husband and your brother."

The lady then asks, "And what if I come home with three men?"

Mickey says, "Bro you better fetch that bucket of ice-water, I told you the bitch is a fucking whore."
***
Bubba dies in a fire and his body is pretty badly burned.
The morgue sends for his two best friends, Daryl and Gomer, to identify the body.

Daryl arrives first, and when the mortician pulls back the sheet, Daryl says, "Yup, his face is burnt up pretty bad. You better roll him over."

The mortician rolls him over, and Daryl says, "Nope, ain't Bubba."

The mortician thinks this is strange. Then he brings Gomer in to identify the body. Gomer takes a look at the face and says, "Yup, he's pretty well burnt up. Roll him over."

The mortician rolls him over and Gomer says, "No, it ain't Bubba."

The mortician asks, "How can you tell?"

Gomer said, "Well, Bubba had two assholes."

"What? He had two assholes?!" exclaims the mortician.

"Yup, every time we went to town, folks would say, 'Here comes Bubba with them two assholes.'"
***
Nuns traveling in Transylvania.
Two nuns are driving down a winding road in Transylvania, long after the sun has set.   

Mother Superior sits in the passenger's seat, and Sister Carlotta sits in the driver's seat.  They are driving along in relative silence when all of a sudden a vampire lands on the hood of the car and snarls at them, baring his teeth.

"Oh no!  Mother Superior!  What shall we do?  There's a vampire on the hood of the car!" asked Sister Carlotta.

"Honk the horn my dear, let's see if that will get rid of him" replied the Mother Superior.  Sister Carlotta did as she was instructed, the horn blared loudly but the vampire did not leave.

"Oh no, Mother Superior, the vampire remains, whatever shall we do now?"  Sister Carlotta asked.

"Try using the wiper blades, that may scare him off."  Mother Superior replied.  Sister Carlotta diligently followed the instructions, but the vampire was still on the hood of the car.

"This is just terrible! How will we escape?" Sister Carlotta's voice was shaky and nervous.

"Well, my dear, try showing him your cross."  Mother Superior suggested.

Sister Carlotta rolled down the window, leaned out and yelled, "GET OFF THE FUCKING CAR!!!"
***
Billy was obsessed with tractors.
Billy was obsessed with tractors. He grew up on a farm and ever since the very first moment he laid eyes on a tractor he thought they were the most beautiful things he'd ever seen. His parents would take him for rides through the fields on their tractor and started buying him toy tractors to play with. As he grew up he drew pictures of tractors all the time, and collected photos of rare tractors to put up in his bedroom. He bought tractor magazines and joined the Tractor Fanclub, and spent any spare pocket money on building model tractors. He was the biggest fan of tractors the world had ever seen.

His parents worried a little as his obsession grew, but it didn't seem to be harming anyone so they let it run its course. "He'll grow out of it in a year or two" they told each other. But he didn't, and soon he had started school. 

Billy was a gifted kid, but it soon became obvious that his obsession with tractors was making it hard for him to make friends. The few kids that tried to hang out with him got bored of talking about tractors and it seemed like Billy talked of little else. Billy grew lonely and started to realise that his love of tractors might be better hidden from the world.

So when Billy started High School he thought of it as a fresh new start. He tried his best to keep his tractor love hidden from his school mates and only indulged in his obsessive tractor fandom at home or reading tractor magazines in the school toilets. He got great marks and seemed especially gifted at mechanical subjects and agriculture, his knowledge of tractors and how they worked held him in good stead. In fact Billy became quite popular, and made a lot of good friends, and he hardly talked about tractors with them at all. 

At the beginning of 10th grade Billy fell in love with a girl called Monica. Monica had beautiful dark brown hair and round braces that almost looked like little tractor wheels. Billy and Monica started holding hands and school, and then kissing occasionally between classes, and eventually Billy asked her to come over to his parents farm and meet his family. 

So Monica came round one afternoon after school and met Billy's lovely parents and had a lot of fun roaming around the farm. Billy could not have been happier and all was going well unitl Monica asked Billy to see his room. "I don't think that's a good idea" said Billy, but Monica only laughed and would not be swayed, and playfully she ran past Billy up the hall to his bedroom door and opened it.

As the door creaked open Monica let out a horrible scream and after recoiling for a moment ran out of the house and all the way home. Inside the room was a vision of a madman. Tractors EVERYWHERE! From posters of tractors on every piece of wall to tractor quilts to thousands of model tractors on every available surface, the room was too much for Monica to deal with. She was absolutely freaked out.

Billy was distraught. He cried and cried and cursed his love of tractors. He flew into a rage, realising that his obsession with tractors had to stop. He pulled down the tractor posters, and broke apart his tractor shaped bed. He piled them outside with his tractor toys and models, his tractor magazines and books, his Tractor Fanclub membership card and his used tractor parts. He flew around the room gathering up every last tractor related item until the room was nearly bare and then when it was all on the huge pile outside he lit it all on fire. His parents came out and put a hand on his shoulder as he watched it burn, they knew it was good for him.

Billy went back to school, and although Monica would not talk to him, he was able to move on with his life. He soon graduated and went to college, deciding to study Finance, about as un-tractor like a subject as possible. Still sometimes he daydreamed and had to force himself not to draw tractors absentmindedly in the margins of his books. 

It worked. By his second year of college Billy was entirely normal, and had even met a wonderful girl called Chloe. He had met Chloe through his new best friend Steve who was training to be a chef, and soon Billy and Chloe were dating. 

Billy and Chloe would go on double dates with Steve and his girlfriend Alison, and eventually started going travelling too. They were very much in love. In fact they were so in love that 6 months later, after returning from a trip to Japan, Billy proposed to Chloe at the new restaurant Steve had just opened. And like that they were engaged to be married.

Chloe came from a wealthy family, and as soon as her parents heard the news they insisted on a huge white wedding. They hired a beautiful white painted hall, and Chloe's mum became involved in picking every single thing for the wedding, from white tablecloths to a huge, towering white cake. And of course, most important, a beautiful flowing white wedding dress. 

Billy's parents were a little overwhelmed by the excess, being used to their humble farm. But Billy was a wonderful son and kept them looked after during the long preparations and rehearsals. Steve's restaurant was being very successful so Billy got him to cater the wedding feast and before anyone knew it the day of the wedding was upon them. 

There was a huge hustle and bustle of frantic activity on the morning of the special day, and all seemed to be going perfectly. Unfortunately, Steve's girlfriend Alison had chosen that morning to break up with him, and he was distraught. And yet he knew he must pull it together if he was to cook the feast for his best friend's wedding. But he was in such a bad way that he started drinking from the cooking sherry and had soon drunk enough that he passed out in the kitchen. But the stovetop had been left on and soon all the food was burning, and a fire started blazing. 

It was only an hour out from the wedding and everyone was so busy with their wedding tasks that it took them some minutes to notice. But with a shout from a groomsman everyone saw the fire and rushed to save Steve from inside the kitchen. Smoke and ash billowed out through the door and into the hall. Billy and his friends quickly managed to put out the fire but when the danger was gone Billy walked out into a hall that had become a disaster zone. Soot covered all the beautiful white tablecloths, and the hall was full of smoke. Chloe's mum was in hysterics, screaming that the wedding was ruined and Chloe herself, the beautiful bride, was crying uncontrollably in a beautiful white wedding dress covered in ash. Billy looked around the hall and knew he had to do something.

"I can fix this!" he yelled. Everyone stopped their shouting and watched as Billy, the soon to be groom, strode over and opened the biggest window. 'There's only one thing for it' he thought to himself.

He opened his mouth as wide as it could go and started sucking up all the smoke. Wooosh, it was sucked into his lungs, and he went to the window and blew it all back out into the world. Again and again, Wooooosh, Billy sucked up all the smoke and the soot from the perfectly white tablecloths. Woooosh, he sucked up the ash from on the cake and all the smoke left in the hall and blew it out into the air out the window. Finally, as the rest of the wedding party looked on incredulously, mouths agape, he went over to his Chloe and wooooosh sucked up all the ash from her wedding dress. 

After one final trip to the window to blow the last smoke and soot out into the outside air Billy turned to see the hall sparkling and white. The wedding was saved! But the wedding party were astonished. Chloe's mum was looking faint and his parents were astounded by their son. But Billy only had eyes for his future wife and he walked over to where she was standing with a very confused look on her face.

"Billy, how the hell did you do that?" she asked, shocked.

Billy got down on one knee, and looking up as his love he said "Chloe, there's something about me you should know. I'm an extractor fan."
***
A man who'd just died is delivered to a local mortuary
... and he's wearing an expensive, expertly tailored black suit.

The mortician asks the deceased's wife how she would like the body dressed, pointing out that the man does look good in the black suit he is already wearing.

The widow, however, says that she always thought her husband looked his best in blue, and that she wants him in a blue suit. She gives the mortician a blank check and says, 'I don't care what it costs, but please have my husband in a blue suit for the viewing.'

The woman returns the next day and to her delight, she finds her husband dressed in a gorgeous blue suit with a subtle chalk stripe; the suit fits him perfectly.

She says to the mortician, 'Whatever this cost, I'm very satisfied.. You did an excellent job and I'm very grateful. How much did you spend?'

To her astonishment, the mortician presents her with the blank check, 'There's no charge.'

'No, really, I must compensate you for the cost of that exquisite blue suit,' she says.

'Honestly, ma'am,' the mortician says, 'it cost nothing. You see, a deceased gentleman of about your husband's size was brought in shortly after you left yesterday, and he was wearing an attractive blue suit. I asked his wife if she minded him going to his grave wearing a black suit instead, and she said it made no difference as long as he looked nice.'

'So I just switched the heads.'

***
Morning Jew
Morris Schwartz is on his deathbed, knows the end is near, is with his nurse, his wife, his daughter and 2 sons. "So", he says to them:

"Bernie, I want you to take the Beverly Hills houses."

"Sybil, take the apartments over in Los Angeles Plaza."

"Hymie, I want you to take the offices over in City Centre."

"Sarah, my dear wife, please take all the residential buildings downtown."

The nurse is just blown away by all this, and as Morris slips away, she says , "Mrs. Schwartz, your husband must have been such a hard working man to have accumulated all this property".

Sarah replies, "Property? The schmuck had a paper round!"

***
Some historic anti-Nazi jokes from Germany
Hey there. I thought, I'll take the time and translate you some of the so-called "Flüsterwitze"(whisper jokes) from nazi Germany. 

* The old code of law seems to complicated, so it has to be changed. From now on, there are only three laws: 1. If you do something, or fail to do something, you are punished. 2. The penalty is determined by the peoples emotion*. 3.What the peoples emotions is dictated by the Gauleiter(governor). (1934/35)
(original: "gesundes Volksempfinden" translates to "healthy emotions of the populace". The nazis used this as an excuse for mob violence agains Jews in the early days)

* The mayor of a small rural town is ordered to identify the local communists. Not knowing how to find out who they are, he calls Berlin and asks for help. The tell him: "Communists are people who don't want to work but expect to earn a lot." The mayor answers: "Well, we got two of those: the preacher and the teacher."(1933)

* "The government just bought the Sahara?" - "Why?" - "So they can cast more sand into peoples eyes." (sand in the eyes = to pull the wool over ones eyes) (1938)

* There can't be any elections in the forseeable future. - Why? - There was a break-in at the ministry of propaganda and the result for the next elections have been stolen from Goebbels desk.

* The Führer always keeps his promises. He promised us work and bread - he didn't say anything about butter.

* A man wants to buy a pig from a farmer, but he says it has to be an aryan pig. "What's that?", the farmer asks. "Well", the man answers. "It has to have bristles like Hitler, a snout like Goebbels and a belly like Göring!" (1934)

* At a press meeting Goebbels tells an American journalist: "If Roosevelt had something like the SS, there wouldn't be any Gangsters left in the US!" The yournalist answers: "Of course not. They would all be squad leaders by now." (1934)

* What's the difference between christianity and national socialism? - In christianity one man died for all, in national socialism all men are expected to die for one." (1944)

* Q: What do you get for a new joke? - A: Six months in Dachau. (1938)

***
Three vampires sit in a cave in the black of night, sharing a drink, laughing, and generally having a good time that one would not associate with the undead.
The night grew longer, and an observer, should they be careful enough, would learn that vampires can indeed get drunk.

Eventually, the three begin to bicker about which of them is the most powerful and deadly.

The youngest suddenly gets up, and flies off into the night. Almost instantly, he returns in a huge flock of bats. His hands are covered in blood.

With a cackle, he points down the road.

"You see that abandoned coach down there? I slaughtered everyone in it! The driver, a nobleman and his wife, their three sons, and a guardsman! All dead in the blink of an eye!"

The second, older than the first, but younger than the last, scoffs. "Child's play. Watch this." And disappears with the wind. Even with his heightened senses, the younger could not follow his movements.

The second vampire reappeared as suddenly as he had vanished, and the gust of his speed knocked the youngest to the ground. His hands, mouth, and collar were caked with gore. He gestures towards a town in the distance. As the vampires watched, a building lit on fire, and fell onto another one. Soon, the entire town was alight, but no movement could be seen from the townsfolk at all.

"A hundred people in that town! All dead! Torn to shreds!"

The youngest was in awe, but the eldest of the three only chuckled amusedly.

"How cute." He says.

The second looks almost indignant. "I'd like to see you do better."

The third lets out a malevolent chuckle.

"Very well."

He gets up, dusts off his cloak, and puts his spectacles down on a rock.

He disappears with a **CRACK.** The other two vampires' jaws dropped at the impossible speed that the eldest flew at.

Another resounding **CRACK** filled the air as the eldest vampire returned to the cave. His cloak was in tatters. His clothes were disheveled. But most prominent was the blood. His entire body was covered in blood. Never would the other vampires imagine that so much blood could cling to one person.

The eldest lets out a sigh, and plops to the ground. He reaches for his glasses, and cleans them with what remains of his cloak.

The younger vampires look at each other, not sure whether to break the silence.

Finally, the youngest asks, "So...?"

The elder vampire looks up slowly. He murmurs,

"You see that massive tree over there? The one with the widest trunk, as thick as a man is tall?"

Baffled, the youngest replied, "...Yes?"

The eldest, sheepishly, continued.

"Well, I didn't."
***
A Blonde Woman Asks For A $5000 Loan
A blonde woman walks into a bank in NYC before going on vacation and asks for a $5,000 loan.

The banker asks, "Okay, miss, is there anything you would like to use as collateral?"

The woman says, "Yes, of course. I'll use my Rolls Royce."

The banker, stunned, asks, "A $250,000 Rolls Royce? Really?"

The woman is completely positive. She hands over the keys, as the bankers and loan officers laugh at her. 
They check her credentials, make sure she is the title owner. Everything checks out.
They park it in their underground garage for two weeks.

When she comes back, she pays off the $5,000 loan as well as the $15.41 interest.

The loan officer says, "Miss, we are very appreciative of your business with us, but I have one question.
We looked you up and found out that you are a multi-millionaire. 
Why would you want to borrow $5,000?"

The woman replies, 
"Where else in New York City can I park my car for two weeks for only $15.41 and
expect it to be there when I return?"
***
Joe wanted to buy a Harley motorcycle.
He doesn't have much luck, until one day, he comes across a Harley with a 'for sale' sign on it. 

The bike looks better than a new one, although it is 10 years old. It's shiny and in mint condition.

He buys it and asks the seller how he kept it in such great condition for 10 years.

'Well, it's quite simple,' says the seller, 'whenever the bike is outside and it's gonna rain, rub Vaseline on the chrome.It protects it from the rain, and he 
hands Joe a jar of Vaseline. 

That night, his girlfriend, Sandra, invites him over to meet her parents. 
Naturally, they take the bike there.

Just before they enter the house, Sandra stops him and says, 'I have to 
tell you something about my family.

'When we eat dinner, we don't talk.

In fact, the FIRST person who says anything during dinner has to do the dishes.'

'No problem,' he says.. And in they go.

Joe is shocked.Right in the middle of the living room is a huge stack of dirty dishes.

In the kitchen is another huge stack of dishes. Piled up on the stairs, in the corridor, everywhere he looks dirty dishes.

They sit down to dinner, and sure enough, no one says a word.

As dinner progresses, Joe decides to take advantage of the situation.

He leans over and kisses Sandra.

No one says a word.

He reaches over and fondles her breasts. Nobody says a word.

So he stands up, grabs her, rips her clothes off, throws her on the table 
and screws her, right there in front of her parents.

His girlfriend is a little flustered, her dad is obviously livid and her mom horrified when he sits back down, but no one says a word.

He looks at her mom. She's got a great body too.

Joe grabs mom, bends her over the table, pulls down her panties, and screws her every which way but loose 
right there on the dinner table.

She has a big orgasm, & Joe sits down.

His girlfriend is furious, her dad is boiling, & Mom is beaming from ear to ear. But still ... . Total silence.

All of a sudden there is a loud clap of thunder, and it starts to rain.

Joe remembers his bike, so he pulls the jar of Vaseline from his pocket.

Suddenly the father shouts.
I'll do the fuckin’ dishes!!
***
Psychology lecture
A psychology professor starts his lecture by telling the students: "Today we'll learn about the three stages of human emotion: surprise, irritation, and rage." With that, he takes his phone out of his pocket, puts it on speaker, and dials a random number.

"Hello, may I please speak to Dave?" says the professor when the other person answers.

"No, I'm sorry, you have the wrong number" says the person on the other end.

"You see that students, that's surprise. Now allow me to show you what irritation sounds like."

He picks up the phone again, and dials the same number. When it answers, the professor asks.

"Hi, can Dave come to the phone?"

"I told you you have the wrong number"

"That's irritation, my friends" says the professor. "Now, let's look at what rage looks like"

He picks up the phone and dials the number again. When it answers he asks.

"Is Dave available?"

"LISTEN, YOU FUCKING DIPSHIT. IF YOU CALL THIS NUMBER AGAIN, I'LL COME OVER, BREAK THAT PHONE IN HALF AND SHOVE IT UP YOUR ASS. AND IF IT DOESN'T FIT, I'LL PUSH IT IN WITH MY COCK!!!!!!"

"And that's rage."

"Professor, you forgot the fourth stage," says a young man in the front rows.

"And what might that be?" asks the professor.

"It's called the stage of total confusion. Allow me to demonstrate"
He comes up to the podium, takes the professor's phone and dials the same number.

"Hello, this is Dave, has somebody asked for me today?"
***
Hark, I hear the cannons roar
An out-of-work actor gets a call from his agent one day.

"I got you a job. It's a one-liner."

"That's okay!" replies the actor, "I've been out of work for so long I'll take anything. What's the line?"

"Hark, I hear the cannons roar," says the agent.

"I love it!" says the actor. "When's the audition?"

"Wednesday," says the agent.

Wednesday comes and the actor arrives at the audition. He marches on stage and shouts, "Hark, I hear the cannons roar!"

"Brilliant!" says the director, "you've got the job! The first show is at 9 o'clock, Saturday night."

The actor is so excited that he goes on a major bender. He wakes up 8:30 Saturday evening and runs to the theater, continually repeating his line, "Hark, I hear the cannons roar! Hark, I hear the cannons roar!" He arrives and is stopped by the bouncer.

"Who the heck are you?"

"I'm Hark, I hear the cannons roar" says the actor.

"You're Hark, I hear the cannons roar?" says the bouncer. "You're late! Get up to makeup right now!"

So, the actor runs up to makeup.

"Who the heck are you?" asks the makeup girl.

"I'm Hark, I hear the cannons roar!" he says.

"You're late! Sit down." So she applies the makeup. "Now, quick, get down to the stage, it's almost time to say your
line!"

So he dashes down to the stage.

"Who the heck are you?" asks the stage manager.

"I'm Hark, I hear the cannons roar!" he replies.

"Oh, thank God! Just in time! Now get out there, the curtains are about to go up!"

So, the actor runs onto the stage. The curtains rise and he sees that the house is full. Suddenly, there is an almighty bang behind him, and the bewildered actor shouts, "What the fuck was THAT?!"
***
A cowboy is captured by a Native American tribe.
The chief approaches the cowboy and tells him, "Your people have encroached upon our lands and killed our brothers, We may kill you in retribution. But we are generous. We will offer you one request per day for the next three days. Choose wisely. What is your first request?"

The cowboy thinks for a moment and asks for his horse. The tribesmen bring the horse and the cowboy whispers something into its ear. The horse takes off and arrives back that night with a beautiful blond on its back. She dismounts the horse and spends the night with the cowboy making passionate love. 

On the second day, the chief approaches the cowboy and says, "White man. You have two requests remaining. Think not of carnal desires but of how you might redeem yourself. What is your second request? 

Again the cowboy asks for his horse. The tribesmen bring the horse and the cowboy again whispers something into the horse's ear. The horse takes off and arrives back that night with a beautiful red-head on its back. The red-head dismounts and spends the night with the cowboy making passionate love.

On the third day, The chief again approaches the cowboy and says, "White man, today is your final request. Choose wisely. You may yet redeem yourself."

Without hesitation, the cowboy asks for his horse one more time. The tribesmen bring the horse and the cowboy grabs it by both of its ears, looks it in its eyes and yells, "POSSE, GODDAMNIT. BRING THE POSSE!"
***
A man walks into a bar......
An Irishman man walks into a bar in New York City. He orders three whiskeys. The bartender pours him one and says, "Lemme know when you want the next one." But the man says, "I think you've misunderstood me. I'd like all three at once." The bartender pours two more drinks. The man drinks down the three drinks, pays, and leaves.

This goes on almost every night for a couple of weeks. Finally the bartender asks the man why he orders three drinks at a time, since there's no real advantage to it. So the man tells him, "When I left the auld sod I promised my two brothers that whenever I sat down to take a taste of the creature, I'd order one for me and one for each of them. That's why I order three at once." It makes sense to the bartender, so he's satisfied.

The man keeps coming back almost every night for more than a year. He and the bartender get to know each other pretty well. Then one day, the man orders only two drinks. This goes on for a couple weeks, but the bartender is afraid to ask if anything happened to one of the brothers. Finally, the man comes into the bar and only orders two drinks, again. The bartender figures he has to ask, and summons up the courage to say, "I noticed you've been ordering only two drinks for the last few weeks. Is everything allright with your brothers?" The man looks at the bartender, puzzled, then realizes what he is implying. He smiles and says, "Yes! My brothers are fine, but I've given up drinking for Lent."
***
A horse walks into a bar...
A horse walks into a bar. The bartender says, "why the long face?" The horse stands there, staring blankly at the bartender. Everyone starts to feel a little awkward. The horse's handler comes in and leads it out, but not before it's knocked over a couple of glasses and soiled itself. Needless to say, the bar is closed for the rest of the day. Jesus walks up to the bar, but it's closed for hygiene reasons and he goes next door to a hotel. He hands the receptionist a couple of nails and says "Can you put me up for the night?" The receptionist takes a moment to understand, not speaking Aramaic, but is able to explain in mime that nails are not legal tender. After Jesus leaves disgruntledly, a duck that has been kind of harrassing the receptionist for the last few days by asking for grapes waddles in. The duck asks if the receptionist has any nails, and the receptionist finally snaps. Deciding to walk out on the most ludicrous workday of his life, receptionist goes to the bar, and is infuriated to find it closed. He jimmies open a window, not caring who sees. But two old friends across the street, a priest and a rabbi, DO see. They decide they should do something to calm this agitated man down, and follow him into the bar. The bartender, having spent all day cleaning up after the horse, sees the receptionist, the priest and the rabbi come into the bar, and stops scrubbing shit long enough to ask "Is this some kind of a joke?"
***
3 guys are hiking through the woods when they find a lamp
One of them picks it up, rubs it, and out pops a Genie.  
It booms "You have finally freed me after all these years, so I'll grant each one of you 3 wishes."
The first guy immediately blurts out "I want a billion dollars." POOF, he's holding a printout that shows his account balance is now in fact 1,000,000,003.50  
The second man thinks for a bit, then says "I want to be the richest man alive." POOF, he's holding papers showing his net worth is now well over 100 billion.  
The third guy thinks even longer about his wish, then says "I want my left arm to rotate clockwise for the rest of my life." POOF, his arm starts rotating.  
The Genie tells them it's time for their second wish.  
First guy says: "I want to be married to the most beautiful woman on earth." POOF, a stunning beauty wraps herself around his arm.  
Second guy says "I want to be good-looking and charismatic, so I can have every girl I want." POOF, his looks change and the first guy's wife immediately starts flirting with him.  
Third guy says "I want my right arm to rotate counter-clockwise until I die." POOF, now both his arms are rotating, in opposite directions.  
The genie tells them to think very carefully about their third wish.  
First guy does, and after a while says "I never want to become sick or injured, I want to stay healthy until I die." POOF, his complexion improves, his acne is gone and his knees don't bother him any more.  
Second guy says "I never want to grow old. I want to stay 29 forever." POOF, he looks younger already.  
Third guy smiles triumphantly and says "My last wish is for my head to nod back and forth." POOF, he's now nodding his head and still flailing his arms around.  
The genie wishes them good luck, disappears, and the men soon go their separate ways.  

Many years later they meet again and chat about how things have been going. 
First guy is ecstatic: "I've invested the money and multiplied it many times over, so me and my family will be among the richest of the rich pretty much forever. My wife is a freak in the sheets, and I've never gotten so much as a cold in all these years." 
Second guy smiles and says "Well, I built charities worldwide with a fraction of my wealth, I'm still the richest guy alive and also revered for my good deeds. I haven't aged a day since we last met, and yes, your wife is pretty wild in bed."  
Third guy walks in, flailing his arms around and nodding his head, and says:  

"Guys, I think I fucked up."
***
Three guys are talking about their families (likely a re-post)
Three men - Bob, Joe, and David - are bragging about their families. Bob and Joe are Catholic, and David is Mormon. 

Joe says "I've got four athletic daughters. One more and I'll have a championship basketball team."

Bob responds "I've got eight athletic sons. One more and I'll have an all-Anerican baseball team."

David answers "I've got five beautiful wives. One more and I'll have a golf course."
***
A man deposits $1,000 cash into his bank account every day
The bank employees start getting a little suspicious and tell the manager about the customer. The manager tells them to let him know next time he makes a deposit. Surely enough, the next day, he comes with 1k in cash to deposit into his account. The tellers tell the man that the manager would like to see him. The manager, who sits in a giant glass office on the bank floor, welcomes the man and then asks him how he gets $1,000 to put in every day. The man tells him "well, I make a lot of bets and that's where all the money is from." The manager doesn't believe how he can make all that money just by betting, so the man says "okay then, I bet you $1,000 I can bite my eye."

"bullshit! That's impossible." Says the manager, and places $1,000 on the table. 

The man takes out his glass eye, bites it, and takes the money. "Okay, that's not fair to you. You didn't know I had a glass eye. I bet you double that I can bite my ear!" The manager thinks that it's impossible and is desperate to make his money back. "Deal."

The man then takes out his dentures and bites his ear. The manager is embarrassed and upset he's lost all that money on a stupid bet. The man notices this and says "Okay, you seem upset. I'll make it up to you fair and square. Tomorrow I'll come back and I bet you $5,000 I can guess what color underwear you're wearing."

The manager thinks this over and sees that there's no way the man will be able to guess and agrees. He later goes shopping for the craziest, most colorful pair of underwear he can find. The next day, the man is back in the manager's office. The manager goes "Alright then, try and guess what color I'm wearing. I'm more than certain that you'll never be able to."

"White." The man says.

The manager jumps up, takes the money, and yelps "AHA! WRONG!" and pulls down his pants to reveal rainbow colored underwear.

The man jumps up and yelps "AHA! I WIN!"

The manager is confused and says "what are you talking about? You guessed wrong and lost the bet."

"Yeah, I lost that bet. But I also bet all your employees out there watching that I could get you to pull down your pants."
***
An Irishman walks into a bar and orders three beers.
The bartender gives him a strange look, but serves him his drinks. The Irishman takes them to a booth, clinks them together, and drinks them all. 

He then goes back to the bartender and orders another three beers, which he proceeds to drink in the same fashion.

On his third round, the bartender can't help but ask him "excuse me sir, I couldn't help but notice that your order your drinks in threes, if you don't mind telling me, I was wondering why that is"

The Irishman grins and says "Well, I just moved here from me hometown. When me and me two best mates split ways, we agreed that we'd always have a drink for each other when we went out, so that we always drink together." The bartender nods understandingly, and serves him his drinks.

The Irishman keeps up this routine, coming to the bar at least twice a week and ordering three drinks at a time.

One day the Irishman walks in, solemnly makes his way to bar, and orders two beers. The patrons and the bartender all see this, and they assume that something terrible has happened to one of his friends. However, they don't want to disturb him in his time of grief, so they refrain from asking him anything.

When he goes to order his second round, the bartender can't help but remark "I'm so sorry for your loss". The Irishman looks up and says "Me loss!? What in tarnation are ye talking aboot?"

The bartender says "Well when you bought two drinks, I assumed that one of your friends had passed"

The Irishman laughs and says "No, nothing of the sort. I quit drinking is all".
***
Donald Trump...
-A big earthquake with the strength of 8.1 on the Richter scale hits the Middle East.

-Two million Muslims die and over a million are injured.

-Iraq, Iran and Syria are totally ruined and the governments don't know where to start with providing help to rebuild.

-The rest of the world is in shock.

-Britain is sending troops to help keep the peace.

-Saudi Arabia is sending oil & monetary assistance.

-Latin American countries are sending clothing.

-New Zealand and Australia are sending sheep, cattle and food crops.

-The Asian countries are sending labor to assist in rebuilding the infrastructure.

-Canada is sending medical teams and supplies.

-President Trump, not to be outdone, is sending back two million replacement Muslims.
***
After i heard the the one about Abe and his wife trying to poison him... I remembered this one.
A Polish man from Chicago married a Wisconsin girl after he had been in the 
states a year or so and, although his English was far from perfect, they got 
along very well. Until one day he rushed into a lawyer's office and asked 
him if he could arrange a divorce for him "very quick."   
The lawyer said that the speed of getting a divorce would depend on the 
circumstances and asked him the following questions:   


LAWYER: Have you any grounds? 


POLE: JA, JA, an acre and half and a nice little home with 3 bedrooms. 


LAWYER "No," I mean what is the foundation of this case?" 


POLE: "It is made of concrete, brick and mortar," he responded. 


LAWYER: "Does either of you have a real grudge?" 


POLE: "No," he replied, "We have a two-car carport and have never really 
needed one." 


LAWYER "I mean, what are your relations like?" 


POLE: "All my relations are in Poland." 


LAWYER: "Is there any infidelity in your marriage?" 


POLE: "Yes, we have hi fidelity stereo set & DVD player with 6.1 sound. We 
don't necessarily like the music, but the answer to your questions is yes." 


LAWYER: " No, I mean does your wife beat you up?" 


POLE: NO: " I'm always up before her." 


LAWYER: " WHY do you want this divorce?" 


POLE: "SHE going to kill me." 


LAWYER: "What makes you think that?" 


POLE: "I got proof." 


LAWYER: "What kind of proof?" 


POLE: "She going to poison me. She buy a bottle at the drug store and put 
on shelf in bathroom. I can read - it says, "Polish Remover."
***
A Burglar Broke Into a House...
A burglar broke into a house one night. He shone his flashlight around, looking for valuables when a voice in the dark said, 'Jesus knows you're here.'

He nearly jumped out of his skin, clicked his flashlight Off, and froze.

When he heard nothing more, after a bit, he shook his head and continued.

Just as he pulled the stereo out so He could disconnect the wires, clear as a bell he heard 'Jesus is watching you.'

Freaked out, he shone his light around frantically, looking for the source of the voice.

Finally, in the corner of the room, his flashlight beam came to rest on a parrot. 

'Did you say that?' he hissed at the parrot.

'Yep', the parrot confessed, then squawked, 'I'm just trying to warn you that he is watching you.'

The burglar relaxed.. 'Warn me, huh? Who in the world are you ?'

'Moses,' replied the bird.

'Moses?' the burglar laughed.  'What kind of people would name a bird Moses?'

'The kind of people that would name a Rottweiler Jesus.' 
***
Satan appeared at the front of the church
A few minutes before the services started, the townspeople were sitting in their pews and talking. Suddenly, Satan appeared at the front of the church. Everyone started screaming and running for the front entrance, trampling each other in a frantic effort to get away from evil incarnate.

Soon everyone had exited the church except for one elderly gentleman who sat calmly in his pew without moving, seeming oblivious to the fact that God's ultimate enemy was in his presence. 

So Satan walked up to the old man and said, "Don't you know who I am?"
The man replied, "Yep, sure do."

"Aren't you afraid of me?" Satan asked.

"Nope, sure ain't," said the man.

"Don't you realize I can kill you with a word?" asked Satan.

"Don't doubt it for a minute," returned the old man, in an even tone.

"Did you know that I could cause you profound, horrifying, physical AGONY... for all eternity?" persisted Satan.

"Yep," was the calm reply.

"And you're still not afraid?" asked Satan.

"Nope."

More than a little perturbed, Satan asked, "Well, why aren't you afraid of me?"

The man calmly replied, "Been married to your sister for the last 48 years!!..
***
A Highway Patrol officer stops a Harley for speeding, and asks the biker his name.
 'Fred,' he replies. 'Fred what?' the officer asks.
'Just Fred,' the man responds. The officer is in a good mood, thinks he might just give the biker a break, and write him out a warning instead of a ticket. The officer then presses him for the last name.

The man tells him that he used to have a last name but lost it.
The officer thinks that he has a nut case on his hands but plays along with it. 'Tell me, Fred, how did you lose your last name?'
The biker replies, 'It's a long story, so stay with me. I was born Fred Johnson. I studied hard and got good grades. When I got older, I realized that I wanted to be a doctor. I went through college, medical school, internship, residency, and finally got my degree, so I was Fred Johnson, MD.' 

'After a while I got bored being a doctor, so I decided to go back to school. Dentistry was my dream! Got all the way through School, got my degree, so then I was Fred Johnson, MD, DDS. Got bored doing dentistry, so I started fooling around with my assistant and she gave me VD, so now I was Fred Johnson, MD, DDS, with VD.'
'Well, the ADA found out about the VD, so they took away my DDS. Then I was Fred Johnson, MD, with VD. Then the AMA found out about the ADA taking away my DDS because of the VD, so they took away my MD leaving me as Fred Johnson with VD. Then the VD took away my Johnson, so now I am Just Fred.'
***
An Italian Boy's Confession
"Bless me Father, for I have sinned. I have been with a loose girl."

The priest asks, "Is that you, little Joey Pagano?"

"'Yes, Father, it is."

"And who was the girl you were with?"

"I can't tell you, Father. I don't want to ruin her reputation."

"Well, Joey, I'm sure to find out her name sooner or later so you may as well tell me now. Was it Tina Minetti?"

"I cannot say."

"Was it Teresa Mazzarelli?"

"I'll never tell."

"Was it Nina Capelli?"

"I'm sorry, but I cannot name her."

"Was it Cathy Piriano?"

"My lips are sealed."

"Was it Rosa DiAngelo, then?"

"Please, Father, I cannot tell you."

The priest sighs in frustration. "You're very tight lipped, and I admire that. But you've sinned and have to atone. You cannot be an altar boy now for 4 months. Now you go and behave yourself."

Joey walks back to his pew, and his friend Franco slides over and whispers, "What'd you get?"

"Four months vacation and five good leads!" 
***
Three men were going through Holy Orders to become priests...
They had passed all the tests up to this point and we're ready for the final test. They stood before the bishop and he told them that the final test would prove their devotion to God. They were instructed to take all their clothes off and tie little bells around their dicks.

The bishop told the first man to stand and prepare for the test. Then, a beautiful stripper came in and began to grind on the first man. Sure enough, the bell jingled 

*Ting-a-Ling* 

The bishop said, "I'm sorry, Patrick, but you are not devoted to God, go hit the showers." Then the second man came in and the stripper entered. Once again, the bells jingled 

*Ting-a-Ling* 

The bishop told the second man, "David, I'm afraid that you are not devoted to God. Go hit the showers."

Finally, the third man enters and stands ready for the test. The stripper comes in but she cannot arouse this man for her life! The bishop congratulates the third man for he must be truly devoted to God. "Congratulations on becoming a priest, young man, go hit the showers with Patrick and David." 

*Ting-a-Ling*
***
Three men approached the gates of heaven...
Three men approached the gates of heaven where they were immediately greeted by Saint Peter. "Hello good sirs, and welcome to the Kingdom of God. In heaven we have but one rule: Do not step on a duck."

"I'm sorry. Can you repeat that?" questioned one of the men.

"Over the years, many misconceptions of heaven have arose. Yes, it's a pretty nice place. No, its not perfect, but its close. You see the only problem are the ducks. If you step on a duck it will begin to quack and then all the other ducks will begin to quack and its simply a nuisance for us all." Saint Peter replied.

The three men looked at each other, shrugged, and entered heaven. As far as the eye could see there were ducks everywhere. Almost immediately one of the men accidentally stepped on a duck. Just as Peter had said, the duck began to quack and then the ducks around him began an audible tidal wave of quacks. 

Soon after the quacks had passed, Saint Peter approached the men in hand with a hag of a woman. Without a word, he shackled the hag to the man that stepped on the duck and left.

The other two men were careful not to step on a duck. Although they tried there best, one of them eventually stepped on a duck. The same phenomenon of before arose and Saint Peter arrived again with a huge amazonian woman. He shackled the woman to the man and left.

The final man treaded with care and spent many days and nights successfully stepping around the ducks. After a while, Saint Peter approached the man with a beautiful woman. He shackled the woman to the man and left without a word.

The man was so delighted he audibly said to himself, "What did I do to deserve this?"

The woman replied, "I don't know, but I stepped on a duck."
***
Old man and the IRS
Grandpa gets an audit letter in the mail and shows up to his appointment at the IRS building with his lawyer.  They enter the room, sit down, and the IRS agent starts to question them.

>*IRS Agent*: "**Well, sir, we think it is a little odd that you have no official income, but are able to afford such a lavish lifestyle, and you claim it is all from Gambling?  You say you made $300,000 last year from gambling alone?**"

>*Grandpa*: "**Yes.  I am very good at it.  Would you like a demonstration? I will bet you $1,500 that I can bite my own eye.**"

The IRS agent stares at him for a minute, quite confused, and takes the bet.  Before he can retract his words, Grandpa pops out his glass eye and proceeds to bite it.  The IRS agent is stunned, and just lost a grand.

>*Grandpa*: "**You didn't think I could do it did you?  Tell you what, double or nothing, I can bite my other eye.**"

The IRS agent studies Grandpa for a minute and thinks to himself that there is no way this guy has two glass eyes, and takes the bet.  Grandpa pulls out his dentures and uses them to bite his other eye.  The IRS agent's mount drops.  He is out $3000 now fair and square, with this man's lawyer here as proof, and starting to get worried.

>*Grandpa (laughs)*: "**You look worried, son.  I will do one more bet, double or nothing.  I am going to stand here and pee into that waste can behind you and not spill a single drop anywhere else.**"

The IRS agent looks at the man, turns around and looks at the waste can.  It is about 6 feet behind him.  This old man will have to pee about 8-9 feet and not spill a single drop.  The IRS agent is worried, but he thinks he can win this bet.

>*IRS Agent*: "**You're on!**"

Grandpa stands up and unzips.  He struggles mightily and lets a weak stream go.  It doesn't get anywhere near the trash can.  In fact, it just splashes all over the IRS agents desk and runs onto the floor.  The IRS agent starts jumping up and down with a huge smile on his face.

>*IRS Agent*: "**HAHA! YES! You didn't even get close!**"

The lawyer puts his head in his hands at this point, shaking it slowly, clearly upset about the incident.  The IRS agent looks over at him and asks what is wrong.

>*Lawyer*: "Just before we came in here, Grandpa bet me $25,000 that he could piss on your desk today and you would be happy about it."
***
An old dying man invites 3 of his friends to his deathbed and asks a favor...

He says, "We've been as brothers for longer than I can remember, and while I was not rich in life, I would like to bring some wealth with me as I die. If you could each leave $5,000 in my coffin, it would bring me great peace."

The three men saw no fault in this, as they were all very rich, and all upstanding members of their respective communities.

Jim was a devout, aging Catholic, and he brought the five thousand in large bills, so as not to occupy much space in the coffin. He later told the members of his congregation, and oh how they lauded him on his selflessness to ease the mind of a dying friend.

Michael was a converted Muslim, and he feared that the dead had no use for paper money, so he converted the five thousand into gold for his friend, leaving the ingots next to the bills. He felt a great warmth inside of him, a feeling that can only be brought about by a good, charitable deed.

David was born Jewish, but wasn't so devout as many of his colleagues. He refused to buck off the stereotype and worked as a moneylender, a loan agent. Because of this, he understood how exchange rates worked and how trying to convert 3 different types of money to one may be hard for a man with little experience handling cash. Therefore, he wrote a check for fifteen thousand dollars, and took the gold and bills as change. He left his friend's side with such a great smile, he must have known the time he'd saved him in the afterlife.
***
And that's how the fight started
One year, I decided to buy my mother-in-law a cemetery 
plot as a Christmas gift... 
The next year, I didn't buy her a gift. 
When she asked me why, I replied, 
"Well, you still haven't used the gift I bought you last year!" 
And that's how the fight started..... 
________________________________ 

My wife and I were watching Who Wants To Be A Millionaire while we were in bed. 
I turned to her and said, 'Do you want to have sex?' 
'No,' she answered. 
I then said,'Is that your final answer?' 
She didn't even look at me this time, simply saying, 'Yes..' 
So I said, "Then I'd like to phone a friend." 
And that's when the fight started... 
________________________________ 

I took my wife to a restaurant. 
The waiter, for some reason, took my order first. 
"I'll have the rump steak, rare, please." 
He said, "Aren't you worried about the mad cow?" 
"Nah, she can order for herself." 
And that's when the fight started..... 
_______________________________ 

My wife and I were sitting at a table at her high school reunion, and she kept staring at a drunken man swigging his drink as he sat alone at a nearby table. 
I asked her, "Do you know him?" 
"Yes", she sighed, 
"He's my old boyfriend. I understand he took to drinking right after we split up those many years ago, and I hear he hasn't been sober since." 
"My God!" I said, "Who would think a person could go on celebrating that long?" 
And then the fight started... 
________________________________ 

When our lawn mower broke and wouldn't run, my wife kept hinting to me that I should get it fixed. But, somehow I always had something else to take care of first, the shed, the boat, making beer.. Always something more important to me. Finally she thought of a clever way to make her point. 
When I arrived home one day, I found her seated in the tall grass, busily snipping away with a tiny pair of sewing scissors. I watched silently for a short time and then went into the house. I was gone only a minute, and when I came out again I handed her a toothbrush. I said, "When you finish cutting the grass, you might as well sweep the driveway." 
The doctors say I will walk again, but I will always have a limp. 
______________________________ 

My wife sat down next to me as I was flipping channels. 
She asked, "What's on TV?" 
I said, "Dust." 
And then the fight started... 
________________________________ 

My wife was hinting about what she wanted for our upcoming anniversary. 
She said, "I want something shiny that goes from 0 to 165 in about 2 seconds." 
I bought her a bathroom scale. 
And then the fight started...... 
______________________________ 

After retiring, I went to the Social Security office to apply for Social Security. 
The woman behind the counter asked me for my driver's License to verify my age. 
I looked in my pockets and realized I had left my wallet at home. I told the woman that I was very sorry, but I would have to go home and come back later. 
The woman said, 'Unbutton your shirt'. 
So I opened my shirt revealing my curly silver hair. 
She said, 'That silver hair on your chest is proof enough for me' and she processed my Social Security application. 
When I got home, I excitedly told my wife about my experience at the Social Security office. She said, 'You should have dropped your pants. You might have gotten disability too.' 
And then the fight started... 
________________________________ 

My wife was standing nude, looking in the bedroom mirror. 
She was not happy with what she saw and said to me, 
"I feel horrible; I look old, fat and ugly. I really need you to pay me a compliment.' 
I replied, "Your eyesight's damn near perfect." 
And then the fight started........ 
________________________________ 

I rear-ended a car this morning...the start of a REALLY bad day! 
The driver got out of the other car, and he was a DWARF!! 
He looked up at me and said 'I am NOT Happy!' 
So I said, 'Well, which one ARE you then?' 
That's how the fight started. 

***
A man wakes up in a dingy slum,
with no memory of how he got there. He wanders around aimlessly before he finds even one person who will talk to him. Some ratty beggar on the street turns out to be nice enough to explain where he is.

"You're in the afterlife!" he tells the man, "But you must have been a real shithead when you were alive, because this is the fourth ring, and only the worst people come here."

All of a sudden, a siren goes off, one of those air-raid things. The man is terrified but the beggar gets up calmly and leads him to a big, dilapidated warehouse where thousands of other similarly unkempt souls are gathering. When the man asks why they're all here, the beggar points to a line of folding tables against the wall. Each table has some moldy bread, cups of dingy water, and some bowls of broth so thin they could have just run out of cups. Only then does the man realize how hungry he is. A guard in heavy body armor blows a whistle and all the people arrange themselves into three lines.

The beggar is helpful enough to explain them for the man. "That one's the bread line, that's the broth line, and that's the water line. All the food here is free, but if you want to get out of this maggot hole, you've got to work, because the gate guards into the third ring ask five hundred dollars to get through. I've heard the food is better there."

So the man gets his food. It's abominable, and right then and there, he vows to make five hundred dollars and get into the third ring. Unfortunately for him, very few people need work in the afterlife, especially when all of them are saving up to emigrate. Even still, after ten years of hard work, eating the moldy bread and indistinguishable soup and water, he finally saves up enough money. The guards let him through and he finds himself in the third ring. It's nothing too fancy, if anything, it's a bit below average for a real city, but to his eyes it is paradise. All the guards look much friendlier, and the houses and buildings, while not spacious or lavish, are at least up to code. And to his surprise, he runs right into a familiar former beggar as he crosses the street.

"What are the odds?" they both ask and they get to conversing. The beggar, it turns out, only managed to make it in himself a few months back. Their conversation is interrupted, however, by what sounds like a school bell. When the man seems confused, the beggar leads him to what looks like a giant gymnasium. Here, people are gathering once again, and the man begins to understand. On a line of folding tables against one wall are stacks of hot dogs, big bowls of salad, and solo cups full of fresh lemonade. A cop shouts for everyone's attention and directs them all to stand in three lines. The beggar smiles at the man's wonder and points to each line in turn. "That's the hot dog line, that's the salad line, and that's the lemonade line." The man gets in each line in turn and gets himself his lunch.

While he's eating, basking in joy at not being stuck with old bread and water, the beggar encourages him, "The best part is, halfway through the year, they switch from hot dogs, salad, and lemonade to chicken, chili, and hot chocolate. You can never get tired of it!"

Sadly, this proved not to be true. After only a few days, the man did again get tired of the same meal every day. But he knew firsthand that he could change his lot, so one day he went up to the wall of the second circle. This time the guards were asking for ten thousand dollars. Well, the man didn't like it, but he figured he had his whole afterlife ahead of him now that he was out of the fourth circle, and he could certainly take some time to save up. After ten years of hard work, it wasn't too difficult for him to keep up the work ethic, and only twenty years later, he went back to the guards of the second ring with the money in hand. He went through the gate and found himself in a glittering, clean city full of glass and steel.

And wouldn't you know it, but there, standing across the street was the same beggar, only now he was wearing a well-fitted suit. The man greeted the beggar as an old friend and they started talking again. Once again, their conversation was interrupted, only this time it was by beautiful church bells. "Come," the beggar told him, "I'll take you to the evening meal." So the man followed and they entered a glamorous ballroom filled with beautiful attendees. Even the cops here looked good, dressed in suits and sunglasses like bodyguards. And sure enough, piled onto platters on huge mahogany tables against the far wall were plates of steak, bowls of the most delicious seafood soups, and glasses of champagne. One of the bodyguards cleared his throat loudly and politely requested that the attendees line up. Three lines were formed and the beggar pointed each line out in turn. "That's the steak line, that's the soup line, and that's the champagne line," and then he added, "and apparently here, they change the meals FOUR times a year!"

The man rejoiced, ate, and was happy, and for once felt that nothing was lacking. Four changes a year was enough for him. But one day, out of curiosity, he went up to the bodyguards that guarded the gate into the first and final ring of the afterlife and found they were asking for a million dollars to pass. Well the man was a bit disturbed by this, after all, the second ring seemed perfect to him. "What is it," he thought, "that could possibly be more wonderful than what I have here?" That question haunted him for weeks until he came to a conclusion. He was used to working hard and he had all of eternity to save up, so he wanted, just once to see what he could possibly be missing in the first ring.

Fifty years later, he returned to the guards with a million dollars. When he stepped into the first ring he fell to his knees. The architecture was glorious and inhuman, and the bodyguard had turned into shining angels. To his surprise, someone helped him up off the street and when he looked, he realized he recognized who it was--it was the beggar he met in the fourth ring, adorned in a golden robe and glowing, and when he looked down at himself he realized he looked much the same.

The beggar laughed jovially. "I got here only three years ago myself, but somehow I knew you would be right here behind me. I've come back to this gate every day waiting for you to make it in!" Suddenly, the air was filled with the sound of angelic choirs and the beggar led the man off to a gigantic palace made of crystal and cloud. The room was filled with radiant citizens of the first circle and angels prepared everything. Sure enough, there was a line of massive altars against one wall, spilling over with glistening golden dragon meat, a pudding refined from clouds and dew and silk, and an ice cold tub of ambrosia and nectar ladled out individually into blindingly beautiful crystalline chalices. An angel fluttered from the ceiling and bowed silently to the assembled mass, who bowed respectfully back and then broke themselves into their lines on their own.

Smiling at the tradition, the beggar pointed to the first line. "That's the line for the dragon meat," he said before turning to the next line, "and that's the line for angeldust stew," then he paused, confused.

"What is it?" the man asked his old friend.

The beggar replied, "There appears to be no punchline."
***
My grandfather sent me this in an email this morning.
Frank is 85 and lives in a Senior Citizens Home. Every night after dinner he goes to a secluded garden behind the home to sit and ponder his accomplishments and long life. One evening, Mildred, age 82, wanders into the garden. They begin to chat and before they know it, several hours have passed.


After a short lull in their conversation, Frank turns to Mildred and asks, "Do you know what I miss most of all?"

She asks, "What?''

"Sex." he replies.

Mildred exclaims, "Why you old toot. You couldn't get it up if I held a gun to your head!"

"I know," Frank says, "but it would be nice if a woman could just hold it for a while."

"Well, I can oblige," says Mildred, who unzips his trousers, removes his manhood and proceeds to hold it.

Afterward, they agree to meet secretly each night in the garden where they would sit and talk and Mildred would hold Frank's thingie.

Then one night Frank didn't show up at their usual meeting place. 

Alarmed, Mildred decided to find him and make sure he was O.K.

She walked around the Senior Citizen Home where she found him sitting by the pool with Ethel, another female resident, who was holding Frank's little pal!

Furious, Mildred yelled, "You two-timing son-of-a-gun!! What does Ethel have that I don't have?"


Old Frank smiled happily and replied, "Parkinson's" 
***
A blind man walks into a restaurant and sits down...
The waiter, who is also the owner, walks up to the blind man and hands him a menu. 

"I'm sorry, sir, but I am blind and can't read the menu. Just bring me a dirty fork from a previous customer. I'll smell it and order from there." 

A little confused, the owner walks over to the dirty dish pile and picks up a greasy fork. 

He returns to the blind man's table and hands it to him. 

The blind man puts the fork to his nose and takes in a deep breath. 

"Ah, yes, that's what I'll have -- meatloaf and mashed potatoes." 

Unbelievable, the owner thinks as he walks towards the kitchen. 

The cook happens to be the owner's wife.

He tells her what had just happened. 

The blind man eats his meal and leaves. 

Several days later, the blind man returns and the owner mistakenly brings him a menu again. 

"Sir, remember me? I'm the blind man." 

"I'm sorry, I didn't recognize you. I'll go get you a dirty fork." 

The owner retrieves a dirty fork and brings it to the blind man. 

After another deep breath, the blind man says, "That smells great. I'll take the macaroni and cheese with broccoli." 

Walking away in disbelief, the owner thinks the blind man is screwing around with him and tells his wife that the next time the blind man comes in he's going to test him. 

The blind man eats and leaves. 

He returns the following week, but this time the owner sees him coming and runs to the kitchen. 

He tells his wife, "Mary, rub this fork on your panties before I take it to the blind man." 

Mary complies and hands her husband the fork. 

As the blind man walks in and sits down, the owner is ready and waiting. 

"Good afternoon, sir, this time I remembered you and I already have the fork ready for you." 

The blind man puts the fork to his nose, takes a deep whiff, and says, "Hey I didn't know that Mary worked here..."
***
A Mexican man who spoke no English went into a department store
A Mexican man who spoke no English went into a department store to buy socks. He found his way to the menswear department where a young lady offered to help him.

"Quiero calcetines," said the man.

"I don't speak Spanish, but we have some very nice suits over here," said the salesgirl.

"No, no quiero trajes. Quiero calcetines," said the man.

"Well, these shirts are on sale this week," declared the salesgirl.

"No, no quiero camisas. Quiero calcetines," repeated the man.

"I still don't know what you're trying to say. We have some fine pants on this rack," offered the salesgirl.

"No, no quiero pantalones. Quiero calcetines," insisted the man.

"These sweaters are top quality," the salesgirl probed.

"No, no quiero sueter. Quiero calcetines," said the man.

"Our undershirts are over here," fumbled the salesgirl, beginning to lose patience.

"No, no quiero camisetas. Quiero calcetines," the man repeated.

As they passed the underwear counter, the man spotted a display of socks and happily grabbed a pair. Holding them up he proclaimed, "Eso sí que es!"

"Why didn't you just spell it in the first place?!" yelled the salesgirl.
***
John wins best toast of the night
John O'Reilly hoisted his beer and said, "Here's to spending the rest of me life, between the legs of me wife!" That won him the top prize at the pub for the best toast of the night! He went home and told his wife, Mary, "I won the prize for the best toast of the night."

She said, "Aye, did ye now. And what was your toast?" John said, "Here's to spending the rest of me life, sitting in church beside me wife." "Oh, that is very nice indeed, John!" Mary said.

The next day, Mary ran into one of John's drinking buddies on the street corner. The man chuckled leeringly and said, "John won the prize the other night at the pub with a toast about you, Mary."

She said, "Aye, he told me, and I was a bit surprised meself. You know, he's only been there twice in the last four years. Once he fell asleep, and the other time I had to pull him by the ears to make him come."
***
ENGLISH IS A FUNNY LANGUAGE
Let's face it -- English is a crazy language. There is no egg in eggplant not ham in hamburger; neither apple or pine in pineapple. English muffins weren't invented in England or French fries in France. Sweetmeats are candies while sweetbreads, which aren't sweet, are meat.

We take English for granted. But if we explore its paradoxes, we find that quicksand can work slowly, boxing rings are square and a guinea pig is neither from Guinea nor is it a pig.

And why is it that writers write but fingers don't fing, grocers don't groce and hammers don't ham? If the plural of tooth is teeth, why isn't the plural of booth beeth? One goose, 2 geese. So one moose, 2 meese? One index, 2 indices?

Doesn't it seem crazy that you can make amends but not one amend, that you comb through annals of history but not a single annal? If you have a bunch of odds and ends and get rid of all but one of them, what do you call it?

If teachers taught, why didn't preachers praught? If a vegetarian eats vegetables, what does a humanitarian eat? If you wrote a letter, perhaps you bote your tongue?

Sometimes I think all the English speakers should be committed to an asylum for the verbally insane. In what language do people recite at a play and play at a recital? Ship by truck and send cargo by ship? Have noses that run and feet that smell? Park on driveways and drive on parkways?

How can a slim chance and a fat chance be the sanme, while a wise man and wise guy are opposites? How can overlook and oversee be opposites, while quite alot and quite a few are alike? How can the weather be hot as hell one day and cold as hell another.

Have you noticed that we talk about certain things only when they are absent?

Have you ever seen a horseful carriage or a strapful gown? Met a sung hero or experienced requited love? Have you ever run into someone who was combobulated, gruntled, ruly or peccable? And where are all those people who ARE spring chickens or who would ACTUALLY hurt a fly?

You have to marvel at the unique lunacy of a language in which your house can burn up as it burns down, in which you fill in a form by filling it out and in which an alarm clock goes off by going on.

English was invented by people, not computers, and it reflects the creativity of the human race (which, of course, isn't a race at all). That is why, when the stars are out, they are visible, but when the lights are out, they are invisible. And why, when I wind up my watch, I start it, but when I wind up this essay, I end it.

source: jokstop.com  :http://jokstop.com/1sY
edit: 
wow 154 upvotes and 4th position,while with 2639 another is on 7th. go figure?
***
WARNING: dark jokes ahead
My girlfriend is into some really strange roleplay when we have sex. She always insists on pretending to be 14 years old.
I don't get why, she'll be 14 in a couple of years anyway


Woman delivers baby. Doctor takes the baby, and throws it, smashing around the hospital room, drop-kicking it, etc. Mother starts freaking out, being held back by nurses, begging "WHYYYY!!??". Doctor holds baby upside down by the ankle and says "I'm just fucking with you, it was born dead"



A guy was walking to a bar and on his way he found a girl tied up to the railroad tracks. He untied her and they had sex. Guy gets to the bar, friends ask why he's so late, tells them about the girl he found and all the different positions they fucked in. Friends give him props and ask if he got head, guy replies "I couldn't find it.

Q: What's the best part about dead baby jokes?
A: They never get old.

Q: What is the difference between Michael Phelps and Hitler?
A: Michael Phelps can finish a race.

edit: front page ahah never thought this would get there thx guy ;)
///

Q: What's the difference between Jews and Santa Claus?
A: Santa comes down the chimney

Q: What's the difference between a pizza and a Jew?
A: A pizza doesn't scream when you put it in the oven

Q: What's the difference between a nigger and a snow tire?
A: A snow tire doesn't sing when you put chains on it.

Q: What do black people and bikes have in common?
A: They stop working when you take the chains off

Q: What is the hardest part about being a pedophile?
A: Fitting in.

Yesterday, I failed my biology exam.
The question was: Name something commonly found in cells.
Apparently, Niggers wasn't the right answer
***
3 Nuns at the Pearly Gates (very mildly NSFW)
3 nuns are in a bus in Colombia, which due to budget cuts breaks it's axle, rolls over, and kills them all.  When they come to, they realize that the three of them are in a cloud-filled place standing in front of an elderly man at a dais, behind whom are enormous, gold-plated gates, which at the moment are closed.

The man says to them "Welcome, my friends, to the Pearly Gates.  My names is Peter, and I am the gatekeeper".

The nuns, thinking that they have devoted their lives to the service of God, are relieved to find out that this is where they are.  As they step forward, Peter says "you three have been such devoted servants of the lord that we will all rejoice to have you in heaven... given that you can answer one question each."

The nuns are, understandably, taken aback.  Peter asks, "So, who would like to go first?"

Two of the nuns step back, leaving the third standing in front.

Peter asks "So, my friend, what is the name of the first man?"

The nun doesn't even have to think... "That's an easy one - Adam".  The bells ring, the angels sing, and the first of the three is welcomed to heaven.

At this, the 2nd nun steps forward, having a bit more confidence.  Peter asks... "What is the name of the first woman?"  The nun answers, without hesitation "That's an easy one - Eve".  The bells ring, the angels sing, and she too is admitted to eternal glory.

Finally, the last nun is at this point relieved that the questions seem to be such trivial pieces of knowledge to those so pious as them, so she steps forward.  Peter asks... "What was the first thing that Eve said to Adam".

The last nun then quakes a bit as she realizes that this question, unlike the others, isn't quite as trivial.  She bites on her lip as she says "Oooh... that's a hard one..."

The bells ring, the angels sing, and the last nun enters the realm of eternal glory as well.
***
Two rednecks decided that they weren't going anywhere in life and thought they should go to college to get ahead.
The first goes in to see the counselor, who tells him to take Math, History, and Logic. 

"what's Logic?" the first redneck asks. 

The professor answers by saying, "Let me give you an example. Do you own a weedeater?" 

"I sure do." 

"Then I can assume, using logic, that you have a yard," replied the professor. 

"That's real good!" says the redneck. 

The professor continues, "Logic will also tell me that since you have a yard, you also own a house." 

Impressed, the redneck says, "Amazin!"

"And since you own a house, logic dictates that you have a wife." 

"That's Betty Mae! This is incredible!" The redneck is obviously catching on. 

"Finally, since you have a wife, logically I can assume that you are heterosexual," said the professor. 

"You're absolutely right! Why that's the most fascinatin' thing I ever heard! I cain't wait to take that logic class!!" 

The redneck, proud of the new world opening up to him, walks back into the hallway, where his friend is still waiting. 

"So what classes are ya takin'?" asks the friend. 

"Math, History, and Logic!" replies the first redneck. 

"What in tarnation is logic???" asked his friend. 

"Let me give you an example. Do ya own a weedeater?" asked the first redneck. 

"No," his friend replied.    
    
    

"FAG" 
***
A Japanese man on vacation in america...
Went to a bank near his hotel to exchange his yen for dollars. He hands the teller 1,000 yen and he gets 10 dollars. The next day he goes to the same bank and hands the teller 1,000 yen only this time he gets back 8 dollars. When the Japanese man asks why, the teller replies "Because fluctuations." the Japanese man says "Oh yeah? Well fuck you Americans too!"

-edit. changed 100 yen to 1,000. 
***
My Favorite Racist Joke
The Lone Ranger and Tonto were at the bar drinking, when in walks a cowboy who yells, "Who's white horse it that outside?"

The Lone Ranger finishes off his whiskey, slams down the glass, turns around and says, "It's my horse. Why do you want to know?"

The cowboy looks at him and says, "Well, your horse is standing out there in the sun and he don't look too good."

The Lone Ranger and Tonto run outside and they see that Silver is in bad shape, suffering from heat exhaustion. The Loan Ranger moves his horse into the shade and gets a bucket of water. He then pours some of the water over the horse and gives the rest to Silver to drink. It is then he notices that there isn't a breeze so he asks Tonto if he would start running around Silver to get some air flowing and perhaps cool him down.

Being a faithful friend, Tonto starts running around Silver. The Lone Ranger stands there for a bit then realizes there is not much more he can do, so he goes back into the bar and orders another whiskey.

After a bit a cowboy walks in and says, "Who's white horse is that outside?"

Slowly the Lone Ranger turns around and says, "That is my horse, what is wrong with him now?"

"Nothing," replies the cowboy, "I just wanted to let you know that you left your Injun running."
***
Go tell Mrs. Smith . . .
Six retired Floridian men were playing poker in the condo clubhouse when Mr. Smith loses $500 on a single hand, clutches his chest, and drops dead at the table.

Showing respect for their fallen comrade, the other five continue playing, but standing up.

At the end of the game, Mr. Jones looks around and asks, "So, who's gonna tell his wife?

They cut the cards. Mr. Miller picks the low card and has to carry the news. They tell him to be discreet, be gentle, don't make a bad situation any worse.

"Discreet? I'm the most discreet person you'll ever meet. Discretion is my middle name. Leave it to me."

Mr. Miller goes over to the Smiths’ condo and knocks on the door.

Mrs. Smith answers through the door and asks what he wants?

Mr. Miller says: "Your husband just lost $500 in a poker game and is really afraid to come home."

"Tell him to drop dead!" yells the wife.

"I'll go tell him." says Mr. Miller.
***
There were three POWs together in a British prison in the Second World War, a German, a Japanese, and an Italian.
The British began by torturing the German. After long hours of silence infected by bloodcurdling screams, he talked, and was sent back to the prison, ashamed. He told the others what he had done and urged them to be stronger than he was.

They next began torturing the Japanese man. Through all the pain and agony, he stayed strong for three days, but in the end, talked. He was sent back to the prison, having brought shame to himself, his family, and his country.

They finally sent in the Italian. For an unending three weeks, they tortured him, until they realized if they did anything else to the poor man, he would die, so they sent him back. When he got back to the prison cell bloody and battered, the other POWs asked him, "So? Did you talk?"

"How could I talk with my hands tied behind my back?"
***
Have what it takes to become a Monk?
Thomas decieded to live his life in service to the Lord. So he went to the nearby monastery to join the Benedictine order of monks there. Thomas was welcomed by Brother John, who gave him a tour of the monastic life. Thomas was excited and eager to join.

Brother John laid out the conditions of induction into the order. Before Thomas would be accepted he would need to complete a 3 year probationary period. 

During this time, Brother John explained, Thomas would have to strictly adhere to vow of silence and could not communicate in any way with anyone.  At the end of each year, Thomas would be allowed to speak only one word. If he passed the 3 year probation satisfactorily, he would be become a full brother of the order.

Thomas, thinking, what is such a small sacrifice for service to the Lord, agreed and began his 3 year probation. 

Life is the monastery was calm, and Thomas passed his time with study of the monks and Benedictine order.  

Then, about halfway through the first year he ran out of toothpaste. What could he do? He had to suffer with nasty breath and teeth until when the year was up he was allowed to speak his one word for the year:

"Toothpaste" he said. The other brothers understood and brought him some toothpaste.

The second year started well, but he popped a button off his tunic, and it let the cold air of winter in, chilling him to the bone. That was a tough and long winter for Thomas!

Finally the second year was up and his chance to say his one word. Thomas said, "Button."  The bothers understood and sewed a new button on his tunic. 

During his last year, Thomas thought he was in the home stretch and all would be fine when the buckle on his sandal broke and made a clanking sound whenever he walked. The noise worried Thomas, who was naturally humble and self-conscious.

At last the 3rd year of his probation ended, and he spoke his one word, "Buckle."  The bothers understood and fixed the buckle on his sandal.

As it was the end of his probation, Thomas was brought before the council of monks where they reviewed his record.  

After some deliberation and whispered discussion, Brother John looked at Thomas and said:

"Well Thomas, we're afraid that you are not a good fit here.  We've decided that you have failed your probation."

Thomas was crestfallen. He'd done everything they wanted without error, and took great pleasure in the pious service of the Lord. 

Thomas pleaded, "Why?"

Brother John looked at him and said,

"The problem is, all you ever do is complain."

***
So the Belgians are pissed...
The king of Belgium is fed up that the Dutch make jokes about how dumb Belgians are. He goes to King Willem, of the Netherlands, and demands that the Dutch should do something stupid, so that the Belgians can laugh at the Dutch. Willem wants to maintain good relations so he says; "meh, we will build a bridge in the Sahara". The king of Belgium approves and so it happens; the Dutch build a bridge in the desert. 

They became the laughing stock of the world. The king of Belgium is pleased and says to king Willem:"Ha ha that was funny, you can remove the bridge.

King Willem responds: "We can't, there are Belgians on the bridge trying to fish."
***
Donald Trump and Barack Obama go to the same barber...
...and one day, they walk in at the same time. Neither of them acknowledges the other. They both sit down, and have their hair cut at the same time by different barbers. The politicians don't speak, and neither do their barbers, lest the topic of politics come up.

After many minutes of silence, Trump's barber asks him if he wants a shave. Trump replies, "Fine, but skip the aftershave. I don't want my wife smelling me and thinking I've been to a *whorehouse!*"

Soon after, Obama's barber asks him if he would like a shave. Obama answers, "Of course, and go crazy with the aftershave. My wife has never been to a whorehouse, and certainly doesn't know what one *smells* like!"
***
A train hits a bus load of nuns and they all perish.
They are all in heaven trying to enter the pearly gates past St. Peter. He asks the first nun, ''Sister Karen, have you ever had any contact with a penis?'' The nun giggles and slyly replies, ''Well once I touched the head of one with the tip of my finger.'' St. Peter says, ''OK, dip the tip of your finger in the holy water and pass through the gate.'' St. Peter asks the next nun the same question, ''Sister Elizabeth have you ever had any contact with a penis?'' The nun is a little reluctant but replies ''Well once I fondled and stroked one.'' St. Peter says ''OK, dip your whole hand in the holy water and pass through the gate.'' All of a sudden, there is a lot of commotion in the line of nuns, one nun is pushing her way to the front of the line. When she reaches the front of the line St. Peter says ''Sister, Sister what seems to be the rush?! ''The nun replies, ''If I'm going to have to gargle that holy water, I want to go before Sister Mary sticks her ass in it!"
***
Vladimir Putin making a school visit...
Vladimir Putin, wanting to get on the good side of voters, goes to visit a school in Moscow to have a chat with the kids. He talks to them about how Russia is a powerful nation and how he wants the best for the people.

At the end of the talk, there is a section for questions, Little Alina puts her hand up and says "I have two questions"
"Why did the Russians take Crimea? And Why are we sending troops to Ukraine?" 
Putin says "Good questions" But just as he is about to answer, the bell goes, and the kids go to Lunch.

When they come back, they sit back down and there is room for some more questions, another girl, Tatiana, puts her hand up and says "I have Four questions"

"My Questions are - Why did the Russians invade Crimea? Why are we sending troops to Ukraine? Why did the bell go 20 minutes early? And Where is Alina?"

Edit: The comment are saying that Sasha and Misha are male names, and that "The Ukraine" is incorrect. Thanks for that, it's changed now.

Edit 2: Front page woop woop :D
***
A Chinese man comes to America...
He brought all of his money over in RMB so he goes to a bank with 1000RMB and asks them to change it into dollars.  The teller takes his money and gives him $650.

A week later he's out of cash and goes back to the bank with another 1000RMB.  He gives it to the teller and this time he only gets $625 back.  Perplexed he asks the teller in a heavy chinese accent.

"Hey, how come last time I get $650 dollar, this time only $625 dollar" 

The teller shrugs and says "Fluctuations"

The chinese man flies into a rage and storms out of bank and as he slams the door he turns and yells

"FLUC U AMERICANS TOO"
***
Last kiss

Back on January 9th, a group of Wadesboro, North Carolina bikers were riding east on Hwy.74 
when they saw a girl about to jump off the Pee Dee River Bridge. So ...they stopped.
George, their leader, a big burly man of 53, gets off his Harley, walks through a group of gawkers,
past the State Trooper who was trying to talk her down off the railing, and says,

"Hey Baby . . . whatcha doin' up there on that railing'?"
 
She says tearfully, "I'm going to commit suicide!!"
 
While he didn't want to appear "sensitive," George also didn't want to miss this "be-a-legend" opportunity either so he asked . . .
 
"Well, before you jump, Honey-Babe . . .why don't you give ol' George here your best last kiss?"
 
So, with no hesitation at all, she leaned back over the railing and did just that . . .
and it was a long, deep, lingering kiss followed immediately by another even better one.
 
After they breathlessly finished, George gets a big thumbs-up approval from his biker-buddies, 
the onlookers, and even the State Trooper, and then says, 
 
"Wow! That was the best kiss I have ever had! That's a real talent you're wasting there, Sugar Shorts. 
You could be famous if you rode with me. Why are you committing suicide?"
 
"My parents don't like me dressing up like a girl."  
 
It's still unclear whether she jumped or was pushed.
***
Mike and Muhammad
There were two white christian men, John and Mike, whose plane crashed into a desert. Luckily they survived unharmed. 

As they traveled through the hot desert looking for food and water, they gave up and sat down, thinking of what to do.
As the dust in the air settled, they suddenly could view a mosque ahead. 

They became very hopeful. But then John said ''Muslims are there. They might help us if we say we are Muslim.'' Then Mike said ''No way, I won't say I'm Muslim, I'm gonna be honest''.

So John and Mike went to the Mosque ahead and were greeted by an Arab Muslim, who asked what their names were.

John thought of a Muslim name and said, 'My name is Muhammad'. And Mike said 'My name is Mike'.

The Arab man said 'Hello Mike.' And told the other men to take Mike and give him food and drink.
Then he turned to John and said, 'Salaam Muhammad. Ramadan Mubarak! (Hello Muhammad, Happy Ramadan)
***
A Mafia Godfather...
... finds out that his bookkeeper of 20 years, Guido, has cheated him out of $10 million. Guido is deaf which is why he got the job in the first place.
The Godfather assumed that since Guido could not hear anything, he could never testify in court.When the Godfather goes to confront Guido about his missing $10 million,
he takes along his personal lawyer because he knows sign language. The Godfather tells the lawyer, "Ask him where the money is!"
The lawyer, using sign language, asks Guido, "Where's the money?"
Guido signs back, "I don't know what you are talking about." The lawyer tells the Godfather, "He says he doesn't know what you are talking about."
The Godfather pulls out a pistol, puts it to Guido's head and says, "Ask him again or I'll kill him!"
The lawyer signs to Guido, "He'll kill you if you don't tell him."
Guido trembles and signs back, "OK! You win! The money is in a brown briefcase, buried behind the shed at my cousin Bruno's house."
The Godfather asks the lawyer, "What did he say?"
The lawyer replies, "He says you don't have the balls to pull the trigger."
***
The Tired Marine
A Marine boarded a train on his way home from deployment. The train was quite crowded, and the Marine walked the entire length looking for a seat. There seemed to be one next to a well-dressed middle-aged French woman, but when he got there he saw it was taken by the woman's poodle.

The war-weary Marine asked, "Ma'am, may I have that seat?" The French woman sniffed and said to no one in particular, "Americans are so rude. My little Fifi is using that seat."

The Marine walked the entire train again, but the only seat available was under that dog. "Please, Ma'am. May I sit down? I'm very tired," he asked again. She snorted, "Not only are you Americans rude, you are also arrogant!"
This time the Marine didn't say a word; he just picked up the little dog, tossed it out the train window and sat down. The woman shrieked, "Someone must defend my honor! Put this American in his place!"

An English gentleman sitting nearby spoke up. "Sir, you Americans seem to have a penchant for doing the wrong thing. You hold the fork in the wrong hand. You drive your autos on the wrong side of the road. And now, sir, you seem to have thrown the wrong bitch out the window."
***
Hitler dies and goes to hell...
As he arrives, Satan greets him.

"Welcome to hell, Hitler." He says. "You deserve a place here for your actions. I will show you 3 rooms, and you'll have to switch places with the person inside the room. Now, follow me please."

Hitler stays silent and follows Satan. They walk into a corridor with 3 doors. Satan opens the first door. Inside, there's a fully burnt figure laying on the floor, constantly being burnt over and over by sunrays.

"Would you like to switch places?" Satan asks.

"Um... Nein, show me ze other options." Hitler responds. They walk on to the next room. Satan opens the door, revealing a man being crushed by a boulder over and over as he screams in agony with each impact.

"Would you like to switch places?" Satan asks.

"Nein. Show me ze last room." Hitler responds. Satan leads him to the last room, revealing a fat guy sitting on a chair, getting a blowjob from Kate Upton. 

Without even Satan asking, Hitler grins and says "Ya, I want zis room!" He claims in excitment, thinking about the pleasures awaiting him.

Satan smiles. "Great choice, Mr. Adolf." He then turns his head to them. "Hey Kate, we found your substitute!"
***
Getting Married in Heaven
On their way to get married, a young Catholic couple is involved in a fatal car accident. The couple find themselves sitting outside the Pearly Gates waiting for St. Peter to process them into Heaven. While waiting, they begin to wonder: Could they possibly get married in Heaven? When St. Peter showed up, they asked him.
St. Peter said, 'I don't know. This is the first time anyone has asked. Let me go find out,' and he leaves.
The couple sat and waited, and waited. Two months passed and the couple are still waiting. While waiting, they began to wonder what would happen if it didn't work out; could you get a divorce in heaven. After yet another month, St. Peter finally returns, looking somewhat bedraggled.
'Yes,' he informs the couple, 'you can get married in Heaven.'
'Great!' said the couple, 'But we were just wondering, what if things don't work out? Could we also get a divorce in Heaven?'
St. Peter, red-faced with anger, slammed his clipboard onto the ground. 'What's wrong?' asked the frightened couple.
'OH, COME ON!', St. Peter shouted, 'It took me three months to find a priest up here! Do you have any idea how long it'll take me to find a lawyer ?
***
Getting Married in Heaven
On their way to get married, a young Catholic couple is involved in a fatal car accident. The couple find themselves sitting outside the Pearly Gates waiting for St. Peter to process them into Heaven. While waiting, they begin to wonder: Could they possibly get married in Heaven? When St. Peter showed up, they asked him. 

St. Peter said, 'I don't know. This is the first time anyone has asked.  Let me go find out,' and he leaves.

The couple sat and waited, and waited. Two months passed and the couple are still waiting.    While waiting, they began to wonder what would happen if it didn't work out;  could you get a divorce in heaven.  After yet another month, St. Peter finally returns, looking somewhat bedraggled.

'Yes,' he informs the couple, 'you can get married in Heaven.'

'Great!' said the couple, 'But we were just wondering, what if things don't work out? Could we also get a divorce in Heaven?'

St. Peter, red-faced with anger, slammed his clipboard onto the ground. 'What's wrong?' asked the frightened couple. 

'OH, COME ON!', St. Peter shouted, 'It took me three months to find a priest up here! Do you have any idea how long it'll take me to find a lawyer ?
***
Four U.S. presidents are caught in a horrible tornado...
Four U.S. presidents are caught in a horrible tornado, that hits a state funeral they’re all attending in Kansas.

Suddenly, all of them are blown off to Oz. 

They finally make it to the Emerald City and come before the Great and Powerful Oz.


“What brings you before the great Wizard of Oz?”

Jimmy Carter steps forward timidly: “I've come for some courage.” 

”No problem!” says the Wizard. “Who is next?”

Ronald Reagan steps forward, “Well…I…I think I need a heart.” 

”Done,” says the Wizard.

“Who comes next before the great and powerful Oz?”

Up steps George W. Bush, who says, “I’m told by the American people that I need a brain.” 

”Not a problem!” says the Wizard. “Consider it done.” 

There is a great silence in the hall.

Bill Clinton is just standing there, looking around, but doesn't say a word. 

Irritated, the Wizard finally asks, “What do you want?” 

”Ummm,” he says quietly, “is Dorothy around?”
***
A young Swedish woman, old Dutch woman, an Englishman, and an Irishman are riding a train.
A young Swedish woman, an old Dutch woman, an Englishman, and an Irishman are riding on a train.
The train goes through a tunnel, it becomes pitch black in the car, and then a loud SMACK is heard.
The train emerges from the tunnel and the Englishman is rubbing his cheek.
The old Dutch woman thinks: "He must have groped the young Swedish woman, and she slapped him."
The young Swedish woman thinks: "He must have tried to grope me, and accidentally got the old woman, and she slapped him."
The Englishman thinks: "The Irishman must have groped the Swedish girl, and she accidentally slapped me."
The Irishman thinks: "I can't wait for another tunnel so I can smack that English guy again."

***
I was at my bank today and there was just an Asian lady ahead of me
who was trying to exchange yen for dollars.
It was obvious she was a little irritated. She asked the teller, "Why it change? Yesterday, I get two hunat dolla fo yen. Today I only get hunat eighty? Why it change?"
The teller shrugged his shoulders and said, "Fluctuations."
The Asian lady says, "Fluc you white people too!!"
***
A redditor walks in to bar...
The bartender says, "what'll you have?" 

"It's been so long since I've had a good laugh", replies the redditor. "I'll give you $100 if you can tell me a joke I haven't heard before." 

"That sounds easy enough", replies the bartender. 

"I should warn you", the redditor says, "I browse /r/jokes so I've heard them all over and over and over again". 

Curious, the bartender pulls out his phone and browses /r/jokes for a few minutes. 

"How about this?" he asks, "A man is driving through a remote forested area at night when his car breaks down next to an old monastery..." 

"Heard it.", interrupts the redditor. "It's reposted every month." 

The bartender apologies and starts scrolling on his phone for a few more minutes. 

"Ooh, here we go, so a blonde shows up at a rich guy's doorstep asking if she can do any chores for cash..."

"Heard it!!", the redditor snaps. "that's reposted every week!" 

The bartender is flustered but tries again, furiously browsing the subreddit. "Aha! This one is sure to impress. What's the difference between Donald Trump's hair and a thong?" 

"No, no, no!!!", the redditor cries out. "That joke is reposted every day!" 

"OK, OK, please give me one more try", the bartender pleads. He scrolls furiously through his phone. "Nope... nope... nope... YES!! This is a great one!" 

"OK, lay it on me", the redditor asks eagerly. 

"Here it is", the bartender replies. "So a redditor walks into a bar..."

---

Edit: initially screwed up the Donald Trump joke. Embarrassing, since I see it every day. 

Edit 2: gold! Now this redditor can actually afford to walk into a bar! They accept Reddit gold there, right? 
***
Einstein, Newton and Pascal play hide and go seek
Einstein, Newton and Pascal are playing hide and go seek. It's Einstein's turn to count so he covers his eyes and starts counting to ten. Pascal runs off and hides. Newton draws a one metre by one metre square on the ground in front of Einstein and stands in the middle of  it. Einstein reaches ten and uncovers his eyes. He sees Newton immediately and exclaims, "Newton! I found you!  You're it!"
Newton smiles and says, "you didn't find me,  you found a Newton over a square metre. You found Pascal!"
***
Little Johnny was walking down the street with his dad...
and he says "Hey, Dad!  I'll bet you $5 there's some dogs humping just around this corner!"    
Dad considers how likely it would be, and says "You're on, kid!"    
Once they get to the corner, they see the dogs going at it and Dad pays up.    
So Dad calls Johnnys teacher.  "Hey, my kid has this nasty gambling habit, but I can't break him of it because he never loses!  Can you help?"    
The teacher replies "I'll do what I can"   
Next day, Johnny enters the classroom.  "Hey teacher!  I'll bet you $5 I can guess what color panties you have on!"  The teacher demurely declines.  All week, Johnny is pestering her about betting on the color of her panties.    
On Friday, Johnny repeats the bet.  "Hey teacher!  I'll bet you $5 I can guess what color panties you have on!"  
She says "You're on!" and lifts her dress to reveal she isn't wearing any panties at all!   
Johnny pays the money, with much grumbling.    
The teacher ecstatically calls his father.  "Great news!  I made little Johnny lose a bet!"    
The father is astounded.  "How'd you do that?" he asks.    
"Well, Johnny's been bothering me all week about the color of my panties, and today I didn't wear any, so he lost the bet!"    
A long string of curses comes over the phone.     
Teacher asks "What's wrong?  Didn't I do it right?"     
Dad answers "Just this morning he bet me $50 he'd see your pussy before the day was out!"

***
A pretty good joke told to me by a coworker
One day little Billy approached Mr. Johnson's house and knocked on the door. After they exchanged a few pleasantries, little Billy asked Mr. Johnson, "Sir, I noticed ya got some milkweed growing in your backyard, mind if go back there and get some milk?" Amused by the request, Mr. Johnson replied, "Son, knock yourself out." knowing full well that he couldn't possibly get milk from milkweed. Sure enough, Billy came back to Mr. Johnson with 2 pails of milk. Little Billy thanked the now shocked and speechless Mr. Johnson and went on his way. 

The next day Billy knocked on Mr. Johnson's door again. "Afternoon Mr. Johnson, I noticed ya had some buttercups growing in your backyard, mind if I get some butter?" Curious this time around, Mr. Johnson replied, "Sure son, go right ahead." knowing full well he couldn't possibly get butter from a buttercup. Sure enough, Billy came back with 2 buckets of butter. Again, Billy thanked a now even more shocked and speechless Mr. Johnson and went on his way. 

The next day little Billy knocked on Mr. Johnson's door for a third time. Mr. Johnson, very intrigued by little Billy's strange requests eagerly greeted the young man. "How can I help you today son?" said Mr. Johnson. "Well sir, I noticed ya had some pussy willows growing in your backyar-" and before Billy could finish Mr. Johnson interrupted, "Hold on Billy! Let me go get my boots!"
***
Me Tarzan, you Jane...
When Jane first met Tarzan in the jungle, she was instantly attracted to him and during her questions about his life, she asked him if he had ever had sex. 

"Tarzan not know sex." he replied.

Jane explained to him what it was. 

Tarzan said, "Ohhh...Tarzan use knot hole in trunk of tree."

Horrified, Jane said, "Tarzan, you have it all wrong, but I will show you how to do it  properly." 

She took off her clothing and lay down on the ground. 

"Here." she said, pointing to her privates, "You must put it in here." 

Tarzan removed his loin cloth, showing Jane his considerable manhood, stepped closer to her and kicked her right in the crotch!  

Jane rolled around in agony for what seemed like an eternity.  

Eventually, she managed to gasp for air and screamed, "What did you do that for?!"

Tarzan replied, "Check for squirrel."
***
The 3 Spies
There are 3 Spies that get captured. One spy is French, one is German and the other is Italian. Their captors come into the cell and grab the French spy and tie his hands behind a chair in the next room. They torture him for 2 hours before he answers all questions and gives up all of his secrets. The captors throw the French spy back into the cell and grab the German spy. They tie his hands behind the chair as well and torture him for 4 hours before he tells them what they want to know. They throw him back into the cell and grab the Italian spy. They tie his hands behind the chair and begin torturing. 4 hours go by and the spy isn't talking. Then 8 hours, then 16 and after 24 hours they give up and throw him back into the cell. The German and French spy are impressed and ask him how he managed to not talk. The Italian spy responds, " I wanted to!, but I couldn't move my hands!".

EDIT: 
Glad everyone likes this joke. I want to give credit to a great friend of mine named Ron who told it to me.
***
Having sex with the teacher
Little johnny comes home from school on a friday afternoon and tells his mom he had sex with the teacher. Johnny's mom was very upset with him and sent him to his room with the warning his father would be home soon to discipline him. Johnny's father walks into his room and closes the door behind him. He says " Johnny, don't tell your mother this but I am VERY proud of you, you're just like your old man! First thing tomorrow morning we are going to the store so I can buy you a brand new bicycle" The following morning johnny and his father go to the store and buy a brand new bike. Johnny's father says " Go ahead son, you can ride your bike home I'll be alright walking by myself." Johnny refused to ride the bike and insisted on walking home with his father. Johnny's dad started to get upset thinking his son was ungrateful for the new bike he just bought him. He finally questioned johnny about why he didn't want to ride his bike home and he replied,

"My ass is still sore from having sex with the teacher"
***
Irishman and a Texan
A Texan walks into a pub in Ireland and clears his voice to the crowd of drinkers. He says, “I hear you Irish are a bunch of hard drinkers. I’ll give $500 American dollars to anybody in here who can drink 10 pints of Guinness back-to-back.” The room is quiet and no one takes up the Texan’s offer.

One man even leaves. Thirty minutes later the same gentleman who left shows back up and taps the Texan on the shoulder. “Is your bet still good?”, asks the Irishman.

The Texan says yes and asks the bartender to line up 10 pints of Guinness. Immediately the Irishman tears into all 10 of the pint glasses drinking them all back-to-back.

The other pub patrons cheer as the Texan sits in amazement.

The Texan gives the Irishman the $500 and says, “If ya don’t mind me askin’, where did you go for that 30 minutes you were gone?”.

The Irishman replies, “Oh…I had to go to the pub down the street to see if I could do it first”.
***
Walking on Water
It's the second resurection of Christ. Before the world ends he wants 
to take in some fishing. So he gets his friend Moses and they head up 
to Minnesota to fish. They are about to rent a canoe when Moses says:
"Jesus, can't you still walk on water? Why not just walk out there?"
So Jesus takes his reel and tackle and steps onto the lake....and falls 
knee deep in water.

Moses says, "Well....maybe you need a head start or something, why not 
go to the end of the dock and try."

So Jesus takes his reel and tackle and steps off the end of the dock and 
falls up to his waist.

Moses says, " Well why not rent the boat, go out to the center of the 
lake and try there."

So they rent the boat and go to the middle of the lake, Jesus is about 
to step off and try again when...

Moses says, "Wait. Just to be safe, why not get yourself into the state 
of mind you were in the first time you did it."

So Jesus sets down, meditates for a few minutes, and finally he's all 
psyched up, and steps out of the canoe.... ..and precedes to drown.
So Moses does the water parting thing, and pulls Jesus up into the boat.
Jesus is just beating himself up over this. He just doesn't see what's 
going wrong here. Moses just stares down at the bottom of the boat.
Suddenly, Moses says, "I got it! I know what's wrong! Did you have those 
holes in your feet last time?!?!"
***
A kid asks his dad "What's the difference between realistically and potentially?"
The father responds with "Go ask your siblings and your mother if they would have sex with a celebrity for a million dollars." 


The boy asks his mom "Would you have sex with George Clooney for a million dollars?" 


The mother responds " While I am a married woman,  that is a lot of money. He is also a very attractive man." 


The boy asks his sister "Would you have sex with Brad Pitt for a million dollars?" 


"Well of course! " she exclaims. 


Finally he asks his brother "Would you have sex with Tom Cruise for a million dollars" 


And he hums and haws about it  "I dunno man,  well... That is a lot of money. Yeah alright I'd do it." 


When the boy sees his father again the father asks " Did you figure out the difference between potentially and realistically?" 


"Yes father,  Potentially were sitting on $3,000,000.  Realistically were living with two whores and a fag."
***
The Girlfriend Joke
So I recently moved into a new neighborhood and it's a pretty nice area. After a couple of weeks, a moving truck pulls up and I realize there's a new girl living in the house next to me. So I walk out and I notice that she's all by herself. 

Being the good neighbor I am, I go up and ask, "Hey, I see you don't have any help. Do you need any help with moving your boxes inside?" 

And keep this in mind, I'm like a 6/10 on good day while this girl is an easy 9/10. Like this girl can easily be a supermodel. 

So I ask if she needs any help and she looks me dead in the eye with the nastiest grimace on her face and says, *"Uh... No thanks, I'm good."* 

"Well ok. No problem. If you need anything, just give a little knock on the door and I'll come out."

So a couple days go by after that failed attempt and this girl's dumb, small chihuahua jumps over the fence and gets into my yard. So I'm thinking, "Ok cranky girl. Round 2, let's go, we got this."

So I take the dumb dog and I bring it over to her house and give the door a knock. She opens the door and with the biggest smile says, "OH MY GOD thank you SO MUCH! I don't know what I would do without him. He's like family to me. I'm so sorry that I was so mean to you the other day. I was having a bad day and took it out on you and I'm so sorry. Please let me make it up to you and take you out to dinner."

So I humbly accept and we end up going out to dinner that night. Now, we don't have much in common. Like, I'm into video games and anime and she's into all this white girl stuff like makeup, Starbucks, and all that other shit. But, we have a good time. And I mean, this girl is WAY out of my league so who am I to complain? So then we hang out more frequently, I visit her and she visits me and now I'm in a good relationship with this extremely hot chick.

A couple weeks go by, we continue this, and I see a moving truck come in from the other direction. I go out to greet the new neighbor and I see a cute girl come out of the moving truck. Now this girl is cute. She isn't supermodel hot, but she's cute. I would say she's like a 7/10. So I go up to her and say, "Hey, I see you don't have any help with moving your stuff in. Is it ok if I help?" Luckily, she says, "Yeah, sure. Um, take this box and put it in the living room. It's the first room to the right, you can't  miss it."

So I go to pick up the box and I realize that it's labeled "*Video Games*." The box wasn't taped very well, so I peek into the box and I'm seeing some serious video games. I'm seeing Final Fantasy 7-9 black label, a mint copy of Illusion of Gaia. Like, what girl even knows what that game is!? So I ask, "Hey, is this a box of your boyfriend's stuff?" and she responds with, "No, I don't have a boyfriend. That stuff's mine so make sure not to drop it." So now I know this girl is actually the coolest girl ever.

So I help the girl move her stuff in and we hang out afterwards. We go out to lunch and we hit it off. We ended up just talking about video games the whole time and it was amazing. Now I have a friend to talk nerd shit with and don't forget, she's a cute as hell 7/10. And I also have this 9/10 girlfriend with me. And again, I'm just a 6/10 so right now, I'm living the dream.

So a couple weeks go by and my girlfriend comes up to me and says, "Hey, so this may sound weird, but I don't want you to hang out with that girl anymore. You're spending a lot of time with her and I'm honestly a little jealous and I want you to spend more time with me." 

I tell her, "Well listen, why don't you try to talk to her. If you like me, then you'll like her and then we can all hang out and it'll be great." She says, "Well...alright. I guess I'll give it a shot. I'll try to talk to her tomorrow

So next day, my girlfriend comes up to me and says, "Uh, yeah you can't see that girl ever again." 

"Wait, what? Why not? What happened?"

"Yeah she told me that you're hers now and if I ever go near you again, she is going to kill me."

"I think you're overreacting a little bit. She doesn't seem like that type of person"

"She told me, and I quote, that she is going to *fucking murder me*."

"I can't imagine that it's that serious. I'll try to straighten this out and go talk to her tomorrow."

I go up to 7/10's house the next day and give it a little knock on the door but nobody answers. I try the doorbell, nothing. Give her a call, text her, no answer. So then I call my girlfriend, try to tell her that she wasn't there and I'll try again tomorrow. But again, no answer. So I go over to her house, knock on the door and still no answer. Next day knock* knock* no answer and I don't know what's going on.

So day after day goes by and eventually, week after week and I'm getting nothing. I put in the missing persons but nothing turns up. I call their family and friends and they know nothing. And after weeks of all this, I just give up.

Then I turn the news on one day, and I see the 7/10 girl getting carried away in handcuffs. And, she's covered in blood from head to toe. She's screaming and yelling at the camera saying, "She's dead, you're next." A couple days go by and the autopsy reports are coming in, and its all over the internet. Apparently, not only did she kill my gorgeous 9/10 girlfriend, but parts of her were missing. Chunks of her arms and legs were gone and it seems that the 7/10 girl ate parts of my girlfriend. Bit and chewed into her.

Now I'm thinking to myself that I had the two most amazing girls in my life. And I'm here, 6/10, just worried out of my mind because I can't get the image out of my head of her screaming into the cameras saying, "She's dead, you're next. She's dead you're next." And I'm going crazy, I'm screaming and writing it in blood on the walls, "She's dead, you're next. She's dead you're next." AND I DON'T KNOW WHAT DO DO ANYMORE. 

And it raises the question: Why is 6 afraid of 7?
***
A Frenchman, a Brit, and a New Yorker go on a safari...
Along the way they run into a tribe of cannibals.  The chief was a pleasant fellow, but had some unfortunate news for them.

"Gentlemen, I am sorry but I must follow the way of my people."

"Oh?"  says the Brit.  "What's that?"

"Well..." the chief responds, "We will kill you, cook you, eat you, and use your skin to make a canoe.  However we're not entirely uncivilized.  We will let you choose the manner of your death, and perform it yourself, if you'd like."

The Frenchman steps forward first.  "I will take a sword, s'il vous plaît."

The cannibals hand him a sword.  The Frenchman shouts "Vive la France!" then runs himself through with the sword.

Next the Brit steps forward.  "I'll have a pistol, chaps."

The cannibals hand him a pistol.  "God save the Queen!" shouts the Brit, and blows his brains out.

Finally the New Yorker steps forward.  "Gimme a fork."

The cannibals are a bit mystified, but nonetheless give him a fork.  He proceeds to stab himself all over with the fork.  Arms, legs, face, torso.  Anywhere he can stab himself with it, he does so.

The chief is aghast.  "Good Lord!  What are you doing?!?!?!"

The New Yorker bellows, 

**"SO MUCH FOR YER CANOE, YA FUCKING JERKS!"**
***
Old man and the IRS
Grandpa gets an audit letter in the mail and shows up to his appointment at the IRS building with his lawyer. They enter the room, sit down, and the IRS agent starts to question them.

>IRS Agent: **"Well, sir, we think it is a little odd that you have no official income, but are able to afford such a lavish lifestyle, and you claim it is all from Gambling? You say you made $300,000 last year from gambling alone?"**

>Grandpa: **"Yes. I am very good at it. Would you like a demonstration? I will bet you $1,500 that I can bite my own eye."**

The IRS agent stares at him for a minute, quite confused, and takes the bet. Before he can retract his words, Grandpa pops out his glass eye and proceeds to bite it. The IRS agent is stunned, and just lost a grand.

>Grandpa: **"You didn't think I could do it did you? Tell you what, double or nothing, I can bite my other eye."**

The IRS agent studies Grandpa for a minute and thinks to himself that there is no way this guy has two glass eyes, and takes the bet. Grandpa pulls out his dentures and uses them to bite his other eye. The IRS agent's mount drops. He is out $3000 now fair and square, with this man's lawyer here as proof, and starting to get worried.

>Grandpa (laughs): **"You look worried, son. I will do one more bet, double or nothing. I am going to stand here and pee into that waste can behind you and not spill a single drop anywhere else."**

The IRS agent looks at the man, turns around and looks at the waste can. It is about 6 feet behind him. This old man will have to pee about 8-9 feet and not spill a single drop. The IRS agent is worried, but he thinks he can win this bet.

>IRS Agent: **"You're on!"**

Grandpa stands up and unzips. He struggles mightily and lets a weak stream go. It doesn't get anywhere near the trash can. In fact, it just splashes all over the IRS agents desk and runs onto the floor. The IRS agent starts jumping up and down with a huge smile on his face.

>IRS Agent: **"HAHA! YES! You didn't even get close!"**

The lawyer puts his head in his hands at this point, shaking it slowly, clearly upset about the incident. The IRS agent looks over at him and asks what is wrong.

>Lawyer: **"Just before we came in here, Grandpa bet me $25,000 that he could piss on your desk today and you would be happy about it."**


***
I met a man from India and he gave me this one
A Frenchman, an American and an Indian are on a plane.

The Frenchman says to the stewardess "I can tell what city we are flying over just by sticking my hand out the window!" Of course she doesn't believe him so he say here, watch, and he sticks his hand out the window and proudly tells everyone "We are flying over Paris" Amused the stewardess asks "how could you know that?", well says the Frenchman "I just touched the Eiffel tower"

Not wanting to be shown up, the American boasts that he too can tell where they are, he sticks his hand out the window as says "see here, I knew it, we're actually flying over New York City, I can tell because I just touched the Empire State Building"

By this point the Indian decides that he would like to play along, he looks at the other two and says "let me see if I can tell where we really are" he sticks his hand out the window and pulls it back in. Then he informs everyone "it turns out we are actually flying over New Deli"... the stewardess leans in and asks "How do you know we're flying over New Deli just by sticking your arm out the window" the Indian man replies "My watch is gone"
***
An Engineer was jobless for long time...
He could not find a job so he opens a clinic and puts a board outside.. get treatment for $50, if not treated get back $100.

One Doctor thinks this is a good opportunity to earn $100 and goes to clinic.

Doctor : I have lost taste in eating 

Engineer : Nurse , bring medicine from box no 22 and put 3 drops in patient's mouth.

Patient (Doctor) : This is Petrol 

Engineer : Congrats.. you got your taste back ..give me $50

Doctor gets annoyed, goes back after some days to recover his money

Doctor : I have lost my memory, can not remember anything

Engineer : Nurse , bring medicine from box no 22 and put 3 drops in patient's mouth.

Doctor : But this medicine for taste of the tongue

Engineer : congrats. you got your memory back.. give my fees $50.

Doctor goes back angrily and comes back after some days

Doctor : My eyesight is become weak.

Engineer : Well I don't have any medicine for this. Take this $100 

Doctor : But this is $50 Note 

Engineer : Congrats .. you got back your eyesight .. give my fees $50

Doctor shocks...Engineer Rocks..!!!

***
A father passing by his sons bedroom...
A father passing by his son's bedroom, was astonished to see the bed was nicely made, and everything was picked up. Then, he saw an envelope, propped up prominently on the pillow. It was addressed, "Dad." With the worst premonition, he opened the envelope and read the letter, with trembling hands... 

"Dear, Dad. It is with great regret and sorrow that I'm writing you. I had to elope with my new girlfriend, because I wanted to avoid a scene with Mum and you. 
I've been finding real passion with Stacy, and she is so nice, but I knew you would not approve of her because of her piercings, tattoos, tight motorcycle clothes, and because she is so much older than I am. 
But it's not only the passion, Dad. She's pregnant. Stacy said that we will be very happy. She owns a trailer in the woods, and has a stack of firewood for the whole winter. We share a dream of having many more children. 
Stacy has opened my eyes to the fact that marijuana doesn't really hurt anyone. We'll be growing it for ourselves, and trading it with the other people in the commune, for all the cocaine and ecstasy we want. 
In the meantime, we'll pray that science will find a cure for AIDS, so Stacy can get better. She sure deserves it! 
Don't worry, Dad. I'm 15, and I know how to take care of myself. Someday, I'm sure we'll be back to visit, so you can get to know your many grandchildren. 
Love, your son, Joshua.
P.S. Dad, none of the above is true. I'm over at Jason's house. I just wanted to remind you that there are worse things in life than the school report that's on the kitchen table. Call when it is safe for me to come home!
***
A Jew and Arab walk into a bakery...
The Arab immediately steals 3 pastries and puts them in his pocket.

He says to the Jew, "See how good I am? The owner didn't see a thing." The Jew says to the Arab, "That's typical of you Arabs. I am going to show you an honest way to get the same result."

He goes to the owner of the bakery and says, "Give me a pastry and I will show you a magic trick."

Intrigued, the owner accepts and gives him a pastry. The Jew swallows it and asks for another one. The owner gives him another one. Then the Jew swallows that one and asks for a third pastry and eats that, too.

The owner is starting to wonder where the magic trick is and asks, "So what did you do with the pastries?"

The Jew replies, "Look in the Arab's back pocket....."
***
A Mexican man who spoke no English went into a department store
to buy socks. He found his way to the menswear department where a young lady offered to help him.

"Quiero calcetines," said the man.

"I don't speak Spanish, but we have some very nice suits over here," said the salesgirl.

"No, no quiero trajes. Quiero calcetines," said the man.

"Well, these shirts are on sale this week," declared the salesgirl.

"No, no quiero camisas. Quiero calcetines," repeated the man.

"I still don't know what you're trying to say. We have some fine pants on this rack," offered the salesgirl.

"No, no quiero pantalones. Quiero calcetines," insisted the man.

"These sweaters are top quality," the salesgirl probed.

"No, no quiero sueter. Quiero calcetines," said the man.

"Our undershirts are over here," fumbled the salesgirl, beginning to lose patience.

"No, no quiero camisetas. Quiero calcetines," the man repeated.

As they passed the underwear counter, the man spotted a display of socks on the wall and happily grabbed a pair. Holding them up he proclaimed, "Eso sí que es!"

"Why didn't you just spell it in the first place?!" yelled the salesgirl.
***
Stalin and the sneezer
Stalin is giving a long speech at an event, naturally in front of a huge audience. While he's in full flow, somebody near the front of the hall sneezes. Stalin stops and surveys the crowd.

"Who sneezed?" he asks.

Deathly silence. 

"I repeat," says Stalin, "who sneezed?"

Not a peep.

"Very well," says Stalin. "First row, stand up!" Everyone in the first row stands up. "Guards! Open fire!"

A few seconds later, the entire first row of the audience is lying in bloody heaps on the ground.

"Now, who sneezed?" Still not a whimper. "Second row, stand up! Guards! Open fire!" The second row writhes and breathes its last.

"Now, comrades: who sneezed?" Absolute silence. "Third row! Stand up! Guards! Op...."

"Wait! Wait!" From the sixth row a man rises, shaking so hard with fear that he can barely stay on his legs. "Please! Comrade Stalin! It was me. I sneezed."

Stalin fixes his eye on the wretch. The entire audience watches, paralysed. 

"You sneezed?"

"Yes, Comrade Stalin, yes. It was me."

"Bless you, comrade!"
***
The Irish Prostitue
An Irish daughter had not been home for over 5 years. Upon her return, her Father cursed her heavily.

'Where have ye been all this time, child? Why did ye not write to us, not even a line? Why didn't ye call? Can ye not understand what ye put yer old Mother through?'

The girl, crying, replied, Dad... I became a prostitute.'

'Ye what!? Get out a here, ye shameless harlot! Sinner! You're a disgrace to this Catholic family.'

'OK, Dad... as ye wish. I only came back to give mum this luxurious fur coat, title deed to a ten bedroom mansion, plus a 5 million savings certificate. For me little brother, this gold Rolex. And for ye Daddy, the sparkling new Mercedes limited edition convertible that's parked outside plus a membership to the country club ... (takes a breath) ... and an invitation for ye all to spend New Year's Eve on board my new yacht in the Riviera.'

'What was it ye said ye had become?' says Dad.

Girl, crying again, 'A prostitute, Daddy!.'

'Oh! My Goodness! Ye scared me half to death, girl! I thought ye said a Protestant! Come here and give yer old Dad a hug !!!
***
A Jewish businessman in America decided to send his son to Israel...
...to absorb some of the culture of the homeland. When the son returned, the father asked him to tell him about his trip.

The son said, "Pop, I had a great time in Israel. By the way, I converted to Christianity." "Oy vey," said the father. "What have I done?"

He decided to go ask his friend Jacob what to do. Jacob said, "Funny you should ask. I too sent my son to Israel, and he also came back a Christian. Perhaps we should go see the rabbi and ask him what we should do."

So they went to see the Rabbi. The Rabbi said, "Funny you should ask.I too sent my son to Israel. He also came back a Christian. What is happening to our young people? Perhaps we should go talk to God and ask him what to do."

The three of them prayed and explained what had happened to their sons and asked God what to do. Suddenly a voice came loud and clear from Heaven. The Voice said, "funny you should ask, I too sent my son to Isreal..."
***
An Englishman, a Scotsman and an Irishman...
An Englishman, a Scotsman, and an Irishman are all builders working on a bridge. The Englishman opens his lunch-box and says, "If I get one more tuna sandwich, I'm going to jump off this bridge." The Scotsman opens his lunch box and says, "If I get one more ham sandwich, I'm going to jump off this bridge." The Irishman then says, "If I get one more egg sandwich, I'm going to jump off this bridge." 

The next day, all three get the same lunch, all three jump off the bridge, and all three die. At their funeral, the Englishman's wife says, "If only I'd known he didn't like tuna." The Scotsman's wife says, "If only I'd known he didn't like ham." The Irishman's wife says, "I don't understand it. He made his own sandwiches."
***
A small geographical difference
An elderly man walks in to the famous restaurant Lucas Carton in Paris with his girlfriend. He orders a bottle of Rothschild Mouton 1928.
The waiter returns with a full bottle of wine and fill up a small amount in a glass for tasting.
The man barely smells the wine before putting the glass down and stating: "This is not a 1928 Mouton!"

Soon, almost 20 people are standing around the table. This includes the chef and the restaurants owner. Every single one is trying to convince the old man that it is, in fact, a 1928 Mouton. The waiter then asks: "How can you be so sure this *isn't* a 1928 Mouton?"

The elderly man then states: "My name is Phillip de Rothschild, and I produce this wine!"
The waiter then admits that the wine actually is a Clerc Milon 1928. "I could not bear the thought of us parting with the last bottle of Mouton 1928. You know, Clerc Milon is produced in the exact same village, with the exact same grapes, the same type of baskets and aged in the exact same barrels. The wines are *exactly* the same, the only difference is that the vineyards are on the other side of the village."

Rotschild turns to the waiter and says: "When you get home tonight, ask your wife to undress, and put one finger in each hole. Pull them out, and smell them. You'll then understand the importance of a small geographical difference."
***
Australia's smartest man
An airplane was about to crash..

There were five passengers on board, but only four parachutes. 

The first passenger said, “I am President Obama, the chosen one. The world needs me, I can’t afford to die.” 

So he took the first parachute and left the plane.

The second passenger, Tony Abbot said, “I am the Prime Minister of Australia and I am the smartest man in Australian history, so Australia’s people don’t want me to die.” 

He took the second parachute and jumped out of the plane.

The third passenger, John Kerry said, “I’m a Senator and a decorated war hero from the Army of the United States of America.” 

He grabbed the parachute next to him and jumped.

The fourth passenger, ex-President George W Bush said to the fifth passenger, a 10-year-old schoolgirl;

“I have lived a full life and served my country the best I could. I will sacrifice my life and let you have the last parachute.”

The little girl said “That’s okay, Mr President. There’s a parachute left for you..., Australia’s smartest man just took my schoolbag.”
***
Guy dies in a car crash...
...and goes up to the Pearly Gates. Saint Peter looks his name up in his book and shakes his head.

"What's that mean?" the guy says.

"You gotta go down," Saint Peter says.

The guy gets put on an elevator and takes the ride down to hell. When the doors open, he sees a large, oval shaped room with red velvet carpet and good music playing at a comfortable level. The room is filled with a hundred or so of the best looking people the guy's ever seen, men in tuxedos, women in fantastic gowns. He steps into the room and sees the room is lined with leather couches, and waitresses are walking around and handing out champagne. Completely taken aback, the guy decides to go sit on one of the couches, alone, and watch.

After fifteen minutes of watching, the elevator opens and a seven-foot tall goatee'd man in a red tuxedo steps out and starts glad-handing everyone. The guy notices he has small horns on his forehead and a tail out the back of the tuxedo. The red tuxedo'd man comes over and shakes the guy's hand. He says, "Hey glad you made it! Welcome to Hell. I'm Satan. If there's *anything* I can do for you to make your stay comfortable, let me know."

Still stunned, the guy nods and continues to sit while Satan goes off to talk to others. He notices the room is walled with tinted glass, but beyond the glass, he can make out fire, brimstone, and shadowed human figures writhing in agony.

When Satan comes back over to the newly deceased guy, he says, "Hey, I hope you're enjoying your first day here. Is there anything I can get for you? Champagne? Cocaine?"

The guy shakes his head and says, "Uh, no, thanks, but I was wondering... what's with all the people out in the fire? They're in agony."

Satan ahs and nods. "Those are the Christians. They wouldn't have it any other way."
***
Several centuries ago, the Pope...
Several centuries ago, the Pope ruled that all Jews in must convert or leave Italy. Obviously, there was a huge outcry amongst the Jewish community. The Pope then decided,

"So be it. Send to me your greatest scholar, and we will have a religious debate. If he can beat me, then you all can stay."

The Jews nominated Rabbi Moshe to represent them. Although he was aged, he was also one of their wisest. However, he spoke no Italian, and the Pope spoke no Yiddish, so they had a silent debate. There must have been thousands watching.

First, the Pope held up three fingers. Rabbi Moshe responded by holding up one. Then, the Pope waved one of his fingers around his head. Rabbi Moshe then pointed straight to the ground. Then the Pope brought out a Communion wafer and a chalice of wine. Rabbi Moshe pulled out an apple. The Pope then admitted defeat, saying that the rabbi was too clever and had beaten him. There was much rejoicing among the Jews in Italy.

Later, the Cardinals met with the Pope and asked him, "We don't understand. What happened in that debate?"

The Pope responded, "First I held up three fingers to represent the Trinity, but Rabbi Moshe held up one to show that there was still one God common to both our religions. Then I waved my finger around to show that God was all around us, but he pointed to the ground to remind me that he was also right there with us. Then I held out the wafer and wine to show that God absolved us of all sins. He then pulled out an apple to remind me of the original sin. He had me beaten and I could not continue."

Around the same time, some members of the Jewish community asked Rabbi Moshe how he won the debate. "I really don't know," he said. "First he put up three fingers showing that we had three days to leave Italy, and so I gave him the finger. Then he waved his finger around, proclaiming that all of Italy will be rid of us, so I motioned that we're staying right here. Then he took out his lunch so I took out mine."

EDIT: grammar, spelling.
***
An old woman with a huge purse walks into a bank...
And she demands from the teller that she sees the President of Manhattan's First Bank, and she has 4 million dollars in her purse for him to see. The teller calls the President, and he arrives shortly to decide whether or not this old lady is just senile. 

The old woman approaches him and says "I have 4 million dollars in my purse, and I bet you $10,000 that your balls are square."

The President was completely taken aback, but recollected himself and asked to see the money. The woman opens her purse and sure as hell there is 4 million dollars all in racks of one-hundred dollar bills. He is awestruck, and the old woman again pipes up, "You've seen the money, and I bet you $10,000 that your balls are square. If you have any, come tomorrow at noon so you can lose 10 grand." With this, the woman departs. 

At 11 the next day, The President decides he'll take the old lady's challenge. He knows his balls aren't square, and if the woman is serious he will get $10,000 for basically nothing. 

He meets with the woman and sees her with a well-dressed man. The woman claimed that he was her lawyer, and that he will make sure the bet isn't cheated. She requests that The President drops his pants, and The President does so. She holds his balls, fondles them a bit, and lets them go. The old woman says, "Well, it seems your balls are round," and hands him the money. In the background, the woman's lawyer is bashing his head against the wall. The President questions this and the woman proudly states with a smile "I bet him $100,000 that I'd have the President of Manhattan's First Bank's balls in my hand by noon today."
***
Sex contest (mildly NSFW)
An Englishman and a Spaniard are in a bar in Amsterdam at midnight when they start bragging to each other about their sexual escapades. After several minutes of back and forth, the Englisman challenges the Spaniard to a contest. 

"We'll go to the nearest brothel and see how many times we can shag a girl between now and dawn. Winner gets 100 euros."

So they go down to a brothel and each of them gets a girl and a room. The Englishman screws his girl, makes a tally mark on the headboard, then dozes off. He wakes up a bit later, screws her again, makes another tally mark, and dozes off again. An hour later he wakes up, pounds the girl a third time, and passes out, dead to the world. 

At dawn the Englisman is awoken by the Spaniard bursting into the room. He sees at the headboard and says,  "One hundred and eleven? Damn it, you beat me by three!" 
***
George Bush dies and goes to hell
Satan is already waiting for him.

'Well, I don't know what to do. See, you're on my list, but I have no free rooms for you. But you, you definitely have to stay in hell, so I'll have to find a solution. There are a few people here who aren't as bad as you are... I guess I'll let one go and you'll take their place. However, you can choose whose place you want to take.

'Oh, that sounds okay I guess' says Bush.

Satan leads him to the first room and opens the door. In this room, there's a huge swimming pool. In it, Reagan is drowning. He goes down, then up, then down, then up, and he's gasping for air all the while.

'Oh, no,' says Bush. 'That's not for me, I'm a poor swimmer.'

Satan opens the second door. The room is full of rocks and they see Nixon trying to break up the rocks with a wooden hammer.

'Nah, I have problems with my shoulders and my back, that'd be such a painful thing to do day after day.'

So Satan opens the third door. In the room, they see Clinton lying on the floor, all tied up. Monica Lewinsky is lying on top of Clinton, giving him a blowjob. Bush stares at the scene with a wide smile and says:

'Ah, that I could endure!'

'Alright,' laughs Satan. 'Monica, you're free to go!'
***
A man lives in a border town between the US and Canada
He lives on the Canadian side, but works in construction on the US side. Every morning, he walks over to the American side, and every evening, he comes back over to the Canadian side with a wheelbarrow full of sand. And, every day without fail, the Canadian Customs officers check him for any contraband he might try to smuggle in.

For 20 years, the man works nearly every day for the construction company, and every day customs checks the sand in the wheelbarrow, trying to find hidden goods. They sift through the sand, dig in around it, but find nothing. As the years go on, they try to be more clever. They x-ray the wheelbarrow, run tests on the sand, check inside the wheels and axles - whatever they can possibly think of. In desperation, they even strip search the man a few times and run cavity checks. Year after year, they find nothing.

Finally, 20 years later, the man is old and set to retire. On the day of his retirement, he once again pushes a wheelbarrow full of sand across the border. The customs officers stop him and ask point-blank, "Look, we know you've been smuggling something across the border all these years. You have to be. But we've searched through your sand  every day for twenty years, and we've found absolutely nothing. It's killing us - please, we'll give you a free pass, wipe away any past crimes, if you just tell us what it is you've been smuggling all these years!"

The old man raised a confused eyebrow and said, "Really? I thought it was obvious, I've been smuggling wheelbarrows."
***
Motorcycle and vasaline
Joe wanted to buy a motorcycle.  He doesn't have much luck, until one day,
he comes across a Harley with a 'for sale' sign on it.  The bike looks
better than a new one, although it is 10 years old, It's shiny and in mint
condition.

He buys it and asks the seller how he kept it in such great condition for 10
years.  

'Well, it's quite simple,' says the seller, 'whenever the bike is outside
and it's gonna rain, rub Vaseline on the chrome.  It protects it from the
rain", and he hands Joe a jar of Vaseline.

That night, his girlfriend, Sandra, invites him over to meet her parents.
Naturally, they take the bike there.

Just before they enter the house, Sandra stops him and says, 'I have to tell
you something about my family.  When we eat dinner, we don't talk.  In fact,
the FIRST person who says anything during dinner has to do the dishes.'

'No problem,' he says.. And in they go. 

Joe is shocked.  Right in the middle of the living room is a huge stack of
dirty dishes.  In the kitchen is another huge stack of dishes. Piled up on
the stairs, in the corridor, everywhere he looks.  Dirty dishes.  

They sit down to dinner, and sure enough, no one says a word.  As dinner
progresses, Joe decides to take advantage of the situation.  He leans over
and kisses Sandra.  No one says a word.  He reaches over and fondles her
breasts. Nobody says a word.  So he stands up, grabs her, rips her clothes
off, throws her on the table and screws her, right there in front of her
parents.  His girlfriend is a little flustered, her dad is obviously livid
and her mom horrified when he sits back down, but no one says a word.

He looks at her mom. She's got a great body too.  Joe grabs mom, bends her
over the table, pulls down her panties and screws her every which way but
loose right there on the dinner table.  Joe sits down.  His girlfriend is
furious, her dad is boiling, & Mom is beaming from ear to ear. But
still....Total silence.

All of a sudden there is a loud clap of thunder and it starts to rain.

Joe remembers his bike, so he pulls out the jar of Vaseline from his pocket.

Suddenly the father shouts, 'I'll do the fuckin' dishes!!'
***
Daughter's vibrator
A mother was walking down the hall when she heard a humming sound coming from her daughter's bedroom. 
When she opened the door she found her daughter naked on the bed with a vibrator. 

&nbsp;

What are you doing?" she exclaimed. 

&nbsp;

The daughter replied, "I'm 35 and still living at home with my parents and this is the closest I'll ever get to a husband."

&nbsp;

Later that week the father was in the kitchen and heard a humming sound coming from the basement. 
When he went downstairs, he found his daughter naked on the sofa with her vibrator. 

&nbsp;

"What are you doing?" he exclaimed.

&nbsp;

The daughter replied, "I'm 35 and still living at home with my parents and this is the closest I'll ever get to a husband."

&nbsp;
 
A couple of days later the mother heard the humming sound again, this time in the living room. 
In there, she found her husband watching the Super Bowl on television with the vibrator buzzing away beside him.

&nbsp;

"What are you doing?" she exclaimed. 

&nbsp;

He replied............"Watching the game with my son-in-law."
***
Chris Pratt, Jesus, and Hitler are sitting in a bar...
Jesus, Chris Pratt, and Hitler are sitting at a bar drinkin' a few brews.

Jesus says, "Hey we should all try and get in the Guinness Book of World Records!"

To which Chris Pratt replies, "Yeah, I bet I could get in it for most loved person in history."

Jesus then says, "and I bet I could get it for most followed person in history."

Hitler raises his beer and proclaims, "and I could get the record for the worst person in history!"

So the three gentlemen make their way to the Guinness head quarters where they are put to the test. 

First Chris Pratt goes into the record-recognizer room and walks out with a big smile shouting, "Yes! Yes! I did it! I'm a world record holder!"

Next, Jesus walks in and then five minutes later comes out smiling as well shouting, "Woohoo! I did it, I'm the most followed man ever!"

Finally Hitler walks in and then five minutes later comes out führerious and yells, "Who the fuck is Ellen Pao?"




Edit: misspelled "their" because apparently I never made it past Ms. Johnson's 6th grade English class and I added führerious because people commenting on this thread are a lot funnier than I am 
***
Arthur Guinness
The leaders of the big beer companies meet for a drink. The president of Budweiser orders a bud, the Ceo of Miller gets a Miller, the head of coors orders a coors, and so on. Until it's Arthur Guinness's turn, he orders a soda. "Why didn't you order a Guinness?" everyone asks. "Nah" Guinness replies. If you guys aren't having a beer,then neither will I.
***
Dave cannot make his wife cum, so he goes to the doctor for some advice...
He goes to the doctor and says, "Look, I just can't bring my wife to orgasm in bed, it's a real problem."

The doctor says, "Well, is it too warm?"

"Yes, it's absolutely sweltering"

"Then get some air-con"

"I can't afford air-con, I'm too poor"

"Well, Dave, do you have a good mate?"

"Yeah, I've got a mate Mick"

"Well, ask your mate Mick to stand over you and the mrs with a towel, wafting you both to cool you down, that might help."

So, Dave asks Mick for this favour, who then agrees to help him. That night, Dave is in bed with his wife, pounding away with Mick fanning them with the towel but it's doing nothing for her.

Dave says, "Well this isn't working, let's swap." So Dave takes the towel and starts wafting Mick, who is now shagging Dave's mrs. Not long after, Dave's wife goes "Oooh... oh that's it, I'm about to cum, I'm going to cum!"

Dave shouts, triumphantly, "You see, Mick?! That's how you waft a fucking towel!"

***
Two rednecks decide to go to college...
Two rednecks decided that they weren't going anywhere in life and thought they should go to college to get ahead. 

The first goes in to see the counselor, who tells him to take Math, History, and Logic.

"What's Logic?" the first redneck asks.

The professor answers by saying, "Let me give you an example."

"Do you own a weedeater?"

"I sure do."


"Then I can assume, using logic, that you have a yard," replied the professor.

"That's real good!" says the redneck.

The professor continues, "Logic will also tell me that since you have a yard, you also own a house."

Impressed, the redneck says, "Amazin!"

"And since you own a house, logic dictates that you have a wife."

"That's Betty Mae! This is incredible!" The redneck is obviously catching on.

"Finally, since you have a wife, logically I can assume that you are heterosexual," said the professor.

"You're absolutely right! Why that's the most fascinatin' thing I ever heard! I can't wait to take that logic class!!"

The redneck, proud of the new world opening up to him, walks back into the hallway, where his friend is still 

waiting.

"So what classes are ya takin'?" asks the friend.


"Math, History, and Logic!" replies the first redneck.

"What in tarnation is logic???" asked his friend.

"Let me give you an example. Do ya own a weedeater?" asked the first redneck.

"No," his friend replied.


"Fag."
***
Stanley...
Stanley died in a fire and his body was burned badly. The morgue needed someone to identify the body, so they sent for his two best deer hunting friends, Cooter and Gomer. The three men had always hunted and fished together and were long time members of a hunting camp.

Cooter arrived first, and when the mortician pulled back the sheet, Cooter said, “Yup, his face is burned up pretty bad. You better roll him over.” The mortician rolled him over and Cooter said, “Nope, ain't Stanley .”

The mortician thought this was rather strange, So he brought Gomer in to confirm the identity of the body. Gomer looked at the body and said, “Yup, he's pretty well burnt up. Roll him over.” The mortician rolled him over and Gomer said, “No, it ain't Stanley.”

The mortician asked, “How can you tell?”

Gomer said, “Well, Stanley had two ass-holes.”

“What! He had two ass-holes?” asked the mortician.

“Yup, we never seen 'em, but everybody used to say, there's Stanley with them two ass-holes.” 
***
Top 20 worst jokes ever !!!!
The 20 Worst Jokes Ever!

1. Two antennas met on a roof, fell in love and got married. The 
Ceremony wasn't much, but the reception was excellent.

2. A jumper cable walks into a bar. The bartender says, "I'll serve 
You, but don't start anything."

3. Two peanuts walk into a bar, and one was a salted.

4. A dyslexic man walks into a bra.

5. A man walks into a bar with a slab of asphalt under his arm and 
says: "A beer please, and one for the road."

6. Two cannibals are eating a clown. One says to the other: "Does 
this taste funny to you?"

7. "Doc, I can't stop singing 'The Green, Green Grass of Home.'" 
"That sounds like Tom Jones Syndrome." "Is it common?" Well, "It's Not 
Unusual."

8. Two cows are standing next to each other in a field. Daisy says 
to Dolly, "I was artificially inseminated this morning." "I don't believe 
you," says Dolly. "It's true, no bull!" exclaims Daisy.

9. An invisible man marries an invisible woman. The kids were 
nothing to look at either.

10. Deja Moo: The feeling that you've heard this bull before.

11. I went to buy some camouflage trousers the other day but I 
couldn’t find any.

12. A man woke up in a hospital after a serious accident. He 
shouted, Doctor, doctor, I can't feel my legs!" The doctor replied, "I know 
you can't I've cut off your arms!"

13. I went to a seafood disco last week... and pulled a mussel.

14. What do you call a fish with no eyes? A fsh.

15. Two fish swim into a concrete wall. The one turns to the other 
and says Dam!"

16. Two Eskimos sitting in a kayak were chilly, so they lit a fire 
in the craft. Unsurprisingly it sank, proving once again that you can't 
have your kayak and heat it too.

17. A group of chess enthusiasts checked into a hotel and were 
standing in the lobby discussing their recent tournament victories. After about 
an hour, the manager came out of the office and asked them to disperse. "But 
why," they asked, as they moved off. "Because," he said, "I can't stand 
chess-nuts boasting in an open foyer."

18. A woman has twins and gives them up for adoption. One of them 
goes to a family in Egypt and is named "Ahmal." The other goes to a family in 
Spain ; they name him "Juan." Years later, Juan sends a picture of himself 
to his birth mother. Upon receiving the picture, she tells her husband 
that she wishes she also had a picture of Ahmal. Her husband responds, 
"They're twins! If you've seen Juan, you've seen Ahmal."

19. Mahatma Gandhi, as you know, walked barefoot most of the time, 
which produced an impressive set of calluses on his feet. He also ate 
very little, which made him rather frail and with his odd diet, he suffered from 
bad breath. This made him. (Oh, man, this is so bad, it's good. . .) A 
super calloused fragile mystic hexed by halitosis.

20. And finally, there was the person who sent twenty different 
puns to his friends, with the hope that at least ten of the puns would make 
them laugh. No pun in ten did!!!!!!!!
***
Don't retire in Alaska.
Tom had been in the liquor business for 25 years.  Finally, sick of the stress, he quits his job and buys 50 acres of land in Alaska, as far from humanity as possible.  He sees the postman once a week and gets groceries once a month.  Otherwise it's total peace and quiet.

After six months or so of almost total isolation, someone knocks on his door.  He opens it, and a huge, bearded man is standing there.

"Name's Lars, your neighbor from forty miles up the road.  Having a Christmas party Friday night, thought you might like to come.  About 5:00."

"Great", says Tom, "after six months out here I'm ready to meet some local folks.  Thank you."

As Lars is leaving, he stops.  "Gotta warn you ... be some drinkin."

"Not a problem" says Tom.  "After 25 years in the business, I can drink with the best of 'em."

 Again, the big man starts to leave and stops.  "More 'n' likely gonna be some fightin' too."

"Well, I get along with people, I'll be all right.  I'll be there, thanks again."

"More'n likely be some wild sex, too."

"Now that's really not a problem," says Tom, warming to the idea.  "I've been all alone for six months!  I'll definitely be there.  By the way, what should I wear?"

"Don't much matter ... just gonna be the two of us."


***
How many lawyers does it take to change a light bulb?
Such number as may be deemed necessary to perform the stated task in a timely and efficient manner within the strictures of the following agreement: Whereas the party of the first part, also known as "Lawyer", and the party of the second part, also known as "Light Bulb", do hereby and forthwith agree to a transaction wherein the party of the second part (Light Bulb) shall be removed from the current position as a result of failure to perform previously agreed upon duties, i. e., the lighting, elucidation, and otherwise illumination of the area ranging from the front (north) door, through the entryway, terminating at an area just inside the primary living area, demarcated by the beginning of the carpet, any spillover illumination being at the option of the party of the second part (Light Bulb) and not required by the aforementioned agreement between the parties.

The aforementioned removal transaction shall include, but not be limited to, the following steps:

1.) The party of the first part (Lawyer) shall, with or without elevation at his option, by means of a chair, stepstool, ladder or any other means of elevation, grasp the party of the second part (Light Bulb) and rotate the party of the second part (Light Bulb) in a counter-clockwise direction, this point being non-negotiable.

2.) Upon reaching a point where the party of the second part (Light Bulb) becomes separated from the party of the third part ("Receptacle"), the party of the first part (Lawyer) shall have the option of disposing of the party of the second part (Light Bulb) in a manner consistent with all applicable state, local and federal statutes.

3.) Once separation and disposal have been achieved, the party of the first part (Lawyer) shall have the option of beginning installation of the party of the fourth part ("New Light Bulb").  This installation shall occur in a manner consistent with the reverse of the procedures described in step one of this self-same document, being careful to note that the rotation should occur in a clockwise direction, this point also being non-negotiable.

Note: The above described steps may be performed, at the option of the party of the first part (Lawyer), by any or all persons authorized by him, the objective being to produce the most possible revenue for the party of the fifth part, also known as "Partnership."
***
An Englishman, a Frenchman, a ravishing blonde and a homely brunette...
...are sharing a compartment on a train as it winds its way through the Alps. Every now and then the train passes through a tunnel, during which time the compartment is plunged into complete darkness. On one such occasion, a ringing slap is heard and as the train passes back into daylight, the Frenchman is rubbing his sore, red cheek.
The brunette thinks 'I bet that dirty Frenchman fondled the blonde and she struck the pervert.'
The blonde thinks 'I bet that filthy Frenchman was looking to grope me in the dark, mistook the dowdy brunette for me and she slapped the beast.'
The Frenchman thinks 'I bet that perfidious Englishman touched up the blonde in the dark and she slapped me by mistake.'
The Englishman thinks 'I can't wait for another tunnel so I can slap that French twat again.'
***
The pope is visiting New York City...
...but due to an error, there's no popemobile delivered. After a lengthy delay, the pope assures them that any car will do fine, so they get him the absolute nicest limousine they can find.

The limo is driving down the highway, and the pope knocks on the window separating him and the driver.

"Excuse me," the pope says, "but we are running a bit late. Could you go a little faster?"

"Of course, your holiness."

The driver speeds up. A few minutes go by, and the pope taps again.

"I am sorry to bother you, but we are quite behind schedule. Can you speed up a little?"

The driver sighs. "I'll do the best I can."

They keep driving. Sure enough a few minutes later, there's a third knock. This time, the driver talks first.

"Your holiness, with all due respect, I simply cannot drive any faster," he says. "I'm at the speed limit, and if we get pulled over, I could lose my license."

"Then may I drive?"

The driver is thrown by that question. "You? A-are you sure?"

"Yes. If there's a problem, I assure you I can explain to the officer that it was my fault."

The driver is perplexed, but he doesn't want to say no to the pope. "S-sure."

They pull over and switch places. As soon as the driver is buckled in in the back, ZOOM. The pope peels out, quickly accelerating to 100 MPH on a busy highway. He's weaving in and out of traffic, he's almost clipping cars, he is cutting people off, driving like an absolute mad man. Within a minute, a police car is zooming right on their tail, sirens blaring. The pope quickly pulls over as the officer rushes over and pounds on the window, ready to pull his gun should there be an incident.

The pope slowly opens the window. "May I help you, officer?"

The police officer stares at him in shock. Seconds tick by with an awkward silence hanging in the air before the officer turns around and goes back to his car, then radios to HQ and demands to speak with the police chief.

"What do you want?" the chief growls.

"Yeah, chief... I just pulled someone over, but I can't arrest him," the cop says. "He's kinda a big deal."

"Big deal? What, some athlete? Son, just because he's an athlete doesn't mean—"

"No. He's much, much bigger than an athlete."

"What, politician? State senator, governor, mayor?"

"Bigger."

There's a long pause. The gruffness in the chief's voice is quickly gone. "Son, did you pull over the goddamn president?"

"Bigger."

Now the chief is flabbergasted. "If he's bigger than the president... god dammit, son, who is he?"

"I don't know, but he's being driven around in a limo by the fuckin' pope!"
***
A 25-year-old Jewish girl.....
..... tells her Mom that she has missed her period for 2 months. Very worried, the mother goes to the drugstore and buys a pregnancy kit. The test result shows that the girl is pregnant. Shouting and crying, the mother says, "Who was the pig that did this to you? I want to know!" 

Without answering, the girl picks up the phone and makes a call. Half an hour later, a Mercedes stops in front of their house. A mature and distinguished man with gray hair and wearing a yarmulke steps out of the car and enters the house. He sits in the living room with the father, mother, and the girl and tells them, "Your daughter has informed me of the problem. I can't marry her because of my personal family situation but I'll take charge. I will pay all costs and provide for your daughter for the rest of her life. Additionally, if a girl is born, I will bequeath two retail furniture stores, a deli, a condo in Miami, and a $1,000,000 bank account. If a boy is born, my legacy will be a chain of jewelry stores and a $25,000,000 bank account.  However, if there is a miscarriage, I'm not sure what to do. What do you suggest?" 

All silent at this point, the mother placed a hand firmly on the man's shoulder and told him, 'You'll fuck her again."
***
A marine on his way home
A Marine boarded a train on his way home from deployment. The train was quite crowded, and the Marine walked the entire length looking for a seat.
There seemed to be one next to a well-dressed middle-aged French woman, but when he got there he saw it was taken by the woman's poodle.

The war-weary Marine asked, "Ma'am, may I have that seat?" The French woman sniffed and said to no one in particular, "Americans are so rude. My little Fifi is using that seat."

The Marine walked the entire train again, but the only seat available was under that dog. "Please, Ma'am. May I sit down? I'm very tired," he asked again. She snorted, "Not only are you Americans rude, you are also arrogant!" This time the Marine didn't say a word; he just picked up the little dog, tossed it out the train window and sat down. The woman shrieked, "Someone must defend my honor! Put this American in his place!"

An English gentleman sitting nearby spoke up. "Sir, you Americans seem to have a penchant for doing the wrong thing. You hold the fork in the wrong hand. You drive your autos on the wrong side of the road. And now, sir, you seem to have thrown the wrong bitch out the window.
***
God sends an angel down from Heaven...
...To bring the commandments to the people of the world, first the angel visits the French and he says "I have these commandments for you, they'll make your lives better"

"Well, what are they?" asked the French

"Thou shalt not commit adultery" replied the angel

"Bah, we're not interested" the French scoffed, and he waved the angel away. Next the angel went to the Germans and offered them the commandments, "What are they?" the Germans asked.

"Thou shalt not kill" said the angel

"Thou shalt not kill?" said the Germans "I think not" And they waved the angel off

Next the angel went to the Italians and offered them the commandments, "What are they?" the Italians asked.

"Thou shalt not steal" said the angel

"Ah, go away" Said the Italians, and they waved the angel off

Then the angel went to the Jews and said "Look, I've got these commandments..."

"How much are they?" asked the Jews

"They're free"

"We'll take ten"
***
The problem with getting married in heaven..
On their way to get married a couple gets into a fatal car accident. They are sitting outside the Pearly Gates waiting for St. Peter to turn up and register them. While they're waiting, they wonder if they could possibly get married in heaven. St. Peter finally shows up and they ask him.

St. Peter says, "I don't know, this is the first time anyone's ever asked. Let me go and 
find out," and he leaves.

The couple sits around for a couple of months and begins to wonder if they really should get married in heaven, what with the eternal aspect of it all, What if it doesn ' t work out, they wonder. Are we stuck together forever?

St. Peter returns after another month looking somewhat worn out. "Yes," he informs the couple, "you can get married in heaven. "

" Great , " says the couple, " but what if things don't work out? Could we also get a divorce in heaven? "
St. Peter, red-faced, slams his clipboard onto the ground.

"What ' s wrong?" exclaims the frightened couple.

"Christ!" St. Peter exclaims. "It took me three months to find a priest up here! Do you have any idea how long it's going to take me to find a lawyer? "
***
Nymphomaniac Convention
Nymphomaniac Convention

A man boarded an airplane and took his seat.
As he settled in, he glanced up and saw the most beautiful woman boarding the plane.

He soon realized she was heading straight towards his seat... As fate would have it, she took the seat right beside his.
Eager to strike up a conversation he blurted out, "Business trip or pleasure?"

She turned, smiled and said, "Business. I'm going to the Annual Nymphomaniacs of America Convention in Boston"

He swallowed hard. Here was the most gorgeous woman he had ever seen sitting next to him, and she was going to a meeting of nymphomaniacs.

Struggling to maintain his composure, he calmly asked, "What's your business role at this convention?"

"Lecturer," she responded. "I use information that I have learned from my personal experiences to debunk some of the popular myths about sexuality."

"Really?" he said. "And what kind of myths are there?"

"Well," she explained, "one popular myth is that African-American men are the most well-endowed of all men,

when in fact it is the Native American Indian who is most likely to possess that trait.

Another popular myth is that Frenchmen are the best lovers, when actually it is men of Jewish descent who are the best. 

I have also discovered that the lover with absolutely the best stamina is the Southern Redneck."

Suddenly the woman became a little uncomfortable and blushed. "I'm sorry," she said, "I shouldn't really be discussing all of this with you. I don't even know your name.."

"Tonto," the man said, "Tonto Goldstein, but my friends call me Bubba."
***
a nice Italian couple . . .
At St. Peter's Catholic Church in Toronto, they have weekly husbands'
marriage seminars.

At the session last week, the priest asked Giuseppe, who said he was
approaching his 50th wedding anniversary, to take a few minutes and
share some insight into how he had managed to stay married to the 
same woman all these years.

Giuseppe replied to the assembled husbands, 'Wella, I'va tried to
treat her nicea, spenda da money on her, but besta of all is, I tooka
her to Italy for the 25th anniversary!'

The priest responded, 'Giuseppe, you are an amazing inspiration to all
the husbands here! Please tell us what you are planning for your wife
for your 50th anniversary?
 
Giuseppe proudly replied, " I gonna go picka her up." 
***
Hooker
A guy is walking along the strip in Las Vegas and a knockout looking hooker catches his eye. He strikes up a conversation and eventually asks the hooker, "How much do you charge?" Hooker replies, "It starts at $500 for a hand-job." Guy says, "$500 dollars! For a hand-job! Jesus Christ! No hand-job is v worth that kind of money!" The hooker says, "Do you see that Denny's on the corner?" "Yes." "Do you see the Denny's about a block further down?" "Yes." "And beyond that, do you see that third Denny's?" "Yes." "Well," says the hooker, smiling invitingly, "I own those. And, I own them because I give a hand-job that's worth $500." Guy says, "What the hell? You only live once. I'll give it a try." They retire to a nearby motel.

A short time later, the guy is sitting on the bed realizing that he just experienced the hand-job of a lifetime, worth every bit of $500. He is so amazed, he says, "I suppose a blow-job is $1,000?" The hooker replies, "$1,500." "$1,500? My God! No blow-job could be worth that. A televangelist wouldn't pay that for a blow-job!" The hooker replies, "Step over here to the window, big boy. Do you see that casino just across the street? I own that casino outright. And I own it because I give a blow-job that's worth every cent of $1,500." The guy, basking in the afterglow of that terrific hand-job, decides to put off the new car for another year or so, and says, "Sign me up."

Ten minutes later, he is sitting on the bed more amazed than before. He can scarcely believe it but he feels he truly got his money's worth. He decides to dip into the retirement savings for one glorious and unforgettable experience. He asks the hooker, "How much for some pussy?" The hooker says, "Come over here to the window, I want to show you something. Do you see how the whole city of Las Vegas is laid out before us, all those beautiful lights, gambling palaces, and showplaces?" "Damn!" the guy says, in awe, "You own the whole city?"

"No," the hooker replies, "but I would if I had a pussy."
***
A guy's phone rings in the gym
A guy is pushing through his usual workout routine in the gym when the phone goes off.

"Hello?"

>"Hi honey! I just saw that dress I wanted -- it's on sale for only $2,000! We can save almost 900 dollars! Can we get it, pleeeease?"

"Sure honey, anything you want."

>"Oh my god, really? Thank you!!!! And the man at the Lexus dealership called and says he can give it to us for $90,000. What should I tell him?"

"Sure honey, sounds good. Make sure everything is included."

>"Wow you mean it?! You're the best! Oh, and one more thing! They called about the house again, they are asking for $400,000."

"Tell them $380,000 and see what they say."

>"Wow!! Okay!! Thank you sooooo much, I love you honey! I'll see you when I get home -- in our brand new Lexus~!"

"Sounds great. I love you too, honey. Talk to you later. Bye bye."

The man hangs up, finishes his set, and after a moment he stands up and says, "Does anyone know whose phone this is?"
***
A russian and an american find themselves in hell in front of Satan.
Satan: "We have two kinds of hell here: american hell and russian hell, which one do you choose?". 

American: "What's the difference?"

Satan: "In american hell you have to eat one bucket of shit every day, while in russian hell you have to eat two buckets of shit every day."

American: "Well, I guess I choose american hell then."

Satan turns to the russian.

Satan: "What about you?"

Russian: "I've been living my whole life in Russia, might as well go to russian hell."

And so they are sent to their hells and meet a week later.

Russian: "How is it going in american hell?"

American: "Not so bad actually, you eat your bucket of shit in the morning and the rest of the day you are free. What about you?"

Russian: "Well, you know how things are done in Russia. It's either shit was not delivered, or there aren't enough buckets for everyone."

---
Edit: grammar.
***
Saul, the Jewish Lottery Winner
So Saul, a 90-year-old Jew, wins the $300 million lottery. He's at the news conference to accept the check, and the reporters ask him if there's anyone he'd like to thank. 

"Yes," he says solemnly. "I'd like to thank my brother Eli for lending me the $5 to buy the ticket, and my brother David for driving me to the Circle-K to buy the ticket.

"Lastly, I'd like to thank Adolph Hitler."

The silence was sudden and complete; you could hear a pin drop.

Finally a reporter raises a shaky hand and asks, "D-did you j-just say you w-wanted to thank H-hitler?"

"Yes, of course," Saul replies. 

"Whatever for?"

Rolling his sleeve up, Saul points to the inside of his forearm. "For the NUMBERS!"
***
So a British SAS squadron and an American Marine squadron are arguing together who are the bravest soldiers...
A British SAS squad and an American Marines squad are together in the middle of a city. The commanding officers of each group are discussing the merits of SAS vs Marines: these officers have reputations for being the strongest, toughest and most feared men in the whole of the armed forces. The American squad leader turns to the British officer and says, "My Marines are so much braver than your SAS."

"I doubt that very much," says the SAS officer.

"They are much braver," says the American. "Watch this."

The American squad leader turns to one of his Marines and shouts, "SERGEANT!! Climb to the very top of that building and jump off."

"SIR, YES SIR," shouts the sergeant. The sergeant runs inside the building, runs to top and, without a second's thought, jumps off the top of the building and smashes into the ground. He survives but is very badly injured and gets taken away on a stretcher. The American leader turns to the SAS officer and says, "Now that's bravery."

"Yeah? Well watch this," says the British officer. He turns to his men and bellows at the top of his voice, "YOU, PRIVATE, CLIMB TO THE TOP OF THAT BUILDING AND JUMP OFF."

The private looks at the officer and says, "Sir, GO FUCK YOURSELF, Sir."

The Officer turns around to the American and says, "Now THAT'S fucking bravery."


***
A young Geordie lad moved to London
A young Geordie lad moved to London and went to Harrods looking for a job. The manager asked "Do you have any sales experience?"

The young man answered "Aye, hods, I was a canny salesman back in Newcastle." The manager liked the Geordie so he gave him the job.

His first day on the job was challenging and busy, but he got through it. After the store was locked up, the manager came down and asked "OK,...... so how many sales did you make today?" The Geordie said "Just the one, Marra." The manager groaned and continued "Just one? Our sales people average 20 or 30 sales a day. How much was the sale for? £124,237.64" replied the Geordie.

The manager choked and exclaimed £124,237.64, what the hell did you sell him?"
"Well, forst I selt him a smaal fish hook, then a medium fish hook, and then I selt him a new fishing rod. Then I asked him where he was gannin' fishing and he said doon at the coast, so I telt him he would need a boat, so we went doon tiv the boat department and I selt him that twin-engined Power Cat. Then he said he didn't think his Honda Civic would pull it, so I took him doon tiv the car sales and I selt him the 4 x 4 Suzuki". The manager, incredulous, said "You mean to tell me....a guy came in here to buy a fish hook and you sold him a boat and 4x4?"

"Nah, nah......he came in here to buy a box of tampons for his ladyfriend and I said......... 'Well, since ya weekend's fucked, you might as well gan fishing."
***
Two Fleas on Vacation (nsfw)
Two fleas had an arrangement to meet every winter in Miami for a vacation. Last year, when one flea gets to Miami he is shivering and shaking.

The other flea asked him, "Why are shaking so badly?"

The first flea says, "I rode down here from New Jersey in the moustache of a guy on a Harley."

The other flea says, "That's the worst way to travel. Do what I do. Go to the New Jersey airport bar. Have a few drinks. While there, look for a nice stewardess, crawl up her leg and nestle in where it's warm and cozy. It's the best way to travel that I can think of."

The first flea thanks the second flea and says he will give it a try next winter. A year goes by... When the first flea shows up in Miami he shivering and shaking again.

The second flea says, "Didn't you try what I told you?"

"Yes," says the first flea. "I did exactly what you said. I went to the New Jersey airport bar. I had a few drinks. Finally, this nice young stewardess came in. I crawled right up to her warm cozy spot. It was so nice and warm that I fell asleep. When I woke up, I was back in the moustache of a guy on a Harley."


        Edit: Front page already!!! Gr8 Guys.
***
Engineer goes to Hell...
The engineer looks around, confused, and sees that despite having lived what he felt was a pious and good life, he is in Hell. 

Satan quickly introduces himself. "Welcome to Hell. I can't say i was expecting you, so i guess St. Peter made a mistake when he put you on the Hell list. I'll have one of my demons phone him right away. In the mean time, well, there isn't much, but if you want to amuse yourself, i can help you with that."

The engineer thinks for a moment, and then says, "You know, it is extremely hot down here. I'd love to build a large AC unit. Do you have the materials?"

Satan says, "Well, yes, we have all manners of metals due to our location under the Earth's crust. Have at it."

The engineer, after 3 days of heavy work, finishes his Hell-wide AC and turns it on. After 3 hours, the temperature has finally reached a more desirable 78 degrees, and Hell is much less hellish. Satan is highly impressed. "Nice work, i didn't think this was even possible! Sorry to say, though, St. Peter refuses to admit he messed up. Since you made this AC happen, I'll let you do whatever you want."

The engineer thinks, and says, "You now it's also really dark and dim with just the lava flows. Have the materials for a lighting system?" Satan says, "Of course! God sent some heavenly light once but i never could figure out how it worked. Here's the instructions."

2 days later, the heavenly light had been configured to brightly light Hell. Productivity was way up and now Hell was not so bad anymore. Satan tells the engineer,  "I like you, bud! Tell you what, you can live like a king. Got a room in my castle for you. Everything you could ever want is there."

At this point, several angels had reviewed the engineer's life and informed God of St. Peter's mistake. God hastily adds the engineer to the Heaven list. He calls Satan and asks for the engineer. 

Satan says, "No way, man! Hell has never been so nice before him. We have lighting, cooling, and now he's tinkering with machines that haven't worked since your son went to Earth! I'm keeping him."

God immediately responds, "He is a good man, though! He belongs in Heaven. It is only right! If you will not return him, I'll have to take you to court."

Satan laughs, and says, "Oh, and just where will you find a lawyer?"
***
So the church is losing money...
...and the friars decide that they need a new income source. To do this, they set up a flower stand, and do a pretty good business selling flowers in the small village. Unfortunately, there is another floral store that is losing business because of the friars. So, they go talk to the friars, telling them to stop selling flowers, because they are losing money. The friars say "no way man, free country, free enterprise." 

The owners of the other floral shop decide to get real about these religious flower sellers, so they hire a hitman to go take them out. The hitman, named Hugh, shows up to the friars' store. Hugh, now, he's about 7'1', and 240 pounds of pure muscle. "Hey," he says, "you guys ought to stop sellin flowers." The petrified friars agree that maybe the floral business isn't such a good idea after all, and promptly shut it down.

And that, ladies and gentlemen, is why Hugh, and only Hugh, can prevent florist friars.
***
Old Scottish joke I remembered that just became relevant again...
The head greenkeeper of St Andrews golf course was out inspecting the greens one morning when he spotted a golfer bending over the stream on the 18th, scooping up water with his hand and drinking it.

'Haw', he shouted, 'Ye shouldnae drink that watter, it's got coo's pish in it!'

The golfer looked up and replied, 'I'm sorry old chap, I'm English and I'm afraid I couldn't understand a word you were saying'

The greenkeeper shouted back, 'I said, use both hands, you'll get more in!'
***
Cheating for "Good" Reasons
An elderly couple was having dinner one evening when the husband reached across the table, took his wife's hand in his and said, "Martha, soon we will be married 50 years, and there's something I have to know. In all of these 50 years, have you ever been unfaithful to me?"

Martha replied, "Well Henry, I have to be honest with you. Yes, I've been unfaithful to you three times during these 50 years, but always for a good reason.

Henry was obviously hurt by his wife's confession, but said, "I never suspected. Can you tell me what you mean by 'good reasons?'"

Martha said, "The first time was shortly after we were married, and we were about to lose our little house because we couldn't pay the mortgage.

Do you remember that one evening I went to see the banker and the next day he notified you that the loan would be extended?"

Henry recalled the visit to the banker and said, "I can forgive you for that. You saved our home, but what about the second time?"

Martha asked, "And do you remember when you were so sick, but we didn't have the money to pay for the heart surgery you needed? Well, I went to see your doctor one night and, if you recall, he did the surgery at no charge."

"I recall that," said Henry. "And you did it to save my life, so of course I can forgive you for that. Now tell me about the third time."

"Alright," Martha said. "So do you remember when you ran for president of your golf club, and you needed 73 more votes?"
***
An American, an Indian, and a Russian got in Hell..
An American, an Indian, and a Russian got in Hell and plead to the Devil that they don't belong here. The Devil, bored, makes them an offer: "I will strike you 3 times with my whip, and if you survive, I'll let you go. You can use anything you want as a shield".

The American goes first. He builds a high-tech shield from depleted uranium and composites, and hides behind it. The Devil strikes once - the shield cracks; twice - the shield falls apart; thrice - the American is no more. 

Next goes the Indian. He puts himself in some advanced Yoga position and goes into deep hibernation. The Devil strikes once - nothing; twice - the Indian shivers a bit; thrice - the Indian grunts, but lives. The Devil is amazed and tells him he's free to go. The Indian asks "May I stay and watch? In all jokes the Russians somehow come out on top. I want to see how he will do it this time". The Devil nods and turns to the Russian: "So, what will you use as a shield?"

The Russian: "The Indian, of course".
***
Four proud fathers.
Four friends reunited at a party after 30 years. After a few laughs and drinks, one of them had to go to the restroom. The ones that stayed behind began to talk about their kids and their successes.

The first guy says: “I am very proud of my son, he is my pride and joy. He started working at a very successful company at the bottom of the barrel. He studied Economics, Business Administration, and was promoted, began to climb the corporate ladder, becoming the General Manager, and now he is the president of the company. He became so rich that he gave his best friend a top of the line Mercedes Benz for his birthday.”

The second guy says: “Damn, that's terrific! My son is also my pride and joy, I am very proud of him. He started working at a travelling agency for a very big airline. He went to flight school to become a pilot and managed to become a partner in the company where he now owns the majority of the assets. He became so rich that he gave his best friend a brand new jet for his birthday.”

The third guy says: “Well, well, well congratulations! My son is also my pride and joy and he is also very rich. He studied in the best universities and became an engineer. He started his own construction company and became very successful and a multi-millionaire. He also gave away some very nice and expensive thing to his best friend for his birthday. He built a 30,000 sq. ft. mansion especially for his friend.”

The three friends congratulated each other mutually for the successes of their sons. The fourth friend who earlier had gone to restroom returned and asked: “What's going on, what are all the congratulations for?” One of the three said: “We were talking about the pride we feel for the successes of our sons. What about your son?”

The fourth man replied: “My son is Gay and he makes a living dancing as a stripper at a nightclub.”

The three friends said: “What a shame that must be, that is horrible, what a disappointment you must feel.”

The fourth man replied: “No, I am not ashamed. Not at all. He is my son and I love him just as well, he is my pride and joy. In addition, he is very lucky too. Did you know that his birthday just passed and the other day he received a beautiful 30,000 sq. ft. mansion, a brand new jet, and a top of the line Mercedes Benz from his three boyfriends?”
***
It's very rare that I laugh out loud when reading a joke, I had to share this...
Last fall, a group of bikers were riding west on I-74 when they saw a girl about to jump off a bridge…So they stopped.

George, their leader, a big burly man of 53, gets off his Harley, walks through a group of gawkers, past the State Trooper who was trying to talk her down off the railing, and says, “Hey Baby….. whatcha doin’ up there on that railin’?”

She says tearfully, “I’m going to commit suicide!!”

While he didn't want to appear ‘sensitive’, George also didn’t want to miss this ‘be-a-legend’ opportunity either so he asked… “Well, before you jump, Honey-Babe… Why don’t you give ole George here your best last kiss?”

So, with no hesitation at all, she leaned back over the railing and did just that… And it was a long, deep, lingering kiss followed immediately by another even better one.

After they breathlessly finished, George gets a big thumbs-up approval from his biker-buddies, the onlookers, and even the State Trooper, and then says, “Wow! That was the best kiss I have ever had, Honey! That’s a real talent you’re wasting, Sugar Shorts. You could be famous if you rode with me. Why the hell are you committing suicide?”

“My parents don’t like me dressing up like a girl.”

It’s still unclear whether the person jumped or was pushed!
***
Chinese Doctor


A Chinese Doctor can't find a job in a Hospital in the US, so he opens a clinic and puts a sign outside 'GET TREATMENT FOR $20 - IF NOT CURED GET BACK $100.'
An American lawyer thinks this is a great opportunity to earn $100 and goes to the clinic.
Lawyer: "I have lost my sense of taste."
Chinese: "Nurse, bring medicine from box No. 22 and put 3 drops in patient's mouth."
Lawyer: "Ugh. this is kerosene."
Chinese: "Congrats, your sense of taste is restored. Give me $20."
The annoyed lawyer goes back after a few days to recover his money.
Lawyer: "I have lost my memory. I cannot remember anything."
Chinese: "Nurse, bring medicine from box no. 22 and put 3 drops in his mouth."
Lawyer (annoyed): "This is kerosene. You gave this to me last time for restoring my taste."
Chinese: "Congrats. You got your memory back. Give me $20."
The fuming lawyer pays him, and then comes back a week later determined to get back $100.
Lawyer: "My eyesight has become very weak I can't see at all."
Chinese: "Well, I don't have any medicine for that, so take this $100."
Lawyer (staring at the note): "But this is $20, not $100!!"
Chinese: "Congrats, your eyesight is restored. Give me $20"
You can't beat Chinese Doctors
***
Headache
A man went to the doctor suffering from severe headaches. After a thorough examination, the doctor turned to him and said: "Jerry, the good news is I can cure your headaches. The bad news is that it will require castration."

"You have a very rare condition, which causes your testicles to press on your spine, and the pressure creates these serious headaches you've been experiencing. So the only way to relieve the pressure is to remove the testicles." 

Jerry was shocked and depressed. He wondered if he had anything to live for. He couldn't concentrate long enough to answer, but decided he had no choice but to go under the knife. 

When he eventually left the hospital Jerry was pleasantly surprised at how good it felt not to have a headache for the first time in 20 years, but he also knew that he was missing an important part of himself. 

As he walked down the street, he realized that he felt like a different person. He could make a fresh start and live a new life. He saw a men's clothing store and thought to himself a new suit would be the perfect thing to mark this new beginning. 

He entered the shop and told the salesman: "I'd like a new suit." 
The elderly tailor eyed him briefly and said: "Let's see... size 44 long?" 
"That's right, how did you know?" said Jerry, laughing. 

"I've been in the business 60 years!" replied the tailor. 

Jerry tried on the suit and it fitted like a glove. As Jerry admired himself in the mirror, the salesman 
asked: "How about a new shirt?" 

Jerry thought for a moment and then agreed. 
The salesman eyed Jerry again. 

"Let's see... 34 sleeve and 16-and-a-half neck?" 

Once again, Jerry was surprised. 
"That's right, how did you know?" 

"Like I said, I've been in the business 60 years!" 

So Jerry tried on the shirt, and it was a perfect fit. As Jerry adjusted the collar in the mirror, the salesman asked: "How about new shoes?" Jerry was on a roll and so thought, why not? 
So the salesman eyed Jerry's feet and said: "Let's see... you must be a size nine-and-a-half?" 

Jerry was astonished. "That's right, how did you know?" 
"Well, young fella, I've been in the business long enough to know these things!" 

Jerry tried on the shoes and they were also a remarkable fit. Jerry walked comfortably around the shop and the salesman asked: "So that only leaves the new underwear. How about it?" 

Jerry thought for a second and agreed. 
The salesman stepped back, eyed Joe's waist and said: "Let's see... size 36." 

Jerry laughed. "Ah ha! I got you! I've worn size 34 since I was 18 years old." 
The salesman shook his head. "There's no way. I'm never wrong. You can't wear a size 34." 

"Oh yes I can," replied Jerry and have been most of my life. 
"I don't understand," said the tailor. "By my reckoning a 34 underwear would press your testicles up 
against the base of your spine and give you one hell of a headache."
***
Irish Humor
John O'Reilly hoisted his beer and said, "Here's to spending the rest of me life, between the legs of me wife !"
That won him the top prize at the pub for the best toast of the night !   He went home and told his wife, Mary, "I won the prize for the Best toast of the night."   She said, "Aye, did ye now. And what was your toast?" John said, "Here's to spending the rest of me life, sitting in church beside me wife."   "Oh, that is very nice indeed, John!" Mary said.
The next day, Mary ran into one of John's drinking buddies on the street corner. The man chuckled leeringly and said, "John won the prize the other night at The pub with a toast about you, Mary."   She said, "Aye, he told me, and I was a bit surprised myself. You know, he's only been in there twice in the last four years. "Once I had to pull him by the ears to make him come, and the other time he fell asleep."
***
A homeless mans funeral.
As a bagpiper, I play many places. Recently I was asked by a funeral director to play at a graveside service for a homeless man. He had no family  or friends, so the service was to be at a pauper's cemetery in the Kentucky back country.

As I was not familiar with the backwoods, I got lost and, being a typical man, I didn't stop for directions.

I finally arrived an hour late and saw the funeral guy had evidently gone and the hearse was nowhere in sight. There were only the diggers and crew left and they were eating lunch.

I felt bad and apologized to the men for being late. I went to the side of the grave and looked down and the vault lid was already in place. I didn't know what else to do, so I started to play.

The workers put down their lunches and began to gather around. I played out my heart and soul for this man with no family and friends. I played like I've never played before for this homeless man.

And as I played 'Amazing Grace,' the workers began to weep. They wept, I wept, we all wept together. When I finished I packed up my bagpipes and started for my car. Though my head hung low, my heart was full.

As I opened the door to my car, I heard one of the workers say, "I never seen nothin' like that before and I've been putting in septic tanks for twenty years."

Apparently I'm still lost.... 
***
A C, an E-flat, and a G go into a bar...
A C, an E-flat, and a G go into a bar. The bartender says: "Sorry, but we don't serve minors." So, the E-flat leaves, and the C and the G have an open fifth between them.

After a few drinks, the fifth is diminished and the G is out flat. An F comes in and tries to augment the situation, but is not sharp enough.

A D comes into the bar and heads straight for the bathroom saying, "Excuse me. I'll just be a second."
An A comes into the bar, but the bartender is not convinced that this relative of C is not a minor. Then the bartender notices a B-flat hiding at the end of the bar and exclaims: "Get out now! You're the seventh minor I've found in this bar tonight."

Eventually, the C sobers up, and realizes in horror that he's under a rest.
The C is brought to trial, is found guilty of contributing to the diminution of a minor, and is sentenced to 10 years of DS without Coda at an upscale correctional facility.
***
Husband went to the sheriff's department to report that his wife was missing.
Husband went to the sheriff's department to report that his wife was missing.
 
Husband:  My wife is missing. She went shopping yesterday and has not come home... 

Sergeant:  What is her height?
 
Husband:  Gee, I'm not sure. A little over five-feet tall.
 
Sergeant:  Weight?
 
Husband:  Don't know. Not slim, not really fat.
 
Sergeant:  Color of eyes?
 
Husband:  Sort of brown I think. Never really noticed.
 
Sergeant:  Color of hair?
 
Husband:  Changes a couple times a year. Maybe dark brown now. I can’t remember.
 
Sergeant:  What was she wearing?
 
Husband:  Could have been pants, or maybe a skirt or shorts. I don't know exactly.
 
Sergeant:  What kind of car did she go in?
 
Husband:  She went in my truck. 

Sergeant:  What kind of truck was it?
 
Husband:  A 2015 Ford F150 King Ranch 4X4 with eco-boost 5.0L V8 engine, special ordered with manual transmission and climate controlled air conditioning. It has a custom matching white cover for the bed, which has a matching aftermarket bed liner. Custom leather 6-way seats and "Bubba" floor mats. Trailer package with gold hitch and special wiring hook-ups. DVD with full GPS navigation, satellite radio receiver, 23-channel CB radio, six cup holders, a USB port, and four power outlets. I added special alloy wheels and off-road Michelins. It has custom running boards and indirect wheel well lighting.
 
At this point the husband started choking up.
 
Sergeant:  Don't worry buddy. We'll find your truck. 
***
Why I fired my secretary
Last week was my birthday and I didn't feel very well waking up on that morning. I went downstairs for breakfast hoping my wife would be pleasant and say, 
"Happy Birthday!", and possibly have a small present for me. As it turned out, she barely said good morning, let alone "Happy Birthday." 

I thought... Well, that's marriage for you, but the kids... They will remember.

My kids came bounding down stairs to breakfast and didn't say a word. So when I left for the office, I felt pretty low and somewhat despondent. 

As I walked into my office, my secretary Jane said, 
"Good Morning Boss, and by the way Happy Birthday!" 
It felt a little better that at least someone had remembered. I worked until one o'clock, when Jane knocked on my door and said, "You know, It's such a beautiful day outside, and it is your Birthday, what do you say we go out to lunch, just you and me." 

I said, "Thanks, Jane, that's the greatest thing I've heard all day. Let's go!"

We went to lunch. But we didn't go where we normally would go. 

She chose instead a quiet bistro with a private table. 
We had two Martinis each and I enjoyed the meal tremendously.

On the way back to the office, Jane said, "You know, It's such a beautiful day... We don't need to go straight back to the office, do we?" 

I responded, "I guess not. What do you have in mind?" 
She said, "Let's drop by my apartment, it's just around the corner."

After arriving at her apartment, Jane turned to me and said, 
"Boss, if you don't mind, I'm going to step into the bedroom for just a moment. I'll be right back."

"Okay," I nervously replied. She went into the bedroom and, after a couple of minutes, she came out carrying a huge birthday cake. 

Followed by my wife, my kids, and dozens of my friends and co-workers, all singing "Happy birthday".
And I just sat there...

On the couch...

Sobbing...

Naked...

and erect.
***
A duck walks into a pub and orders a pint of beer and a ham sandwich.
A duck walks into a pub and orders a pint of beer and a ham sandwich.

The bartender looks at him and says, "Hang on! You're a duck."

"I see your eyes are working," replies the duck.

"And you can talk!" exclaims the bartender.

"I see your ears are working, too," says the duck. "Now if you don't mind, can I have my beer and my sandwich please?"

"Certainly, sorry about that" says the bartender as he pours the duck a pint. "It's just we don't get many ducks in this pub. What are you doing around this way?"

"I'm working on the building site across the road," explains the duck. "I'm a plasterer."

The flabbergasted bartender cannot believe the duck and wants to learn more, but takes the hint when the duck pulls out a newspaper from his bag and proceeds to read it.

So, the duck reads his paper, drinks his beer, eats his sandwich, bids the barman good day and leaves.

The same thing happens for two weeks.

Then one day the circus comes to town.

The ringmaster comes into the pub for a pint and the bartender says to him:

"You're with the circus, aren't you? Well, I know this duck that could be just brilliant in your circus. He talks, drinks beer, eats sandwiches, reads the newspaper and everything!"

"Sounds marvelous," says the ringmaster, handing over his business card. "Get him to give me a call."

So the next day when the duck comes into the pub the bartender says, "Hey Mr. Duck, I reckon I can line you up with a top job, paying really good money."

"I'm always looking for the next job," says the duck. "Where is it?"

"At the circus," says the bartender.

"The circus?" repeats the duck.

"That's right," replies the bartender.

"The circus?" the duck asks again. "With the big TENT?"

"Yeah!" the bartender replies.

"With all the animals who live in CAGES, and performers who live in CARAVANS?" says the duck.

"Of course," the bartender replies.

"And the tent has CANVAS sides and a big canvas roof with a hole in the middle?" persists the duck.

"That's right!" says the bartender.

The duck shakes his head in amazement, and says: "What would they want with a plasterer??"

***
2 Christians are lost in the Arabian desert
The first day is hot, and they're miserable after running out of food and water.  The night is surprisingly cold and even worse than the day.  The second day and night are even worse.

On the third morning, hotter than the past 2 days, they see a mosque.  "We're saved!" exclaims one.  The other is wary and says he doesn't think they'll help Christians.  The first says he doesn't care, he's so hungry he'd rather be killed than starve.  The second one decides to tell them he's Muslim.

They arrive and the first man says he's Christian and asks for help.  The Muslims are very friendly and tell him they have plenty of food and water for him.  The second one tells them he's Muslim.  The reply: "Salaam, brother!  Happy Ramadan!"
***
So Cinderella was crying...
...when her fairy godmother shows up. She asks poor Cinderella, "What's troubling you, my dear?" "My sisters have all gone to the ball, but I can't! I have nothing to wear and no way to go..." cried Cinderella. "Oh fret not. Let me handle this for you," said the fairy godmother. "But first, you have to bring me all the pumpkins you can find."

So Cinderella set off to look for all pumpkins she could find and rolled them back. Then her fairy godmother turned 1 into a beautiful golden
carriage, 2 into majestic stallions, 2 into a beautiful pair of glass slippers and 1 into the most elegant and gorgeous white gown you could ever imagine. But Cinderella kept on crying.

"Why are you still troubled, sweetie? You've got everything you need to go to the ball!"

"But I... I... I'm on my period now. I can't wear that white dress," replied Cinderella.

"Don't worry honey," said her fairy godmother, and she turned to look at the garden, only to find the largest pumpkin left, which she turned into a tampon. 

And at midnight, Cinderella died.
***
Jesus and Satan were having an ongoing argument about who was better on the computer...
They had been going at it for days, and God was tired of hearing all of the bickering. Finally God said, "Cool it! I am going to set up a test that will run two hours, and I will judge who does the better job."

So Satan and Jesus sat down at the keyboards and typed away. They moused. They did spreadsheets. They wrote reports. They sent faxes. They sent emails. They sent out emails with attachments. They downloaded. They did some genealogy reports. They made cards. They did every known job. But 10 minutes before their time was up, lightning suddenly flashed across the sky, thunder clapped, the rain poured, and, of course, the electricity went off.

Satan stared at his blank screen and screamed every curse word known in the underworld. Jesus just sighed. The electricity finally flickered back on, and each of them restarted their computers. Satan started searching frantically and screamed, "It's gone! It's all gone! I lost everything when the power went off!"

Meanwhile, Jesus quietly started printing out all of his files from the past two hours of diligent work. Satan observed this and became irate. "Wait! He cheated! How did he do it?"

God shrugged and said, "Jesus saves."
***
In 1941, a German boy named Hans was listening to the radio.
Over the radio, Hitler announced that Germany was now going to war with the United States.

"Father, where's the United States?" asked Hans. His father pointed on a map to the continental nation in North America.

"And I'm told we're already at war with Russia," the curious lad continued. "Where is Russia?" His father pointed to where Soviet Russia lay in all its time zone-hogging glory.

"And we're also at war with the British Empire," added Hans. "Where is that?" His father pointed out all the territories of the empire upon which the sun never set.

"And where is Germany?" asked Hans. His father pointed to their country in central Europe.

Hans thought for a moment and then said, "Father, has Hitler seen this map?"
***
Einstein, Newton, and Pascal are hanging out one afternoon.
Einstein is bored, so he suggests, "Let's play hide-and-seek. I'll be it!"

The others agree, so Einstein begins counting. "One... Two... Three..."

Pascal runs off right away to find a place to hide.

But Newton merely takes out a piece of chalk and draws a 1 meter x 1 meter square. He finishes and steps into the square just as Einstein shouts, "Ready or not -- here I come!"

Einstein looks up and immediately spots Newton standing right in front of him. He says, "I found you, Pascal!"
***
The blind Walmart clerk
My teacher was telling us about this joke today so I thought I would share.

A woman goes into Wal-Mart to buy a rod and reel for her grandson's
birthday. She doesn't know which one to get so she just grabs one and 
goes over to the counter. A Wal-Mart associate is standing there wearing
dark shades.

She says, "Excuse me, sir. Can you tell me anything about this rod
and reel?"

He says, "Ma'am, I'm completely blind; but if you'll drop it on the
counter, I can tell you everything you need to know about it from the 
sound it makes.

She doesn't believe him but drops it on the counter anyway.

He says, "That's a six-foot Shakespeare graphite rod with a Zebco 404
reel and 10-lb Test line. It's a good all around combination; and it's
on sale this week for only $20.00."

She says, "It's amazing that you can tell all that just by the sound
of it dropping on the counter. I'll take it!" As she opens her purse, her
credit card drops on the floor.

"Oh, that sounds like a Master Card," he says.

She bends down to pick it up and accidentally breaks wind. At first
she is really embarrassed, but then realizes there is no way the blind clerk
could tell it was she who farted. Being blind, he wouldn't know that she
was the only person around.

The man rings up the sale and says, "That'll be $34.50 please. "

The woman is totally confused by this and asks, "Didn't you tell me it was on sale for $20.00? How did you get $34.50?"

He replies, "Yes, Ma'am. The rod and reel is $20.00, but the Duck
Call Is $11.00 and the Catfish Bait is $3.50."
***
'Reincarnation' - My favourite joke of all time
Dave comes home from the pub, drunkest he's been in a long time, and collapses into bed next to his sleeping wife.  Later, he's woken by a brilliant flash of light at the end of his bed, which his still sleeping wife seems oblivious to.  St. Peter appears in all his glory, standing over the two of them.

"You have died my son, of alcohol poisoning" says St. Peter.  Dave is obviously distraught and begs and pleads with the saint to be given another chance at life.

"Well..." says St. Peter, thumbing through his saintly handbook, "There is a little known rule which might help.  Apparently you can be reincarnated in special circumstances if you wish, but only as a dog or as a chicken I'm afraid.."  Dave, living next door to a chicken farm, agrees to be reincarnated as a chicken, at least so he can still see his wife.

BOOM, the man is suddenly now a chicken, pecking around the chicken farm.  A rooster approaches him and says "Hey! You must be the new arrival here!  How's everything going?"  "Pretty good" says Dave, "though my stomach feels a bit funny.."  "Well you're obviously about to lay an egg!  Give it a try; push one out!"  So Dave wriggles and squirms and wriggles and squirms and out pops a nice egg!

"That felt great!" thinks Dave, "I think I'll lay another one!"  So again he wriggles and squirms and wriggles and squirms and then !!BANG!!  His wife angrily slaps him on the back of his head and screams in a rage: "For Christ's sake David!!  You've shit the bed again!!!"


***
Man meets Smoking Hot Sexologist on an Airplane...
A man walks onto an airplane, and he's cranky as hell. It was an early morning, security held him up, and all he wants to do is sleep until the plane reaches New York. However his mood does a 180 when he gets to his seat and see the most angelic blonde woman he has ever seen sitting next to him. He smiles awkwardly, receiving a warm and friendly smile from said bombshell. After about 30 minutes of sitting there he finally convinces himself to say something,

"So, business or pleasure?"

Smiling, she replies, "Business actually! I'm a sexologist, and Im headed to a conference in New York". 

Eyes widened and breathing intensified, he says "Oh really?! What does that entail?"

"Well, my particular area of study revolves around sexual trends, stereotypes and myths" , she says, "and we've actually found some pretty exciting new stuff". 

"Like what?"

"Well, you know the myth that black guys have the largest dicks?", she asks. 

"Well yeah, everyone knows that one."

"Its actually Native American men", she says with a smirk.

"Wow, I never would've thought of that", he said.

"I know right? Also, you know how they say Italians are the most attentive lovers?", she asks.

"Not really, but i guess it makes sense", he replies. 

"Turns out it's actually Jewish Men", she says.

"That one I really didn't expect", he says, laughing.

"Well its true! We've also uncovered some new trends. We recently found out that on average rednecks last the longest in bed", she says. 

"No kidding!", the man says. 

"I'm so sorry", the woman says, "Here I am talking all about myself and what I do and I don't even know your name!"

The guy holds out his hand and goes, "My name is Squanto Berkowitz but all my friends call me Bubba".
***
49ers Fan
On the first day of school, a first grade teacher explains to her class that she's a Seahawks fan. She asks her students to raise their hands if they, too, are Seahawks fans. Wanting to impress their teacher, everyone in the class raises their hand except one little girl. The teacher looks at the girl with surprise, 'Janie, why didn't you raise your hand? 'Because I'm not a Seahawks fan' she replied. The teacher, still shocked, asked, 'Well, if you aren't a Seahawks fan, then who are you a fan of?' 'I'm a 49ers fan, and proud of it,' Janie replied. The teacher could not believe her ears. 'Janie please tell us why you're a 49ers fan?' "Because my mom's a 49ers fan, and my dad's a 49ers fan, so I'm a 49ers fan too!" "Well" said the teacher in a obviously annoyed tone, 'that's no reason for you to be a 49ers fan. You don't have to be like your parents all of the time. What if your mom was an idiot and your dad was a moron, what would you be?' Janie smiled and said 'I'd be a Seahawks fan.'
***
A plane leaves JFK airport under the control of a Jewish captain, Josh Weinberg.
It is the first time he has flown with his Chinese co-pilot Bo Weng and an awkward silence between the two seems to indicate a mutual dislike.

After this protracted silence has continued for a while, the Captain mutters, 'I don't like the Chinese.. .' 

'No rike Chinese?' asks the copilot, 'why not?'

'You people bombed Pearl Harbour , that's why!'

'No, no', the co-pilot protests, 'Chinese not bomb Per Hahbah. That Japanese, not Chinese. Japanese do that'.

'Japanese, Chinese, Vietnamese....Doesn't matter to me: you're all alike!'

The silence continues on until the co-pilot suddenly announces 'I no rike Jews anyway' .

'Oh yeah, and why not?' asks the captain.

'Jews sink Titanic' says the co-pilot.

'You're nuts' exclaims the captain, 'Jews didn't sink the Titanic!' , 'It was an iceberg!'

'Iceberg, Goldberg, Greenberg, Rosenberg, no mattah to me...all bruddy same!!'
***
Jesus and Satan were having an on-going argument about who was better on the computer.
They had been going at it for days, and frankly God was tired of hearing all the bickering.   

Finally fed up, God said, 'THAT'S IT! I have had enough. I am going to setup a test that will run for two hours, and from those results, I will judge who does the better job.' 
So Satan and Jesus sat down at the keyboards and typed away.   

They moused.   
They faxed.   
They e-mailed.   
They e-mailed with attachments.   
They downloaded.   
They did spreadsheets!   
They wrote reports.   
They created labels and cards.   
They created charts and graphs.   
They did some genealogy reports .  
They did every job known to man.     

Jesus worked with heavenly efficiency and Satan was faster than hell. 
Then, ten minutes before their time was up, lightning suddenly flashed across the sky, thunder rolled, rain poured, and, of course, the power went off. 
Satan stared at his blank screen and screamed every curse word known in the underworld.   

Jesus just sighed. 
Finally the electricity came back on, and each of them restarted their computers. Satan started searching frantically, screaming: 'It's gone! It's all GONE! 'I lost everything when the power went out!' 
Meanwhile, Jesus quietly started printing out all of his files from the past two hours of work.   

Satan observed this and became irate. 
'Wait!' he screamed. 'That's not fair! He cheated! How come he has all his work and I don't have any?' 
  
God just shrugged and said, 
JESUS SAVES...
***
A Texan walks into a pub in Ireland
He clears his voice to the crowd of drinkers.
He says, “I hear you Irish are a bunch of hard drinkers. I’ll give $500 American dollars to anybody in here who can drink 10 pints of Guinness back-to-back.”
The room is quiet and no one takes up the Texan’s offer. One man even leaves. Thirty minutes later the same gentleman who left shows back up and taps the Texan on the shoulder. “Is your bet still good?”, asks the Irishman.
The Texan says yes and asks the bartender to line up 10 pints of Guinness. Immediately the Irishman tears into all 10 of the pint glasses drinking them all back-to-back. The other pub patrons cheer as the Texan sits in amazement.
The Texan gives the Irishman the $500 and says, “If ya don’t mind me askin’, where did you go for that 30 minutes you were gone?”
The Irishman replies, “Oh…I had to go to the pub down the street to see if I could do it first”.
***
The Unemployed Engineer
An engineer who was unemployed for a long time decided to open a medical clinic. He puts a sign outside the clinic: 
"A cure for your ailment guaranteed at $500; we'll pay you $1,000 if we fail." 
A Doctor thinks this is a good opportunity to earn $1,000 and goes to his clinic.  Doctor: "I have lost my sense of taste."  Engineer: "Nurse, please bring the medicine from box 22 and put 3 drops in the patient's mouth."  Doctor: "This is Gasoline!"  Engineer: "Congratulations! You've got your taste back. That will be $500."  

 The Doctor gets annoyed and goes back after a couple of days later to recover his money.  Doctor: "I have lost my memory, I cannot remember anything."  Engineer: "Nurse, please bring the medicine from box 22 and put 3 drops in the patient's mouth."  Doctor: "But that is Gasoline!"  Engineer: "Congratulations! You've got your memory back. That will be $500."  

 The Doctor leaves angrily and comes back after several days, more determined than ever to make his money back. Doctor: "My eyesight has become weak."  Engineer: "Well, I don't have any medicine for this. Take this $1,000," passing the doctor a $500 note. Doctor: "But this is $500..."  Engineer: "Congratulations! You've got your vision back! That will be $500."
***
A man and his wife were sharing their very first wedding anniversary... (NSFW)
The wife says "Honey, I'll do anything you want for you tonight"

Husband replies "Nice! How about a 69er!"

"I can't, I'm on my period!"

"I don't give a fuck!"

"Well" she says, "if you don't care then I certainly don't, let's do it."

So they are going at it for a bit when the dorbell rings, and the husband says "Fuck sakes, who could that be? Go answer the door hun"

She says "Fucking look at me! I'm a mess! I can't answer the door! YOU answer it!"

"Look at my face! I can't go out there looking like this!"

She says "Just tell them you were eating a jam sandwich and got carried away"

"Alright" the man says, and proceeds to answer the door.

It was the mailman. "Hi I have a delivery fo...WHAT IN THE FUCK!?"

Husband says "Ohhh don't mind my face, I was eating a jam sandwich and I got a little crazy with it."

Mailman replies, "Sir I wasn't looking at the jam on your mouth, I was looking at the peanut butter on your forehead."
***
It was the best KISS hed ever had.
A group of HELLS ANGELS, South Carolina bikers were riding east on 378 when they saw a girl about to jump off the Pee Dee River Bridge. So they stopped.
 
George, their leader, a big burly man of 53, gets off his Harley, walks through a group of gawkers, past the State Trooper who was trying to talk her down off the railing, and says,
"Hey Baby . . . whatcha doin' up there on that railin'?"
 
She says tearfully, "I'm going to commit suicide!!"
 
While he didn't want to appear "sensitive," George also didn't want to miss this "be-a-legend" opportunity either so he asked . . . "Well, before you jump, Honey-Babe . . .
why don't you give ol' George here your best last kiss?"
 
So, with no hesitation at all, she leaned back over the railing and did just that . . .
and it was a long, deep, lingering kiss followed immediately by another even better one.
 
After they breathlessly finished, George gets a big thumbs-up approval from his biker-buddies, the onlookers, and even the State Trooper, and then says, "Wow! That was the best kiss I have ever had! That's a real talent you're wasting there, Sugar Shorts. You could be famous if you rode with me. Why are you committing suicide?"
 
"My parents don't like me dressing up like a girl."

It's still unclear if she jumped or was pushed. 
 
***
12 of my favorite anti-jokes.
1. A horse walks into a bar, several of the patrons get up and leave quickly after assessing the danger of the situation.

2. How do you confuse a blonde? 
Paint yourself green and throw forks at her.

3. What's red and smells like blue paint?
Red Paint.

4. I like my women like I like my coffee. Without a penis.

5. What's red and bad for your teeth? A brick.

6. Why doesn't jesus play hockey?
Because soccer and baseball are much more popular in mexico.

7. What's green and has wheels? 
Grass, I lied about the wheels.

8. What do a banana and a helicopter have in common?
Neither is a police officer.

9. Why isn't Helen Keller a good driver?
Because she's dead.

10. Why did the old lady put roller skates on her walker?
She has dementia.

11. Why did the dinosaur break through the brick wall?
I don't know, that's why I'm asking you the question.

12. An owl and a squirrel are sitting in a tree. The squirrel looks at the owl and says, nothing because animals can't talk. The owl then continues to eat the squirrel, because it's a bird of prey.

Bonus!: A gorilla walks into a bar and says to the bartender, "I'd like a banana martini please." The bartender thinks this is a little peculiar and becomes aware that he's actually dreaming. He wakes up and begins to tell his wife about the crazy dream he just had. His wife ignores him, and the man cries through the rest of the night with the realization that his marriage is in shambles.
***
"Turks have 3 problems..."
An Italian man walks into a nightclub wearing a shirt that says "Turks have 3 problems". 

A turkish man approaches him and asks: "What the f*** is your shirt suppposed to mean?""

The Italian says: "See, that is your first problem. You turks are way too curious"

The Turkish man walks away and comes back later with a friend and threatens the Italian.

The Italian says: "See, that is your second problem. You turks are way too agressive."

The two men walk away and when at the end of the evening the Italian leaves the nightclub, the Turkish man is waiting outside with 5 friends. They all have their knives out.

The Italian says: "See that is your third problem."

"You brought knives to a gunfight"
***
Six retired Irishmen were playing poker in O'Leary's apartment...
...when Paddy Murphy loses $500 on a single hand, clutches his chest, and drops dead at the table. Showing respect for their fallen brother, the other five continue playing standing up.
Michael O'Connor looks around and asks, 'Oh, me boys, someone got's to tell Paddy's wife.. Who will it be?'


They draw straws. Paul Gallagher picks the short one. They tell him to be discreet, be gentle, don't make a bad situation any worse.


'Discrete??? I'm the most discreet Irishmen you'll ever meet. Discretion is me middle name. Leave it to me.'


Gallagher goes over to Murphy's house and knocks on the door. Mrs. Murphy answers, and asks what he wants.


Gallagher declares, 'Your husband just lost $500, and is afraid to come home.'


'Tell him to drop dead!', says Murphy's wife..


'I'll go tell him.' says Gallagher.
***
3 men are walking through the jungle when they get taken by cannibals
They beg for their lives are given the chance of freedom - they have to go out into the jungle and collect 10 pieces of the same fruit.

So off they go and not long after the 1st man returns with 10 apples. This is when he is told about the 2nd part of the deal

"You must insert all of those pieces of fruit up your ass without making a sound and you are free to go" says the chief

Sweating a bit the man agrees and starts inserting the apples. He does quite well but as he gets to the 4th apple he winces and yells out in pain

As qucik as a flash he is executed and prepared for lunch

Short time later the 2nd man returns with 10 berries and is told the same story as the 1st guy.

"Well" he thinks "Piece of cake this!" and proceeds to insert the berries. 1, 2, 3 etc... getting there... 8, 9 and then all of a sudden he bursts out laughing and is swiftly killed and prepared for dinner.

1st and 2nd guy meet up in heaven and start chatting

"Why did you laugh?!" the 1st guy asks? "You were so close to getting free!"

"Well.." he says with a sad grin "I was just about to put the last berry up my ass when I looked over to the path into the jungle and I see the 3rd guy walking around the bend with a big smile on his face and an armful of pineapples!"
***
Bad news, good news, really great news
Hopefully not a repost - 
The day after his wife disappeared in a kayaking accident in the Bay of Fundy, Nova Scotia, a man answered his door to find two grim-faced Mounties. "We know it's late, sir, but we have some information about your wife," said one of the Mounties.

"Tell me! Did you find her!?" the husband shouted.

The Mounties looked at each other. One said, "We have some bad news, some good news, and some really great news. Which do you want to hear first?" Fearing the worst, the ashen husband said "Give me the bad news first."

The second Mountie said, "I'm sorry to tell you, sir, but this morning we found your wife's body in the bay."

"Oh my God!" exclaimed the husband.

Swallowing hard, he asked, "What's the good news?"

The Mountie continued, "When we pulled her up, she had 6 twenty-five pound snow crabs and 12 good-size lobsters clinging to her."

Stunned, the husband demanded, "If that's the good news, what's the great news???"

The Mountie answered, "We're gonna pull her up again tomorrow".
***
Old man goes to a doctor...
Old man, well into his eighties, goes to a doctor for a regular checkup.

The doctor examines him, makes several tests, looks at him and he can't believe what he sees. He says:

"Old man, this can't be true! You're old, but you're healthy as a teenager. No hypertension, no elevated sugar levels, your ECG is perfect... How is that possible?"

"Well" old man replies "probably because I'm physically active. You see, I walk every day, I go fishing regulary..."

"No" the doctor interrupts him "that couldn't possibly explain this phenomenon. This must be genetic. Tell me, how old was your father when he died?"

"My father is not dead! - the old man replies - He's alive and well just as I am. We go fishing together."

The doctor is gobsmacked. With a shaky voice, he asks:

"How old is he?"

"Almost a hundred. He married young."

"Wow! This is phenomenal! Now, how about your grandfather? Can you remember how old was he when he died?"

"He's not dead either! He's almost 120."

Now the doctor is skeptical.

"I guess he too goes fishing with you and your father?"

"Oh, no, this week he'll be at home, he's preparing for his wedding"

"He's getting married at 120?"

"Well, he doesn't really want to, but his parents are nagging him..."
***
An engineer quit his job and decided to open a clinic...
He hung a sign saying," I will cure your illness for $500 otherwise, if I fail to cure it, I will pay you $1500."

A doctor was curious and assumed that he could easily exploit this, so he walked into the clinic and told the engineer,“ I have lost my taste."

Upon hearing this, the engineer told his assistant to get a tablespoon of kerosene and give it to the doctor. When he tasted the kerosene, the doctor spat it out and exclaimed," That was terrible!"

The engineer smirked and replied," That would be $500." The doctor paid and left grumbling

Still determined, the doctor went back to the clinic and told the engineer this time," I have lost my memory!"

The engineer told his assistant to give the doctor another tablespoon of kerosene. When the doctor heard it, he immediately stopped the assistant. 

The engineer, once again, laughed and told the doctor," That would be $500." The doctor paid and left

Even more determined, the doctor marched into the clinic and told the engineer," I have lost my vision." The engineer thought for a moment and sighed and replied, " I do not have a cure for that, I will write you the check for $1500." So, he goes off and begins to write a check.

The doctor smirked and waited for the engineer. When the engineer came back, he handed the doctor the check and left.

"WAIT! This check only has $200, are you trying to cheat me?" the doctor exclaimed. But at that moment, the doctor realised his fault.

"That would be another $500, thank you." the engineer replied, laughing.
***
Roger and Jenny on their wedding night . . .
Roger, 85, married Jenny, a lovely 25 year old.

Since her new husband is so old, Jenny decides that after their wedding she and Roger should have separate bedrooms, because she is concerned that her new but aged husband may over-exert himself if they spend the entire night together. 

After the wedding festivities Jenny prepares herself for bed and the expected knock on the door. Sure enough the knock comes, the door opens and there is Roger, her 85 year old groom, ready for action. They unite as one. All goes well, Roger takes leave of his bride, and she prepares to go to sleep. 

After a few minutes, Jenny hears another knock on her bedroom door, and it's Roger, Again he is ready for more 'action'. Somewhat surprised, Jenny consents for more coupling. When the newlyweds are done, Roger kisses his bride, bids her a fond good night and leaves. 

She is set to go to sleep again, but, aha, you guessed it - Roger is back again, rapping on the door and is as fresh as a 25-year-old, ready for more 'action'. And, once more they enjoy each other. 

But as Roger gets set to leave again, his young bride says to him, 'I am thoroughly impressed that at your age you can perform so well and so often. I have been with guys less than a third of your age who were only good once. You are truly a great lover, Roger.' 

Roger, somewhat embarrassed, turns to Jenny and says: 'You mean I've been here already tonight?'
***
The Bacon Tree
Two Mexicans are stuck in the desert after crossing into the United States , wandering aimlessly and starving. They are about to just lie down and wait for death, when all of a sudden Luis says.........

"Hey Pepe, do you smell what I smell. Ees bacon, I theenk."

"Si, Luis, eet sure smells like bacon. "

With renewed hope they struggle up the next sand dune, & there, in the distance, is a tree loaded with bacon.

There's raw bacon, there's fried bacon, back bacon, double smoked bacon ... Every imaginable kind of cured pork.

"Pepe, Pepe, we ees saved. Ees a bacon tree."

"Luis, maybe ees a meerage? We ees in the desert don't forget."

"Pepe, since when deed you ever hear of a meerage that smell like bacon...ees no meerage, ees a bacon tree."

And with that, Luis staggers towards the tree. He gets to within 5 metres, Pepe crawling close behind, when suddenly a machine gun opens up, and Luis drops like a wet sock. Mortally wounded, he warns Pepe with his dying breath,

"Pepe... Go back man, you was right, ees not a bacon tree!"

"Luis, Luis MI amigo... What ees it? "

"Pepe.. Ees not a bacon tree. Ees


Ees


Ees


Ees


Ees a ham bush...."
***
Copper Wire
After having dug to a depth of 10 feet last year, French scientists found traces of copper wire dating back 200 years and came to the conclusion that their ancestors already had a telephone network more than 150 years ago.

Not to be outdone by the French: in the weeks that followed, American archaeologists dug to a depth of 20 feet before finding traces of copper wire. Shortly afterwards, they published an article in the New York Times saying : "American archaeologists, having found traces of 250-year-old copper wire, have concluded that their ancestors already had an advanced high-tech communications network 50 years earlier than the French."

A few weeks later, ‘The British Archaeological Society of Northern England’ reported the following: "After digging down to a depth of 33 feet in the Skipton area of North Yorkshire in 2011, Charlie Hardcastle, a self-taught amateur archaeologist, reported that he had found absolutely f&*%  all. Charlie has therefore concluded that 250 years ago, Britain had already gone wireless."

***
One American Soldier
My apologies if this has been told here already (I haven't found it yet). A military buddy of mine told me this when he got back home:



One day during the Gulf War, an Iraqi general and his army were patrolling through semi-mountainous terrain. Suddenly, over one of the hills they hear a soldier.

"One American soldier can take out 10 Iraqi soldiers!"

The Iraqi general smirks, then sends 10 of his soldiers over the hill. A brief firefight ensues, and then everything goes quiet...

"One American soldier can take out 100 Iraqi soldiers!"

The Iraqi general is rightfully impressed, so he laughs and sends 100 of his soldiers over the hill to finish the job. A large battle is heard over the hill that lasts much longer than the previous fight. Finally, everything calms down...

"One American soldier can take out 1000 Iraqi soldiers!"

The Iraqi general is furious, and sends over 1000 of his best soldiers. A massive and lengthy battle takes place over the hill. During the fight, a wounded Iraqi soldier comes crawling back over the hill toward the general.

"Sir! Do not send any more men! It's a trap! THERE'S TWO OF THEM!!"
***
Old but good
Two Italian me get on a bus.

They sit down and engage in an animated conversation. The lady sitting behind them ignores them at first, but her attention is galvanized when she hears one of the men say the following:

"Emma come first. Den I come. Den two asses come together. I come once-a-more. Two asses, they come together again. I come again and pee twice. Then I come one lasta time." 

"You foul-mouthed swine," retorted the lady indignantly. "In this country we don't talk about our sex lives in public!" 

"Hey, coola down lady," said the man. "Who talkin' abouta sexa? I'm a justa tellin' my frienda how to spella 'Mississippi'."

***
The Jewish tie stand
A fleeing Taliban fighter desperate for water was lost in the Afghanistan desert when he saw something far off in the distance. 

Hoping to find water, he hurried towards ‘the object’ only to find a little old Jewish man at a small stand selling ties. 

The Taliban fighter asked, “Do you have water?!!?”

The Jewish man replied, “I have no water. Would you like to buy a tie? They are only $5.” 

The Taliban fighter shouted, “Idiot! I do not need an over-priced tie. I need water! I should kill you, but I must find water first! "

“Okay” said the old Jewish man, “It does not matter that you do not want to buy a tie and that you hate me. I will show you that I am bigger than that. If you continue over that hill to the east for about two miles, you will find a lovely restaurant. It has all the ice cold water you need. Shalom”. 

Muttering, the Taliban fighter staggered away over the hill. 

Several hours later he staggered back, almost dead. 

"Your fucking brother won’t let me in without a tie”.
***
pint of guiness
On my last trip home I found myself in a pub in Edinburgh.
A group of American tourists came in. One of the Americans said, in a loud voice, "I hear you Scots think your great drinkers. I bet 5,000 pounds that no-one hear can drink 30 pints of Guinness in 30 minutes." 
The bar was silent, the American noticed one Scot leaving, no-one took up the bet.
40 minutes later the Scot returned and said "Hey Yank, is your wee bet still on?"
"Sure" said the American, "30 pints in 30 minutes for 5,000 pounds."
"Aye" replied the Scot, "pour the pints and start the clock."
It was very close but the last drop was consumed with seconds to spare.
"Ok yank, pay up." said the Scot
"I'm happy to pay, here is your money" said the American.
"But tell me, when I first offered the wager I saw you leave. Where did you go?'
The Scot replied, "Well sir, 5,000 pounds is a lot of money to a man like me, so I went to the pub across the road to see if I could do it."
***
A Priest takes a walk down to the docks one day
and runs into a fisherman that attends his church. Upon hearing that the priest has a few hours off the fisherman invites him out to sea to fish with him.

Out at sea it doesn't take long for the fisherman to realize that the priest has no idea how to fish, so he gives him some quick instruction and shows him how to cast his bait out into the water. Within moments the priest manages to reel in the largest fish that the fisherman has ever seen. In the moment of excitement the fisherman exclaims, "Look at the size of that Son-of-a-bitch!"

Immediately the priest becomes disturbed and says, "My son, please don't use such language."

The fisherman, embarrassed and hoping word of this gaffe will not reach the rest of his family, makes up an explanation in a moment of ingenuity, "Oh no father, that's the name of that type of fish, a son-of-a-bitch." He lies, taking advantage of the priests fishing naivete. 

The priest is pacified, and begs forgiveness for jumping to conclusions. The fisherman, relieved, brings the priest back to the docks and drops him off.

The priest lumbers back to the church, with the giant fish in his arms. Upon entering the church he sees the bishop and approaches him, "Bishop, look at the size of this son-of-a-bitch I caught!"

The bishop stands wide-eyed a moment, "Priest, how could a man as holy as you use such language in the house of God?"

The priest calmly explains that it is the name of the fish, and the bishop feeling embarrassed for jumping to conclusions offers to take and clean the fish for the priest. 

After cleaning the fish the bishop takes it to the maid in the kitchen and tells her, "Maid, I want you to cook this son-of-a-bitch for me."

The maid blushes and responds, "Bishop, it may not be my place to say so, but is such language fitting for a man of your stature?"

The bishop laughs haughtily, explains that it's the name of the fish and that he too had made the same mistake only minutes earlier. The maid laughs too, apologizes and cooks the fish.

It just so happens that the Pope decided to stop in for dinner at their church that evening. They are all sitting at the table when the pope says, "Oh, my children, I know that gluttony is a sin but I simply can't stop myself from eating this fish. I must know, where did you get it?"

"I caught the son-of-a-bitch." Said the priest.

"I cleaned the son-of-a-bitch." Said the bishop.

"And I cooked the son-of-a-bitch." Said the maid.

For a moment the pope sat silently, staring at them all wide-eyed. He then slowly removed his hat, kicked off his sandles, put his hands behind his head, kicked his feet up on the table and said, "You know what? You mother fuckers are alright!"
***
So a guy works at a sex shop
And his friend was in the neighbourhood and decided to go in to say hello. After a brief hello and small talk, the shop owner asks his friend if he'll look after the store for 10-15 minutes, while he goes to the bank before it closes. The friend agrees and away he goes.

After 5 minutes, a woman walks in asking about one of the small vibrators on the wall behind him.

"Oh that white one? $25"

She agrees and pays him. After about another 5 minutes, another woman comes in asking about one of the dildos on the shelf.

"That big black one? Well it's kinda pricey, but $60 if you're interested."

She pays him as goes off on her way.

Just before the shop owner returns, another woman enters the store, but looks awfully nervous, as if she doesn't know what she wants, but quickly goes up to the front desk.

"How much for that one on the shelf, the big plaid one?" she asks timidly.

"Well that one's a limited edition, pretty much the only one in the store. It's quite pricey, I'm not sure if it's in your price range...$250."

She quickly thinks it over and says, "what the hell, you only live once! I'll buy it." He bags it up, and as she's exiting the shop, the owner returns.

"Hey thanks again for helping me out." He shakes his hand in gratitude.

"My pleasure," the friend replies.

"Did you manage to sell anything while I was away?" he asks.

"Absolutely. I sold one of your white vibrators for $25" the friend says proudly.

"Great! I sell them for $15."

Then the friend continues, "I sold the big black dildo for $60."

"That's incredible! I charge only $40 for it," the shop owner beams.

"You kidding? That's nothing! I sold your thermos for $250!"
***
So a politician dies...
And ends up standing in front of the pearly gates. Saint Peter looks at him for a second, flicks through his book, and finds his name.

"So, you're a politician..."
"Well, yes, is that a problem?"
"Oh no, no problem. But we've recently adopted a new system for people in your line of work, and unfortunately you will have to spend a day in Hell. After that however, you're free to choose where you want to spend eternity!" 

"Wait, I have to spend a day in Hell??" says the politician.
"Them's the rules" Says St Peter, clicks his fingers, and WOOMPH, the guy dissapears...

And awakes, curled up with his hands over his eyes, knowing he's in Hell. Cautiously, he listens for the screams, sniffs the air for brimstone, and finds... Nothing. Just the smell of, is that fabric softener? And cut grass, this can't be right?

"Open your eyes!" says a voice. "C'mon, wakey wakey, we've only got 24 hours!". Nervously, he uncovers his eyes, looks around, and sees he's in a hotel room. A nice one too. Wait, this is a penthouse suite... And there's a smiling man in a suit, holding a martini.
"Who are you??" The politician asks. "Well, I'm Satan!" says the man, handing him the drink and helping him to his feet. "Welcome to Hell!"
"Wait, this is Hell? But... Where's all the pain and suffering?" he asks.
Satan throws him a wink. "Oh, we've been a bit mis-represented over the years, it's a long story. Anyway, this is your room! The minibar is of course free, as is the room service, there's extra towels next to the hot-tub, and if you need anything, just call reception. But enough of this! It's a beautiful day, and if you'd care to look outside..."
Slightly stunned by the opulent surroundings, the man wanders over to the floor-to-ceiling windows through which the sun is glowing, looks far down, and sees a group of people cheering and waving at him from a golf course.
"It's one of 5 pro-level courses on site, and there's another 6 just a few minutes drive out past the beach and harbour!" says Satan, answering his unasked question.
So they head down in the lift, walk out through the glittering lobby where everyone waves and welcomes the man, as Satan signs autographs and cherrily talks shop with the laughing staff. And as he walks out, he sees the group on the golf course are made up of every one of his old friends, people he's admired for years but never met or worked with, and people whose work he's admired but died long before his career started. And out of the middle of this group walks his wife, with a massive smile and the body she had when she was 20, who throws her arms around him and plants a delicate kiss on his cheek. Everyone cheers and applauds, and as they slap him on the back and trade jokes, his worst enemy arrives, as a 2 foot tall goblin-esque caddy. He spends the day in the bright sunshine on the course, having the time of his life laughing at jokes and carrying important discussions, putting the world to rights with his friends while holding his delighted wife next to him as she gazes lovingly at him. Later, they return to the hotel for dinner and have an enormous meal, perfectly cooked, which descends into a food-fight when someone accidentally throws a bread roll at the next table (where Ghandi is having a game of truth-or-dare with Marylin Monroe). As everyone is falling about laughing and flinging breadsticks at each other, his wife whispers in his ear... And they return to their penthouse suite, and spend the rest of the night making love like they did on their honeymoon. After 6 hours of intense passion, the man falls deep into the 100% Egyptian cotton pillows, and falls into a deep and happy sleep...

And is woken up by St Peter. "So, that was Hell. Wasn't what you were expecting, I bet?"
"No sir!" says the man.
"So then" says St Peter "you can make your choice. It's Hell, which you saw, or Heaven, which has choral singing, talking to God, white robes, and so on".
"Well... I know this sounds strange, but on balance, I think I'd prefer Hell" says the politician.
"Not a problem, we totally understand! Enjoy!" Says St Peter, and clicks his fingers again.

The man wakes up in total darkness, the stench of ammonia filling the air and distant screams the only noise. As he adjusts, he can see the only light is from belches of flame far away, illuminating the ragged remains of people being tortured or burning in a sulphurous ocean. A sudden bolt of lightning reveals Satan next to him, wearing the same suit as before and grinning, holding a soldering iron in one hand and a coil of razor-wire in the other.
"What's this??" He cries. "Where's the hotel?? Where's my wife??? Where's the minibar, the golf-courses, the pool, the restaurant, the free drinks and the sunshine???"

"Ah", says Satan. "You see, yesterday, we were campaigning. But today, you voted..."
***
A Pirate Joke that doesn't end with "ARRRR."
A pirate walks into bar and sits down. The bartender notices that he has a peg leg, a hook for a hand, and a patch over one eye. The pirate orders a beer, and while he's pouring it the bartender asks "So what's the story with the leg?"

"Well it were many a year ago," says the pirate. "I were walkin on the deck a me ship and a rogue wave swept me overboard, and a shark swum up and bit me leg clean off! I swum ashore and were fitted fer a peg leg that very night."

"That's terrible," says the bartender. "What about the hand?"

"Well it were the very next day," says the pirate. "I were walkin on the deck a me ship and a rogue wave swept me overboard again, and a whale came up and bit me hand clean off! I swum ashore and were fitted fer a hook that very night."

"Wow," says the bartender. "So what about the eye?"

"Well it were the very next day," says the pirate. "I were walkin on the deck a me ship, and I were lookin out fer rogue waves, and a seagull flew over and shit right in me eye!"

"Oh man," says the bartender. "And that blinded you?"

"Well no," says the pirate. "But it were me first day with the hook."
***
Two men want to get drunk...
But only have 10 dollars on them. The first guy turns to his friend and says, "I have an idea! Let's go to the deli and buy a salami." The friend is confused but goes along with the plan. They head to the deli, buy the salami and finally head to the bar. They start drinking beer after beer and before they can pay their tab the first guy places the salami between his legs and says, "Here, suck on the salami and they'll kick us out before we even pay!" The friend complies and sure enough the two guys are kicked out the bar. They laugh and celebrate, the plan was a success! So they continue this routine to one bar, then another, and another. Each time they were required to pay the tab the first friend took out the salami and the second bobbed his head on it. Immediately getting them removed from the bars premises. After the last bar hopping the second friend became hungry and said, "Aw man, all these beers have me starving. Where is that salami I want to eat?" The first friend says, "I don't know man, I lost it after the first bar."
***
Two men were sitting next to each other at Murphy’s Pub in London.
After awhile, one bloke looks at the other and says, ‘I can’t help but think, from listening to you, that you’re from Ireland’

The other bloke responds proudly, ‘Yes, that I am!’
 
The first one says, ‘So am I! And where about from Ireland might you be?’ 

The other bloke answers, ‘I’m from Dublin, I am.’ 

The first one responds, ‘So am I!’ 

‘Mother Mary and begora. And what street did you live on in Dublin ?’ 

The other bloke says, ‘A lovely little area it was. I lived on McCleary Street in the old central part of town.’

The first one says, ‘Faith and it’s a small world. So did I! So did I! And to what school would you have been going?’

The other bloke answers, ‘Well now, I went to St. Mary’s, of course.’

The first one gets really excited and says, ‘And so did I. Tell me, what year did you graduate?’
 
The other bloke answers, ‘Well, now, let’s see. I graduated in 1964.’ 

The first one exclaims, ‘The Good Lord must be smiling down upon us! I can hardly believe our good luck at winding up in the same place tonight. Can you believe it, I graduated from St. Mary’s in 1964 my own self!’

About this time, Vicky walks up to the bar, sits down and orders a drink. 

Brian, the barman, walks over to Vicky, shaking his head and mutters, ‘It’s going to be a long night tonight.’ 

Vicky asks, ‘Why do you say that, Brian?’ 

‘The Murphy twins are drunk again.’
***
Saint Peter Decides That Heaven Is Getting Too Full
Upon deciding this Saint Peter decides that only people who have had a really bad day on the day they died will be allowed in.

The first guy comes in and SP says "Sit down and tell me about your day." To which the guy responds "Today was the shittiest of my life. I came home early because I was pretty sure my wife was cheating on me. When I walked in she was naked in the back room so I knew the bastard was around. After searching for a while I couldn't find him but then I hear something out on the balcony. Now see we live in an apartment on the 3rd floor, I knew right away it was him. Sure enough I go out there to see hands hanging on the edge. I got so mad I grabbed the closest thing possible and beat his hands until he fell. Of course though the bastard falls into a patch of bushes and is *still* alive. Without thinking I grab the god damn refrigerator and throw it over the edge but when I did that I had an aneurysm and died."

Saint Peter sits there astounded and goes "Well OK go into heaven, that sounds like a horrible day"

Once the first guy has left another man comes in and SP of course says "Sit down and tell me about your day"

"Man, I dont know man. Just I was up in my apartment doing aerobics on my balcony. I live up on the fourth floor and I slipped. I managed to grab the balcony before me but man.... some maniac came out and beat my hands until I fell. I landed in some bushes and this fucker threw a refrigerator, *a fucking refrigerator* on top of me and I died."

SP is obviously amused at this point and says "Go right on into heaven." As he leaves SP smiles, grins from ear to ear. The day was going good.

The next guy walks in and SP points to the chair containing himself. After a bit he says "Alright tell me about your day."

The third guy grins ear to ear and says "OK so picture this, I'm sitting naked in a refrigerator." 
***
An Italian Boy's Confession:
'Bless me Father, for I have sinned. I have been with a loose girl.' The priest asks, 'Is that you, little Joey Pagano?' 'Yes, Father, it is.' 'And who was the girl you were with?' 'I can't tell you, Father, I don't want to ruin her reputation.' "Well, Joey, I'm sure to find out her name sooner or later so you may as well tell me now. Was it Tina Minetti?" 'I cannot say.' 'Was it Teresa Mazzarelli?' 'I'll never tell.' 'Was it Nina Capelli?' 'I'm sorry, but I cannot name her.' 'Was it Cathy Piriano?' 'My lips are sealed Father.' 'Well then, was it Rosa DiAngelo?' 'Please, Father, I cannot tell you.' 

The priest sighs in frustration. 'You're very tight lipped, and I admire that. But you've sinned and have to atone. You cannot be an altar boy now for 4 months. Now you go and behave yourself.' Joey walks back to his pew, and his friend Franco slides over and whispers, 'What'd you get?' 'Four month's vacation and five excellent Leads.'
***
A Frenchman, an Englishman, a Texan, and a Mexican are riding a plane...
…when the plane's engines fail and it starts to go down.  The pilot grabs one of the parachutes and jumps from the plane.  The remaining passengers see that there is only one chute left, and quickly do the math.

The Englishman stands up, straightens his tie, says "God save the Queen!" and jumps from the plane.

The Frenchman, not wanting to be seen as less noble than the Englishman, says "Vive la France!" and jumps to his death.

The Texan stands up, straightens his cowboy hat, says "Remember the Alamo!" and throws the Mexican out.
***
Buying Condoms....
A sixty year old man walks into a drug store and walks up to the girl at the checkout counter. He asks her, "Do you sell condoms here?"

"Sure. What size are you?"

"I don't know," he replies.

"Well, just let me check," the cashier says. She unzips his pants, takes a feel, and then says over the intercom, "Extra large condoms to the checkout counter please. Extra large condoms to the checkout counter."

A clerk returns with some condoms. The man pays for them and leaves the store.

Later, a thirty year old man walks into the store and up to the checkout counter. He asks the girl, "Do you sell condoms here?"

The cashier replies, "Sure. What size do you need?"

"Well, I don't know."

"Allow me to check for you," she says as she unzips his pants and takes a couple of tugs. She then says over the intercom, "Large condoms to the checkout counter please. Large condoms to the checkout counter."

A clerk returns with some condoms. The man pays for them and leaves the store.

Some time later, a eighteen year old boy, hoping to get lucky, walks up to the girl at the checkout counter and asks sheepishly, "Um, ah, do you guys sell condoms here?"

"Yep," she says. "What size do you need?"

"I don't know," he says nervously.

"Allow me to check for you," she says. The cashier unzips his pants for a feel, pauses for a moment and then says over the intercom, "Clean up at the checkout counter please. Clean up at the checkout counter."

***
A Scottish joke
An Arab sheik was admitted to hospital for heart surgery, but prior to the surgery, the doctors needed to have some of his blood type stored in case the need arose.

As the gentleman had an extremely rare type of blood that couldn't be found locally, the call went out around the world.

Finally a Scotsman was located who had the same rare blood type. After some coaxing, the Scot donated his blood for the  Arab.

After the surgery the Arab sent the Scotsman a new BMW, a diamond necklace for his wife, and  $100,000 in appreciation for the blood donation.

A few months later, the Arab had to undergo a corrective surgery procedure.

Once again, his doctor telephoned the Scotsman who  this time was more than happy to donate his blood.

After the second surgery, the Arab sent the Scotsman a thank-you card  and a box of chocolates. The Scotsman was shocked that  the Arab did not reciprocate his kind gesture as he had anticipated.

He then phoned the Arab and asked him: "I thought you would be more generous than that. Last time you sent me a BMW, diamonds and money, but this time you only sent me a lousy thank-you card and a crappy box of chocolates?"  

To this the Arab replied: "Aye, laddie, but I now have Scottish blood in me veins."
***
Bill and Hillary
When Bill and Hillary first got married Bill said, “I put a box under the bed. You must promise never to look in it.”
In all their 30 years of marriage, Hillary never looked. On the afternoon of their 30th anniversary, curiosity got the best of her and she lifted the lid and peeked inside. In it were 3 empty beer cans and $81,874.25 in cash.

She closed the box and put it back under the bed. Now that she knew what was in the box, she was doubly curious as to why there was such a box and with those contents. That evening, they were out for a special anniversary dinner.
After dinner, Hillary could no longer contain her curiosity and she confessed, saying, “I’m so sorry, Bill. For all these years, I kept my promise and never looked into the box under our bed. However, today the temptation was too much and I gave in. But now I need to know, why do you keep the 3 beer cans in the box?”

Bill thought for a while and said, “I guess after all these years you deserve to know the truth. Whenever I was unfaithful to you, I put an empty beer can in the box under the bed to remind myself not to do it again.”

Hillary was shocked, but said, “Hmmm, Jennifer, Paula and Monica. I’m disappointed and saddened by your behavior; however, since you are addicted to sex I guess it does happen and I guess 3 times is not that bad considering your problem.”

Bill thanked her for being so understanding. They hugged and made their peace. A little while later Hillary asked Bill, “So why do you have all that money in the box?”

He answered, “Well, whenever the box filled up with empty cans, I took them to the recycling center.”
***
A guy walks into a bar with his dog...
A man walks into a bar with a small dog under his arm and sits down at the counter, placing the dog on the stool next to him. The bartender says, "Sorry, pal. No dogs allowed."
The man says, "But this is a special dog -- he talks!"
"Yeah, right," says the bartender. "Now get out of here before I throw you out."
"No, wait," says the man. "I'll prove it." He turns to the dog and asks, "What do you normally find on top of a house?"
"Roof!" says the dog, wagging his tail.
"Listen, pal..." says the bartender.
"Wait," says the man, "I'll ask another question." He turns to the dog again and asks, "What's the opposite of soft?"
"Ruff!" exclaims the dog.
"Quit wasting my time and get out of here," says the bartender.
"One more chance," pleads the man. Turning to the dog again, he asks, "Who was the greatest baseball player that ever lived?"
"Ruth!" barked the dog.
"Okay, that's it!" says the bartender, and physically throws both man and dog out the door and onto the street.
Turning to the man, the dogs shrugs and says, "Maybe I should have said Joe Dimaggio?"

Heard this joke years ago and decided to look it up. 
***
An 18-year-old Italian girl tells her Mom that she thinks she is pregnant.
Very worried, the mother goes to the drugstore and buys a pregnancy kit. The test results show that the girl IS pregnant.

Shouting , cursing, crying…the mother says, “Who wassa dah piga that do thisah to you? Ima wanna know!!”

The girl picks up the phone and makes a call.

Half an hour later, a Ferarri stops in front of their house. A mature and distinguished man with grey hair and impeccably dressed in an Armani suit steps out of the Ferrari and enters the house.

He sits in the livingroom with the father, mother and the girl and tells them, “Good morning, your daughter has informed me of the problem.

I can’t marry her because of my personal family situation, but I’ll take charge. I will pay all costs and provide for your daughter for the rest of her life.

Additionally, if a girl is born, I will bequeath a Ferrari, 2 retail stores, a townhouse, a beach-front villa, and a 2 million dollar bank account.

If a boy is born, my legacy will be a factory and a 3 million dollar bank account. If twins, they will receive a factory each and 4 million dollars each.

However, if there is a miscarriage, what do you suggest I do?

At this point, the father who had remained silent holding a shotgun… places a hand firmly on the man’s shoulder and tells him…

“You gonna try again!!”
***
A guy enters bar carrying an alligator
A guy enters bar carrying an alligator. Says to the patrons, "Here’s a deal. I'll open this alligator's mouth and place my genitals inside. The gator will close his mouth for one minute, then open it, and I'll remove my unit unscathed. If it works, everyone buys me drinks." 

The crowd agrees. The guy drops his pants and puts his privates in the gator's mouth. Gator closes mouth. After a minute, the guy grabs a beer bottle and bangs the gator on the top of its head. The gator opens wide, and he removes his genitals unscathed! 

Everyone buys him drinks. Then he says: "I'll pay anyone $100 who's willing to give it a try." 

After a while, a hand goes up in the back of the bar. 
It's a woman... 

"I'll give it a try," she says, 
"but you have to promise not to hit me on the head with the beer bottle."
***
Classic joke for our Muslim friends today
There were two white christian men, John and Mike, whose plane crashed into a desert. Luckily they survived unharmed. As they traveled through the hot desert looking for food and water, they gave up and sat down, thinking of what to do.

As the dust in the air settled, they suddenly could view a mosque ahead. They became very hopeful. But then John said ''Muslims are there. They might help us if we say we are Muslim.'' Then Mike said ''No way, I won't say I'm Muslim, I'm gonna be honest''.

So John and Mike went to the Mosque ahead and were greeted by an Arab Muslim, who asked what their names were.

John thought of a Muslim name and said, 'My name is Muhammad'. And Mike said 'My name is Mike'.

The Arab man said 'Hello Mike.' And told these other men to take Mike and give him food and drink.

Then he turned to John and said, 'Salaam Muhammad. Ramadan Mubarak! (Hello Muhammad, Happy Ramadan)
***
An anti-semite goes to a bar
An anti-semite is drinking in a bar. He notices a Jew sitting at a table nearby and doesn't like it.

"Bartender!" he says, nodding at the Jew, "A round of the good stuff for everyone except him!"

Everyone happily receives a glass of premium scotch.

The anti-semite looks over at the Jew with a smug grin.

The Jew smiles back.

The anti-semite loses his satisfied expression.

"Bartender! Give everyone a drink of your finest, plus an appetizer!" 

He looks directly at the Jew and adds, "Everyone except the Jew."

The Jewish man looks at the anti-semite, and smiles again.

Furious, the anti-semite says, "Is that Jew just stupid or pretending to be?"

"Oh no, sir, he's the owner."
***
The Husband Store
A brand new store has just opened in New York City that sells husbands. When women go to choose a husband, they have to follow the instructions at the entrance:
"You may visit this store ONLY ONCE! There are 6 floors and the value of the products increase as you ascend the flights. You may choose any item from a particular floor or may choose to go up to the next floor, but you CANNOT go back down except to exit the building!"
So, a woman goes to the Husband Store to find a husband.
The 1st floor sign reads:
Floor 1- These men have jobs.
The 2nd floor sign reads:
Floor 2- These men have jobs and love kids.
The 3rd floor sign reads:
Floor 3: These men have jobs, love kids and are extremely good looking.
"Wow," she thinks, but feels compelled to keep going.
She goes to the 4th floor and the sign reads:
Floor 4- These men have jobs, love kids, are drop-dead good looking and help with housework.
"Oh, mercy me!" she exclaims, "I can hardly stand it!"
Still, she goes to the 5th floor and the sign reads:
Floor 5- These men have jobs, love kids, are drop-dead gorgeous, help with housework and have a strong romantic streak.
She is so tempted to stay. But she goes to the 6th floor and the sign reads:
Floor 6- You are visitor 31,456,012 to this floor. There are no men on this floor. This floor exists solely as proof that women are impossible to please. Thank you for shopping at the Husband Store!!
To avoid gender bias charges, the store's owner opens a New Wives Store across the street.
The 1st floor has wives who love sex.
The 2nd floor has wives who love sex and have money.
The 3rd through 6th floors have never been visited.

***